DVDRip by Ssugar
'The Tandoori's under attack!'
(Radio) 'Loveline is meant for an adult audience.
'Loveline may contain sexually oriented content.
'Listener discretion is advised.
Loveline starts now.'
(Presenter) 'And it is Loveline.
Again that number is 1 -800-LOVE-1 91 .
'Very exciting evening today.
Why don't you introduce our guest?'
(Mike) 'A little guy who started off his career
'in the space-rock band Hawkwind many years ago.
'But you probably know him best
'as the only static member of a band called Motörhead.'
The image of his silhouette holding that Rickenbacker bass, that alone is enough to put shivers up my spine. l'm talking about the man sitting next to me, musical icon Lemmy.
Ah, you romantic fool!
The man's the modern Jesus.
He's fucking Jesus Christ.
Motörhead is my life.
Without Lemmy, there'd be no Motörhead.
There wouldn't be any of the heavy metal we have today.
Rock and roll is Lemmy.
Lemmy is rock and roll.
Rock and roll! d Hey, babe, don't act so scared d All l want is some special care d lf l hear Motörhead, l will bang the whole time!
Lemmy is God. lf they drop a nuclear bomb on this planet,
Lemmy and cockroaches is all that's going to survive. d Move over for a damage case d Hey, babe, wait a minute, stop d
Hey, everybody, it's Loveline.
Lemmy from Motörhead in the house.
Mike Catherwood paying homage.
You know it.
Current CD is Motörizer.
Came out last year. lt's the 24th CD from Motörhead.
Amazing!
Yeah, it amazed me, all right!
35 years ago when the band started, did you think you'd be 25 albums in?
You don't think like that.
You think two years.
You just wanna play with a couple of guys, that's all.
- And then it goes on and on.
- And on! ls it true that over 2,000 women you've bedded?
No. The magazine printed that. l said 1 ,000.
Yeah. That's still pretty impressive.
Not really. l've never been married and l'm 63.
Work it out. lt's not many a year.
- (Dr Drew) l like how he thinks!
- Jason's calling from Canada.
'Lemmy, it's an honour to be talking to you. A true legend.
'l have two quick questions for you.
'Basically, l'd like to know what are your musical influences today.
'The other is your favourite place to play a gig.' l don't mind where we play as long as they go, ''Hooray.''
'lt's cool you're still rocking today and keep up the good work.' l will. Don't forget, l'm not qualified to do anything else!
'The other question was what are your musical...?'
- lnfluences, yeah.
- He anticipates that one!
Your influences are the same when you're my age as when you were 20.
The first things you hear that really knock you out stick with you.
You're never gonna hear any music better than that.
So it was Little Richard,
The Beatles, Elvis, you know.
All that good old stuff, you know.
Where were you when you heard that stuff?
The first time l saw The Beatles they hadn't made a record yet.
- You saw them?
- At the Cavern in Liverpool, yeah.
- What was that like?
- lt was magic. They were magic.
Did you think, ''This is going to be the greatest rock band?''
(Lemmy) Yeah, kind of. l did, because these girls would come down. l lived in this holiday resort place in north Wales, and these girls from Liverpool would come down. lt was this singer called Billy Fury.
They were all crazy about him.
And then one year it all changed.
There was this Beatles thing.
So we hitchhike up to Liverpool, and they were monstrous.
They were, like, perfect.
Everybody thinks The Stones were the hard men and The Beatles were the sissies, and it's the opposite.
The Beatles were from Liverpool, and The Stones were from the London suburbs, going to art school and shit.
So it wasn't that way at all.
The Beatles, l thought, were the best band in the world.
- No, we don't.
- l knew you were gonna say that. OK.
'Melanie, line four.'
'Call on line one.'
The owner gave you hers.
You wanna go...?
$1 46.7 0. We don't take
American Express cards, man.
- Oh, you don't? Do you take Visa?
- Yeah. l was like, ''l gotta give it to him.'' ln the name of rock and roll.
And it sounds great.
Yeah, exactly. The original.
Sgt Pepper sounds amazing. l think you'll really like it.
- Thank you. Thanks very much.
- All right. See you later. d Dance, girl, you gotta move your feet d Dance, don't stop, dance till you drop d Dance to the American beat d
The Sunset Strip has seen a lot of different movements and genres, and musical versions of the same thing, basically.
We had a bunch of different musical movements,
Motörhead is one of those bands that transcends movements. lt doesn't matter what's happening in the community, in the rock culture,
Motörhead is still hailed as being, like, king.
When he moved to LA, became part of the scene, he was already embraced.
Basically, his throne was waiting for him.
- Sound is speeding.
- Two cameras. A mark.
Action!
Lem, someone l want you to meet.
Hank Moody, the writer.
He's not from LA, but it's really interesting to see how much of a staple Lemmy has become, especially in Hollywood.
He's become a Los Angeles icon.
- And cut.
- Cutting. l don't know if he does fit in LA.
LA's so fucked up.
But he doesn't really fit. l think Hollywood has to fit him.
All we have to do is do that another 1 47 times and we've got it!
A lot of people are LA bashers.
Especially people from up north and San Francisco.
''Oh, that's LA. La-La land.''
Or whatever they call it.
''lt's a land of pretentious people,'' and all that kind of thing.
There's a real weight to this town.
There's a real history to it. l think it's got a lot more balls than a lot of big cities, frankly.
Lemmy looks like an LA rocker to me.
He's just got that thing about him.
He's got the part that's combination biker-musician, or guy that works at the car wash.
He's got that old-school LA look.
He doesn't change it, and l don't think it was created.
That's the good part of LA. lt's the people that don't try to be. l was in bands as a kid, and l came to California to do that.
This cat l knew wanted me to come to an acting class, so l went.
Next thing you know, l was in some theatre group. l realised l was making a little bit of money doing acting so l stuck with it.
No, l doubt we get it this day and time. l always figured my music is very popular, l must be doing something wrong.
Yeah, me too. l grew up in that.
Oh, yeah, it's great...
Oh, l'm telling you...
Oh, yeah... l worked with him once on a TV show.
He was there.
He pulls up in an old Cadillac, and all these guys get out in suits and everything.
And he met my son.
My son at the time was only like three or four, you know.
And Little Richard goes, ''Hey, baby!''
And l told my kid, l go,
''Hey, Willie, listen.
''lt's OK to talk to this cat, but don't sit on his lap!''
Lemmy is like a fucking radioactive cowboy.
Hard-rock Johnny Cash.
- A biker.
- World War ll chic!
- He's Black Bart meets Mad Max.
- He's Captain Hook.
A bit of cowboy, a bit of metal, a bit of rock and roll.
He would be the perfect description of my dream dude, for sure.
Lemmy's look is something that is probably a little cultivated from back in the '50s, and added to that, some of the shit that he picked up along the way, bikers, punk rock, whatever.
Although, he's been around for a long time.
Maybe some of the punk stuff they got from him.
Describing Lemmy's style is not that easy, because, you know, from boot to boot, it always changes substantially. d Let me tell you, babe d What l say is right d
He's got a very distinctive and good aesthetic sense.
He actually will bring me drawings of what he wants. lf l was to really give it a specific name, l would probably say it's like a Western jack boot, because he likes these boots with a squared-off nose, almost military-looking.
Almost like a cavalry kind of boot, with Motörhead flair to it of course!
We were at a rehearsal place in the Valley in the mid '90s, and Motörhead was right next door.
Every day we would see Lemmy out at this video game in this lobby area. lt was summer time. lt was really hot in the Valley.
And Lemmy was wearing these shorts. lf l tell you he's wearing Daisy Dukes... lt was like a thong, dude!
You would walk out of our door, and the first thing you would see was Lemmy bent over this machine.
So it's basically Lemmy bending over with his arse in your face.
That's a weird scene.
We're all wearing shorts, but our shorts are like board shorts. l finally got the balls to walk up to him, and he's playing the game. l'm like, ''Hey, man.''
''Hey, Scott. How are you?'' l'm like, ''We've been wondering...''
And he's like, ''What's that?''
And l said, ''What's the deal with the shorts?''
Like, seriously.
And l'm thinking... l'm afraid. ls he gonna punch me?
What's gonna happen?
He's like, ''What? What do you mean?'' l said, ''They're really short.
''We see your arse every day. lt's weird.''
And he goes, ''What? lt's hot out.
These are shorts.''
He looks at me and goes,
''Those aren't shorts, those are pants.
''These are shorts. l'm cool.''
And he kind of goes like this, like it made absolute sense! d lt's not so bad, baby, l don't care d
What anyone thinks, what anyone cares, it doesn't matter.
You either take him or you fucking don't,
He don't give a shit whether you do or not.
There's just no words. lt's just... He's Lemmy. lt's almost... lt should be a verb!
Nobody told him to do anything that he wasn't completely natural and comfortable doing, and that's rare.
And that's why l think we respond with respect, because we wanna be like that. l think he's a renegade.
There's not that many of them any more.
Everybody assimilates.
Go along to get along, to get what they need to get.
And l don't see Lemmy as that kind of guy. l see Lemmy as doing things his way to get where he wants to go.
And that's attractive because people don't do that any more. d When you move in right up close to me d That's when l get the shakes all over me d
The thing l remember about Lemmy, which has nothing to do with music, is he was obsessed, and l think he still is, with one-armed bandits.
You know, the...
You know? And... l can remember Dingwalls, the little club in London, very popular, by the canal. l think that was probably the first time l ever met him.
You walked into Dingwalls, and just inside the door was the one-armed bandit.
Without fail he would be on that, sometimes all night. l don't know if he ever won, but,
God, he'd play that thing for hours. l've never seen anybody love those things so much.
They should bring out a Motörhead one-armed bandit, and if you get three Lemmys, you win the jackpot! d Shake it all over d
When it comes to rock and roll, you need something to believe in. lntegrity means everything.
Musically, of course, when you go and you see a band, and you know it's coming from the heart, it touches you more because there's some sort of human connection. lf you go and see some robots just moving around the stage, you might as well go home and play a video game.
But when someone is doing...
When someone is playing rock and roll from the heart, and they really walk it like they talk it, you pay more attention, because it makes you feel like a human being, in a way.
To connect to someone doing something really honest or true, it's important.
So, to me, more than any other rock musician... l consider Lemmy a legend, you know.
But, to me, more than any other rock musician, he is...the baddest motherfucker in the world.
Mm-hm.
Know what would be cool? lf l could get one of those lyric sheets.
For the instrumentals there's two 1 2 bars in a row.
(Bob) Let's check the levels with Lemmy, make sure he can hear himself.
That one little spot when it's on the double chorus...
Yeah, it's a double chorus!
Fuck! For Christ's sake, what was Chuck Berry thinking? l remember a show in England that l did with Meat Loaf where the show was held up cos Chuck
Berry thought he hadn't been paid.
He wouldn't go on until he had a wad of money.
He had been fucked so many times. ln the '50s there were no rules at all.
A guy could pull a gun and say, ''l'm not paying you.''
Even in the '60s, late '60s,
Hendrix got burned fucking blind.
He never saw any of the money. l was standing outside of LAX once, getting ready to get on a plane, and this young black guy comes up to me and says,
''Hey, l read in an interview that the only person
''you ever wanna meet is Little Richard.'' l had always said that. l didn't give a fuck about anyone else. l said, ''Little Richard?''
And he goes, ''Yeah. He's my dad.'' l said, ''Shut the fuck... Really?''
He goes, ''Yeah. Come here.''
And there's this limo parked out front and he goes...
The window comes down and fucking Little Richard is sitting right there!
And l'm like, ''Oh, my God!''
And he goes, ''Hey, Dad, this guy...''
He's like, ''What?''
He said, ''This guy's a musician.''
And the fucking window comes down and he goes, ''God bless you!''
How weird must it have been to be gay and black in Macon, Georgia in the '50s.
- (Bob) And an amazing singer.
- The best rock and roll singer ever. l don't know who people consider the originator of rock and roll. lt's Little Richard, because nobody else had... He was crazy.
Him, Elvis and Jerry Lee Lewis.
That's it. Those three.
You can't tell who did the first whatever, but between 'em, they started rock and roll.
(Gröhl) When you meet the originals you realise of course they're fucking troubadours or renegades.
They're fucking freaks!
So that's where you got all the music that was different than anything else, like Little Richard, a gay black dude in Macon, Georgia in the '50s.
There was nothing he could do but play rock and roll.
Probably not!
People say, ''Don't you like Prince back in the '7 0s, '80s?'' l said, ''No, l've seen Jimi Hendrix.''
He comes on with scarves over him with a Stratocaster. Are you kidding? l used to score for Mitch. l used to score dope for him.
And l used to score acid for Hendrix.
He's a very fair man. l'd give him ten trips and he'd give me three and take seven.
(Bill) Very generous.
But he had to take 'em then, on the spot.
Yeah. Well, the thing is with acid, see, they say it doesn't work two days in a row.
But we found that if you double the dose, it does!
Yeah! A great day!
See you, buddy.
Great to have you back.
- Are you here for good?
- Yeah, for a while. l'll call when l get back. l haven't been to the Rainbow in ages. l had this fight going on with the fucking Darkness, this band, right?
That's why l called you.
We went to the show and it was fine.
We went up the Rainbow and we were sitting there. l'm sitting at a table talking to the singer and he says,
''Hey, you recorded a song with Lemmy, right?'' l said, ''Yeah.''
He said, ''We have a feud with him.'' l was like, ''Really? Why?''
He said, ''He reviewed our record and he said it was fucking shit.''
And l said, ''Have you ever met him?''
He said no. l don't think you'd met him. l'm like, ''Dude, he's the fucking greatest guy.''
''Well, so l called him a fucking cunt or something in the press.''
''Honestly he's a good dude.
You'd like him. l'm gonna go take a piss.'' l fucking got my cell phone. l'm like, ''Lem, come on up for a drink.''
So l go up there.
The Darkness are sitting there.
He sees you coming. lt was like, ''Oh, fuck me! No, no!''
Then Lemmy sat down, and at first l'm like, ''Lem, what's going on?''
He's like, ''l wanted to go to the Darkness gig but they banned me.''
And l'm like,
''Have you met Justin, the singer?'' l talked to him for, what, half an hour that night?
He didn't change my opinion one bit! d Riots in the burning streets, crystal night outside d Brutal music in the night enough to make you cry d Nobody knows how it is to sleep and drown the world d l am the midnight snake to bite your little girls d Outside in the distance the city in the fire d
(Nikki) The Rainbow Bar and Grill is the most famous restaurant-bar where musicians and hangers-on and groupies... lt's sort of like the place to go hunt and the place to die at the same time. lt's a rocker place. lf you're a rock and roller, come here. lf you're not, don't come here. d Well, lawdy, lawdy, lawdy,
Miss Clawdy d Girl, you sure look good to me d Please don't excite me, baby d
(Scott) ln the '90s, for me, Lemmy became synonymous with the Rainbow.
Any time you would go there, there he is playing the trivia machine. lt became a joke.
Like, ''Let's go to the Rainbow and have a drink and say hi to Lemmy,'' and then Lemmy's there.
You get so many tourists that come in -
''Does Lemmy hang here? ls Lemmy here?'' lf he's not here, he's on tour.
He's got to be one of two places - the Rainbow or on tour.
Give Lemmy the game, a Jack and Coke and a cigarette and he's there for ever.
People go on that game and go,
''lt says Lemmy up there.'' l go, ''Yeah, that's Lemmy from Motörhead.''
''No, it can't be.'' lt's the afternoon and here's Lemmy sitting at the end of the bar. l've seen everything from chicks welling up to the frat guy going, ''Oh, my God!'' lt's the best when they start crying. lt's so cute.
Anyone wants a picture, he'll take one.
Anyone that wants to talk to him, he'll talk to 'em, but let him play his Megatouch first.
(Nikki) He would be just sitting there playing it.
Some sort of weird heavy-metal meditation, mixed with Jack and Coke and something else we won't disclose! l was a house painter for about three weeks, working for this old gay guy called Mr Brownsword.
How's that? And it's true, too.
Mr Fucking Brownsword! lt doesn't come any better than that.
Monty Python couldn't do better than that.
Luckily, he fancied my mate and not me. l got to paint the upstairs, while he was attacking
Colin downstairs. lt was funny as shit. l worked at the riding stables in the summer. l worked on the fair when the fair came round. l worked in a factory for a while, but that was fucking terrible. l grew my hair till they fired me.
We had the beach, the sea and the horses. lt was great. l had a pretty good childhood. l ain't complaining.
Except they fucking ruined it and put the school in there. l'd heard before that Lemmy went to school here. l'd heard rumours about it first and l went on the internet and found out it was true. l heard Lemmy got expelled from this school.
(Cameraman) For what reason?
Apparently, he was playing his guitar down the Tannoy, but l'm not sure if that's true. l don't even know if he wanted to be a rock star. l think it came naturally.
That's how he seems - pure rock. d lf you like to gamble, l tell you l'm your man d You win some, lose some, it's all the same to me d The ace of spades, the ace of spades d The ace of spades, the ace of spades d
(All) Hi, Lemmy! d Dandy, Dandy d Where you gonna go now? d Who you gonna run to? d All your little life you're chasing all the girls d l saw The Vickers at the Oasis in Manchester and l thought they were excellent so l asked for a job with them. d Chatting up the ladies d Tickling the fancy d Pouring out your charms d
We'd be on with The Kinks,
The Who, The Hollies.
We played at South Pier, Blackpool with The Who and all the audience were chanting,
''We want The Vickers!''
Roger Daltrey didn't like that!
They were a damn good band, and compare very favourably with any of the bands that l had who had bigger hits, like The Who and The Kinks and Manfred Mann.
They were about as big in the north as The Kinks were in the south.
We'd just tour all around the north of England, really.
We couldn't even get arrested in London.
North of Birmingham we were big stars.
This is 1 965/6.
We were on L200 a week each clear.
That's like L 4,000 a week each now.
And we all had Jags and we had a speedboat.
We used to go water-skiing on Windermere.
(Harry) lt was rock and roll with a bit of thump. Very aggressive.
He would go up to his amplifier, feed his guitar back and he would make 'em scream.
(Lemmy) When l joined The Vickers, they were ambitious.
They settled into this routine of doing the same gigs every year, the circuit, and they became in the end, in fact, a cabaret show.
So it wasn't for me, really.
He wanted to be in the thick of it in London.
And we didn't!
What l really like about the Lemmy mythology is that he used to be a roadie for Jimi Hendrix, too, which scores a lot of points in my book, man!
He would rather play an instrument than carry it.
So that kind of gives you the idea! l think just as a resumé piece, defining what is a rocker. l mean...to his core he's the kind of guy who said,
''lf l can't be in the band, l'll carry their equipment.''
He hung out with musicians, and he did it continually until people let him play.
And he's really come up the hard way.
That wasn't great.
He said one of the most amazing one-liners l've ever heard, and he explained it.
He said, ''l remember before there was rock and roll.'' l said,
''Wow, that's a wild thing to say.'' l said, ''What do you mean?'' l'm not gonna try and imitate his voice.
He said, ''l remember when there was only Rosemary Clooney records.
''l remember before there was rock and roll.
''There was just your mum's records.'' l think l'm paraphrasing but he said something like,
''Then we heard Elvis and we never turned back.
''We heard rock and roll. That's us.'' ln the '60s, how l got albums and singles, too, l had to go down to the electrical appliance shop and he would order it for me from whatever company.
He wasn't licensed to do it or nothing. lt was just a friendly basis.
He would order them. Three weeks later they would come back.
A Buddy Holly record called ''Wishing'' and one called ''Learning the Game.''
Eddie Cochran's ''Two Three Steps to Heaven'' and ''Something Else.''
These kids, without knowing it, when they listen to Motörhead, they're getting Johnny Cash,
Chuck Berry, Eddie Cochran. lt was the same thing with the original punk-rock guys.
They were very influenced by that music.
The fans don't know that but when they're listening to ''Ace of Spades'', they're listening to Eddie Cochran.
That's Lem's influence. d Now l taught the weeping willow how to cry d And l showed the clouds how to cover up a clear blue sky d
The Head Cat is just like what we did when we were teenagers.
We're playing the songs that got us into it.
The music is so real and unpretentious that people can't help but like it. d A bad little kid moved in to the neighbourhood d
The genesis of Head Cat was someone wanted me to do one track for an Elvis tribute record. l know Lem loves Elvis and Johnny Ramone.
So l thought it would be cool to get
John and Lem on the same record.
So we did the song and John went home.
We had studio time left cos we did it so quickly.
(Lemmy) lt was for fun. We all knew the same songs by heart.
We said we should do an album, so we did. d Buys all the rock and roll books on the magazine stand d Every dime that he gets is lost to the jukebox man d
(Lemmy) This apartment is like a fucking museum. lt is a museum. l've seen museums with less shit in them than l got. lt's one of those things.
This was available, and it was near the Rainbow, which was the only point of reference in LA l had.
All l've ever done is stay at the Park Sunset and come up to the Rainbow, which was what we used to do.
Here you go.
He's pretty cool, isn't he?
That's the Metal Hammer Award.
Two of them.
This is a porcelain model of me done by somebody and given to me on the road. lt's pretty interesting shit.
You get given some great stuff.
The platinum album is from Joan Jett and the gold one is from Lita Ford, cos l wrote a song on that album.
That's from the Wacken Festival in Germany.
And this is my clan, my Scottish clan, Fraser.
And this is my honorary membership in the Rangers.
There's my action figure.
You gotta keep it in the original box.
Then one day it'll probably be worth as much as $5!
Silver and gold record for ''Ace of Spades''.
This is from Hammersmith Odeon.
This is from
''No Sleep 'til Hammersmith''.
And this is by a German cat. lt's pretty good, too, huh? l wish l hadn't dropped it.
That's the only thing.
(Cameraman) Why not move?
Well, l'm never gonna get a place for the money l'm paying here. l've got a place that's rent-controlled.
They can't put it up more than 6% a year. l'm still only paying
900 bucks a block from Sunset. l'm never gonna get a deal like that.
And l'd want to live around here cos l like it around here.
What's your most cherished possession in here?
My son.
Cos he's the only one l got. l have another one but l've never seen him so he don't count.
- Neither have l, no.
- No, neither of us. No.
His mother went and found him two years ago.
She said he's like 5ft tall, looks just like me, and he's a computer fucking programmer or something.
She's a social worker, right?
And she's put on a bit of weight so she wears these paisley smock things.
She said he put his head in his hands when she told him she was his mother!
She said, ''l hadn't got the heart to tell him who his father was!''
He'd probably run out on the balcony with a fucking pistol!
You can't win 'em all, can you?
Where would you put 'em?
Yeah, but l mean... l dunno. l just like stuff. l've always liked stuff.
Stuff is what happens. ln your life you get stuff.
Then you lose some stuff and you keep some stuff.
At the end you leave it to some other poor bastard to be saddled with it for the rest of their lives!
Don't worry, kid.
You'll have all this shit soon enough!
- l'm looking forward to that!
- Yeah, really. l have no doubt.
- l'd rather have you than all that stuff.
- l know, yeah. l can never imagine why that is.
Why people would rather have some gobsmack human instead of money. l never understood that.
- Well, money doesn't love you back.
- l don't know.
- You can spend it.
- You can imagine it does.
(Cameraman) Paul, l know that you met your dad when you were six.
(Lemmy) l met him, too.
We met each other at the same time.
- Simultaneous, it was.
- Funny, that.
Like two ships meeting in the cosmos, man. lt's like a memory that's all frayed around the edges and sepia-toned.
Sepia.
Actually, l was sepia then. l was almost see-through, in fact.
Yeah. l just remember tugging at these slim legs in jeans.
- That's me, you see.
- l was small so l just saw the legs.
- Describe what happened.
- l don't remember what happened. lt was a dope deal. l was waiting for some hash to arrive or something. l was in the kitchen making a piece of toast and this small blond child came in.
''You're my dad, l'm your son, and my mum's in the other room.'' l look round and bloody Tracy's sitting there, babbling like an idiot, as usual. l don't know how he got there.
She wasn't in no dope deal cos she didn't do drugs, right?
So why was she there?
How did she get in there?
She went looking for you. l know that.
And that's because when l was about four, l was, you know, in like a kindergarten, right, and there was this other kid that came up to me and he said,
''l've got a daddy and a mummy.'' l was like, ''l've only got a mummy.''
He said, ''You must have a daddy.
Everybody has a daddy and a mummy.''
- So l went home and l said...
- Where's my daddy, you bitch?!
And l got this look like...
''We don't talk about him in this house!''
And then l think after that endeavours were made to introduce us to each other. l didn't want to live with his mother, you see, because it was only casual sex, really.
But, l mean, l love Paul. l like Tracy. She's great.
She did a really good job of bringing him up, up to a point.
He's turned out to be a clever kid and he's good.
He's a great musician.
You have no idea how good he is.
My mum knew The Beatles, right?
She used to go out with John Lennon, didn't she?
Obviously, trying to get to Paul McCartney through him!
No, she lost her virginity to John Lennon.
The story that l've been told by my mum is that George liked her.
He would shyly, coyly look at her when she walked past the bus stop and George would be standing there.
She wasn't interested in George.
And then, you know, l don't know.
Maybe if she had been interested in George, it would have lasted longer than with John!
- lt didn't last long with John.
- Nope. lt didn't.
But she always talked about it.
She was very smitten.
But she called you after Paul not John, so...
Yeah, that's a strange one.
She must have been thinking about Paul when she was with John.
Perhaps she called him Paul and that's why it didn't last.
''Oh, l love you, Paul.'' ''What?!''
Yeah! Paul!
- We swapped girlfriends twice.
- Yeah, we did.
At the Limelight and then at Stringfellows, wasn't it?
We swapped girlfriends one night and did it again two months later.
Well, a lot of chicks like that - the old man and the son as well. lt's like screwing the daughter and the mother at the same time.
- Yeah, that kind of thing.
- Yeah.
(Cameraman) Doesn't it ever feel too cluttered?
(Lemmy) Yeah, all the time.
What do you think?
What are you doing?
Shooting my trash can?
Fuck off, man! You better not put that in the fucking movie.
- Where's the trash can?
- There.
- l was looking at that.
- At what? l don't know. Whatever that is. lt's a fucking Domino's bargain list.
One of my favourite memories of my dad is when l was six years old, and l'd just learnt to play three or four chords.
He came to visit and as he was leaving, he picked up a guitar and he started just playing by the front door, like E major, and we just jammed on that one chord for about 20 minutes.
He was looking right into my face, right into my eyes, and just egging me on, like, ''This is the rhythm, the feel.
This is how you do it.'' lt was probably the third time l had ever seen him, so that was a major event in my life.
The nicest thing he ever said to me was very recently when you asked him, ''What is the most precious thing in this room?'' and he said, ''My son.'' l was kind of blown away by that. l wasn't expecting that response. l wasn't thinking he would say that.
But that was amazing. lt was wonderful.
Thank you! This is my son, Paul.
Eh? Not bad for an only child! d Lucky thing for you, babe l'm so lazy d But l'm gonna pull your trigger d
- Go take it to him, Scott.
- That's some size. That's cool.
Yeah! l present this tank.
- lsn't that bad?
- Yeah, it is. l served several years in the US army as a special operations soldier in Ranger regiment and Special Forces, and l had served in lraq and Afghanistan. l know Lemmy is a big military history buff.
My kind of rock-and-roll connective tissue to the military was probably Motörhead.
You know, l would wear
Motörhead T-shirts over there. ln a way kind of stating my own individuality.
Not to glorify war or say,
''War is really cool,'' or whatever. lt is what it is. lt's a function of the human condition.
But Motörhead is good go-to-war music.
He's a World War l and World War ll historian.
''1 91 6'' was their first
Grammy-nomination record about World War l.
And he's a collector of war memorabilia, in general. l remember watching a BBC documentary with him and he's showing me this airplane, this Messerschmitt. l'm trying to remember what it was and he's going, ''That's wrong.'' l go, ''They must have researched the shit.''
Brings out three books to show me that plane wasn't even built then.
Everybody collects something.
The drummer in my old band used to collect elephants.
He had elephants all over his fucking apartment. l think l have a collection that might warrant more interest!
This is a Damascus sword.
See the blade?
That's Damascus steel.
This is a first model dagger. lt's quite pretty, l think.
Purely decorational.
These are Masonic daggers.
Look at that, huh?
That's a nice piece, too.
This is from Toledo and not Ohio.
Look at this fucking thing!
- (Cameraman) What is that?
- British.
That's British. l think it's from the first war.
And this is a German bayonet.
That's seen action. l always liked the workmanship and the designs, you know.
They were the last great knife makers, the last great sword makers. lt's a craft in Germany that has largely disappeared now.
Even a lot of the American swords were made in Germany. ln the Civil War, there were a lot of German swords used in that war.
Up to the First World War, obviously. l got Argentinean stuff. l got Yugoslav, l got Croat,
Slovakian.
(Cameraman) How long has it taken you to amass this collection?
Years and years, right?
1 9 years, yeah.
When l came over to the States, l had nothing, you know.
So there we are. Come on.
- l thought l'd dress up for you.
- Yeah, you look good.
- Good to meet you.
- And you.
- Nice to meet you.
- How are you doing?
We pulled it all out. Check it out.
- MP40, G43, K98.
- That's a nice gun, that.
That's a 251 9.
That's the chassis of 2-22, isn't it?
- There's the Hetzer.
- What was the chassis?
- A 38(t). A Czech chassis.
- A Czech one.
- Skoda.
- Right.
- Did you have to restore it?
- lt's got the original engine in it.
There you go.
(Lemmy) This is the smallest tank that the Germans made. lt was made actually in Czechoslovakia, based on a Skoda design from before the war.
This was called a Hetzer. lt's a 38(t) chassis.
This is a big gun for a tank this size.
This is a 75mm armour-piercing gun, you know.
This would stop anything, more or less.
They would bury this tank in the ground.
So all that would be visible would be this here.
Just the gun on the top of the tank.
So they would wait for you to come along and just kill you!
Wars are the most interesting times.
Shows the best and worst in people. ln war you get to find out who your real friends are.
Ask any of those boys coming back from lraq, you know.
(Cameraman) Anybody who's watching and thinks you're a Nazi, what do you want to say to them?
Well, l've had six black girlfriends so far.
So l'm one of the worst Nazis you've ever met, right? lmagine going to Nuremberg and introducing my girlfriend to the Führer.
Yeah, l don't think so. l just dress how l like to dress. l don't ask anybody else to do it, you know. lt's a free country, supposedly. lf the lsraeli army had the best uniforms, l'd collect them, but they don't.
So there you go. l can't help it. lt's ridiculous to think that l could be a Nazi. l'm about as far from it as you could get.
Fire!
- (Cameraman) How was that, Lemmy?
- That was great.
Hawkwind were really ahead of their time. l worship Hawkwind.
That's some genius music.
They were like a prog-rock group that punks were allowed to like. d l just took a ride d On a silver machine d And l'm still feeling mean d lt's dangerous rock and roll. lt's not choreographed. lt's not safe. lt's not clichéd.
You never know what you're gonna see.
That's got to be good, hasn't it?
We were a space-rock band so a lot of the music we played was around science-fiction stories, which we'd sort of interpret and put into music.
We were a pretty heavy rock band with nice flowing electronics.
(Lemmy) People thought we were hippy flower people. lt fucking wasn't true.
We were like a black nightmare.
We used to lock the doors so people couldn't get out! lt was a psychedelic experience and no one was doing that.
We used to have this sort of trancey beat going, this trancey rhythm and strobe going. lt didn't drive you insane. lt just put you into a trance. d l got a silver machine d l got a silver machine d lt's quite odd, as New Order, the driving sound Hawkwind had - the very pulsey, percussive, keyboard sounds, we would actually listen to that and try and emulate it. ln songs like ''Temptation'' and ''Everything's Gone Green,'' we did try and rip off Hawkwind.
They represented the first counter-culture with lT and Oz Magazine, and it was very romantic. lt was a wonderful time to grow up and be a kid, but mostly l remember standing at the front, drooling at Stacia.
The girl with her breasts out, which was incredible for a 1 2 or 1 3 year-old. lt was like our education!
We were a bunch of misfits, basically. lt was like a family. lt was like a family.
(Nik) We had a huge following, because we would do any gig.
We'd do a gig in London and it'd be like a drug dealer's convention.
Dik, Mik and Lemmy were always into a lot of speed, and grumpy.
Dik was always grumpy cos they'd been up for a few days.
We'd get picked up in our van, and Lemmy would be all surly and slam the door and sit down.
We were in the States touring.
We were in Niles, Michigan, on the way to Detroit.
Niles is on the other side of Michigan from where Detroit is.
So we pulled over at a roadhouse to eat, and l wasn't hungry, being a speed freak. l just got this new camera, so l went out, prowling round, looking for things to photograph.
And l got conked over the head in this abandoned housing project and fucking came round without my camera, without any money. l go back to the roadhouse and they'd gone, dumped me there. l mean, what kind of shit is that?
One of your band members is missing after a meal and you just drive off?
That's not the way l work.
And so now l'm stuck here. l have to hitch across Michigan. l go up to my room, crash out for about two hours, down to sound check, do the show.
Crossing into Canada the next day, l get busted for speed. ln jail for two days in Canada, handcuffed to a fucking iron bar.
Then l get the news, as l'm going into Essex County jail, with overalls over my arm, going into the delousing section, this voice behind me says,
''You're bailed, Kilmister.''
''Ah, thank you.''
Flown to Toronto immediately.
Do the show.
Four o'clock in the morning, fired.
They only got me out of jail because my replacement couldn't make it in time. l found Lemmy in certain ways quite hard to work with because we were in a band where everybody was taking different drugs.
So you had this sort of disparity between people of where they were and what sort of wavelength they were on. l was into psychedelics myself - pot, mushrooms and peyote, all that sort of thing.
Pretty calm stuff, you know.
And l think Lemmy was more into amphetamines.
He used to hang the band up cos he was never on time to leave when we had to catch a flight and we'd all be downstairs waiting to go.
And it'd be, ''Christ, where is he?''
And he'd be still in bed.
You'd shake him.
''Come on, Lemmy!'' lt did cause a lot of stress within the band.
All of us got pissed off over it. lt wasn't just one or two.
Then he got busted at the border, sort of thing, which, when you're on tour with all the stress factors, is like the last straw.
And the majority of the band said,
''Enough's enough,'' and that was it.
When l arrived at the gig, l said,
''Where the fuck's Lemmy?''
And they said this other guy,
Paul Rudolph, was taking his place, that they'd sacked Lemmy. l was devastated, but l'm the type of person who... l keep a lot inside, so... l think l just carried on, but l was devastated. lt was quite a sad thing, actually.
Very sad. l mean, he was very upset over it.
We all were, really. lt was coming for a long time. lt was '7 0s drug snobbery.
Like, they were all just doing organic drugs, man. l was doing speed and organic drugs, so they didn't like that.
He hated us for it all.
Well, you would do, wouldn't you?
He described me as a sanctimonious, self-righteous arsehole.
And l thought, ''All right.
That's what he thinks of me.'' l went home and screwed three of their old ladies. Ha ha ha!
Well, you know, ''Vengeance is sweet, saith the Lord.''
And l must admit, l was banging one of them already before we left.
But it was a great time. l wouldn't have traded it for any other band ever. l'd probably be in that band now if they hadn't fired me.
But there you are. lt was quite good for him cos look where he is now!
How long have l been on the road?
1 9 years.
- (Reporter) 1 9 years?
- Yeah. Give or take a year.
- lsn't it boring after a while?
- No.
Why is there so much violence on the road?
Why do you break things?
When you start, when you start doing things...
What fucking violence? l don't know what you mean about violence.
You wanna see some violence, baby?
Come and see me!
(Reporter) Don't break it!
No! Not me!
Want to do an interview? d Sunrise wrong side of another day d Sky-high and 6,000 miles away d Don't know how long l've been awake d
Lemmy was at the beginning of heavy metal.
Maybe even pre-Black Sabbath. lf they'd said to me,
''Who was the original metal band?'' it was a toss between Lemmy and Black Sabbath, but l would say Lem and Motörhead. d Motörhead, you can call me Motörhead all night d
They took elements of what existed as heavy metal, mixed it with punk, and created this frantic, intense, powerful music form that went on to define heavy metal as we know it. lt was brash, in-your-face. lt was like getting socked by an overhand right, like Mike Tyson in his prime. l remember you'd turn the radio on and it was like really rancid disco, bad boy-band pop music.
The Osmonds, stuff like that.
You'd go and see a Motörhead show and it was completely different. d Silver-tongued devil the demon leech d l know just what l'm doing d l like a little innocent bitch d l could not believe that there was a guy singing like that on a record.
People were digging it. lt was like, ''Whoa!''
One headline we had was ''Worst Band in the World'', but it was in big letters. l mean, it was fucking great.
You didn't give a fuck.
You kind of care up to a point, but the kids were turning up.
''l want to see the worst band in the world. They must be great.''
Motörhead was speed music, with three people on speed.
Consistency of energy could be contributed to that, and our slim figures!
Everybody tried to be that heavy after that.
Nobody's achieved it.
We fancied ourselves.
Guns N' Roses did. lf we could be close to as heavy as Motörhead, we'd be successful.
Back when l was young, like 1 9, late-'7 0s, early-'80s, we were very punk rock. l had my shelf of my old rock records l bought as a kid -
Steve Miller,
Aerosmith, Led Zeppelin.
All these bands l used to go see.
And then punk rock happened, and l saw The Clash and The Ramones.
All of a sudden that's the old in with the new.
And you'd see someone with long hair,
''He's a hippy.
''l can't listen to that music cos Johnny Rotten says...''
And then someone would pull out the ''Ace of Spades'' record, and you're like, ''Wait a minute,'' because this kind of goes against the gospel of the punk rock.
They're long hairs and it's metal but you put the record on and go,
''Damn, man! l can't help it. l'm a Motörhead fan.'' d Playing hide-and-seek cos l'm a speed freak d lt was their look, their attitude, their music.
You felt by listening to their records that they didn't fit in.
You felt that.
When you didn't fit in yourself, there was that instant lightening-bolt connection,
''Oh, shit. They're one of us.''
(Captain Sensible) l think that this tour is the antidote to Simon Cowell and all the evil shit music that he's purveying! lf there's one man on this tour that embodies the spirit of rock and roll more than Lemmy, show him to me!
Ladies and gentleman, the great man himself, Lemmy! d Be a man can a mystery man d Be a doll be a baby doll d
The Damned split up, and Brian James went off and did other stuff, and we thought, ''Could we possibly have a Damned without Brian?''
We needed someone who could really play bass.
We asked Lemmy and he instantly said he would do some gigs with us.
As a laugh, me and Scabies said,
''Let's see if he'll play SOS by ABBA.''
We thought there was no way in the world. We did it as a joke.
Lemmy said,
''Yeah, l'll give that a go.''
He played a whole bunch of Damned songs.
We did one of his, one Motörhead song, and we fucking ruined it!
Yeah, he wasn't pleased about that.
He said,
''l learned all your shitty songs.
''You ruined my one. One fucking song!
You bunch of cunts!''
The great man himself!
- ''Killed by Death''.
- ''Metropolis''.
- ''Overkill''.
- ''l Don't Believe a Word''.
People might say,
'''Killed by Death'? That's stupid.''
No, you're stupid.
(Dee) Lemmy is an amazing lyricist, a powerful lyricist.
Sharp, smart.
(Geoff) The first lyrics are twisted.
They're just straight in your face.
''Don't talk to me. l don't believe a word.''
''But that's the way l like it, baby. l don't want to live for ever.''
Who could say it better?
That is one of the most prolific lines.
''You win some, you lose some. lt's all the same to me.'' l kind of live by that.
Fuck Keith Richards, fuck all those dudes that fucking survived the '60s, and are fucking flying around on Leer jets, you know, living up to their gunslinger reputation as they fuck supermodels in the most expensive hotel in Paris.
You know what Lemmy's doing?
Lemmy's probably drinking Jack and
Cokes and writing another record.
Two, three, four!
One of the lyrics that Lemmy wrote for me was ''Mama, l'm Coming Home''.
And it's really a haunting feeling.
When l get someone who doesn't know what the situation with my wife and l is, it's spooky when somebody writes a lyric and you sing that lyric and you go, ''Fucking hell. lt's so close to home.''
Every time l play that on stage, l get a chill up my spine. d Just a clown in a one-horse town d ln a broke down second-hand car d Can you still get it up?
Or are we pushing too hard? d l think if you ever had a beautiful girl d You had to use your MasterCard d
- (Lemmy) Nah.
- Let's go again.
'd Can you still get it up?
Or are we pushing too hard?' d lf you wanna get your hands on the beautiful girl
'd You gotta use a MasterCard d '
- Let's listen to what we have, OK?
- Yeah.
Look, pills. Ooh!
What kind of pills are they?
Vitamins?
No.
Diabetes.
And...
...one for blood pressure, l think. l told 'em my blood's pressing just fine.
Every time l cut myself it comes right out.
OK, let's hear it.
'd Or are we pushing too hard?
'd lf you wanna get your hands on a beautiful girl
'd You gotta use a MasterCard
'd There's no excuse for bullshit
'd So don't try to feed me none
'd You better shake some action, bring it on, bring it on d '
We were talking and he asked me about a quad injury. l had torn my quad maybe a year before that.
He said out of nowhere, ''When you tore your quad, did you think that was it?
''Did you think your career was over?
Were you finished?'' l said, ''lt went through my head, but l kept going with it.''
He said,
''When they told me l was diabetic
''and l was really sick with it'', which was right before he did my song,
''at first l thought,
'l'm done. lt's all over.'''
And then he said,
''l started thinking about it and what the fuck am l gonna do?
''l've lived my whole life this way.
''l've done everything l've done to get to where l'm at.
''l'm not gonna change.''
The quote that sticks with me was,
''l do all the stuff that l do drug-wise and drinking-wise
''and at the end of the day, l'm too old to find God now.'' l'm touring, man!
He wanted us to do a couple of songs with him in the studio.
He came in there with Maker's Mark whiskey and l started drinking with him.
And we really didn't get much done because we were just drinking.
He was playing guitar and showing me stuff.
And then we'd stop and drink, drink, drink, drink.
And the next day l had to go to the hospital.
Lemmy gave me alcohol poisoning, basically!
There's the Marlboro Reds, the Jack Daniel's, the speed, the strippers and the gambling.
That's what he likes. l remember sitting with Zakk, and he's showing us Beatles footage and he says,
''Do you want a Jack Daniel's?''
Me and Zakk are like, ''Far out.''
And l remember this.
He takes out a fifth of Jack Daniel's and cracks the seal and hands it to me.
Zakk and l take a swig of it and
Zakk goes to hand it back to Lemmy.
Lemmy is opening another fifth for me and another fifth for him.
He wanted us to drink the whole fifth like we were drinking a beer!
We're like, ''Holy shit! No!''
The first time l ever met the guy, he says hello and proceeds to offer me crystal meth.
This is a fucking hardcore dude. l will say this, l've never, ever, ever seen Lemmy incapacitated by booze or anything. l have not seen him fall off the stage. l haven't seen him say stupid things. l haven't seen his life crumble because of it. lt would be pretty scary to have Lemmy completely sober and on you, man!
By the law of averages, he should have been dead.
We all used to hit it really hard.
But l don't know.
He's made of fucking iron.
No, l don't really want to advertise all that. l don't want kids to take any drugs cos of me. l don't want them to stay off drugs cos of me, either.
But l don't want to advertise a lifestyle that killed a lot of my friends.
OK?
'Another question for Lemmy.'
'Yeah. Lemmy, what do you credit your longevity to?
'You drink, you smoke, you party a lot. l wanna know what you credit it to.'
Not dying. That's the secret.
That's the secret of survival - not dying. l don't know. l was lucky, right?
Cos a lot of my friends didn't make it and l did. l never did heroin, see.
That was the one. l never saw anybody die on anything else.
When l was about 1 7 years old, he said to me,
''Son, promise me when you grow up...'' you know,
''...don't do coke.
Please. Just don't do coke.''
And l was like, ''OK.''
And he says, ''Just do speed. lt's much better for you!''
When you think back on it, Motörhead was the original thrash band.
Everything about them.
They played fast. lt was gnarly. lt was a little loose. lt had some punk rock, it had metal. lt had all the elements that we then later perfected and refined and then we became part of the big four of thrash metal. d Ain't a hope in hell, nothing's gonna bring us down d
You could definitely say without
Motörhead, there's no Metallica, there's no Anthrax, no Megadeth, probably no Slayer.
There could have been those bands but it would have been Anthrax-light. d You know l'm bad the times l've had d
The man influenced me big time as a bass player because of the levels of distortion, the speed and the power of it all, and the relentlessness of it. l can't even begin to say how much of an influence
Motörhead have been on us. l mean, on a bunch of different levels. l'll give you a list of things that were lifted from Lemmy.
Musical level.
Singing style.
Lyric phrasing, the simplicity, the rhyming scheme of it all.
- Attitude.
- Trying to be as cool as Lemmy.
Motivation. Perseverance. The look.
His facial hair in the early days, for me, was all about that.
The bullet belt. Come on!
Lemmy, to me, is not just an inspiration. l think he's kind of like the OK sign. lt's OK to go this far. lt's OK to do this. lt's like he's kicked the door open for a lot of bands that were feeling like they wanted more. d Only way to feel the noise... d l can't sing that way. lt's like the opposite. l gotta sing down here.
- You like it lower.
- Yeah. d You take the high mic and l'll take the low mic d
- What's up, motherfuckers?
- Hello, sir!
- Great to see you, brother.
- Good to see you, too.
Hey, Lem, what's happening?
- How you doing, bro?
- Good.
So l'll do the first one, and you'll do the second one?
- Yeah.
- Do the third one together?
- Or a line each, or what?
- You do the high harmony?
Not any more, no.
Grab your balls and you go, ''Ahhh!''
That's the theory, yeah.
What ending do you have for
''Damage Case''? How do you end it?
He stops and l stop and then you're the last to stop.
- We'll figure it out when we get there.
- How?
Don't be under any illusion we know what we're doing.
Let's see what happens.
Let's have fun with it. lt's a three count. lt goes, ''One, two, three!''
(James ) lsn't it time to go home?
(Audience) No! l didn't think so.
You can see there's an extra amp up on stage here.
We have the distinct pleasure of inviting on stage with us one of our all-time idols.
And l know the reason that Lars is so into music... Right?
He followed him around, pestered him for ever. l think he even threw up on him.
Something like that.
Lars is the biggest Motörhead fan on the planet, all right?
And here is the godfather of heavy metal.
From Motörhead, the one and only
Lemmy Kilmister!
(Chants ) Lemmy, Lemmy, Lemmy!
(Chanting) Lemmy, Lemmy, Lemmy!
(James ) All right! d Hey, babe, don't look so scared d All l want is some special care d l'm on the run from some institution d All l need's a little consolation d And l can tell by your face d l'm all over the place d Let me inside your place d Move over for a damage case d Hey, babe, don't act so scared d All l want is some special care d l ain't looking to victimise you d All l wanna do is tantalise you d And l can tell by your face d That l'm all over the place d l'm a total disgrace d Move over for a damage case d Move over d Hey, babe, don't turn away d l'm here tomorrow, l'm gone today d l ain't looking to victimise you d All l want to do is tantalise you d And l can tell by your face d l'm all over the place d l'm all over the place d Move over for a damage case d Damage case d
(James ) Yeah!
Good job, man!
Thanks, James. Good job!
- Good job!
- Thanks, man.
(Chanting) Lemmy, Lemmy, Lemmy!
(TV) 'Stacey. You dropped your pom-pom in the water.
- 'l'll get it for you.'
- 'l'll come with you.'
'Wait a minute. We don't want to get our sweaters wet.
'Better take 'em off.'
'Splash fight!'
'(Giggling)' d Hit it d Louie, Louie, oh, babe d We gotta go d Ay, ay, ay, ay, ay d
(Dee) l hadn't seen Lemmy and the boys for a decade or whatever. l wound up doing a show with them and, surprise, surprise, same dudes were on the crew as back in the early '80s!
Here it is, the '90s, and they're like,
''Dee, how you doing?'' l'm like, ''Holy crap!''
But this is Lemmy. lt was just a big family thing, without getting too cliché.
We rely on each other.
We love each other, hate each other.
We love to hate each other.
We've done a tour, we've gone home, come back.
The first time you seem them again, it just feels tight.
There's not that band-crew thing with this lot. lt's just friends.
What other job can you get paid for travelling around the world, meeting great fucking amazing people and seeing Motörhead every night? d Happy birthday to you d Happy birthday to you d Happy birthday, dear Roger d Happy birthday to you d
- Eat your cake!
- l'm gonna, fucker! ln rock and roll bands that l've been in, the money comes into play and attitudes change.
You wanna act like a rock star.
Motörhead doesn't do that.
Motörhead isn't into that.
Motörhead is in it for the music, for the fans. d Well, we came up from the gutter d The wrong side of the tracks d
We still have a goal, you know, to move this band forward, and to sound the best and to be able to write good records.
There's no faking going on here. l used to say there's not a fake bone in Lem's body, and that really is true, you know. l can say the same for Phil and myself, as well.
We're not faking us through year after year, pretending or so.
And l think that is reflecting out. lt's like an aura around us, l suppose.
(Phil) We've had quite a few people tell us our music got them through particularly low times in their lives. lt does something to us when we play.
For some reason, it's great. l don't know what it is we do, but it gives you a good feeling. l guess it's the same for the fans. l asked him for his autograph when l was 1 2.
He came to my home town, when he was with Hawkwind and he was the only one to sign autographs. lf somebody had said,
''You're gonna be in a big rock band with this guy for a quarter of a century,'' l would have said, ''Come on.''
But it's a good story. lt's quite inspiring.
Anything can happen.
Fucking microphone!
What's the point? Listen to it!
Didn't you know it was doing that all afternoon?
Has nobody tested the mic before? l've done gigs with Motörhead and gone to sound check. lt's so fucking loud, you really can't do much.
There's a lot of yelling going on.
(Lemmy) One, two, three!
That's perfect. Just a bit more.
An ear doctor would be amazed at just how well Lemmy can hear, considering the abuse he gives his ears.
There's one thing about Lemmy, he'll always hear you if you offer him a drink, even if you walk up behind him!
We're the loudest band in the world, in the Guinness Book of Records.
That's what people want.
They want it loud, they want it fast, they want it Lemmy.
(Phil) ls it loud enough?
(Audience) No!
(Lemmy) You want it louder?
(Phil) Are you sure about that?
(Lemmy) This is from ''lnferno.'' lt's called ''Killers.''
We went in to record
''Power, Corruption and Lies'' in Britannia Row in lslington in London and the people that had been in before us hadn't...
You're supposed to level the desk.
When you leave, you take the strip off and you level the desk, put it back to how it was, and they hadn't done it, presumably because it was late when they finished.
And l said,
''Rotten fuckers. Who was it?''
He went, ''Oh, it was Motörhead.'' l'm like, ''Fucking great!''
So we put my bass through his channels on the desk.
And it sounded shit!
When l think of Motörhead, l don't think subtlety. l think of a door blown open.
His voice, it's rasp, you know. lt's like eating fucking nails. lt's more like a wind coming at you. l have the impression that someone's spanking my ears!
Everything starts going grainy.
That's it - it's like being in a sandstorm.
That's it. That's it. lt's the oral equivalent of being in a sandstorm, l would say.
When the lights go down and that motherfucker hits the stage and blows that cigarette out and winds into the bass, it's game over, man.
Drag anybody to a Motörhead show and they're gonna go... d lf you like to gamble, l'm your man d You win some, you lose some, it's all the same to me d The pleasure is to play, it makes no difference what you say d l don't share your greed, the only card l need d The ace of spades, the ace of spades, all right d Playing for the high one, dancing with the devil d Going with the flow, it's all a game to me d Seven or eleven, snake eyes watching you d Double up or quit, double stakes or split d The ace of spades, the ace of spades, all right d You know l'm born to lose, and gambling's for fools d But that's the way l like it baby l don't wanna live for ever d That's right, baby d l'm gonna burn everything l have d Pushing up the ante l know you've got to see me d Read 'em and weep, the dead man's hand again d l see it in your eyes, take one look and die d The only thing you see, you know it's gonna be d The ace of spades, the ace of spades, all right d
(Lemmy) Thank you kindly.
(Woman on TV) 'Next election, l'm gonna run against you and win.'
(Man) 'You wanna take me on? Fine.
'But if you plan to beat me, you'll have to... (Gasps )'
- 'What is it?'
- 'A bee just flew in through that door.
'Don't move.'
'Now look who's made it.
'First order of business, free honey for everyone!
'Yeah! Made of bee! Made of bee!
'Ow! Oh, done stung myself.'
'd He's a family guy
'd Lucky there's a man who positively can do
'd All the things that make us laugh and cry
'd He's a family guy d ' d My ma told me lots of things d About the life we lead d
Everything about Lemmy's playing sets him apart from other bass players.
For that matter, any other musician. l think the biggest thing is the Rickenbacker and the Marshalls.
That's a sound l don't think l've ever heard anybody create on bass.
And he plays it a lot like some heavy metal guitar players play.
He doesn't play guitar on bass, but it almost sounds like guitar.
The basic difference is that most bass players sounds like this...
Whereas l...
..sound quite different.
Like that. l always wanted that sound. l didn't necessarily know it then. lt evolves, you know.
- What would you say, Tim?
- What's that?
How would you say my bass playing encompasses my personality and my outlook on life, generally, in the modern 21 st century already? l think the phrase
''hammer and tongs'' comes to mind.
Really? Not a hammer and anvil?
- An anvil and tongs.
- An anvil and tongs and hammer.
- And stuff like that.
- Very hard.
Actually, he's never heard us...
Nobody fucking understands a thing we say.
We're just two geezers trying to get along backstage, you know.
- And everything like that.
- And things like that.
Americans usually have a nervous breakdown around now!
He's dead, isn't he?
How do you sell a deaf guy a frog?
(Yells ) Do you want to buy a frog?
How do you make a dead baby float?
Two scoops of ice cream, two scoops of dead baby! ls it still as fun as it used to be to go around the world and play concerts?
Yeah, it's great. lt's a great job. l recommend it. lt's almost as good as being a TV interviewer!
You see any?
What makes you the proudest in your career?
Survival, l think.
Every year that goes by, l get a bit prouder.
Cos we proved that we weren't the trash band that they said we were originally.
And every year we survive proves it a little bit more.
You know, like that, right?
What keeps you going?
30 years.
What keeps you going and going?
Well, see, you have a dream when you're a kid, and my dream came true, so why stop it?
Oh, until 2047.
Then l might slow down a bit.
Might be 2048. l don't know. l love everything about Lemmy.
The music. Fucking everything.
There's nothing not to like about Motörhead. lt's the band that's got it all.
They're hardcore.
A proper hardcore band.
They're not like Saxon and all that shit.
They're excellent.
They've always been full-on.
Motörhead set a standard for all the others to follow.
Every time you see them live, they make you deaf. l don't have to listen to my wife.
For about five days out of every year, my wife is totally ignored because...
''Sorry, darling, l can't hear you. l just can't hear you!''
They've made me stone deaf for ever! d Rock and roll to save your soul d And l got it d Give it to me loud and free d Don't knock it d Let me hear it till the end of time, it's the only way d Send shivers up and down your spine, you can't stop it d l'm telling you one more time d lt ain't no crime d Rock it d lt's the only way to fly, l gotta have it d Break through, gonna break you too d You better grab it d Let me hear it till the end of time, it's the only way d lt'll stop you on a dime, you can't stop it d l'm telling you one more time d lt ain't no crime d Rock it d Say it d Rock and roll music gonna stop the world d Can't lose it d lt'll make your toenails curl, you can't defuse it d Gonna hear it all the time, it's the only way d Gonna make you feel all right d You can't excuse it d l'm telling you one more time, it ain't no crime d Rock it d Rock it, rock it d
That's all right. lt's the biggest thing that's ever happened to me. lt's huge. l love that guy!
He's so much nicer than l thought he would be.
- (Cameraman) Why is that?
- He's really humble. l thought he'd be like,
''l don't give a shit.''
When l said, ''Your music really means something to me,'' he looks at me and says,
''Thank you.''
That really means something to me.
To look at, he's very intimidating, but this is one of the nicest guys you could ever meet.
So many people hit him for stuff and you just look at him.
Most of the people in his position would not pay attention to half of these things, and this is a guy who'd go out of his way to help anybody.
You see it in his heart. l was married before, right, and we were all on the road together.
My husband was a huge...
My husband, Matthew, had come from lndiana, just a Redneck kid.
He idolised Lemmy - huge Motörhead fan.
So we're on tour with Motörhead, and me and Lemmy immediately have this connection.
My marriage was heavily on the rocks, you know.
Lemmy - my husband just wouldn't talk to him or anything.
Lemmy would come up with T-shirts and be like, ''Hey, Matt,'' you know.
And when we actually separated, he was telling all these people in town...
We were from Athens, Georgia, so it's a small town.
He was telling all these people that me and Lemmy were having this affair.
So he...
Eight months later he...died.
When l was going through his things - his mother gave me his things - l found a letter from Lemmy.
He had written him a letter saying, you know,
''l know at one point you really liked my band.
''Just so that you know, for the record,
Corey and l are really good friends.
''There is mutual love and respect there.
''She did nothing but talk about how much she loved you.
''l would never cross that line. l'm not that type of man.''
And it was just so cute, because when you read the letter, it was like, ''l know at one time you liked me and my band,'' and it's Lemmy of fucking Motörhead! lt's so bizarre, but he wrote this really beautiful letter to him with the red candle wax with the stamp on it on the back and sent it to him.
That type of shit, man.
You know, it's like...
He's a very, very honourable, generous, good, good man.
He's very much a complex emotional person but there is a kind of a distance that he's purposely put in between there.
Do you know what l mean?
And l think a lot of that is, from what he tells me, from his youth, and how he's always had to look out for himself.
He's realised that 90% of the time the only person he can depend on is himself.
(Cameraman) Tell me about the most important people in your life.
My mother, obviously, cos she brought me up on her own.
And my granny for filling in during the day.
They were really important.
They really dictated my outlook on things.
Being brought up by two women is different from having the big heavy husband in the house.
So l never got, ''Let's go out and kill small furry animals, son.'' l never had that shit going on. l just never missed a father because l never had one so l didn't care.
He was just a miserable little dickhead with glasses and all he ever did for me was walk out on me. l think l understand women a lot better than some guys do.
Women want the same things as guys do.
They just don't want them for as long.
Guys want the quick fuck in the alley all their lives.
Girls get tired of that pretty quick.
They want security.
Security means you have to give up everything that might be a risk to that, which is why l'm not married.
My dad once went out with a woman that he really fell in love with when he was very young - he must have been about 1 7.
And this girl died of a heroin overdose.
You know, my dad is anti-heroin.
He will not have anything to do with someone who is on smack.
But this girl, and l think it's because of this girl, because he really loved this girl, and she...
He found her in the bathtub.
He found her dead in the tub. l think that, as l can recall, he sat in an armchair for, like, three days.
He hasn't been able to feel the same way about any other woman since that woman.
That might be a part of why he is the way he is. l don't miss her any more. lt's been a long time. '7 3.
That's a long enough time. l can't even...
Some of the time you can't even picture her face. l can picture Suzy's.
She was all right.
She died young and left a beautiful corpse, you know.
When they do that, it's easy to think that they were the one.
She probably wasn't, cos she was a mouthy little bitch as well.
But she was great at the same time.
For a woman to be really interesting, she's got to be something of a bitch, surely.
Somebody going, ''Yes, sir,'' all the time, that's no fucking good, is it?
You want somebody to give you a run for your money.
No relationship can survive a guy or girl being in a rock band unless the other partner is also in a rock band.
And even then it's difficult.
You're away seven months of the year.
Nobody's going to stand for that.
Either they go with you, which doesn't work, or they sit at home and have affairs.
Or if they take care of the kids, they're building up resentment cos they think you're having a whale of a time on the road. lt can't work. lt's one of those things.
You have to make up your mind between rock and roll or your beloved, and since sex only lasts half an hour at the very top and a rock and roll set lasts an hour and a half, l think we got that one sorted out.
Do you ever stop filming?
Huh?
What a pity you haven't got smell-on-vision.
Here you are.
'd Here's a little song l wrote
'd You might want to sing it note for note
'd Don't worry
'd Be happy
'd Don't worry, be happy now
'd Ooo, ooo, ooo, ooo
'd Don't worry
'd Ooo, ooo, ooo, ooo
'd Be happy
'd Don't worry, be happy d ' d Well, if l'm in heaven d Or if l'm in hell d Don't matter to me d Cos l'm under your spell d l'm playing haste d Trying to make you see d Don't matter to me d l'm over my head d And l'm driving to shore d Don't matter to me d Like l told you before d l'll sleep like a stone d lf you're leaving me d Don't matter to me d Babe, you know l love you d But you can't break my heart d l wanna be here with you d But you're tearing me apart d l want you to be the only one d l want you to be mine d But if you're gonna be this way d l just don't have the time d l don't know if l should stay d Or if l should go d Don't matter to me d lf l can't see you no more d lf you shoot out my lights d Black night's where l'll be d lt don't matter to me d l just can imagine the party where everybody's gonna celebrate his life someday. lt's gonna be like for a head of state. l think he'll be sorely missed throughout the world when he goes, but l think the way it will be, and the way he'd want it as well, there's not gonna be many tears shed but many
''what fucking great times we had!''
Do you know what l mean? lt's gonna be one of those - a sad day but also a day where everybody's gonna get together and talk about the great fucking times that they had with him and his music. l don't know how old he is and l don't care. He could be 1 00.
The fact that he's up there still doing it is absolute inspiration for us.
We got nothing to complain about and everything to look forward to.
This is what l am.
This is what l do.
This is what l'm supposed to do.
Right here. l'm supposed to be backstage, waiting to go on, you know.
(Cameraman) lf your life was a movie, how would you want it to end? lt should end with the clap of thunder and me vanishing off the top of the mountain, leaving behind a plaque which says,
''Fooled you, again.''
Something along those lines.
But we can't afford the mountain and we can't afford the flash powder and we can't get the cameras up the slope.
So there you go.
You can't have everything, can you?
Where would you put it?
- Any regrets?
- None. Life's too short.
Motörhead! Motörhead! l would like to say that you are one of the best fucking crowds we ever played for.
Thank you!
Don't forget us.
We are Motörhead, and we play rock and roll! d Only way to feel the noise is when it's good and loud d So good l can't believe it screaming with the crowd d Don't sweat it, get it back to you d Don't sweat it, get it back to you d Overkill, overkill d Overkill d On your feet you feel the beat d Goes straight to your spine d Shake your head you must be dead d lf it don't make you fly d Don't sweat it, get it back to you d Don't sweat it, get it back to you d Overkill, overkill d Overkill d Say it d Know your body's made to move d You feel it in your guts d Rock and roll ain't worth the name d if it don't make you strut d Don't sweat it, get it back to you d Don't sweat it, get it back to you d Overkill d Overkill d Say it d
- All for one.
- And all for another fucking year.
Yeah, it was a good one this year.
Fuck off back to your dressing rooms now. lt was all right this show, wasn't it?
- Bugger off, Greg!
- Yeah, give it a rest.
Not in the elevator.
Give it a break. Oi!
All right, go away.
Fuck off with the cameras, boys.
There they are.
What's the matter with you, pal?
You want a mouth full of broken teeth?
- Cheers, guys.
- Cheers, man. Good to see you again.
DVDRip by Ssugar
Not enough, not enough
Not enough love
Not enough, not enough
Not enough love
Not enough, not enough
Not enough love
Not enough, not enough
Not enough love
There's no room for hating
A heart full of kindness
How long will it take, then
For that to ring true?
Our chances are fading
Just stop all this blindness
A new world is waiting
For us if we do
- But there's not enough love in our hearts
- Not enough love in our hearts
They write songs about it
They put it in movies
Our life would be better
With just enough love
- Still, we tend to doubt it
- Still, we tend to doubt it
- Though sometimes it moves us
- Though sometimes it moves us
- We settle for little
- We settle for little
When we could have much
'Cause there's not enough love
In our hearts
No, no
There's not enough love
There's not enough love
There's not enough love in our hearts
- There's not enough love
- There's not enough love
- There's not enough trust
- There's not enough trust
- And it doesn't keep us apart
- Keep us apart
- There's not enough caring
- There's not enough sharing
- Too much "me, me, me" and
- Too much double-daring
- There's too much delaying
- Oh, and not enough praying
I'm just saying It's not enough
Oh, no
I'm just saying It's not enough
Oh, oh!
Not enough, not enough
Not enough love
Not enough, not enough
Not enough trust
- Let's build a foundation
- And change situations
- Strive for salvation
- Heed this revelation
Fall on your knees
And avoiding temptation
I'm just saying
It's just not enough
Unh!
- No, it's not enough
- It's not enough
Not enough, not enough
Not enough love
Not enough, not enough
Not enough trust
- Not enough love
- Come on
Not enough love
- Darling, what's the matter?
- I'm okay.
- It's nothing.
- Something's wrong.
- I know you better than that.
- Vi, take over for me.
Passion in your hearts now
Come on, I'm taking you home.
- Down in our hearts
- Down in our hearts
- Not enough love
- Not enough love
- Down in our hearts
- Down in our hearts
- Not enough love
- Not enough love
- Down in our hearts
- Preach, choir
- Not enough love down in our hearts
- Speak on it, hey, hey, yeah
Friends...
...we are here today to celebrate the memory of Bernard Sparrow.
Beloved husband, cherished father and grandfather.
With his last breath...
...he led our choir to victory in the regional semifinals.
Let the church say "Amen."
Amen.
Bernard loved life. And he knew how to live it. Isn't that right, G.G.?
The man had five kids.
He must've loved something.
God judges a man on two things...
...and two things alone.
On his faith...
...and on the contents of his heart.
Amen.
And, Bernie, we will miss that heart each and every day.
Ah.
- Please.
- Thank you.
Mm-hm.
Oh, it was a beautiful memorial service,
Pastor.
I saw your boys, but not your daughter and her family.
Well, God gives you girls so your mama can say, "I told you so."
The only thing that would've made it perfect would have been if the choir had sung.
- But then there was no one to lead them.
- I think I know where this is going.
You need to replace Bernie as soon as possible...
...so we can continue in the competition.
I think he would've wanted that.
- Oh, I agree.
- Good.
Because the church council has already discussed it...
...and we've decided to offer the position to Vi Rose Hill.
Vi Rose?
Well, I mean, nothing against Vi Rose, but I helped prepare every arrangement.
I helped choose every song.
Vi Rose has been second-in-command for a long time now.
Well, it is your decision, of course.
We're very appreciative at the church of your generous support.
In fact, I don't think we'd be able to stay open without you.
But...
...that's our decision.
Caleb, what is your country ass eating?
- Pig and pickle mash. You want some?
- Ugh, get that mess out of my face.
Caleb, you are so country...
...you have been married three times and still have the same in-laws.
Ha-ha! She said he been married three times and still got the same in-laws.
Small town, big family.
That's just the law of averages.
- He said, "That's just the law of averages."
- Devonne...
- ...do we look deaf to you?
- Oh!
Hey, there she is.
All right, heh, all right.
But, altos, y'all have to look at me when y'all singing.
I know y'all feeling the spirit, but Jesus don't know where the cut-offs are.
Look, you all sing as well as I know you can and we finally gonna whoop Baylor Sykes...
...and that Detroit choir in the national semifinals.
Pfft. We've been saying that for four years.
Devonne, save time, see it my way.
Ooh.
Look, y'all, I know y'all miss Bernie.
So do I.
Those are some mighty big shoes to fill.
But I like to think he is right on my shoulder...
...guiding my hands, urging us on.
What do y'all say?
Y'all with me?
- Pacashau, y'all with me?
- We with you.
Yeah.
- Pacashau.
- That's what I'm talking about.
Well, don't you look as happy as a puppy wagging two tails.
I did not ask to be made choir director.
Please, Vi, I have known you for a minute.
The council chose me over you.
When foxes pack the jury box, the chicken's always guilty.
And when folks get too wrapped up in themselves...
...they make very small packages.
Olivia, go check on your brother.
He better not be in that car.
What are you doing out here?
It's freezing.
Why do you have those sunglasses on?
You look like Mary J. Blige.
- Light hurts my eyes.
- It's dark.
Mary J. Blige had many hits.
But I prefer one-hit wonders, like Sir Mix-A-Lot.
Uh-huh.
- What's up, Olivia?
- Hi, Manny.
You ever go anyplace besides school or church?
- I only see you at one or the other.
- I don't know.
Hey, you think you and me can go out sometime?
- I'm not allowed to date.
- You're 16.
I'll be a perfect gentleman.
I respect women. For real.
Is this your guitar?
Brand-new Gibson. You want to see it?
Well, hello, Manny.
You know, 30 more feet...
...and you'd actually be inside the church instead of loitering outside.
Mama.
- I told you to find your brother.
- I did. He's in the car.
I can give her a ride home after rehearsal, Miss Hill.
I don't doubt that you can or that you will.
Just remember, there's always free cheese in the mouse trap.
But trust me, the mice there ain't happy.
Walter. Inside, now.
Aah! Grandma. Wait, it's me.
Randy?
Surprise.
Mm-hm.
Randy, you need to put that thing away.
I'm sorry. Sorry.
- You are in the house of God.
- Yeah, okay.
Now sit down there so I can keep an eye on you.
Can I help you?
Excuse me, Miss Earla.
But when y'all sing, the angels just about spit with envy.
Thank you, Mr. Hsu.
You have a very nice tenor voice yourself.
You got some big old lungs on you too.
You don't mind my saying?
He just call you big?
You just call me big?
Y'all know what y'all doing, right?
- You know what you're doing? Y'all ready?
- Yes, ma'am.
Gonna make a change
For once in my life
All right, now, you're singing too wild.
It's gonna feel real good
Gonna make a difference
Gonna make it right
Okay, this is why I shouldn't have let y'all talk me into doing pop songs in church.
Don't you bring that Mariah/Christina mess up in here.
I don't care about hearing you.
I want to hear God through you.
As I turn up the collar
On my favorite winter coat
This wind is blowing my mind
I see the kids in the street
With not enough to eat
Who am I to be blind
Pretending not to see their need?
A summer's disregard
A broken bottle top
And a one man's soul
They follow each other
On the wind, you know
'Cause they got nowhere to go
That's why I want you to know
I'm starting with the man in the mirror
I'm asking him to change his ways
And no message
Could've been any clearer
If you wanna make the world
A better place
Take at look at yourself
And then make a change
Oh
Nanana, nanana, nana, nana
Oh, yeah
I've been a victim of
A selfish kind of love
It's time that I realize
There are some with no home
Not a nickel to loan
Could it be, really me
Pretending that they're not alone
A willow deeply scarred
Somebody's broken heart
And a washed-out dream
A washed-out dream
They follow the pattern
Of the wind, you see
'Cause they got no place to be
That's why I'm starting with me
I'm starting with the man in the mirror
I'm asking him to change his ways
And no message
Could've been any clearer
If you wanna make the world
A better place
Take a look at yourself
And then make that
- Change
- I'm starting with the man in the mirror
Oh, yeah
I'm asking him to change his ways
- Change
- No message could've been any clearer
If you wanna make the world
A better place
Take a look at yourself
And then make the change
You gotta get it right
While you got the time
'Cause when you close your heart
Then you close your mind
Starting with the man in the mirror
Oh, yeah
- I'm asking him to change
- Yeah
Change
No message could've been any clearer
If you wanna make the world
A better place
Take a look at yourself
And make that change
Nanana, nanana, nana, nana
Nanana, nanana
- Yeah
- Oh, yeah
- Oh, oh
- Nanana, nanana, nana, nana
I'm gonna make a change
- For once in my life
- Ooh
Whoo! Are you kidding me?
Make some noise up in this bitch.
Heh, uh....
Y'all remember my grandson, Randy.
Did you hear what that boy said?
And in a house of God.
Boy, the apple don't fall far from the family tree.
- I thought it was funny.
- Oh, you did, huh?
You know, his mother threw him out the house in New York.
That's why he's at G.G.'s house.
And what did G.G. do to that robe? Getting it all fitted and taken in like that?
Like she's better than everybody else just because she's rich.
That woman, I swear.
Did you see the way she looked at you?
Like Jesus left a will putting her in charge.
I think you have to maintain a certain speed or you actually go back in time.
And how much did she spend on all that?
You stay away from that boy is all.
- Tsk.
- Don't suck your teeth at me.
He been trouble since he was 5 years old and made you eat that goldfish.
Talking about that's where the little crackers come from.
- Mama.
- Don't think he don't have...
...some new goldfish either.
People don't change, especially in that family, okay?
And I saw the way you were looking at Olivia Hill.
You date that little girl, Vi Rose will just about lay square eggs.
Be worth it.
Hey, now, we're all going around to the pastor's for lunch on Saturday.
So you behave.
Hey girl
Walter, Olivia.
You're gonna be late for school.
You're too shy shy
Hush hush, eye to eye
Too shy shy
Cover yourself.
Eye to eye
Too shy shy
Walter.
I was in my room listening to "Too Shy" by Kajagoogoo.
One-hit wonders are unfairly maligned.
I'm fond of "Walk Away Renée" by The Left Banke.
Walter, I swear your train of thought makes all local stops.
Go ahead, eat your breakfast.
- Mail came.
- Give me mine.
Okay, take it easy.
The man writes every week.
You act like it's the Fourth of July.
Why don't he just text or e-mail like everybody else?
Mm.
Bow your heads. Heavenly Father, thank you for this food which we are about to receive.
Love letter?
From my father.
He's stationed at Fort Kail.
Oh, I thought he got out of the Army.
- He went back.
- Pssh.
Don't know why anybody would wanna leave you.
You grew up like you were on fast-forward.
Like one of them stop-motion movies of flowers.
Please.
And the way you sing. Oh!
I used to think church music was all corny, and then you get up there and it's like:
- I never heard anything like that.
- Mm-hm.
Hey. You know I'm a musician too.
What do you say, huh?
We hit the road, start a band...
...make some babies that look exactly like you.
Oh, you got a nice smile. Always di...
- Oh.
- Oh, my gosh, are you okay?
I have to go.
I'm gonna be late for school.
- Wait, hey. Can I meet you after?
- I have choir practice.
Oh, I'm gonna get in that choir.
Right.
- You'll see.
Mm. That's nice.
That is a lovely hat, Vi Rose.
Thank you, Pastor.
I didn't expect anyone to notice.
Like your hair, G.G. You worried you're not gonna be seen from space?
Could you pass the butter, please?
Feels downright strange sitting here with y'all and not Bernie.
- He was our rock.
- Thank you, Pastor.
I keep looking out my window expecting to see him out on that big old porch.
But, so far, he hasn't made an appearance.
Times like these, we feel his loss even more.
Amen.
So, Vi, how is Marcus keeping himself?
Just fine, thanks.
- Two years is an awful long time to be away.
- Crazy, you ask me.
I mean, who rejoins the Army for a second time at age 35?
Someone who's out of work and wants to feed his family.
All right, Olivia.
- And wants to serve his country.
- It's confusing, that's all.
- What you trying to say?
- Well, it's not just me.
The whole town's confused.
It's none of this town's business about me and my husband.
Well, it is a small town, Vi.
And people do care.
And if you don't like that, maybe you should move to New York.
My mama told me if people swept in front of their own doors...
- ...this whole world would be clean.
- Hell, yeah.
- What?
- Ha-ha.
Apologize for your language, young lady.
I'm sorry.
It was just surprising when he left.
That's all.
Yeah, to all of us.
There have been more one-hit wonders in hip-hop...
...than in the entire 30 years of music that preceded it.
All right, Walter.
My particular favorite is "Walk Away Renée" by The Left Banke.
Just walk away, Renée
You won't see me....
When Walter gonna sing, ain't nothing you can do but sit back and enjoy it.
The em...
He gets a little nervous around people.
I think it's time to say grace.
Dear Lord, we come before you...
Walter, Pastor trying to say grace.
Excuse me.
Walter, you okay?
You know, there's nothing to be nervous about. Everybody here loves you.
Uh, can I try?
There's nothing you can do when he's like this. It's his Asperger's syndrome.
- I don't like to be touched.
- I won't touch you. Uh, look.
Hey, I will sit all the way down here.
Okay?
Okay, good. Now just play that note.
This one. Right there.
Good. Good. Okay, now, just do it in time.
That's good. That's perfect. That's great.
Okay, now, keep doing that.
Just walk away, Renée
You won't see me follow you back home
The empty sidewalks on my block
Are not the same
You're not to blame
That's "Walk Away Renée."
Hey, you know, um, if you want,
I could give Walter piano lessons.
Walter, would you like that?
Come on.
Here you go.
You go out there and win that competition, you hear?
We're counting on you.
Ah, there but for the grace of God.
Amen.
I worry about my job at the hardware store and my boss is my own father.
Well, like he always says, people always need a hammer or a doorknob.
I'm in love with a stripper
She poppin', she poppin', she rollin'
She drivin' that pole
And I'm in love with a stripper
She trippin', she trippin', she playin'
I ain't goin' nowhere, and I'm stayin'
I'm in love with a stripper
She poppin', she poppin', she rollin'
She drivin' that pole
What? I'm in love with a stripper
She poppin', she poppin', she rollin'
- I'm in love
- I'm in, I'm in love
With a stripper.
Do it right now. Come on and pray.
Baylor Sykes and the Holy Vision Church of Detroit.
They're the reason we never make it to the finals.
They always beat us at regionals.
- Why don't you do songs like this?
- Can you imagine? With my mother?
So how long until regionals?
Two weeks.
I should go.
If she knew I even came out here to sit with you, she'd explode.
Will I see you tomorrow?
See you when I get home from school.
Don't look at my butt. I'm a good girl.
- Stop it.
- Ha-ha-ha.
- You wanna join the choir?
- Yes, ma'am.
He's a good singer, Mama.
A great singer.
Yeah, when he's singing about being in love with strippers.
I mean, do you know any decent songs?
Because they don't have to be corny.
How about, um,
Sly and the Family Stone?
I want to take you higher
Do you even know who Sly Stone is?
You just wanna be near my little girl.
Just listen to him, Mama.
- He is good, Vi.
- Yeah, how would you know?
We've been sneaking in some extra rehearsals.
Excuse me?
We wanna win, Vi.
- Come on, give him a chance.
- Go ahead, Vi, give him a shot.
I'm sorry.
I'd call you stubborn, but that'd be an insult to mules.
Heh, oh, she said she'd call her stubborn, but it'd be a insult....
Vi, don't deny him just because he's my grandson.
Maybe I'm amazed at the way
You love me all the time
And maybe I'm afraid
Of the way I love you
Maybe I'm amazed at the way
You pulled me out of time
You hung me on a line
Maybe I'm amazed at the way
I really need you
Maybe I'm a girl
Maybe I'm a lonely girl
Who's in the middle of something
That she doesn't really understand
Maybe I'm a girl
And maybe you're the only one
Who could ever help me
Hey, won't you help me understand?
Ooh, help me understand
Maybe I'm amazed at the way
You're with me all the time
And maybe I'm afraid
Of the way I need you, yeah
Maybe I'm amazed at the way
You help me sing my song
Right me when I'm wrong
Maybe I'm amazed at the way
I really need you
Yeah
Maybe I'm a girl
Maybe I'm a lonely girl
Who's in the middle of something
-Oh
- That she doesn't really understand
Maybe I'm a girl
Maybe you're the only one
Who could ever help me
-Oh
- Hey, won't you help me understand?
- Ooh, help me understand
- Help me understand
Maybe I'm amazed at the way
You love me all the time
- Love me all the time
- Maybe
Maybe I'm afraid of the way
I love you
Ooh
Maybe I'm amazed at the way
You pulled me out of time
Ooh
- Yeah
Maybe
- Maybe I'm amazed at the way
I really need you
Maybe I'm amazed
Maybe I'm amazed
Maybe I'm amazed
Oh!
Oh, maybe I'm amazed
- By you
- By you
- Amazed
- Amazed, amazed
- By you
- By you
Come on.
Oh! Ah! That was amazing.
It was like... It was like you knew everything I was gonna sing before I sang it.
Well, we rehearsed all week, so it's not magic.
It was magic.
You felt it too, I know you did. Heh.
What?
My mother says when I sing,
I should just be the instrument...
...not try to be more important than God.
But singing is the only time
I feel important.
Where I don't feel like I'm this close to disappearing.
I don't know,
I guess I'm just being prideful.
Hey.
So what?
You deserve to be as proud as you can be.
Seems to me your mother doesn't tell you that near enough. Heh.
Hey, well, I'll tell you, I am proud of you.
And I would be very upset if you disappeared.
Young love.
I haven't been with anyone in three years.
Four.
As long as you live
Someone who loves you
Tender like I do
You'll never find
Oh.
No matter where you search
Someone who cares about you
Wakey-wakey, Mr. Hsu.
The way I do
I made you a big breakfast.
Mr. Hsu?
Oh, Mr. Hsu.
I'm the one who loves you
And there's no one else
No
Mr. Hsu.
God.
Cherish the brief time you and Mr. Hsu had together...
...rather than weep for his loss.
That's not why I'm crying.
Oh.
- Why are you crying?
- Well...
...what man's ever gonna wanna be with me after this?
From now on, I'll just be known as the girl who, you know....
Tap it and die.
- I hear that.
- No.
Go, go, go. She wakes up if I breathe funny in the next room.
- Hey, Vi Rose, I have your daughter.
- Stop. That's not funny.
- Don't wake up, I'm stealing her.
- Stop.
I'm gonna keep you dancing
Baby, all night long
Drop it nice and low
Take it to the floor
Let me see you work it
What you working for?
If I didn't see it with my own eyes,
I wouldn't believe it.
Olivia Hill and not a pew in sight.
Come on, Manny, I wanna dance.
Don't talk to me like you know me.
I just met you 10 minutes ago.
You look pretty.
Would you like to dance?
I'm sorry, son.
She promised this dance to me.
Baby girl, you're with me
'Cause you're beautiful
Got it going on, baby
From head to toe
And I'm gonna take you home
If you don't wanna go
I still have you on my phone
- I can't, Randy. I don't know how.
- Yes, you do.
I know you dance all alone in your room to your radio.
Got a little stuffed animal going:
You wanna be a church girl the rest of your life?
There's so much more to you than that.
Come on.
Baby girl, you're with me
'Cause you're beautiful
Got it going on, baby
From head to toe
And I'm gonna take you home
If you don't wanna go
I still have you on my phone
'Cause I like the way
You like to dance with me
And I like the way you looking
In them jeans
And I wanna take you home
If you don't wanna go
I still have you on my phone
Let me get your bedpan.
Okay, here we go. Okay.
It's okay. It's all right.
Hey.
Lazy bum.
It's time for your lesson.
No one wants to hang out with me.
That's not true.
I like hanging out with you.
You're like the only guy friend
I have here.
I don't wanna be like this, you know.
To have no idea when people are joking...
...or when they want me to shut up and leave them alone.
I think everything's fine...
...and then they leave a tissue full of shit in my locker.
There are always gonna be jerks that wanna treat you badly.
I mean, my mother called me stupid so many times...
...I finally believed her and quit school.
Hey.
Crazy or not, you're an awesome kid.
I mean, you're scary smart.
You picked up the piano like you have alien magic powers.
And....
And I'm really glad I met you.
- Randy?
- Yeah.
Part of my condition is I can't tell when people are coming on to me.
I'm sorry. Okay, I'm sorry.
Hey. You know what I think?
I think we need more than a piano lesson today.
- Hey, Randy.
- Yeah.
I just realized we're lying on the left bank of the quarry.
And The Left Banke is the name of the band...
...who recorded "Walk Away Renée."
They spelled "bank" with an E.
You know how you don't know when people want you to shut up? Shut up, Walter.
Come on, you try it.
- No.
- Come on.
Damn, you can sing, boy.
You know, you should join the choir,
Walter, or at least play with the band.
I can't. It's too loud. It hurts my ears.
See, that's just an excuse you use so you don't have to be around people.
You're afraid you're gonna be embarrassed or rejected. But you are strong, talented.
And I need a friend there...
...to stand with me against your psycho mom.
That woman is crazy
That woman is crazy
That woman is crazy
That woman is crazy
That woman is crazy
- That woman is crazy
- That woman is crazy
That woman is crazy
- Didn't know anyone else came here.
- What do you want?
Me? Nothing.
Got a problem you wanna iron out with me?
I don't know who you think you are, son, coming into town, hitting on Olivia.
She don't mean nothing to you but a challenge.
The challenge is everything.
You're the one that don't mean nothing to me.
Come on.
What are you doing? Huh?
Unh! Quit hitting me in the nuts.
Yeah!
Yes!
That was great.
What happened? You okay?
- We beat his ass, Mama.
- You got into a fight?
He saved my life.
You'd have been proud of him.
Answer me. Somebody hit you?
He didn't get the chance. I was too fast.
Too fast? Look at you. Go to your room.
Whoo-hoo! Ha-ha.
- What happened?
- It wasn't a big deal. You'd have been proud.
He didn't have to talk about one-hit wonders or worry about being touched.
I mean, he saw me in trouble and he just went for it.
Know what? You a falling-rock zone.
And anybody who stands too close to you...
...is gonna have a whole mess of rocks fall on them too.
He's fine. He's better than fine.
He's proud.
Look at him. He feels like a man for the first time in his life.
That's not how I want my son to feel like a man.
- Where's Olivia?
- Never mind about Olivia.
Get out of my house.
- Mama, no.
- I told you to go.
I'll deal with you in a minute.
She can't keep me from seeing you.
She was just angry. She'll get over it.
Why am I defending her?
She wants to control my life.
It must kill her that she can't control Walter's too.
What kills her is feeling guilty for Walter's condition.
That's why she holds y'all so close.
Maybe too close.
There I go again.
Is there such a thing as being too good a Christian?
Because that just may be my problem.
I wish you really knew my father.
He's the total opposite of her.
Well, then I know who you take after.
I'll just leave this right here.
Excuse me.
Whoa!
- Back to your corners.
- All right.
This is not gonna turn into that in my house.
And get your little butt off my table.
That's where I eat.
Welcome to the
Joyful Noise Regional Finals.
And now, four-time champion
Holy Vision Church of Detroit...
...featuring Baylor Sykes.
Hey, hey, hey
Thought I had it together now
Hey, hey, hey
Thought I could handle the weather now
Hey, hey, hey
Thought I'd make it on my own
Hey, hey, hey
But now I see I was wrong
- Hey, hey, hey
- Ow!
I think the same when you're not with me
Hey, hey, hey
I feel the change when you're near me
Hey, hey, hey
I'm not afraid to be strong
Hey, hey, hey
I know I'm never alone long
Uh!
When no one's around
And the rain's falling down
You cover me
Hey! Do I have a witness out there somewhere?
On that side? Let me hear you.
When my days turn to night
Will you rescue me?
I hope they see
Oh, Lord, not again.
Those aren't the same singers from the clip online.
And if they say I'm crazy about you
I just want everybody to see
Ha! Hallelujah.
Maybe they are just that good.
I just want you to see.
I just want the whole world to see
- I'm in love with you
- Oh, oh, ah
- I'm in love with you
- Oh, oh, ah
- Jesus, I'm in love with you
- Oh, oh, ah
His love is deep till the end....
They'd have to rehearse like eight hours a day.
Don't these people have jobs or families?
So the whole world can see
- Can see
- Let me hear you.
Y'all ready?
- Ow!
- Hey, hey, hey
Hey, hey, hey
Hey, hey, hey
On that side, sing.
Hey, hey, hey
- Whoo!
- Can't make it without you
Clap your hands.
- Ain't a good day without you
- Come on.
And if they say I'm crazy about you
I just want everybody to see
When they look at me.
When they look at me
I hope they can see
- I gotta tell the world, y'all.
- I just want the whole world to see
- I'm in love with you
- Oh, oh, ah
- I'm in love with you
- Oh, oh, ah
- I'm in love with you
- Oh, oh, ah
Jesus, I'm in love with you
Uh, uh
Listen here, listen here I say
You've been good
I'm in love with you
You've been kind
I'm in love with you
You've been great
I'm in love with you
I'm in love with you
Yeah!
Let's go.
Whoo!
Cheer up. We can't win them all.
They're just disappointed.
We all are.
You know, Pastor,
I been thinking about this a lot.
I think next year, we need to do more traditional songs.
Like, not so many horns.
Not going to be any next year, Vi.
It's official.
What?
- It's too expensive and we always lose.
I'm sorry.
I don't consider making it to the regional finals anything to be ashamed of.
Of course not. But every year?
- Wait, really?
- What?
We didn't before that.
The money is best used elsewhere.
Well, it's not about winning or losing.
It's about giving our town something to believe in.
A reason to drive 300 miles and have a little something to cheer about...
...instead of sitting home, watching everything fall apart.
It's about praising his name.
And we can praise his name on Sunday in our own church.
I didn't create this economy.
It's been settled.
P is for polar bear.
Did you see her face when we lost?
She was actually surprised.
- She be saying "less horns" when...
- Olivia, do the voice.
Less horns.
When what she needs to do...
...is get rid of the tired old-timey arrangements...
- ...and let you get your hands on them.
- Mm-hm.
And let Earla choreograph us some moves.
Ah, like that's gonna happen.
It could. We just have to convince her, that's all.
All right. Keep your voice down.
- She's at work. She can't catch you here.
- You're scaring the animals.
See, they're all staring at us.
- It's because you're so hot.
- Shut up.
Look at the yak.
He's totally into you.
Come on.
What do I have to do to cheer you up?
Huh?
- Hey. Hey. Come on. Let's go.
- Go where?
Come on. Don't you worry about where we're going.
- Don't take my blanket, I'm comfortable.
- Don't care. Give me your hand.
- Where?
- Ha-ha-ha. Don't worry about it.
If we go outside, I need my shoes.
- Okay, I got them.
Where we going?
- I told you, on a date.
A date where? We left town an hour ago.
It's a surprise.
My mother's gonna kill us both.
At least we'll die together.
- She could be somewhere dead in a ditch.
- Oh, don't be so dramatic.
There's no reason to think like that.
Kids run off all the time.
Mostly, they come right back.
It's not like Randy's never pulled a stunt like this before.
This is your fault.
You brought that hoodlum into our lives.
- No wonder his parents kicked him out.
- You don't wanna go there, Vi.
The best thing you can do is just go about your business.
- I will call you as soon as I hear anything.
- Go about my business?
Yeah, right.
Hey. Hey, wake up.
Daddy?
You called him?
I took a pretty big chance here.
I'd really appreciate it if you'd smile.
Just walk away, Renée
Oh....
You won't see me follow you....
That's his favorite song.
Hmm.
- How's your mama?
- She's changed, Daddy.
Don't blame your mama for that.
Being left alone can change anybody.
I was the one that ran out.
Randy, can you give us a minute?
I'll be outside.
Look.
I could've stayed.
Now, Olivia, listen to me. This ain't a easy thing to say to your daughter.
I could've tried harder.
The truth...
...is I couldn't... I couldn't face knowing that I failed your mama.
No job, no money.
I saw it every time she looked at me.
I know that look.
No, no, no. She was sweet back then.
You remember how she used to be.
I thought the only thing I could do for y'all was leave and send a paycheck home.
Your mama...
...is the best person I ever met.
And it took being away from her to realize that.
And now I need you to love her.
And love her hard.
Because I don't think she's gonna want me again.
And that....
That is a hard thing to live with.
That's not true. She always watches those home movies with you both dancing.
And I see the way her face looks when we read our letters.
She tries to fight it, but I know she misses you.
What letters?
Baby, I haven't sent any letters.
I think your mama must have been writing them.
I'm sure she thought it was a good thing.
I have to get back.
I want to be with you.
Baby, I ship out soon.
It's my job.
You worried?
Me too.
Did you know gospel is the only musical genre with no one-hit wonders?
No.
Why you love gospel so much, Mama?
Why you ask?
Because I just don't understand what's so great about God.
You don't mean that.
Seems like he don't do much around here that I can see.
Give me those glasses.
Let me see that sweet face of yours.
Baby, you have to think of God as a parent.
You know when I punish you or make you eat your greens...
...you may not like it, but you know
I love you, no matter what, right?
Right.
Even if you don't understand why I do what I do.
Well, just like I'm your mother,
God is our father...
...and we have to have faith because we know he loves us, no matter what.
But....
But what, baby?
You spend all your time...
...singing songs and praising God...
...and he's who did this to me.
He made me this way.
If you loved me, you'd hate him.
- I do.
- No.
- I hate him. I do.
- Walter. Don't say that, Walter.
I just wish I could be normal...
...for you, Mama.
For me?
Baby, you don't have to be anything except exactly who you are.
I love you.
Come here, come here.
They broke the mold when they made you.
And when someone don't fit into a neat little box...
...the answer ain't to squeeze them in there even harder.
You build a bigger box.
Shoot, God don't make no mistakes, Walter, and he ain't about to start with you.
Fix me, Jesus
Fix me
Oh, fix me
Oh, fix me
Oh, fix me
Fix me, Jesus
Fix me
Fix me for my home on high
Fix me, Jesus, fix me
Fix me for the by and by
Fix me, Jesus, fix me
Fix me for my starry crown
Fix me, Jesus, fix me
Fix me for a higher ground
Fix me, Jesus, fix me
Oh, fix me
Oh, fix me
Oh, fix me
Fix me, Jesus, fix me
Fix me, Jesus, fix me
Fix me, Jesus
Oh, fix me
Fix me, Lord.
Hello?
Don't do anything stupid over there.
You've never been the bravest man.
Don't abandon that quality now that it can actually do you some good.
Now, most husbands would take offense at that.
Be safe.
# Living on a lighted stage #
# Approaches the unreal #
# For those who think and feel #
# In touch with some reality #
# Beyond the gilded cage #
Ahh!
Owww! Ohhh!
Oh!
Would you please welcome from Canada, Rush!
# There's no bread, let them eat cake #
# And there's no end to what they'll take #
# Flaunt the fruits of noble birth #
# And wash the salt into the earth #
# But they're marching to Bastille Day #
# La guillotine claimed her bloody prize #
If you get a band together, growing up, you didn't think about writing your own music, you learned other songs and you identified yourself by the kind of music you played and all the best players quickly learned the language was Rush.
The first time I heard Rush,
I was like, "Oh, my God,"
I had no idea this band was this incredible.
I became obsessed.
They were my gods.
I listened to it and I thought,
"Wow! That is amazing playing."
My mind was just totally blown.
I bought every magazine, I had every record,
I cut out every picture,
I would go to sleep at night with Rush on the heads,
I'd wake up and it was still playing.
I did that.
I, Sebastian Bach, was member number three of the Rush backstage club at Toronto, mother trucker.
Rush is just one of those bands that has a deep reservoir of rocket sauce.
A lot of bands, they've only got so much in the bottle.
They use it up sometimes in one song.
These guys were the real deal.
Their bottle was so big and so filled to the brim, they were shaking it literally for decades and still there was sauce coming out.
What makes Rush unique is fearlessness.
It's the quality of starting to write a song and not caring about what's popular, what's not.
There's only one band that sounds like that.
What kind of band is Rush? It's Rush.
I believe that when people step back and actually really look at who the great bands were, they are one of those bands but somehow they were never popular enough that they get commonly name-checked as one of the great bands of all time.
A lot of the other stuff has been over-explained.
Zeppelin has been over-explained, the Beatles have been over-explained, it doesn't tell the whole story, and you could say,
"Why was this band marginalized.
What was it?" It doesn't matter.
At some point they're there and somebody has to explain why they're there.
# Living on a lighted stage #
# Approaches the unreal #
# For those who think and feel #
# In touch with some reality #
# Beyond the gilded cage #
# Cast in this unlikely role #
# Ill-equipped to act #
# With insufficient tact #
# One must put up barriers #
# To keep oneself intact #
# Living in the limelight #
# The universal dream #
# For those who wish to seem #
I guess we should start at the beginning and talk about your upbringing, where you were born and what your childhood was like.
OK, how do I start my beginnings?
I was born in Willowdale, Ontario.
I was a nebbishy, quiet kid.
My parents were both Holocaust survivors and emigrated here after the war.
They basically arrived with ten bucks in their pocket and worked their way up to a lower-middle-class kind of income and raised me in the suburbs.
When we first moved in, we were one of the few Jewish families to live in our neighborhood and we were constantly living in terror of being beat up because of that fact, so it was an exciting time.
When I was twelve, my father passed away and I had to go to synagogue in the morning and in the evening every day for eleven months and one day.
I was not really allowed to listen to music.
So that whole year was devoid of what all the other kids were just starting to get turned on to.
After the year, he really came out and he was himself.
I said to Gedd, "Mom wants to buy you a nice present,
"you're such a good, hard-working kid."
He says, "Mom, next door
Terry has a guitar."
As we drove into the drive I said,
"Here's $50, go to Terry, get your guitar."
And then Alex entered my life in junior high school.
We liked the same kind of bands but I think we bonded more over our goofiness than over music.
My earliest memory of you is your paisley shirt.
- Your purple paisley shirt.
- Yeah.
It was purple. Burgundy, God...
...corduroys.
I was born in Fernie in British Columbia.
My parents came over after the war from Yugoslavia.
We moved to Toronto and I would say it was a very normal upbringing.
My father usually had two or three jobs at any given time and he believed that if you wanted something, you went out and you worked for it. Period.
This is when Alex was a youngster and this is when he was a Navy League cadet.
He was such a cutie.
One day he came and he said,
"Mom, Dad, if I bring you a good report card,
"will you buy me a guitar?"
And, you know, he brought a very good report card and we promised, and we didn't even have money, we just borrowed the money and bought him a guitar.
I would come home after school and play until dinner and then, supposed to do my homework,
I just played the guitar all the time.
I couldn't stop playing.
This wasn't here.
None of these houses, it's just the school and the field.
Yeah. There's Fisherville.
I remember my homeroom class was the third window from the end.
Alex was always the teacher's pet at school, he always smiled up to the teachers and, you know, he was a real schmoozer.
We were in the same homeroom.
Did we used to take all our classes together?
In grade nine we did.
And one year we wrote each other's test.
We had almost finished with the test and we said at the end, "You sign my name,
I'll sign yours." "OK."
We were bad.
Oh, yeah, I do remember...
That's how bad we were.
We upset the teacher.
We were very similar.
We both felt like we were really outside the rest of our class, the rest of our school, the rest of everything.
And then we discovered this manic love for music that we both had.
We got this gig, early in September of 1968, in this church basement.
John Rutsey was a neighbor that played the drums and I asked Gedd if he would sit in because he knew these same songs that we all knew.
So I said, "Sure," I came down and we were playing this drop-in center in Willowdale called The Coffin.
That was The Coffin there.
You used to come in here and you used to go downstairs.
We had maybe 35 people there, we got paid $10 to do the show, for the whole band, not each, ten bucks and we went to Pancer's Deli afterwards and the three of us sat in a booth planning our takeover of the world.
# My head is full of sunshine #
# My world is spinning round #
# Here come the magic people #
# The people with the freedom sound #
# Sound #
When I started hanging around with Alex and John, we would come downtown and there was a coffee shop in Yorkville called the Upper Crusts and a lot of musicians would hang out there.
There was another band that we really idolized at the time called The Paupers.
You could see the guys from that band hanging around so we would go in there and order a cup of tea like they were, trying to be cool, and we were just these little suburban hippies.
Always playing with your hair, you know.
Trying to look like you fit in.
I was living on Yorkville Avenue and I had met the guys at a concert in a church hall.
Even though they were sixteen-year-old kids, they were incredibly good players.
I was a fan immediately.
They were playing the kind of music that I liked.
Ray said, "You guys need a manager," and what did we know?
We said, "Yeah, sure.
Get us up to twelve bucks from ten bucks."
And Ray started booking dances and putting up posters on telephone poles and we started to grow.
In Ontario at the time, with a drinking age that high, the high schools took it upon themselves to create entertainment for teenagers.
So there was a real circuit to do.
That's really what bands did back then, you played at a school dance and hopefully you had a repertoire that covered lots of the current popular music, but that wasn't really our thing.
# I had a woman not too long ago #
# A cool-hearted woman, let my feelings show #
# Damn, that woman, I do all I got #
# Ooh, all I wanted was to treat her good #
# Can't understand it, no matter how I tried #
# Till one day my heart grew cold inside #
# Fancy dancer, oh, can't you see #
We played a lot of Sadie Hawkins dances, we played a lot of dances where people couldn't dance very well because we weren't really a dance band.
Everyone would be staying at the back of the hall, they wouldn't even be coming near us, like we were contagious.
We probably bummed out a lot of people on their high-school memories.
I was trying to do this full time and stay alive and they were still in high school.
They were a part-time band playing high schools on weekends and they were practicing at Geddy and Alex's house.
We were rehearsing in my basement and playing with these guys.
They weren't Jewish guys.
We were really loud and it didn't sound anything like music to my family.
They just thought I was nuts.
They thought I was probably a drug-taking freak so they were scared, they were freaked out, they didn't know what to do.
They didn't know how to handle it.
The whole neighborhood was just bumping because the music was so loud and everything was vibrating.
I really didn't like it and it wasn't my kind of music.
Perry Como was my kind of music.
Alex's mom and I used to talk always on the phone, crying at each other's shoulder.
It was hard because he wanted to just play and practice and he couldn't study, he would go to sleep late, couldn't get up and that's why he said,
"I'm quitting grade 12," and we were very upset.
Like, I don't wanna make a bunch of money.
Like, if I make a lot of money that's great, but I'm not going to go to university and get a big degree.
Hang on, no.
I don't wanna drive around in a big car and get people to go, "Hey, there goes Alex,
"he's loaded with money and, wow, he's really set himself up great."
I don't see why I have to go through all the bullshit of high school to learn music.
It's not that we're forcing Alex to go to university right now or anything.
We're just asking a little favor of him, just to finish grade 12, and then he's on his own.
We wanted for him to be something, to have education.
I was a little bit worried about his future.
If he doesn't finish high school, what's gonna happen?
And if the group doesn't succeed, you know, it was tough.
It was tough to go through that.
You know, the thing is, my parents were right.
I thought I knew everything.
I have said to you, Alex,
I want you to be free to expand.
You know, they came from Yugoslavia, people were getting killed everywhere.
My dad was in prison camps.
They came to Canada and their kids were everything.
That was, I'm sure, a great disappointment to them that I wasn't going to do something that was more professional.
The whole idea of leaving school was a stressful decision, but at that age
I was just wanting to be a kid and there was so much heaviness in my family's life.
Being Holocaust survivors, losing your dad at twelve,
I kind of wanted to run away from that a little bit.
To my mother it was the equivalent of joining the circus.
She didn't see any music in what we were doing, this was just madness and she didn't really get it until she, one day, years later, saw me on television and then it kind of...
"Oh, he's an entertainer." You know?
"Now I understand what he's doing."
Once again we're back at the Laura Secord secondary school and we've got a great trio of guys here who call themselves Rush and I'll let John, the drummer, introduce the rest of the guys to you right now.
Well, introducing, on lead guitar and vocals Alex Lifeson.
And on lead vocals and bass guitar,
Geddy Lee.
And sitting behind the drums, here, myself John Rutsey.
OK, we're gonna see in this number if we can get you to make a little noise along with us.
It doesn't take too much, all you've got to do is put your hands together like this.
# Well, I've been lyin' and I've been sneakin' #
# Ooh, yeah, yeah #
# Well, I've been crowin' and I've been weepin' #
# Ooh, yeah, yeah #
# Ooh, your lovin' makes me feel #
# Makes me feel mighty real #
# Well, I've been Ionely and I've been duped, yeah #
# Ooh, yes, now, baby, don't stop #
# I know nothin' about you #
The turning point came in 1971, when the drinking age was lowered to 18 from 21 in Ontario.
As soon as the drinking age dropped to 18, it was right at the time we turned 18, so we could finally start playing in bars which were better paying, more serious gigs.
What happened is Yorkville got shut down by 1970.
They wanted to rid that area of hippies and the clubs and shift it onto Young Street and onto Queen Street as well.
And as soon as the drinking age went down in '71, it invited a whole different kind of music because a drinking crowd wants a different kind of entertainment than a listening crowd.
You wanted something harder and heavier.
So a whole new world grew.
The scene in Toronto was vibrant as far as live bands go.
There were a ton of live venues.
I went into a place called the Abbey Road pub on Queen Street and saw Rush one night.
I was watching them, going,
"Wow, there's something going on here."
We went from playing a couple of high-school dances in the course of a month, to playing six nights a week with matinees on Saturdays sometimes and playing four or five 40-minute sets.
We started to get a little more experimental with music and that was great because that's really where we learned our chops.
We're gonna do a number called Garden Road for you!
# Passin' down this garden road,
I've passed it many times #
# Beauty flashing in the yard #
# Covers many vines #
# Each day I seek the answer that I must know #
# I found my questions on this garden road #
Initially, I was trying to get them a record deal and no one was willing to sign them.
I couldn't get arrested.
So it became obvious that I was gonna have to come up with the money and do the record myself.
We looked for, jeez,
I guess about four months, trying to get a record deal on Rush in this country and couldn't get anyone interested at all.
There was just no reaction.
We were willing to literally give the album away if somebody would just make a commitment to promote it.
Couldn't get that.
Part of the general attitude in Canada is, unfortunately, the people coming out to see you, not all of them, but quite a few of them go, "Well, they're a local band, how good can they be?"
And it's funny when other people from the States come out and they see these so-called local bands, they go, "Man, these guys are fantastic."
There was no one in Canada to sign you.
There were no record companies here, they were outposts really.
You had to get an American deal if you wanted to do anything.
# Cleveland Rocks, Cleveland Rocks! #
Cleveland Rocks on WMMS!
I was up in my office and I was listening to the new music.
We were deciding what we were going to play that week and, suddenly,
I get this thing from Canada.
I remember dropping the needle on what was the longest cut, because back in those days in album rock, you were always looking for what was called "bathroom songs."
And a bathroom song was something that if you did have to answer the call of nature, the record wouldn't run out.
And then I start listening to the song and I'm just, "Oh, my God, this is a perfect record for Cleveland."
Back then it was a factory town.
The song Working Man, every listener in the audience felt like that.
# I get up at seven, yeah #
# And I go to work at nine #
# I got no time for livin' #
# Yes, I'm workin' all the time #
# It seems to me I could live my life #
# A lot better than I think I am #
# I guess that's why they call me #
# They call me the workin' man #
Phones light up immediately.
"When's the new Led Zeppelin album out?"
"No, no, not a new Led Zeppelin album, a Canadian band, Rush."
Every time the record gets played, people are calling,
"Where can we get one?"
We had this cult following going already.
June 1974, I was working at Mercury Records in Chicago, it was a Monday morning and on my desk was an album.
A note comes along with it, it says, "This is the first album by a Canadian group called Rush," and that it's already selling in Cleveland and they're looking for a deal in the United States.
The artists and repertoire person who would normally listen was not in, so they took it to the least qualified guy, me.
I put on the record and got blown away.
I said, "Get the president of the company on the line.
"We should sign this band."
He said, "Don't make a deal with anyone until we talk."
And he loved the record and he really wanted to sign us.
By the end of the day we'd worked out a deal, signing the band within eight hours of hearing it.
We went from getting this offer to getting an advance, to buying equipment.
Everything was happening very, very quickly.
I don't think that John really felt comfortable with what was happening.
We talked about musical differences and he was a much more straightahead rock kind of guy.
He was more into Bad Company whereas Gedd and I were more into Yes and Genesis and Pink Floyd and bands like that.
If we'd stayed on the Toronto local circuit, we probably would have stayed together and that would have been fine but suddenly things were turning a page.
John was not a healthy boy, he had sugar diabetes.
Of course, like any teenager, he liked to drink and whatever else.
He was not taking care of himself and I took Geddy and Alex aside and Ray and I said, "We have to replace John.
For his health."
We can't put him out there on that tour or we'll be bringing him home in a box.
So I discussed it with John, of course he was heartbroken, but he understood.
There was no saying that John wasn't doing his job.
It wasn't for his ability to drum that he was let go, it was for health reasons.
It's like coming to the end of high school and you're with all your friends and you think, "We'll know each other forever," and then everybody just goes in their own direction and, for the most part, you never see those people again.
It was a big deal, we had an American contract, we were going to the States, we only had less than a month to find somebody and get them in shape for us to go on the road.
We needed a drummer.
Let's put it like that.
Oh, ho! Broken drumhead!
I thought it would be good to start at the beginning.
Oh, how predictable.
The very beginning. Where you were born and where you grew up.
Much of that I don't remember.
I know that I was born on the...
We were living on the family farm near Hagersville, Ontario, at the time.
We went to the nearest hospital, which was in Hamilton and moved to St. Catherine's when I was about four or so.
I had never been athletic,
I never could play hockey,
I skated on my ankles, which, for a young Canadian kid, that's automatically like the hugest curse a young boy could have.
Well, he was...
In those days, I used to say weird.
He just read everything.
He just read everything there was to read.
He even had to learn to knit because he had to know how that was done.
It was horrible coming into high school, once I got interested in rock bands and started to grow my hair a little over my ears and wear bell-bottoms and all that stuff.
The taunting in the hallways and even physical abuse out in the smoking area.
The constant misfit sense.
For any kid, especially a sensitive one, it just wears you down, so that's why drumming became an instrument of self-esteem for me.
This was the first time
I was admired for anything.
And that doubled my fervor about playing drums.
Fortunately, I was in a very serious band at the time called J.R. Flood.
We'd practice all weekdays and then weekends we'd be playing high schools around Ontario or the nights at Columbus Halls.
In the summer of '74, I was working behind the parts counter for my dad at the farm equipment dealer and this white Corvette pulled up.
A white Corvette doesn't pull up in a farm equipment dealership that often.
They came and asked if they could talk to Neil and take him out for lunch and I could tell, as Neil came back, the rest of the afternoon that he was really troubled with something.
He told me then that these guys were the managers of Rush and they wanted Neil to come over and audition and he said, "I don't know what to do, Dad."
And I said, "Well, two things.
"First of all, we'll talk it over with your mother
"but secondly, as far as I'm concerned,
"this is your passion, this is all you have wanted all your life," and I said, "I guess there will always be a parts department here
"so I think you've got to go for it."
So I borrowed my mom's Pinto, so perfect, and loaded my drums into that and drove up to Ajax.
So this car pulls up with this kind of gangly guy, really kind of short hair.
My first impression was that he was kind of goofy.
I remember thinking, "God, he's not nearly cool enough to be in this band."
I had Rogers with two 18-inch bass drums and everything set up really high and kind of weird-Iooking, and I was kind of weird-Iooking.
And then he started playing, he pounded the crap out of those drums.
He played like Keith Moon and John Bonham at the same time.
I was blown away.
As soon as he started playing.
He's playing these triplets and it was so good.
I think it's very common for musicians, especially in your early years, to feel that you totally blew it and I had that feeling.
I could've played better,
I should've played better, all that stuff, but, um, they picked me.
# Hey, now, baby #
# Well, I like your smile #
# Won't you come and talk to me #
# For a little while? #
# Well, you're makin' me crazy #
# The way you roll them eyes #
# Won't you come and sit with me? #
# I'll tell you all my lies #
It was like a tornado came and hit my life and swept it away.
We had two weeks to prepare and to learn songs that I'd never heard before and to gel a little bit as much as we could.
The first show was going to be in front of 11,000 people at Pittsburgh Civic Arena, opening for Manfred Mann and Uriah Heep.
# The only time she's happy #
# Is when the bullets fly, fly, fly, fly #
# And she'll make you feel you're better than any other guy #
We found that the biggest rock audience was Midwest and we gave Rush the perfect audience to come into.
It was a great rock audience, and they loved their rock music.
We had a dressing room that was just a small kind of room under the stands at the far end of the arena, away from the other dressing rooms.
We had this tour manager,
Howard Ungerleider, who had come in from New York, he was teaching us how to be professional.
I remember Howard saying,
"You can have booze or something
"and they'll supply it for you."
And we went, "Really? OK. Cool."
I ordered, like, a little bottle of Southern Comfort and I think Alex ordered Blue Nun wine or something like that.
I remember taking a sip of this stuff and it went straight to my head and I was completely dizzy and we hit the stage.
By the time I kind of came to my senses, the set was over and we were off and I had no idea how well we'd played.
My immediate thoughts were,
"God, he can sing high."
That was my first thought, and how full it sounded for just a three piece.
Rush came out and nailed it.
It was obvious that they were going to move up the ladder pretty quick.
# Hey, baby, it's a quarter to eight #
# I feel I'm in the mood #
# Hey, baby, the hour is late #
# I feel I've got to move #
It was huge. This was the start of our tour and it was America.
Big, bold, beautiful America and we were so excited to be doing it.
Here are these three twenty-year-old guys living a dream.
It was a very exciting time and we were working eleven days on, one day off, nine days on, one day off.
We were really working a lot and traveling all over the place.
The circuit was different back then.
The money certainly wasn't as great and you wanted to play five or six times a week.
You could play markets like Johnson City,
Tennessee or Yakima, Washington.
You would talk about how many shows in Iowa you were going to do.
Every day and we would always share the driving.
Everybody was sharing rooms.
We had a room rotation schedule back then. It was kind of fun.
Traveling around in a rental car, it wasn't even a bus or a van.
Sleeping on your baggage.
Now, you know, you'd be in traction for a month if you did a week traveling like we used to travel for months.
The life of an opening act back then was hooking up from circuit to circuit.
Sometimes you didn't know where you were going because sometimes your gigs would run out and you'd be in the States waiting to find out if you're on another tour.
# Rock 'n' roll! #
# Baby gets tired, everybody knows #
As soon as we heard that first Rush record, we just were like, "What is this?
This is like Canadian Zeppelin."
"Yeah! Oh, yeah!"
"What the hell is that?"
And we literally said,
"We want that band to open Canada."
We then took them across America.
With Kiss we probably played 50, 60 shows in the first couple of tours, where they were just this weird band from New York, and we got very, very close.
# Baby, won't you tell me #
# Baby, rock 'n' roll, yeah, yeah #
# Do you wanna rock 'n' roll? #
Regardless of what you want to say about Kiss, musically or otherwise, there was no harder-working band than Kiss and there was no band more determined to put on a spectacular show and give people their money's worth than Kiss.
That was a great thing to see as an opening act.
We were so impressionable and we were so green.
They were very good to us.
Those guys liked to have a good time, especially Gene, and their hotels were always fun to watch.
Every night after the show, the girls would line up.
My God! You can even be an ugly bastard like me and get laid and none of the Rush guys ever did.
I just never understood it.
I said, "They're not gay?" "No."
"Farm animals?"
"No, that's not it."
I... What the fuck did you do when you went back to your hotel room?
I even remember one night, it was in Milwaukee I think, and there was a female bowling league sharing the same floor and they were walking around in their nightgowns and their hotel room doors are open and they're drinking.
All the guys in Rush are in their rooms just watching TV after a gig.
They probably woke up the next day, going,
"God, these Canadian bands sure are boring."
That was a "getting to know you" period for us and Neil.
He was one of the weirdest people we'd ever met because we'd never met anyone that was so literate and so opinionated before.
And it was hard for him.
He was always and still is the new guy in some strange way.
Alex and I were bonded, old friends and he had to kinda make his way to be part of that.
In some ways he was very serious and we were totally goofy, certainly he had a bigger brain than us and that was a target.
What more perfect, portable education than having a lot of free time on your hands and bookstores everywhere?
So for the next few years I'd say, basically, I started filling those hours with reading.
And we'd say,
"Look at how many books he reads.
"Look at the words he uses,
"this guy is probably capable of writing lyrics!"
# Beneath the noble bird #
# Between the proudest words #
# Behind the beauty cracks appear #
# Once with heads held high #
# They sang out to the sky #
# Why do their shadows bow in fear? #
It was really stimulating, but really a mouthful to sing in the kind of rocking style that we were doing at that time.
# Anthem of the heart and anthem of the mind #
# A funeral dirge for eyes gone blind #
# We marvel after those who sought #
# Wonders in the world, wonders in the world #
# Wonders in the world they wrought #
We worked on songs as we traveled.
On my little handwritten lyric sheets for the time
I think I wrote the cities that all of those songs were written, they varied widely all over the map.
It was like the Monkees, you know.
Alex would have an acoustic guitar and we'd be working on a song in a rental car, in a hotel room after a show.
That's how, pretty much,
Fly By Night was written.
That's the way bands used to do it.
They'd write the record while they were on the road.
They'd go home and cut it in two or three weeks and a new album would appear every six months.
Pretty amazing to think of that today.
# Why try? I know why #
# This feeling inside me says it's time I was gone #
# Clear head, new life ahead #
# It's time I was king now, not just one more pawn #
# Fly by night away from here #
# Change my life again #
# Fly by night, goodbye, my dear #
# My ship isn't coming and I just can't pretend #
Fly By Night was a little different from the first record so the record company wasn't sure if we were developing in the correct way.
They wanted us to be more like Bad Company and not so much like this weird thing that we were becoming.
By-Tor And The Snow Dog, what the hell was that all about?
With By-Tor And The Snow Dog, that was the start of writing in more of a thematic, multi-piece idea.
And then with Caress Of Steel we did the whole side of Fountain Of Lamneth and the Necromancer was kind of like that, it was the start of those longer pieces.
Neil had come up with this concept and we had to put it all together and make it work.
It seemed like an evolution of where they were going.
I thought it had amazing potential.
It's a dark record, but it was certainly a good record,
I thought.
But that view wasn't shared by everybody.
I know we played Caress Of Steel once for Paul Stanley.
We'd just got it, we played it in our van for him one night and you could see that he just... he didn't get it.
A lot of people didn't get it, we were wondering if even we got it.
I think we were pretty high when we made a lot of that record.
It sounds like it to me.
# My eyes have just been opened #
# And they're open very wide #
# Images around me don't identify inside #
# Just one blur I recognize the one that soothes and feeds #
# My way of life is easy and as simple are my needs #
Caress Of Steel was not well received by the record company.
It was not well received by our agents.
Everything took an awful downturn and it was off the crest of a wave too, because we were so in love with what we'd done, we were so into it and so proud of it.
When Caress Of Steel pretty much met a deaf ear, the ensuing tour, we were opening acts on smaller tours and playing backwater clubs and we called it, at the time,
"The Down The Tubes tour".
You would find yourself in places like Battle Creek, Michigan, playing to twenty people wondering why you were still continuing.
Everybody thought that it was over.
Audiences were becoming smaller and smaller so we thought the end was near.
At that time, Ted Nugent was also not breaking, so the two of us played a lot of small clubs together.
It was a pretty depressing tour, we were kinda lost, figured that we would probably not survive to see another tour.
And the record company was really not happy with us and our management was trying to defend us.
I remember going to Chicago and meeting with Mercury Records to not give up on the band, to not drop the band.
I nodded to every request they had.
They wanted singles, more commercial,
"Yeah, I'm sure that's what they're going to do."
That was a terrible winter.
I had no money,
I was sleeping on a friend's couch.
Things couldn't have been bleaker really.
At the record company, everybody was,
"We have to be more commercial here and think about some singles," and just leaning on us at our weakest.
We talked about how we would rather go down fighting than try to make the kind of record they wanted us to make.
We made 2112, figuring everyone would hate it but we were going to go out in a blaze of glory.
We all decided that we would rather go back to our jobs, working on a farm or working as a plumber's mate for my dad or whatever, than give in and just be something that everybody else wants us to be.
We did summon that strength of character to say, "No, we won't do that.
"We're doing it our way and if this is the last hurrah, fine."
Back to the farm equipment dealership for me.
It was a big no -
"No, we're not doing any of that.
"No, you can't tell us what to do and no, we don't care."
# Whoa, oh, oh, oh #
# Whoa, yeah, yeah, yeah #
# Yeah, yeah #
When the record company heard a full side concept like the first side of 2112, people panicked. They thought,
"Wow, we're screwed."
They didn't get it.
This was, like, I ordered salmon and they brought me a steak - what the hell is this?
The nature of the story that evolved in 2112 was the individual against the mass, and that album did communicate and reach people on a level that just blossomed outward by the classic form of word of mouth.
Obviously, the opening twenty-minute piece did not get played on the radio.
# I can't wait to share this new wonder #
# Well, the people will all see its light #
# Let them all make their own music #
# The priests praise my name on this night #
Suddenly it was like, you gotta to check this band out, and, you know, the first thing that struck you was the level of musicianship was just insane.
I remember vividly,
I was in my bedroom with my neighbor and he'd brought over 2112.
It was just something
I'd never heard before, just the fact it was a three-piece ripping... they were pulling off this stuff that sounded like a huge prog rock production.
It took me on a journey instantly and I looked at the album cover and saw that there were only three of them and they were wearing some funky clothes.
But I thought, how can three guys make such a sound?
I remember the keyboard sound...
...and all of a sudden it kicked in and it was just like a whole new experience to music, something I'd never heard before.
The drumming was incredible, the bass playing was incredible and that was it.
I was hooked on Rush ever since then.
There was a moment in my life, and I willingly admit this, that I knew how to play the entire side.
I knew how to play 2112 all the way down.
I knew every note, every moment.
And I think back now,
"How long did I have to fucking learn that?"
I must have sat in the bedroom for a year to learn that fucking song.
I was into the story.
You know, I read the back and it was dedicated to The Fountainhead, the book, and I went right out and bought
The Fountainhead and read it.
I mean, not too many bands make a twelve-year-old go out and buy The Fountainhead by Ayn Rand.
Goddamn this rock band, it's got me all fired up about literature.
# Well, yes, we know, it's nothing new #
# It's just a waste of time #
# We have no need for ancient ways #
# The world is doing fine #
As it turned out, the concept record went through the roof.
They were right.
2112 really bought us our independence.
The record company has never been in on a single session that we've ever done.
In fact, when we're done, it's all packaged and they accept it the way it is.
They have no choice.
That somehow was the plateau of untouchable.
Nobody thought they had the right anymore.
So, yeah, 2112 was absolutely the passepartout, you know, the skeleton key that opened that door that we could close behind us.
OK, from now on, we do what we want.
Attention, all planets of the Solar Federation.
Attention, all planets of the Solar Federation.
Attention, all planets of the Solar Federation.
We have assumed control.
We have assumed control.
We have assumed control.
Most critics ignored 2112 or treated Rush, I think, very, very negatively.
I mean, what do critics hate generally?
They hate heavy metal and they hate progressive music.
I would say probably most of the reviews were bad.
I don't know if it was discouraging to read bad press.
I mean, after a while it was like,
"Oh yeah, yeah, whatever."
Usually it's, critics back then particularly, just trying to be cool, so they would write all sorts of things.
# What you own is your own kingdom #
# What you do is your own glory #
# What you love is your own power #
# What you live is your own story #
# In your head is the answer #
# Let it guide you along #
# Let your heart be the anchor #
# And the beat of your song #
Geddy's soaring voice was described in some rather unkind ways.
"A hamster in overdrive."
"The dead howling in Hades."
"Mickey Mouse on helium."
"Strangling a hamster."
"A cat being chased out the door with a blowtorch up its ass."
It was just constant insults hurled that way.
But it was never like that with the audiences.
We found that we had a growing audience that didn't care about any of that press stuff.
They were into the band and liked what we were trying to do.
We were a little more thoughtful about the way we wrote music and certainly how we wrote lyrics and how we put it all together.
I'd rather read fan reviews than some guy who always hated us and didn't stay for half the show.
Critically, we were designated terminally unhip and that prevents you from getting mainstream press.
Our songs were too long to go on mainstream radio, so what the hell are we?
Every once in a while you have an artist that is very sophisticated but somehow in their sophistication they don't alienate the common person.
They're really a people's band and the great hole in their career has been that they've never been truly accepted by the intelligentsia.
But with a band like Rush you can't say,
"Well, they can't play, they can't sing."
So what was it? Well, they're nerdy or they don't fit in a neat box.
The one constant with Rush throughout the decades is that it's been difficult to fit them into any kind of definition.
Their music was hard rock but at the same time it was orchestral.
The melodies were simple but at the same time complex.
Nobody could ever put their finger on exactly what they were.
I think the fashion that was associated with it defied definition as well.
We were never very good at the whole fashion image thing.
Let's face it.
We didn't have a clue.
We desperately just wanted to wear jeans and T-shirts but we were raised in a period that said that's not OK.
So we looked for some way of standing out in a crowd.
I remember we were in San Francisco and we were staying in the Japanese part of town, so we found all these kind of kimonos and robes and we said, "Hey, why don't we try these?"
So that began the period of the absurdly prophetic robes.
# And the men who hold high places #
# Must be the ones who start #
# To mould a new reality #
# Closer to the heart #
# Closer to the heart #
# The blacksmith and the artist #
# Reflect it in their art #
# They forge their creativity #
# Closer to the heart #
# Yeah, it's closer to the heart #
These were the salad days because we were transitioning and we could feel it.
The world was expanding for us.
We were starting to record in England, starting to get success in England and to go over there and to actually have a song in the charts and play Hammersmith Odeon was really gratifying, because all of our heroes were English rock musicians.
So that gave us a tremendous amount of confidence.
# Whoa, oh, you can be the captain #
# And I will draw the chart #
# Sailing into destiny #
# Closer to the heart #
# Closer to the heart #
# Well, closer to the heart #
# Yeah, closer to the heart #
As the records progressed, the palette got bigger and bigger.
Neil was constantly changing and adding to his drum kit and we had more choice of guitars and acoustic guitars.
Bass pedals. The keyboards developed every time we went into the studio.
Gedd was staying on top of that.
The first time I worked with the band it was a three piece.
I think we may have had a cowbell.
# Held within the pleasure dome #
# Decreed by Kubla Khan #
# To taste my bitter triumph #
# As a mad immortal man #
# Nevermore shall I return #
# Escape these caves of ice #
# For I have dined on honeydew #
# And drunk the milk of paradise #
# Oh, is it paradise? #
You know, what really helped us get out of that robe period was touring with UFO.
They made fun of us relentlessly and they would hold up signs and make fun of our lyrics and I would go up to my microphone and there'd be a pair of furry slippers nailed to the stage beside my mic.
They used to call me Glee, and the guys would be at the side telling me...
"It goes perfect with your robe, Glee."
It was good for us because, you know, you go on stage thinking that maybe there has to be some other thing but in the end it is always back to the music for us.
# The trouble with the maples #
# And they're quite convinced they're right #
# They say the oaks are just too lofty #
# And they grab up all the light #
# But the oaks can't help their feelings #
# If they like the way they're made #
# And they wonder why the maples #
# Can't be happy in their shade #
Hemispheres was the album that broke the camel's back in terms of long songs.
The Hemispheres side of that album was incredibly complex, both thematically and structurally.
# When our weary world was young #
# The struggle of the ancients first began #
# The gods of love and reason #
# Sought alone to rule the fate of man #
We went to a little farmhouse in Wales and wrote all that music, arranged it, learned how to play it.
It was so ambitious and so demanding, so experimental, all of that.
It was quite manic and our hours became later and later and later, and it just went around so that we were going to bed at noon, we were getting up at seven o'clock and having breakfast then and then working through the night until the morning, unending, with no time off.
Even the shorter songs on that record, like La Villa Strangiato, were really hard, and, of course, we were bound and determined to record La Villa Strangiato live in one take.
It was so complicated and went through so many different mood and time signature changes, it would have needed to be charted out in order to keep track of where you were at any given point.
I think we spent eleven days trying to record the bed track only and we finally had to admit defeat.
We had to do it in three parts.
That one, kind of slow, open solo that Alex plays, the way he built that up had a huge impression on me because he was creating a mood by playing very, very sparsely and just slowly amping up the intensity.
I just thought that was the greatest thing in terms of lead guitar dynamics and phrasing.
I see them as the high priests of conceptual metal.
A big influence. Huge.
Probably the hardest song
I ever learned how to play was La Villa Strangiato.
The drumming is... It takes everything you've got to get through it.
That was the benchmark of drumming when I was a kid.
I could play YYZ but can you play La Villa Strangiato?
We'd written material that was really a little beyond us, considering our level of musicianship at the time.
And that was the thing about Rush, we were always overreaching.
When you listen to early Rush, it was like the riffs were simpler.
It got more complex as they kept going.
With the arrangements, it would be so long, it would be like the boys were up there going,
"We did write this, didn't we?
What part of the song are we in?"
If you could learn those songs, that was a stepping-stone to just about everything you needed to know.
If you could play those songs with some proficiency, you could play pretty much anything else.
Just eerily precise.
Everything was just right on the nuggets.
I bet, if you went in with a computer,
Neil Peart would probably be right on the beat to, like, an atom.
At least that's how it sounds when you're listening with the headphones, you're like, "He's not even human."
Geddy Lee is still my favorite bass player.
It would be like, "Wow! That guy who's shredding the bass is also singing
"and playing the keyboards with his feet and hands?"
And he would move his microphone a lot with his nose, he actually figured a way to use it.
If it weren't for the nose,
I don't think he could have done the keyboards, bass and singing.
I really don't. I think the nose was what enabled him to get the microphone where he needed it to be.
He has a big nose.
Props to the nose!
We knew at the time we were overreaching ourselves and we agreed among ourselves in 1978 when we finished Hemispheres, we're not doing this again, we're not making this kind of record again.
We knew that was the end of that era, of the epics.
You've been touring now for how many years?
Well, professionally, in the United States and around the world, about five years.
About five years. How many concerts do you average a year?
About 200, maybe more.
200 concerts a year for five years.
How long can you keep that up?
As long as we can.
As long as we're still standing.
We were working all the time.
I remember at one point we counted 17 one-nighters in a row.
We were getting fried and getting stupid.
Not taking care of ourselves, just burning out.
We didn't like what we were becoming as people.
In my personal life
I was getting alienated from my wife, we were just starting to have kids and once you start introducing children into your life, you can't be so selfish. You just can't.
I think we all cherish the fact that we're pretty normal guys.
I got married when I was young.
I had a family early.
I introduced Geddy's wife to him when we were teenagers.
Family was the most important thing to me in my life.
We were trying to remember music is just one of the things we had chosen to do with our lives.
Not everything.
If we'd kept going like that, we would have crashed.
Something started to break.
I think the heaviness of Hemispheres made us want to run away from that kind of album so we ran from Hemispheres straight into Spirit Of Radio.
# Begin the day with a friendly voice #
# A companion unobtrusive #
# Plays that song that's so elusive #
# And the magic music makes your morning mood #
Permanent Waves was a joy to me.
We were in Canada, you know, our families were close, that's when we discovered Le Studio and the songs just came together.
Just boom, boom, boom.
OK, the new album.
There are a number of new things, new approaches to the album.
Tell me what's new about it.
You tell him.
Basically, its newness derives from experiments we've conducted over the last couple of albums.
Through Hemispheres and Farewell To Kings, we were experimenting with a lot of new instruments and sounds and rhythmic approaches and so on.
This time we found ways to put those directions into a single stream and consequently, I think, the album probably has a more direct feel to it.
The whole music industry is going primitive, new wave, minimal, rock-'n'-roll.
Do you care?
There's gonna be some bands that have gone back to basics, but those bands can't do anything but play basics.
But all the real interesting new-wave bands seem to be developing and progressing into more interesting styles.
- Who do you listen to at home?
- All kinds of people.
Recently been Talking Heads on the turntable a lot.
The Police.
I was a huge fan of The Police,
Ultravox and all these new English bands.
I loved them. It became a part of our sensibility.
Permanent Waves still had a couple of longer songs on it but The Spirit Of Radio was the emblematic song of that period.
The mix of sounds in it, the approach to electronic music and reggae, that's all the stuff I was listening to.
# For the words of the prophets were written on the studio wall #
# Concert hall #
They seemed to have that knack of being able to use time signatures at will and yet make them feel seamless.
If you're changing time signatures and your audience aren't really aware of it, then you've got something special.
Rush find a real interesting way of drawing a straight line through the song, whether it's melodically or rhythmically.
And when you put together the sound of the band being so recognized and their ability to make sure there's a lifeline for people out there who can't quite tap their foot to an odd time signature, that makes what Rush does genius when it comes to still being able to be played on the radio.
# We are secrets to each other #
# Each one's life a novel no one else has read #
# Even joined in bonds of love #
# We're linked to one another by such slender threads #
I think Permanent Waves was, in a way, the most important stepping stone because, just like
Caress Of Steel is to 2112, there would be no Moving Pictures without Permanent Waves first.
As I define it, that's when we became us.
I think Rush was born with Moving Pictures really.
# A modern-day warrior, mean, mean stride #
# Today's Tom Sawyer, mean, mean pride #
It represents so much that we learned up to that time about song writing, about arrangement.
That's when we brought our band identity together too, how we like to play individually and as a band at the same time.
Now when I look back on those songs,
I'm glad to say to people that
I will never get tired of playing Tom Sawyer because it's difficult to play right, and any time I do play it right, I feel good.
# No, his mind is not for rent #
# To any god or government #
# Always hopeful, yet discontent #
# He knows changes aren't permanent #
# But change is #
Suddenly we were on the radio everywhere that summer.
Our concert audiences doubled.
You could picture it in the high-school halls,
"Are you gonna see Rush?"
"Oh, yeah, man. I'm going."
We were that band that year.
We were playing 120,
130 cities in America.
We were going back to places where, if we were a theatre act at the start of that tour, by the end of that cycle we'd gone back to those places and we were in the arena.
Their latest release, Moving Pictures, is number one on Toronto's album charts and they're close to selling out an unprecedented three nights at the full Maple Leaf Gardens.
Here's a cut from Moving Pictures, platinum after only four weeks of release.
# Suddenly ahead of me #
# Across the mountainside #
# A gleaming alloy air-car #
# Shoots towards me, two lanes wide #
# I spin around with shrieking tires #
# To run the deadly race #
# Go screaming through the valley #
# As another joins the chase #
# Drive like the wind #
# Straining the limits of machine and man #
# Laughing out loud with fear and hope #
# I've got a desperate plan #
# At the one-lane bridge #
# I leave the giants stranded at the riverside #
# Race back to the farm #
# To dream with my uncle at the fireside #
Moving Pictures was a mixed blessing to me, in retrospect, for me, personally in my life.
A lot of strange people came out of the woodwork.
There was so much attention on us at that time, that was transitory.
Generally, we were pretty private and I think Moving Pictures was the turning point when there was a lot of pressure from fans wanting a piece of you or believing they were connected to you in some other way.
There was a time when we first started getting recognized that I got a little touchy about it and I remember I started thinking about this thing, about fame and how you deal with it.
That was kind of an epiphany and I said to myself,
"I'm gonna go where I want to go
"and if somebody comes up to me and is nice and wants an autograph,
"I got time for them. It's no big deal."
Geddy, right?
That's right.
Oh my God, that's Geddy?
Yeah!
- Just making a video of them.
- No problem.
- One is to...
- Sorry.
- One is to Shawny.
- Didn't mean to get in your way. Sorry.
The first one is to Shawny.
And the next one's to Troy.
Thank you. That's it, I promise.
I'm so sorry...
You want his too?
He's the leader of the group.
I can walk around the city and get recognized from time to time,
Geddy more so. He's got a very distinctive look about him.
But generally people are very polite, they don't want too much from you.
I understand that these are your fans that just love what you do.
There's been a moment in their lives where your music has been so important to them that to take a couple of minutes and just chat, shake a hand or hug or something, it's not a big deal.
I remember when I met them,
I was just struck by Geddy Lee and Lifeson's friendship, it seemed like they had a real deep bond.
Real playful and sort of goofy, it just seemed like there was a lot of joy there, a lot of genuine fun.
And then I turned the corner and then I saw the master, Neil Peart.
He had, sort of, a different vibe going, just as focused but a brewing intensity.
Little wisps of darkness.
Neil has a real struggle with fans and it's not a personal thing.
It's a shyness thing.
He's not able to be as relaxed around strangers as Alex or I am.
You know, he doesn't mean to hurt anyone's feelings by it, he's not trying to be rude, he's just not comfortable.
OK, I was the world's biggest Who fan as a kid.
I never dreamed of trying to find their hotel and knocking on their doors or interfering in their lives in any way, that I don't understand.
I love being appreciated, being respected is awfully good but anything beyond that just creeps me out, you know.
Any sense of adulation is just so wrong.
I got a chance to go meet Neil Peart and I got brought into a room and I started to tell him, "Hey, I'm the hugest fan ever," and I got, sort of,
"the Neil Peart cold shoulder" and the security guard removed me from the room.
It was a weird uncomfortable situation.
I love Neil Peart even though he totally blacklisted me.
But I don't know, if I was Neil Peart and I walked in the room,
I would probably want to remove me too.
Neil was great. A very intense man but very... you know.
His line, "I can't pretend a stranger is a long-awaited friend," that's Neil.
When people have a fantasy,
I don't want to trample on it, but I also don't want to live it and people can think that I'm antisocial or a sourpuss, it's really not.
It doesn't make me mad, it embarrasses me.
The other guys are obviously comfortable with it and they do the meets and greets every night and that's fine, they can do it.
One, two, three...
One, two, three...
One, two, three...
Thank you. It's lovely meeting you.
I am so appreciative of our fans.
I bless their hearts every single day, but they're hard to analyze as a group because they're so different.
We have hard-core fans.
The old fans that have been there from the beginning, they're usually male and they are really intense.
In the early stages it was very young, almost 100% male.
And then, as the years went by, it remained 100% male.
Chicks did not really dig it, you know.
I still don't put on Caress Of Steel that often with my wife around.
Whoo!
Tonight is my 113th Rush show.
The last time I missed a show anywhere in Europe was on the Signals tour.
Tonight will be the seventh on this tour.
I've been to two in America, one in Canada, did all six on the last UK tour.
My name's Pete,
I'm from Cleveland, Ohio.
I just had my 100th show in Stockholm.
# You can choose from phantom fears #
# And kindness that can kill #
# I will choose a path that's clear #
# I will choose free will #
Rush fans are like
Nascar fans. They ain't going anywhere.
They're brand loyalty.
They are a cult band.
When you go to a Rush concert, there ain't anybody leaving it till the song is over.
They're waiting for their favorite part, they're nudging their friend, they're going, "Look, he played it perfect."
They're riveted to the band.
The band have that relationship with their audience, where their audience really feel like the Rush lyrics communicate to them, make them feel like their experience is heard.
I have this memory of sitting in the basement with my mother.
I actually said to her,
"I wanna play you a song."
And it was very hard to ever get my parents' attention or anything so it was, like, a big deal.
"Will you please sit here and I wanna play you a song."
And I played Entre Nous and I gave her the lyric sheet because I wanted her to understand that this song was connecting with me on some level.
When I was sixteen years old,
I wasn't as emotionally open.
I was very withdrawn, so something about that song allowed me to say,
"Somehow this song is almost like it's written for me."
Music, when you're growing up, is such a strong part of like...
"What do you like? What's your identity?"
Rush seemed to be just a complete added dimension of not being obsessed with girls and hair and shit like that.
They seemed to be kind of smart and, fancying myself as a really smart kid,
I was like, "Oh, that's my deal."
# Not so clearly charted, it's really just a question of your honesty #
# Yeah, your honesty #
# Glittering prizes and endless compromises #
# Shatter the illusion of integrity, yeah #
Dum, tss, mm!
I mean, when you're hearing lyrics like that that are so earnest and sincere, talking about honesty in art and asking some of the tougher intellectual questions, with that great music behind it, they really offered something in rock that was in short supply.
And plus they sang in French on Circumstances.
"Plus c'est la même, plus c'est la même chose."
That was pretty tricky, you didn't hear that on any Kiss records.
It's like, the dude is singing in French now.
I can't even figure out his English!
It wasn't for everybody, and it wasn't necessarily cool.
You were kind of like a Rush geek, a music nerd, a kind of nerd, and it was sort of nerdy music I suppose.
# Growing up, it all seems so one-sided #
# Opinions all provided #
# The future predecided #
# Detached and subdivided #
# In the mass-production zone #
# Nowhere is the dreamer or the misfit so alone #
You listen to Subdivisions and it just seemed like, exactly my life.
You know, I was that kid who was watching the car drive away with all the cool kids going off to a party that I wasn't invited to.
It was just nice to feel like there was a rock song out there that spoke to my experience of trying to be cool and worrying about being cast out of a group of friends if you weren't cool.
I wasn't very cool, but luckily I had a group of friends that was equally not cool.
I lived in a housing development, suburbia backyard barbecues, a lot of the stuff that, I think, most American kids can relate to.
I remember watching the video, and I'm like, "Damn, that represents me, right there."
This one person walking around, not really being in a group, it seemed like it was this person that nobody really could relate to.
- # Subdivisions #
- # In the high-school halls #
# In the shopping malls #
- # Conform or be cast out #
- # Subdivisions #
The thing I loved about Neil was he took very complex, metaphysical themes and he was able to put them in a way that everybody could understand.
And whether he was ripping off Shakespeare or he was quoting his own heart, he was able to do it in a way that never felt snobby.
It always felt like he was in the room talking to you.
Words can carry different freight for different people, of course.
But those who do have the sensitivity to pay the kind of attention to lyrics that I put into them, it's wonderful to connect that way, to feel that you're not playing down to anyone.
We always had the impression that people are just as smart as we are, so if we can figure this stuff out, they can too.
And we're not being that terrible, damning word, pretentious.
We're not pretending anything.
This is really what turned us on this year.
Lyrically, it's always been a reflection of my times and the times I observe.
But everyone is a reflection of me.
We could have gone in and done Moving Pictures all over again but we're too curious, we're too dissatisfied with where we're at and just because we got successful doesn't mean we're going to stop.
And that's the motivation.
We have to find the better Rush.
There was a big shift happening on Signals, the keyboards were becoming more and more important, from Geddy's standpoint that is.
And also, one of the biggest things at that point for me was Neil getting into the electronic drum kit.
It didn't really appeal to me.
I wanted to still have that element of the basic acoustic band.
We'd been working with Terry for ten years at that point and we really felt the need to expand and see what it was like to work with other people and it was a very tough transition because we were so close.
Terry was like the fourth member of the band.
It was Neil who broke the news to me on the bus and he said,
"Just think of it like a boyfriend and girlfriend,
"they want to split up for a while, have a break from each other."
I was surprised because I figured we would figure it out and we'd move to the next level.
But it was time for a change and I didn't really want to do an electronic band, which is where I thought it was going.
# An ill wind comes arising #
# Across the cities of the plain #
# There's no swimming in the heavy water #
# No singing in the acid rain #
# Red alert, red alert #
# Red alert #
To be honest with you,
I'd never really heard of Rush in England.
I was a pop producer, so I was kind of bemused when I got the call to come and produce them.
I was coming from that whole
British '80s music scene.
I was trying to bring them into line with what I perceived to be the contemporary, modern pop music, the new technology, the new keyboard sounds.
We all loved the music of that time.
We were young enough too, and we didn't have any protective nature of what Rush was that they could never be allowed to be influenced by new-wave music or could never use an African rhythm.
There was no such thing as "That doesn't suit Rush."
Those words have never been uttered.
# Ragged lines of ragged gray #
# Skeletons, they shuffle away #
# Shouting guards and smoking guns #
# Will cut down the unlucky ones #
Synthesizers and technology became a way of sparking your creativity.
I liked it because my need to write melodies is more satisfied writing on a keyboard.
As a songwriter, you're always looking for an angle to give you something fresh.
Coming from a trained keyboard background, you always felt kinda left out in the rock world because keyboards really weren't that cool.
Rush was one of those bands that the way they started integrating synths seemed wildly exciting to me.
Wow, this can actually fill the role of what a guitar player would have done, eats up the mid-range rhythm-section space.
I'd be hard pressed to think of another... someone else who's done it like that.
Once the keyboards and the shorter songs became more of their sound, that's when I kind of moved on to other things.
I didn't like it and I still really don't like it that much.
And Geddy would spend a lot of time on the keyboard and, as a bass player, I love the bass, and so when my favorite bass player's playing the keyboards,
I'm not that psyched about it.
I loved the idea of the keyboards when we first started.
I think as that part of our sound developed, there were times where we just got on the wrong track.
Alex and I had some real disagreements about how profound the keyboard should be.
But Power Windows is a really important record because it was the final and essential blending of keyboards and guitar to me, for Rush.
With Power Windows,
I found it really, really difficult to work around the way the keyboards were developing.
Why am I looking for a different place?
I shouldn't be looking for a different place.
What's going on with these keyboards?
You know, they're not even real.
It's not even a real instrument.
# The more we think we know about #
# The greater the unknown #
# We suspend our disbelief #
# And we are not alone #
# Mystic rhythms #
# Capture my thoughts #
# And carry them away #
I love the synthesizers and I think it's as important as any of their other work.
The ultimate thing that people were saying was they kind of moved somewhat away from the rock and they got a little bit more in the middle of what they did.
To me, Rush middle of the road is still somebody else's left field.
Certain periods of Rush are more universal than other periods.
Now, you could say on the one hand that maybe they're better records.
Maybe that's the best Rush.
Moving Pictures got us into a much broader world of rock fans and when there was a shift, we lost some of those people.
But we realized after time that there was a core of our fan base that was as curious as to where we were going as we were.
Those are the ones that have sustained us through all these years.
I can't fault them for not wanting to be a prog rock band for another 15 years.
They had different periods, that's what makes them interesting.
# Time stand still #
# I'm not looking back but I want to look around me now #
# Time stand still #
# See more of the people and the places that surround me now #
# Time stand still #
Hold your Fire was the record that told me that there was a shift in the way we were writing, pushing us away from rock.
It was starting to move into a jazzier, softer kind of tonal area.
Things can go too far in any one direction and we correct ourselves and eventually go,
"We tried to go along this way but it's too much."
That was the first thing I said on the first meeting.
It seems absolutely crazy to me that one of the few remaining power trios on this planet, guitar, bass and drums, are smothered in keyboards.
And I said, "My interest is to get you back to being a power trio, but a modern take.
"We'll just find out what that contemporary definition of power trio really is."
Alex particularly wanted to assert guitar more as the dominant instrument and push the keyboards aside and Geddy and I went,
"OK, we can do that."
Alex was pretty...
"Let's have a concept, let's not have keyboards."
And I went along with it.
I was a little bit sad.
Presto and Roll The Bones for me were very much indicative of what was going on in the '80s.
They were thin-sounding records, they didn't have any balls to them.
So when I got in there I was kind of hell-bent on making a heavy record.
The Caveman pushed us.
He wanted me to use my Fender bass, go through old Ampeg amps and record it old school.
Everything was old school.
There were battles, because every engineer wants Alex to play without his pedals and all his own synthesizers that he plugs into.
Alex would ask for his fridge of effects and I would say, "No."
And he'd say, "I want reverb," and I would say, "No."
He'd say, "I fucking want reverb!
If I want reverb, then I want reverb."
I'm like, "No, you sound terrible with reverb, you're not having any reverb."
So we ended up going to a bar and drinking about five bottles of Scotch, had terrible hangovers the next day, but we ironed it out.
We had a lot of "few drinks together" and I know what Kevin was going for and he's right.
Counterparts turned out to be the record that we envisioned when we first started working on it.
The songs were thicker and more hair on them.
That record was a big turning point in reconnecting with the kind of rock-and-roll guts of Rush.
# Compensate me #
# Animate me #
# Complicate me #
# Elevate me #
The opening song, Animate,
I think is one of our all-time best.
I love the drive of it,
I love the arrangement.
But I was starting to get conflicted about my own drumming at that point.
I'd been working so much with sequencers and with click tracks for so many years, and I had developed really good precision of time, but I felt a stiffness because of that metronomic need.
I didn't have the looseness that I wanted to hear out of my own playing.
After so many years of being an amazing player,
Neil could have clearly just decided not to play drums until it was time to go play a Rush show.
But instead, he cared enough about what he did to try and break down his current technique and work with Freddie Gruber and, sort of, reinvent his playing style.
I was in New York doing a Buddy Rich tribute recording.
Over that recording session in New York,
I met Freddie and had dinner and got curious...
What would it be like to study with a guy like that?
And I had the time so I thought,
"Yes, I'm gonna try this."
Not to make it sound easy, because when I studied with Freddie I asked myself,
"Can I really do this?
Will I have the discipline?"
It's a huge commitment.
Can you tell me about when you met Neil? Your first impressions?
He was easy because he wasn't nuts.
And I was, you know, and it was, like... it was fun.
Didn't have to go to some strange land.
We never played the drums.
We talked about motion and told a lot of stories and did some dancing...
We were behind a set of drums because the approach to what you do results in what you get. You understand?
Freddie is all about the motion and it was all about the motion of the hands and feet that contributed to a dance.
One of the first things he did was stand up and do a little soft-shoe dance for me and saying,
"When you're doing that, is that dance happening on the floor?
"No, it's happening in the air."
So these were revelations to me to start thinking about not just the hit but the motions between.
- Time is linear, it's not...
- Dah! Pah!
It's like a pogo stick, you know.
A lot of pop music is played like that.
It's extremely vertical.
It's like people slapping water when they swim.
- Mm. Yeah.
- It doesn't...
- Inefficient motion.
...breathe.
Put it this way, you could have a beautiful body and look marvelous...
Thank you.
...but if you're not breathing, it's not alive.
You know, so you got to at least put the breath in there, huh?
I can play a simple beat now completely different from how I would have played that simple beat 15 years ago.
Not that.
There you go.
It takes a lot of courage being a drummer the stature that Neil Peart is to be able to say, "I can improve."
And when he came back out, and made his appearances after working with Freddie and he turned his grip around, his traditional grip, he had a different approach, was so much more relaxed.
That was the most refreshing thing you could have seen, is that your hero could also still learn, that they weren't just done.
When I worked with my band mates right after that, on the Test For Echo songs, the other guys would say, "It still sounds like you," at first I was disappointed, but then I thought "Of course it does."
They thought it sounded the same but when they went to play with me, there was a different clock at work now.
# Driven day and night in circles #
# Spinning like a whirlwind of leaves #
# Stealing in and out of back alleys #
# Driven to another den of thieves #
# It's my turn to drive #
# But it's my turn to drive #
# Driven to the margin of error #
# Driven to the edge of control #
# Driven to the margin of terror #
# Driven to the edge of a deep, dark hole #
In mid-August of '97, we'd finished the Test For Echo tour earlier that summer and there was a message to call the office and it was urgent.
One of the girls told me what had happened.
Neil's daughter was in a terrible car accident and lost her life.
I mean, it was just such a horrible shock.
It was, and I still feel it today, it was the start of a whole lot of emotions that we'd never felt before.
I had not had a friend who'd gone through anything like this.
Ray called me and told me about the accident and I was just in shock as everyone was.
You're just so unprepared for how devastating it is and you just don't know what to do or how to help or any of that.
He could be such a private guy and when news like this hits, you don't want to do the wrong thing.
You don't want to try to comfort them and find out you're only comforting yourself.
Everything to do with the band ended at that moment.
It just didn't seem important.
It was not something you even thought about thinking about.
They didn't know what to do with themselves so they left Toronto and got away from all those reminders.
And then Jackie got sick.
After she passed away, he was lost and so he ran.
He got on his motorcycle and ran.
When his wife died, he had to do what he needed to do to just find some kind of peace.
He embarked on a long, very, very painful journey, just going and going and going and going.
Everybody was so worried about me, there was a network among my friends and loved ones,
"I heard from him today,"
"I got a postcard" or "He called."
They would all reassure each other.
Anything could have happened to me even by accident, let alone by design.
Fuck, we were so worried about him,
I just...
But he... you know, he was at arm's length.
Neil needed time but, to be honest,
I had no real interest in music for about a year.
I hardly played...
I hardly listened to music.
We were on sabbatical.
We were shut down.
We're talking about a journey that stretched 55,000 miles starting from Quebec and going up to the Arctic and around Alaska and onto Mexico, across all of Mexico from Baja across the whole
Mexican mainland down to Belize.
I'd go to small towns and the back roads, generally stopping for the night in hotels along the way and I don't think in that whole 55,000 miles,
I don't know if I was ever recognized once in a little town, at a gas station or a motel or a diner, because I'm just a guy sitting there with a hat on reading a book.
A lot of times I can just slip around and be a guy.
That's all I want from traveling.
I just want to be a guy and that's life enough for me.
# The way out is the way in #
# The way out is the way-ay-ay in #
Travel has always been known as a soothing balm, and even motion, from the time we're little babies, we want to be rocked and if the baby's crying, you can take it for a drive in the car and it calms down.
That's the way
I described it to myself at that time,
I was so stirred up, my little baby soul would only be soothed by motion.
I traveled out of the darkest place a human being can come from, and it was landscapes, highways and wildlife that revitalized me.
It was the timeless landscapes.
It gives your tiny existence a new perspective when you're among things that are millions of years old.
# The way out is the way in #
# The way out is the way-ay-ay in #
I remember getting postcards from him from wherever and he was using different names.
We have, like, about 6,000 nicknames for each other and so I would get a postcard with that nickname on it, so I knew who it was from.
They were lifelines, those little contacts.
He knew we were there, somewhere, and he knew that we would be there if he wanted us to be there.
All he had to do was reach out.
As far as the band was concerned, as things went on, it seemed less and less of a possibility that we would get back together and it looked like the band was - basically, it was four years -
...that the band was done.
Oh, I thought it was...
I thought it was over.
Alex and I would talk about it once in a while but there was no point.
I don't want to play in Rush without those other two guys.
You know, there's no replacing anybody in this band, it's just not possible.
It is the band, the three of us, you know.
Even though he's the new guy, he's just as important.
Those two guys were the most stable thing I had.
My family and loved ones and those that dared to stay around me through that time, and so hard to...
I would have walked.
My concern was just that he would be OK and I thought it was pointless to think about it beyond that.
After a year and a half, whatever, two years,
I sensed that he would do it again, that he would be OK.
I don't think he worked that hard to be what most people consider as the best in the world at something and not go and do it again one day.
I didn't know if it meant that it would take five years or ten years but I thought that one day he'd have to do that again.
When I stopped riding...
...I was ready.
Traveling all that time, it was when
I came to rest and I came out to California and met my wife-to-be and I got some stability there and, with Carrie's help, then realized that I was wanting to work again.
That's basically what it took, but I had to stop moving first.
He was a little apprehensive and thought that perhaps maybe we might try to talk about perhaps trying to maybe think about possibly getting back in the studio to record a record.
It was really like that.
It was quite a fragile, delicate proposition.
I don't think he knew if he could do it.
He hadn't played his drums in a hell of a long time.
He's such a perfectionist, such a fucking monster musician.
I think he was afraid of not being as good as he once was.
It was an unsureness.
"Can I do this?
"Can I write rock lyrics like it's the most important thing in the world?
"Can I slave over and over on a drum part,
"refine every detail like it's the most important thing in the world? I don't know."
We basically booked the studio,
7 days a week, for 14 or 15 months.
Everything had so much weight to it and for him to get back his chops was really a slow process.
I could hear my state of mind in my drumming - anger, obviously, but confusion.
The state I was in... it's in the lyrics too, of course, so many of them had to deal with...
I could not sidestep all of that stuff.
But there was something that was so pure and truthful about the energy on Vapor Trails.
It really is a representation of that time, of the coming back of the band.
# Horizon to horizon #
# Memory written on the wind #
# Fading away like an hourglass #
# Grain by grain #
# Swept away like voices in a hurricane #
# In a vapor trail #
# In a vapor trail #
Coming back to the stage is way more difficult
'cause the essential existence of a band is on a stage.
One of the things that keeps me from quitting touring all the time is that's what a band does.
So coming back to the stage was the biggest recovery possible.
Thank you.
And good evening, Hartford,
United States of America, nice to be back here.
It's been quite long enough, I think.
That was in Hartford, Connecticut on the Vapor Trails tour and it was such a dramatic thing after all this that we'd gone through that here we were, at our first gig, back on the road and we never even thought we would work again.
I think that was one of the few times we've had a group hug before the show.
It wasn't lost on us that... getting to that point... was almost impossible.
So we looked at each other, gave each other a hug and said, "OK, let's go."
# For the words of the prophets were written on the studio wall #
# Concert hall #
The crowd was amazing.
They welcomed us back, really warm.
And Neil was really nervous, so I figured my job is to go over there to make him not nervous so I kept checking on him, throwing him some shapes to make sure he was smiling or laughing.
That's what that night was like. I was completely folded into the job of performing, but there were moments when the three of us connected visually and we knew what we were doing and I remember saying to Ray afterwards,
"It would have been a shame if that never happened again."
It was amazing. And it was amazing to see how happy he was after the show.
Some demons were gone that night.
Part of the rebirth of the band was suddenly a willingness to go where we hadn't gone and to see these legions of fans was such a positive effect on us.
It was like, "This is a second chance for us to go back out and play some new places."
We had no idea, going to Brazil, of any popularity that we might have and then the São Paulo show was 60,000 people.
By far the largest audience we singularly had ever played to.
There was a sense of wild tumultuous impossible masses of people but so locked in a unifying way that it was just magical. We elevated.
Having gone through that whole tour, being in this place where we had people going totally mental, playing One Little Victory, it was a huge victory that we'd survived the previous five years.
Finishing on such a high note was quite a trip.
The newness of touring was over... and I think we had successfully returned.
Oh yeah!
# Modern-day warrior named Tom Sawyer #
# He floated down a river on a raft with a black guy #
# Doo-doo doo-doo #
# Doo-doo doo-doo-doo-doo-doo... #
Hold on! Hold on!
Hold on! Stop! Stop!
Those aren't the right lyrics, fat ass!
I am Geddy Lee and I will sing whatever lyrics I want!
There's a lot of people who were 18 in 1978, guys who were crazy Rush fans.
They're in positions of relative power now.
They're raising their hands and going,
"Yeah, I want to be on this bandwagon now.
I always was there."
Now they had the ability to bring it to more people than ever before.
My guests tonight have 24 gold and 14 platinum records.
Please welcome Rush!
Geddy, Neil, Alex, thank you so much for joining us.
I just wanna remind everybody that this is your first appearance on American television in 33 years.
- Correct?
- Yeah.
I think one of the greatest things to happen to the collective community that has very much enjoyed Rush for many years, was their appearance on the Colbert Report because I've seen these guys get beaten up by the supposed cool people for a long time.
And then, in one fell swoop,
Stephen Colbert puts them on their show and gives them the hand of coolness.
You're known for some, sort of, long songs.
Have you ever written a song so epic that by the end of the song you were actually being influenced by yourself at the beginning of the song...
...because it happened so much earlier in your career?
You are yet to be inducted in the Rock and Roll Hall of Fame.
Is there any chance your next album will be called That's Bullsh...
You could get into sociological and cultural reasons why a band like Rush was publicly marginalized.
You can say, "What was it?
They were too weird? Geddy's voice?"
I like to think that, at the end of the day, people will step back and all those labels fall away because the body of work is significant.
To me, they remain one of the top bands in the world.
Whether some guy at Rolling Stone decides they are or not, is completely irrelevant because, at the end of the day, rock is a people's game and the people have generally and consistently voted for this band.
A generation of rock critics have kept them from being in Rolling Stone and from being a part of that conversation.
They were on the other side of this divide we're talking about, back when they were held in corners by Rush fans at parties going,
"But you don't understand!"
They liked Elvis Costello or David Bowie or something more critically accepted.
Now, it's like we're all so old that even if you hated Rush in the '80s and '70s, you gotta give it up for them, you just got to, or you're just being an old dickhead.
I think that, in many ways, you're served better if you're not quite as successful.
If you never become a pop star, if you don't have top 40 hits.
Then what you have is a pure memory for people.
They don't think you ever sold out.
Virtue is actually rewarded, I believe.
The thing with us is, we've always walked along a shore of the mainstream and we've been attached to it and connected ourselves to it, time and again but we've always been a bit outside of it.
We had our own stream and it wasn't the main one but it was not too far away from the main one.
I always like to consider us the world's most popular cult band.
The Rush fan, while it's a stereotype that it's mostly guys who like heavy metal, there are many devoted female fans.
It's kind of like a giant club.
People turn on their kids to Rush, who turn on their kids to Rush.
It's amazing that the music's been able to go from this generation to this generation and even a younger generation.
Their fans have stuck with them through all of it.
All their shows are sold out still.
When Snakes and Arrows came out in 2007, it charted really well for quite a while and it was some of the biggest shows they've ever played.
It's just amazing for them to come back really strong like that.
It was just like it took off!
It took off again all of a sudden.
It seems like they're bigger now than they've ever been, which is fantastic.
There's a comfort in knowing those same three guys are out there.
It's also spectacular to see three guys that could tolerate each other for all these years and still make music, make good music.
How many more times?
Here's that thing you ordered.
It arrived today, this thing you ordered.
Thank you, Lurch.
- No sweat.
- It's that special thing!
Could you turn that off while I use it?
The Three Stooges all at once.
They're just such a unique and weird concoction and I get the sense, and I always have from Rush, that they're on a righteous path.
There's something there that's really pure, sincere and honest.
At the root of all of it, it's also really good, you know.
That matters more than anything else.
There's a magic and a coolness to them that continues to this day and that's a testament to the music's power.
That's how you know, it's the only way you know.
You check in after 25 years.
"Is it still resonating?"
"Yeah."
It's the only true test.
The test of time.
- Right, shall we?
- Now? What, now?
You mean now?
You mean right now? Now?
I can't go on now.
I've got things to do.
# Pariah dogs and wandering madmen #
# Barking at strangers and speaking in tongues #
# The ebb and flow of tidal fortune #
# Electrical changes are charging up the young #
# It's a far cry from the world we thought we'd inherit #
# It's a far cry from the way we thought we'd share it #
# You can almost feel the current flowing #
# You can almost see the circuits blowing #
# One day I feel
I'm on top of the world #
# And the next it's falling in on me #
# I can get back on,
I can get back on #
# One day I feel
I'm ahead of the wheel #
# And the next it's rolling over me #
# I can get back on,
I can get back on #
# Whirlwind life of faith and betrayal #
# Rise in anger, fall back and repeat #
# Slow degrees on the dark horizon #
# Full moon rising, lays silver at your feet #
Maybe you could tell us where we're going tonight?
We're going to meet with Neil.
We're gonna talk about stuff, I guess, drink some local wine.
Will there be any discussion of the next steps for the band?
We don't really want to hang around with the guy, so yeah, we'll talk about that stuff.
This is just a business meeting.
- Do we ever have business meetings?
- This is the first one.
This will be your 24th record.
What's the motivation to keep doing it?
Chicks.
OK, I call this meeting to order.
Do the thing.
It's so great to drink wine.
It tastes fantastic and it makes you feel funny.
- Didn't I ever tell you Lurch was a genius?
- You never had to tell me.
- He's a genius.
- He manifests it every single day.
- Why don't we write some songs?
- Right now. Let's start.
- I got a notepad here.
- Are you gonna write lyrics?
- I can write things down.
- What I thought...
What if we do something on the
Frankenstein theme we were talking about?
Like, the life of Frankenstein.
- A concept album?
- I'm getting an inspiration.
- That's a bolt... Perfect.
- Hey, yeah! You know something?
- You got a couple of bolts...
- That's what I'm thinking.
It's a miracle really that we've ever had a conversation.
Let's not start now!
You know they say if you put 100 monkeys in a room with typewriters they'll eventually produce the works of Shakespeare?
Who's going to clean those typewriters?
- We're getting into a weird area here...
- Monkeys, you know, defecation.
I don't know you anymore.
It's like working with a whole new person.
- This relationship is...
- I'm so sick of you guys.
This is really helpful for me.
I'm working through something emotionally and psychologically and this helped a lot.
Yeah, and I quit the fucking stupid band.
I'm out of here.
OK, take your smokes and go then.
As soon as I can get over there, I'm gonna rise to my knees and kick your ass.
Rise to your knees. That sounds like the new Rush album title.
That'll be the day.
Oh my God, we are geniuses.
- We're gonna do hockey nights in Canada...
- Hockey, hockey!
...with the drum solo with the Latino stuff in it.
Boy, that's gonna be one great album.
That's the next album, guys.
We've got it sorted out.
I think we've been successful in destroying these people's film.
I will remind them that I said you would regret it.
I just wanted to say that.
I said, "Don't be surprised when you discover how boring we really are."
Cut!
Now I like Rush.
The louder the better now.
There's a moment when you realize that something's changed
And all the bits and pieces start to fit
It's so fab!
When nothing that you know will ever be the same
Ring the bell
That's my cue
Gotta try something new
Gonna shine
And make the moment mine
Now my time has arrived
Gonna shine so bright
The sun will run and hide
And I'll be the only star that lights the sky
I'm gonna shine
Yeah
Listen up, fellas.
Now there's nothing in this universe to hold me back
Bye, Gab.
No endless night can keep me in the dark
And I just might give my dear old dad a heart attack
- But he'll live
- He'll live
- And he'll see
- He'll see
What his girl is meant to be
Gonna shine
And leave the past behind
Gonna try to fly so high
Gonna climb and make the prize all mine
Then I'll write my name in letters across the sky
I'm gonna shine
And if my present luminescent state is second rate
I'll turn it up a notch past nine
And watch the world go blind
Got a diva dazzle that you just can't touch
Like an angel in Armani
I'm too fabulous
They'll be lining up for blocks
Once I bop to the top
With a poochie in my Gucci
I just can't be stopped
I'm gonna shine
And make the moment mine
Now my time has arrived
Gonna shine so bright
The sun will run and hide
And I'll be the only star that lights the sky
I'm gonna shine
There she is. Wonderful!
Hi!
- I know, I know.
- I loved it.
Excuse us. There's our little superstar!
Princess, you had better watch out for law enforcement.
They are gonna come after you for stealing the show!
Honey, on a scale of one to 10, you were an entirely different scale.
And you know my aversion to scales.
Sharpay!
Yes, I know. And thank you.
We'd like to introduce you to Jerry Taylor.
He's a good friend of our family, visiting for the week.
May I just say how wonderful you were?
As many times as you'd like!
I really see a unique talent here.
I mean, a true gift.
And your kind, true words are a gift as well.
It was so nice to meet you.
But if you'll excuse me, my friends have been waiting.
I'm a casting agent from New York.
And will keep waiting until I tell you how much I love your suit.
I'm about to start casting for a new musical on Broadway.
Broadway? As in "Broadway?"
Yeah. And I think that there is a perfect part.
I would be more than happy to arrange an audition if you happen to find yourself in the Big Apple any time soon.
That would be... I would be...
It would be, like...
The show is gonna star
Amber Lee Adams.
- No.
- Yeah.
Stop. Seriously, stop.
Who's Amber Lee Adams?
She's only the most amazing performer ever!
We have so much in common.
I won't keep you.
It was so nice to meet you, Sharpay.
Congratulations again.
And, who knows, maybe we'll see you in New York. Okay?
- Congrats!
- Bye.
Toodles!
Yes! Yes! Yes!
- No!
- No?
I don't understand!
What language is that?
No, I don't think going to New York is a good idea.
See, there you go, believing everything you think.
Do you really believe you're ready for such a monumental step?
Daddy, the main reason
I buy such expensive shoes is to take monumental steps.
Sweetheart, when you graduated from high school almost a year ago, do you remember what you said to me?
"How come no one makes a cap and gown in hot pink?"
No.
"How come you get a car and driver and I don't?"
- No.
- "Good luck finding anyone
"to fill the talent-less void of boring and unattractive
"that will exist in these hallways
- "once I graduate"?
- No.
Yes, but you also said that you needed a year to find yourself, to figure out what came next in your life.
That year's almost up, and you haven't found anything.
It's a small town. I mean, there's only so many places to look.
Besides, I did find something.
A show I wanna be in.
This is more than just a show.
You're talking about going it alone in the big city.
Right! To star on Broadway with Amber Lee Adams.
Could you really deny the world that opportunity?
I'm sorry, princess.
But nothing you've shown me convinces me you're ready for something like this.
Okay, ladies. Team Sharpay.
New York.
Daddy says I'm not ready for this.
So, what does that mean?
You pout, throw a tantrum, and he buys you a new Burberry bag to make you feel better?
That's good, but no.
It means we show him I'm determined.
And when I make up my mind...
And no one is better with make-up.
...my mind looks amazing.
Okay, here's your assignments.
I texted Bridget, who e-mailed
Constance, who tweeted Bethany, who IM'ed Jenn, who Facebooked Kara, who has an ex-friend who she caught with her boyfriend, who she then dumped, so now Kara's her friend again, who knows of a New York apartment available in a luxury townhouse.
That is, like, the best house you can get in terms of towns.
- Sounds perfect.
- It gets better.
- It can't.
- But it does.
It is equal distance from both Chanel and wicked.
Okay. Now, on to travel plans.
That's right. Albuquerque to New York.
One adult and one dog.
Excuse me? Coach?
Hi,
I'm calling for Sharpay Evans.
Mr. Taylor wanted to set up an audition with her for a new musical.
Two weeks from today is perfect.
Now, new outfits.
And this would be for opening night.
The beading actually doubles the reflection of paparazzi flashbulbs!
You can wear anything.
You should have your own reality show called I Can Wear Anything.
Where you wear anything.
All right. I'm ready to show Daddy what we've accomplished.
Ladies, and people I don't know,
New York is calling.
And this is one call that is not going to voice-mail.
So, by way of review, this is my shoe closet, that is my bedroom, these are my new clothes and where I'll wear them, and then I'm a star! See?
I'm just not totally convinced.
Daddy, you said
I haven't shown you anything to let you know I'm ready for this.
But, look, I took matters into my own hands, and without even chipping my manicure.
Sweetheart, it's not as easy as putting pictures on boards.
But I've worked everything out!
And used this pointer.
- I don't know...
- Please, Daddy.
Alone, in New York?
My dear college friend, Michelle, has a son that goes to NYU.
I've met him. He's a very nice boy.
I could ask her to make sure that he keeps his eye on you.
Are you sure you're ready to take this on?
I know I can do this.
I know it like I know purple washes me out and that my eyes are the exact same distance apart to be a supermodel.
What I don't know is whether you believe in me.
Mom seems to.
Okay, you have my blessing.
Thank you, Daddy!
I'll call my friend Michelle and have her talk to her son.
Thanks, Mom.
There's just one condition.
Fine. I love a good conditioner.
You have one month.
I'll fly you to New York,
I'll pay for your penthouse, but you have to get yourself in that show and prove to me you can take care of yourself.
One month.
- Deal?
- So deal!
But if it doesn't work out, you come back here and work for me.
At the country club.
- Work?
- A job.
That's the deal.
Prove yourself, or come back in a month and work for me.
Fine. Prove myself it is!
Look!
Look, Boi, look!
- Sharpay?
- In the flesh and pastels!
- We've been awaiting your arrival.
- Then the wait's over!
We spoke on the phone.
I'm Marjorie Grande, the manager for the building.
My pleasure.
Please, follow me to the penthouse.
Ooh!
I hope this is to your liking.
No. It's to my loving!
Boi, you've gotta see this.
- That's a dog.
- Try to get him to believe that.
I'm sorry.
There are no dogs in the building.
Sure there are. See?
The members of the co-op board have a strict no-dog policy.
Well...
My father heads our country club board, so I'm sure that gives me some kind of board immunity.
Miss Sharpay, this building is pleased to have you.
This dog...
Not so pleased.
Miss Grande, Ma'am. If he goes, I go.
What are you doing?
Filming you.
Just keep doing what you're doing.
Do you always just film totally stunning people on the street that you don't know?
Only when I think the subject is interesting.
And you look baffled and scared and really pink.
So, yeah, interesting.
Are you paparazzi?
I'm a film student at NYU, working on a short film.
The assignment is to capture one unique New York story.
Maybe you're it.
So, you decided to film me without my permission, just for a school assignment?
- Yep.
- How dare you!
And my left side is better for close-ups.
I'm Peyton.
Sharpay Evans. Actress, heiress, soon to be Broadway legend.
- Wait!
- About 105,
- but it's really not polite to ask.
- No...
I should know my own weight, okay?
No, I'm Peyton Leverett.
Our moms went to college together.
This is crazy!
I was on my way up to your apartment to make sure you were okay.
And here you are.
Right, they told me to expect you.
Well, glad we could finally meet.
- Oh, and this is Boi.
- Well, nice to meet you, Boi.
So, why are you out here?
Is everything okay?
Not really.
When I rented this apartment online, it never said they don't allow dogs.
And now they won't let us live here.
Yeah, well, it's their loss!
- Do you have someplace else to go?
- Okay, it's my loss and their loss!
Actually, the only place
I have to go is home.
And trust me, that is not an option!
Listen, there's an empty studio in my building, if you're interested.
I'm friends with the building manager.
I'm sure I can make a call.
And...
Well, I'm sure I can make a call and arrange something.
Maybe get you to see it.
Well, since I don't seem to have any other options.
Bellman!
Oh, yeah, right.
Seriously?
Careful with those!
This is all I have to get by on until the truck arrives with the bulk of my things.
Oh! That's good.
Okay, now, go outside, and then come back in and give me even more of that it's-the-end-of-the-world look. Okay?
- Hey, Peyton.
- Hey, Peyton!
- What's up?
- Off to acting class.
"Maggie, the cat is alive. I'm alive!"
Singing lesson.
Cool, guys. Okay.
Hey, this is Sharpay and Boi.
Hi, Sharpay. Hi, Boi!
Anyways, gotta go. See ya, Peyton.
- Nice meeting you, Sharpay.
- Later, guys.
Okay. Really, you're going to love this place. Okay? Up you go.
Sorry. It's a pre-war building.
And during the war, they didn't fight for an elevator?
Listen, the building has two things going for it.
It's got something available, and I live here.
Fine. But if I break a heel, or a sweat, you're responsible.
Get my bags.
See? That wasn't so bad.
Yeah. Down the hall.
The one with the police tape and chalk outline.
Really?
Kidding.
- You said this was a studio.
- It is.
No way! MGM was a studio! This?
This is a roach motel with no room service.
Yeah, a studio apartment.
Sure, from certain angles, it's a bit small.
A two-karat engagement ring is a bit small!
This is a doll house!
- So what do you think?
- Forget it!
I'd need an entirely separate apartment just for my lipsticks.
And where am I supposed to sleep?
- What is that?
- It's your bed.
That is not a bed.
It's a closet with a tongue.
You can't be serious!
- There is one really good thing about it.
- Yeah, sure.
See? This is my place!
Looking better, huh?
Am I missing something? Oh, right.
Space! Luxury! Maid service!
Let me guess.
You're used to being spoiled.
I'm not used to it. I just expect it.
You know, half this building is filled with performers who came here with the same ambitions you did.
What makes you so much better than them?
Money, breeding, talent, great hair, perfect jaw line, chic taste.
How much time do you have?
All right, fine.
I tried to help you out like my mom asked, but whatever.
I'll find someone else to film.
The only problem is if I call my father and tell him how I messed up on the other apartment and how I have nowhere to go but here, and I ask for his help, he'll make me come home and...
Work!
- So?
- So? Then I'll never get my big break.
Oh, and promise you won't call your mother and tell her about this, because then she'll call my mom who will tell my dad, and I don't think he really believes
I can make this happen.
He only gave me one month to prove it.
Well, then you've got one month to prove him wrong.
Why did I do this?
I want my canopy bed and my housekeeper.
And a shower that doesn't share a room with a kitchen.
- Come on.
- Where to?
- Do you trust me?
- You suggested this place.
Yeah. Point taken. Come anyway.
Come on.
I hope you're taking me to a better apartment than what you just showed me.
Because let me tell you, if that's it?
No way! Absolutely no!
Just come on.
Just don't ask any questions.
I need luxury! Are you kidding me?
That was like a green, dark hole that I never wanna be in ever again.
All right, here you go.
Butchy!
- Come on...
- Where are you taking me?
- You'll see. Come on.
- Why are we here?
All right, all right. Now, you're gonna have to close your eyes.
- Close my eyes?
- Yeah, just close your eyes.
- Why?
- Because! Just do it.
All right, now. Keep them closed.
- Well, what if I hit into something?
- You won't. I got you.
All right, all right. Keep them closed.
All right.
- All right, you got them closed?
- Yes, I do.
All right, all right. Perfect. All right.
Now, stay here, keep them closed.
Keep them closed. All righty.
Keep them closed.
All right. Open them. Hit it, Butchy!
Wow.
I know.
When I left Indiana to go to school here,
I didn't know a soul either, and I was just as overwhelmed as you.
But I had two things, my dream and my camera.
And look at me now.
You still only have your dream and your camera.
Yes, but I met you, didn't I?
So, something's working out.
Well, whenever people meet me, things get better.
Look, you just have to adapt to your surroundings.
And remember that for now this is all just temporary.
Right. Like prom dresses and first boyfriends.
Look, anything you have to do will be worth it to get your dream.
Okay.
I'm gonna meet with that casting director, get the part,
- be a star and have a palace!
- There you go.
That's the self-indulgent, self-entitled, optimistic pink hurricane
I've been seeing through my lens.
And I like how perceptive you are.
Okay, New York. Bring it on.
I used to think maybe you loved me
Now, baby, I'm sure
And I just can't wait till the day
When you knock on my door
Now every time I go for the mailbox
Gotta hold myself down
"Cause I just can't wait till you write me
You're coming around
I'm walking on sunshine
I'm walking on sunshine
I'm walking on sunshine, whoa
- And don't it feel good!
- Hey!
All right now
And don't it feel good!
Hey!
All right now, yeah
Hi!
Turn it off. Turn it off!
Just waiting foryou
Just waiting for you
Now I don't want you back for the weekend
Not back for a day
No, no, no
What?
I want you to stay
I'm walking on sunshine
- And don't it feel good!
- Hey!
All right now
And don't it feel good!
Oh, yeah!
Looking good. So pink.
You're good.
- Do you wanna try some?
- No, I don't want any!
Lay down. Lay down.
Night, Boi!
Boi? Get help!
- Knock, knock.
- Come in!
Wow! And wow.
Hey, are you on your way to meet with the casting director?
No, I'm on my way to change theater history.
You think this is a good outfit for changing history?
Perfect! Mind if I tag along and film?
Not that you could ever mind me, right?
I think you should. After all, not many people can say they were there to film the creation of a legend.
Sharpay! You made it after all!
Destiny called, and I get great reception!
Well, your timing is perfect.
What's tomorrow like for you?
The first day of the rest of my fame.
Well, all right.
I'll set up your audition for 3:00.
I'll e-mail you the musical number that we'd like you to prepare.
And could you make sure that he's well-groomed and, you know, takes care of any business beforehand.
- What?
- What?
- He?
- Yes.
- Him?
- Him.
- He?
- Yes!
Wait, what?
It's your dog that we want to audition.
He was amazing!
Oh.
What?
I mean...
I sent you all the information in response to your e-mail.
I mean, didn't the title of the musical give you any indication?
A Girl's Best Friend?
A Girl's Best Friend!
And I'm here for the girl!
You're here for the girl?
Well, I'm never the best friend!
Oh, no. No, no. We wanted Boi.
As the girl?
No, as the best friend.
Wait, wait. You wanted Boi as the best friend of the girl?
Not me as the girl with the best friend?
Exactly.
Oh, Sharpay, I am so sorry for the confusion.
If you don't want Boi to audition,
I would totally understand.
Sharpay. Sharpay! Hey, stop.
Hey, don't touch the car!
Look, slow down. Even New Yorkers can't keep up with you.
It's not even me they wanted!
Well, to be fair, the role is for a dog.
If they wanted you,
I could understand you being upset.
Why did I come all this way?
Leave my friends, family, a dry, self-hydrating climate?
To follow your dream!
Or at least that's what I thought.
Nothing is turning out the way I planned it!
Plan A. Live in a penthouse and star on Broadway.
Plan B... Don't have a plan B!
What do I tell my father now?
That you came to a very special city determined to be someone very special, which you are.
Oh, I'm not so special.
I'm just like everyone else.
Maybe a little better.
Look at it this way.
Boi is your dog, and he has an opportunity, so be happy for him.
You're right.
I'm being, you know, what's the word?
When you do something for yourself even though it's not so good for other people?
- Selfish?
- No!
Oh, yeah.
Look, Sharpay, you can't give up. Okay?
And, anyway, you're officially the star of my film.
I am?
Yeah, you are.
Oh. So now it's all about you?
Only because I need you here.
Fine. I'll star in your movie.
Okay. Good, good!
Okay, change of strategy.
I didn't know you had a strategy, but I like the way you think.
If Boi becomes a success, everyone will see me as well.
After all, I am his entourage.
I am the one who's holding his leash.
His fame will ultimately lead to my fame.
That's what I came here for, right?
Still a little selfish, but heading in the right direction.
We're gonna do this.
It's like I tell the housekeepers.
If you can't see the bright side, polish the dull side.
Yeah, not quite what I was talking...
They want Boi to audition?
It's Boi they will get! when a sign ofthe times is the times are extremely tough
When you look at the world and the world that you see is
Yes, rough
When you feel like a long lost pup
And you need some cheering up
Sit back, relax and watch us do our stuff
Two, three, four
We're gonna sit and shake your hand
That's how it starts
We're gonna nose our nosy way into your hearts
We'll sing and bark
In two-part harmony
You're gonna love us
That's our guarantee
We'll bow together on the count of three
Me and my Boi
My Boi and me
We make the perfect pair
We've got that savoir-faire
Me and my Boi
Me and my Boi
My Boi and me
Wait!
That's the best audition I've ever seen!
I'm Gill Samms, the director.
Neal Roberts, writer.
That was amazing!
Chills. Feel my hand...
I won't feel your hand, but I believe you.
I won't feel your hand either, but I believe you, too.
That is one special dog.
We've done special here.
Special has been done, people!
Boi was meant for Broadway.
We both were.
So, when do we start?
Well, there's one more waiting.
One more!
One more, people!
Could you take a seat in the front row, please?
There.
Now.
Roger Elliston the third.
And his dog, Countess.
FYI, I'm Roger.
As you can see by our extensive resume, hand-printed on carbonless, environmental-friendly rice paper,
Countess has numerous major
Broadway credits under her paws, including The Collar Purple
Three Puppy Opera, and the original
Broadway cast production of A Wagging Tail of Two Cities, a musical opera in German.
Major pedigree.
I'm impressed.
This is us impressed.
Plus, she can bark a high C with sustained vibrato.
Sure, but only dogs can hear it.
All right.
Let's see what Countess can do. when a sign ofthe times is the times are extremely tough
When you look at the world and the world that you see is rough
When you feel like a long lost pup
And you need some cheering up
Sit back, relax and watch us do our stuff
We're gonna sit and shake your hand
That's how it starts
We're gonna nose our nosy way into your hearts
We'll sing and bark
In two-part harmony
You're gonna love us
That's our guarantee
We'll bow together on the count of three
Me and my girl
My girl and me
We make the perfect pair
We've got that savoir-faire
Me and my girl
My girl and me
That's the best audition I've ever seen!
- Amazing! I weeped!
- Wept.
I wept!
- I wept!
- And not just regular weeping.
Theater weeping!
Amber Lee, what do you think?
Yes. Amber Lee, thoughts?
Wow...
We are so meant to be BFFs!
Wow! "Wow" is a word, right?
Right. Wow!
I just hope that the palpable chemistry surging between you and I right now like nuclear fusion won't in any way influence your decision towards our clearly superior audition.
How old are you?
Twelve.
I think I'm good.
And you, also!
Your dog...
Wow! Wow.
I know, right?
He's just saying hi.
Sharpay Evans of the New Mexico Evans. I'm a mega fan.
Oh, you are not!
So am!
I am gonna tweet about you right now.
Shut up! I follow your tweets.
She did! She tweeted!
Okay, I don't know how we're gonna decide. You're amazing!
All this and a grade school diploma.
And you, amazing! Wow.
I would be excited to work with either one of you and your dogs.
And can I just say, this is the opportunity of a lifetime for me.
Because Broadway...
Broadway's not like film or television, because with Broadway, real people are watching.
- Wow.
- Me, too.
I am just so excited to be performing on the Great White Way!
Not that I don't love all colors.
Well, I know both these talented dogs want to work with you.
But only one can be in the show.
- How are we gonna decide?
- Wait.
How about we work with both dogs during rehearsals?
Wait! How about we work with both dogs during rehearsals!
That way I could see which one I work best with.
- That sounds like a solution.
- We have a solution, people!
Can I just say how totally great I think you are?
You do, and I'll never wash my ears again.
You know what I think?
Well, of course you don't because I just thought of it, but I think they loved you!
I like the way you think!
And you're such a good singer.
And I would know.
- My album went triple platinum.
- Well, I've done quite a bit of theater.
It totally shows.
Listen, I'm gonna have my assistant give you my phone number.
If there's anything that you need, you just let me know, okay?
We girls gotta stick together, right?
- Here.
- Wow.
I mean, this is actually your number!
It looks like any ordinary number, but it's not. It's yours!
- Oh, and, hey, may the best dog win!
- Thanks!
Yes! Yes! Yes!
Can you believe it?
You were great!
Boi was great.
This new strategy just might work.
- Amber Lee really likes you, too.
- Is she awesome or what?
She inspires me. There. I said it.
Quelle inspired.
We are so gonna get that part.
- How do you know?
- Easy. I don't do rejection.
Sharpay!
I just wanted to wish you both luck.
Oh! That's so nice of you.
And suggest that you give up now, while you still have your dignity.
Distant though it already might be.
Sorry, which Smurf are you again?
True, you have talent.
But you lack both the experience and the finesse to ever achieve the Holy Grail of possibility.
- Yeah, but Boi is cuter.
- Countess is a theatrical ninja.
I'm sorry. For a minute there you just bored me to death.
I have a foolproof strategy of getting what I want.
See it, want it, have a fit, get it.
- Yeah, well, this playdate's over.
- I hope you enjoy rejection.
- We're gonna get that part.
- We're gonna destroy you.
- Bring it on.
- Oh, it's brought.
All right, Boi. This foot. That foot.
Good boy! Yeah!
Okay, let's try our next one. Stay.
Catch your tail. Catch your tail!
Good! Yeah, good.
Sit. Stay.
We are so going to take them on.
I'm not gonna let some hobbit get in my way.
And, look.
All Boi can do is think about how horrible that other little mangy dog was.
If you want success so badly, then you will get it.
All you need is one shot to make it happen.
Yeah, and this is my shot.
It's like my grandmother says.
"God only got one book published,
"and look how well it did for him."
Doing this is all I've ever dreamed about, especially since
I already have everything else.
Well, there's still humility.
What's wrong with being confident?
Confidence is when you know you're good.
Arrogance is when you think others know you're good.
Well, I want everyone to know I'm as good as I think everyone thinks I am without them knowing
I know they think it.
- And do you have to film everything?
- Yep, 'cause this is my shot.
If my professor loves my film, he talks about it.
Then there's a buzz, then it gets in a festival, then it gets distribution, then I'm signing a studio deal, then I'm getting an Oscar.
I always knew I wanted to be an actress the first time I produced and performed the entire production of Snow white.
Full dance, musical numbers, handmade costumes.
I made my brother play all the dwarfs.
Everyone in that pre-school worshipped me.
I just want to wake up every morning and be onstage.
Good morning!
Good morning, everyone.
- And welcome to the first rehearsal...
- Of the new Broadway musical.
A Girl's Best Friend!
And you are all amazing.
- No, you are!
- Him or me?
- You!
- No, you!
Me? Okay!
And heading our superb cast, we are thrilled to welcome one of the biggest stars around,
Amber Lee Adams!
Oh, stop!
- Yes!
- Guys, come on.
Can I just say that this, this is the opportunity of a lifetime for me.
Broadway's not like film or television, because with Broadway, people can see if you write your lines on your hands!
All right. Let's rehearse.
I want everybody downstairs with piano, rehearsing the music for the opening number.
Amber Lee and Judith,
I want you onstage so we can block that first scene.
- Let's go!
- Let's go, people!
All right. Let's start with Boi.
Let's go!
What a perfect goodbye party.
Thank you, Mom!
I can't believe my little girl is going out into the world on her own for the first time.
I have to, Mom. And who knows, maybe I'll find fame and fortune!
Actually, reverse that.
- Why is that funny?
- Well...
Because you'd rather have the...
I'll explain later. Just keep going.
There's only one thing that breaks my heart.
Leaving Shelby behind.
Pick it up! Go, go!
A star is about to be born!
Shelby!
Oh!
What's in this envelope?
This very wet envelope.
- Again, I don't get that.
- Keep going.
Gasp!
Actually, that's a stage direction.
You gasp, you don't say "gasp."
Simple mistake. Keep going.
Shelby! Trying to run away with my boarding pass won't change the fact that I'm leaving at 8:00 a.m.
6:00 a.m.
Oh, Shelby.
This is the first time we'll be apart.
I wish I could just pack you up in a widdle doggie bag.
Okay. Let's get Countess in there and continue.
Don't worry, sweetheart.
Shelby and I will both be here when you get back.
You're killing me.
Oh!
That is adorable!
You're right, Shelby!
Why not go with me?
Any place that doesn't want you,
I don't wanna be.
Let's see what New York has in store for us together!
Good.
Let's talk about the scene a bit, and we'll do it again.
And both dogs, great work!
Shelby! Trying to run away with my boarding pass won't change the fact that I'm leaving at 8:00 a.m.
6:00 a.m.
What's going on? The dog.
What is this?
Somebody, please.
The dog is licking me.
All right, all right. Get me the other dog!
Sorry. What can you do?
There's only one thing that breaks my heart.
Leaving Shelby behind.
Okay, go, go!
- Why is she twirling?
- What is she doing?
- Gill?
- Roger!
Figure out what's going on with the dog.
It's not helping me.
- Not helping, people!
- Meanwhile, get the other dog!
Sorry. What can you do?
There's only one thing that breaks my heart.
Leaving Shelby behind.
Okay, go!
Oh, hey!
How is this helping? Really.
Am I the only one bothered by this?
Gill?
Okay, everybody, that's 10!
I'll admit you're good. But we're better.
Give up!
Give up?
Not until there's a Broadway marquee with a picture of my dog so big you can walk by and smell his puppy breath!
I have to take the dogs for a nap.
Union rules.
Thank you.
- You break first.
- No, you break first.
Oh!
- Pretty cute, huh?
- Yeah! Yes, they are!
I just wanted to tell you something.
This is my show.
I'm America's sweetheart.
They're paying to see me, not you two over-bred fur balls.
So, until I can figure out a way to get rid of you, you better watch your step, otherwise you'll find out the real meaning of going home in a doggie bag.
This film is cutting together really well.
Do I look amazing?
- The camera loves you.
- I know!
Oh, no! My dad's video-chatting me.
He thinks I live in a penthouse.
I can't let him see that I live in a tiny studio in a filthy tenement.
With a boy in my room!
A boy, by the way, that has no money, and lives in a tinier studio, and who, apparently, has never heard of the word "maid-service"! No offense.
What of that could possibly offend me?
Oh, my! Oh, my!
I don't know. Hyperventilating!
- What do I do? What do I do?
- Come on.
Come on. Hurry!
- All right, scoot over. Okay, go, go.
- Okay, I gotta get this. Stop!
Hi, Daddy!
Hey, princess! How's my little girl?
Overpaying for everything and yelling at total strangers.
You're practically a native.
Hey, where are you?
That view is spectacular.
Well, there's hardly a penthouse in the city that doesn't have a spectacular view!
So, you the toast of Broadway?
Daddy, you know how I feel about carb references.
Just a little concerned, sweetie.
The last time no one's heard from you for this long was when you found out your gold card wasn't actually made of gold.
Well, I've been busy with rehearsals.
Outstanding! You got into the show?
Well, it doesn't quite work like that.
It's complicated.
But I know it's gonna work out.
Sharpay, is there something you're not telling me?
You remember the deal, right?
If things aren't working out...
I know, I know. I have one month to get in the show, and then...
Two weeks, sweetie.
You have two weeks left.
You're sure everything's okay?
It's fine, Daddy.
Well, okay. We miss you, angel.
Miss you, too.
I love you!
Boi has to get that role. I can't go home.
Not as a failure.
I need some sort of subtle, visibly crushing advantage over Roger.
Look, why not just trust Boi is talented, that you've trained him well,
- and let fate take it from there.
- Fate?
Fate gave a girl in my graduating class one long eyebrow.
I can't trust fate.
Some matters you just have to take into your own hands.
What do you mean you forgot my bottled water?
Well, I was going to get those magazines that you said you wanted from across town, and I got hit by a bike messenger.
So I went to the hospital for, like, just one second to get these stitches.
And meanwhile, I had no water!
I will get it for you right now.
Now I've had to drink tap!
- I am so sorry.
- "I am so sorry."
- I will do better.
- Forget it, okay?
Aside from catching some shade from the shadow cast by your madam's apple, you're of no use to me.
You're... fired!
God!
Amber Lee?
Oh, wow! You look so cute, Sharpie!
- Sharpay.
- You changed it.
I like that even better.
So, tell me, what's on your mind?
I just saw your assistant leave in tears.
She's not my assistant. She quit.
No wonder she was crying.
Yeah, I don't think she even really cared.
Next time I should probably just hire a best friend instead.
Wait!
Are you thinking what I'm thinking?
What are you thinking that I should be thinking?
I could help you out until you replace her.
That is what I was thinking about thinking.
Of course this can't, in any way, affect your decision of which dog gets the starring role.
Oh, it won't.
I couldn't live with myself if I thought I did anything unfair.
You have my word. Hey, I know!
How about dinner?
- That sounds awesome!
- Right?
Get me a reservation for two at someplace fantastic.
Then call my agent, have her meet me.
Right. Sure.
Oh. I won't forget this. And I promise, it won't be because you're helping me if I happen to take a little extra liking to Girl.
- Boi.
- You changed it.
I like that even better.
Oh, and can you take my mic down to the sound guy
- and tell him the wire hurts my scalp.
- Okay.
You're the best.
Amber Lee says the wire is hurting her scalp.
Personally,
I think she's using the wrong shampoo, but she's the star, and you know,
I don't wanna say anything.
You're hot.
Excuse me?
You're hot.
Okay. Even though theater lighting highlights my natural skin tones, thank you for noticing, that's a little rude, don't you think?
No. Your mic's hot.
It means it's on.
You see that little switch.
When it's flipped over like that, it means it's on and it's going through the entire theater.
Well, you could have led with that part, thank you.
Amber Lee's got a great scalp!
You're hot.
Then she asked me to help her out after her assistant quit.
And after I suggested it.
Are you sure this is wise?
I'm sorry. Let me re-phrase that.
This isn't wise.
It's perfect. Amber Lee will see that she and I are exactly alike, we'll become BFFs, she'll make sure Boi gets the role, then his fame becomes my fame!
I mean, this is the advantage
I've been waiting for!
Isn't it more like taking advantage?
And my father thought
I couldn't do this in a month.
It's turning out better than I imagined.
Hello?
Sure. Be right over.
Hello?
Oh, thank goodness. In here, quickly.
I just... I can't reach that.
Can't reach it?
Okay, it was a little bit of a test.
Only a true friend would come all the way down here at this hour and help me with something like that.
- So, I passed?
- Yes.
- But, seriously, the purse.
- Okay.
Thank you.
All right, here's your bag.
Here's your other bag.
Oh, and don't forget your photo shoot.
Oh, you're a lifesaver.
You must be at that photo shoot to make sure I look as fabulous as you always do.
- Are you serious?
- Serious? You're now also my stylist.
You have to tell me all your secrets.
Okay, gotta go.
"Life is so strange.
"Shelby and I travel halfway across the country to find fame and fortune,
"and instead, we find love."
Hey! How about dinner?
Split some egg rolls at Wok This Way?
Can't. I have to highlight script changes for Amber Lee, then highlight her hair.
Highlight of my night!
Okay.
But I miss spending time with you.
And you did promise to shoot some more stuff for my film.
You know, what I'm doing is important, too.
Oh.
For a minute there, you sounded like Amber Lee.
"Good to see you. Good to see you. Good to see you. Good to see you."
Bad news. My maid quit.
So, here's a list of chores.
Chores?
And I want to talk to you about Boi.
But you have to promise it'll stay between us.
Okay.
I think I'm going to ask the director to give Boi the part.
- Are you serious?
- Almost positive!
You won't be sorry.
Trust me. I know.
Oh!
Oh, no.
There are some changes for the blocking in the dog scene, top of act two.
Countess can learn these in no time.
She's got a memory like a digital hard drive.
- No bark and all mega-bite.
- Funny.
I need to find Sharpay and make sure she gets them.
Boi is doing the first run-through tomorrow.
I'd be more than happy to deliver them to her.
- Great.
- Thank you.
Thank you.
Sharpay?
That's unfortunate.
And I've been here ever since.
Life is so strange.
Shelby and I travel halfway across the country to find fame and fortune, and instead, we find love.
Lenore, I have something to ask you.
We have something to ask you.
He's supposed to come from the other side of the stage with the ring box!
Yeah, sorry. We changed that blocking.
What happened?
What is wrong with this dog?
And is he okay? It's not his fault.
He's just a little dog! He's just so sweet.
Okay, everybody.
Let's break for a few.
That's 10, people.
I'm aware. I know.
I don't know what happened.
We sent out the script changes, but Boi didn't do them.
But I didn't get any new script change.
I looked everywhere last night to give them to you.
I guess working for Amber Lee has its drawbacks.
- You did this on purpose.
- That's a complete...
Yeah.
You're threatened because you know
Amber Lee is gonna choose Boi.
Not after today she won't.
Okay. Countess doesn't have half the personality that Boi has.
And Boi doesn't have half the talent that Countess has.
Isn't that right, girl?
- Countess?
- Boi?
- Has anyone seen Boi?
- No, sorry.
- Countess?
- Boi?
- Anyone seen Countess?
- Nope.
- Countess?
- Boi?
- Hello?
- Boi and Countess are gone!
Gone! What?
We have to find them!
Wait, where are you now?
Leaving the theater.
We're gonna look around here.
Can you look near the apartment in case they come back?
Yeah, yeah. Of course.
Just keep me posted, and I'll call you if they show up.
Okay. What if they were dog-napped?
Do you think we pushed them too hard?
- I don't know.
- Countess is über-sensitive.
She cries watching dog food commercials!
I just hope they're not huddled in a corner somewhere.
Afraid, lost, at each other's throats!
You knowyou love me
I know you care
Just shout whenever
And I'll be there
You are my love
You are my heart
And we will never, ever, ever be apart
Are we an item?
Girl, quit playin'
"We're just friends,"
What are you sayin'?
Said, "There's another"
And looked right in my eyes
My first love broke my heart for the first time
And I was like
I thought you'd always be mine, mine
Baby, baby, baby, oh
Like baby, baby, baby, no
Like baby, baby, baby, oh
I thought you'd always be mine
I'm goin' down, down, down
And I just can't believe my first love won't be around
And I'm like baby, baby, baby, oh
Like baby, baby...
What if we never see them again?
They're smart dogs.
Smarter than we are. They'll be okay.
Oh, no. It's my dad. I just...
I can't deal with him right now.
- Countess!
- Boi!
Hi!
I missed you!
You're back!
It's amazing.
They came back to the apartment.
Thanks, Peyton.
Oh, and Sharpay, it's still on.
Bring it.
You're back! Yeah!
You bad, bad boy, Boi.
I'm just glad you're okay.
He and Countess had an adventure.
She probably coaxed him into joining a doggy gang or something.
We'd better check him over for tattoos.
Are you so lost in what you're doing that you haven't noticed?
Noticed what?
Boi and Countess are in love.
- With what?
- Each other.
No way!
You're right. He's dilated.
He's got puppy dog eyes.
How could I have not noticed puppy love?
Well, there's a lot you haven't noticed.
Like lately, you've had no time for me.
You know, I was counting on you to help me finish my film.
I said I would, and I will.
Things have become complicated.
It's not that complicated.
Amber Lee is using you, and you're letting her.
You don't know what you're talking about.
- I don't?
- No!
Where's the Sharpay that was determined not to go back home because she didn't want to work for anyone?
Why don't you tell me?
Working for someone, that's where.
- So at least be honest as to why.
- I know what I'm doing.
You've sold your soul to get Boi in that show, rather than trust in the dog that you raised.
Even worse, you've stopped trusting that your own talents would get you where you need to go.
And maybe you're jealous because I'm on my way up with a new famous friend, and you're just a student making a film about someone else's life instead of your own.
You don't have to be in my movie anymore.
I get it.
You have more important things to do.
Fine!
One question?
What happened to that hot pink whirlwind of confidence and ambition
I saw through my lens that first day you got here?
I mean, that girl knew she was special.
That girl knew she didn't have to do any of this to succeed.
What happened to her, huh?
Hello.
Oh, and Sharpay, can you remember to invite as many people from my fan club as possible to opening-night dress rehearsal?
I want the theater filled with people who love me as much as you do!
Sure.
You know what would be great after all this work?
A long, luxurious spa bath.
Sounds amazing!
Thank you.
Run one for me, will you?
And then you can finish these.
You're the best!
- This is a big change.
- Huge change!
I don't think you're hearing me!
New Jersey can hear you!
The name of the show is
A Girl's Best Friend.
I didn't tell you to change the title.
But you want the best friend written out!
Oh. Right. Change the title!
How are we supposed to get rid of one of our main characters a day before our dress rehearsal in front of an audience?
The audience is coming to see me.
You change that dog's part to a bark and play dead, or I don't go on.
Let's be reasonable here.
I'm a star. I don't have to be reasonable!
Look, those mangy mutts are bothering me almost as much as their disposable owners.
I actually had to have one of them clean my toilet just to keep her away.
She thinks she's an actress.
She acts all right.
She acts just like every other obsessed fan.
Wait.
Everything you said... You were...
Right?
Yes.
Thank you.
You must think I'm a total fool.
No. Not total.
Maybe my dad was right.
Maybe I'm not ready for this.
Maybe I should just go home and... work for him.
I mean, did I really think
I was just gonna come to Broadway and be a star?
Yes.
Because that's exactly how you think.
It's perfect.
Perfect is so hard.
And it doesn't prepare you for disappointment.
Well, if it helps, you still look adorable, even when you're disappointed.
Yeah, that doesn't help.
Look, Sharpay.
There is not a marquee big enough or lights bright enough to contain the fame you're gonna have.
Yeah, but not the way I've been doing it.
Like you said, the Sharpay you know isn't the Sharpay that has become the Sharpay that is this Sharpay.
Did all the Sharpays follow that?
I sacrificed integrity for opportunity.
I let someone insecure distract me.
I cleaned a bathroom!
But worst of all,
I disappointed someone I care about.
I forgot what was really important to me.
I lost track of what I want.
And other than maid service and a canopy bed, what is it that you want?
A fair fight. A lifetime in the spotlight.
And maybe you'll still let me be in your movie.
I guess.
Okay, I can't say I approve of dating beneath your station in life, but fine. Go.
Hey, I got your text.
What's C-Q-M-T-W-I-L-G-T mean?
"Come quick. Major trouble.
Wow, I look great today." Duh.
I really should have gotten that.
Listen, Amber Lee Adams isn't what you think.
A self absorbed, two-faced panther who would eat her young alive on a reality show rather than allow anyone to steal her spotlight?
Okay, she's what you think.
Listen, I don't care if her parents had to tie beefjerky around her neck just to get the family dog to play with her, as long as Countess is at her side on that stage.
That's what I'm trying to tell you.
She wants the part of the dog written out completely!
- That's not fair!
- Too far.
Well, I am 12, remember?
Roger, we've been fighting the wrong battle, each other.
We need to form an alliance and work against a common enemy.
- Zits?
- Amber Lee.
Trust me, the zit battle is one you won't win.
But what can we do?
Tonight is the dress rehearsal.
The audience will be filled with members of Amber Lee Adams' fan club.
I know, I saw the tweet.
Fine. Yes, I follow her, too.
Okay, we need to show people exactly who Amber Lee really is.
It's time someone taught her how to behave in the theater.
I like the way you think.
It's manipulative, but for a good cause.
Tell me what you need me to do.
- Hey, Amber Lee, I...
- Where have you been?
I have been trying to reach you all day.
Oh. Sorry, my phone must have been turned off.
Without asking me first?
I just wanted to say good luck.
You know, I know you chose Countess for this performance tonight, and I'm fine with that.
Well, it was nothing personal, but your phone was shut off, so I couldn't talk to you about it.
I guess that won't happen again, will it?
We're good.
Hug? Okay.
Hello, everyone. I'm Gill, the director.
And I'm Neal, the under-appreciated writer.
And we are thrilled that you're here for our first performance in front of an audience.
Does everyone here know how to applaud?
Okay, how about the balcony up there?
- Okay, now.
- Can you hear us? You're good!
Will somebody please control these wannabe werewolves?
Hello? People?
See, this is exactly why I didn't want to do a show with dogs!
I'm the star, not them! Stage people?
Could somebody please put these rats with rabies out of my misery? Anyone!
Finally, you idiot! What took so long?
Now, hurry up and get these flea-bitten fur bags out of here!
- There are people waiting to see me!
- Okay, go now.
You think all those boring freaks with no lives came to worship two no-name mutts?
I don't think so! I'm the one they love!
Me! They came to see...
I knew I forgot to tell you something.
Careful, your mic's on.
You did this to me. You ruined me!
News flash! You ruined you!
Oh, what do you know?
You're a nobody!
The only reason you even wanted to be my friend is so I'd choose your dog!
No, no. At first, I idolized you, even more than myself, which isn't easy.
But you're not at all what I thought you were.
You and I are exactly alike.
Except I don't enjoy letting people down.
I don't use people to feel better about myself.
And I definitely don't wear yellow and orange in the same week, let alone the same outfit, okay?
Maybe I did think you and I were alike, but not anymore.
In fact, I'd be embarrassed if someone thought I was like you.
Well, I quit!
And without me, there's no show.
Now neither one of your furry little friends will have their shot and neither will you.
Blame her!
I'm sorry. Someone had to say it.
I'll go talk some sense into her.
You, out of this theater right now.
Wait, Sharpay.
If you go, then I'll go, too.
No. You wanted this as badly as I did.
This mess was my idea.
You win.
That's not what it feels like.
- Hey. Can I come in?
- Sure.
- So, you're really leaving, huh?
- Yeah.
I'm packing my carry-on stuff first.
- I wish you weren't going.
- Me, too.
Have you thought about what you're gonna do now?
Move home where there's enough room for my pores to open, spend months in the spa getting this layer of New York grime off my skin, and mostly...
...miss you.
Look, I know exactly how to help that.
Don't go.
I already talked to my dad.
I guess I'm gonna start...
- You don't have to say it.
- Thank you.
What about your dream of being a star?
It's still there.
It's just a little bit more of a dream than a reality.
- You know what today is?
- What?
I got here exactly one month ago.
My time was up tonight anyway.
Well, so then you still have eight hours.
This isn't how my movie's supposed to end.
I guess it is.
This is Sharpay.
Uh-huh.
Sure. No, no. I'll be there.
That was the stage manager.
They want me to come to the theater and clear out Boi's things.
I can go with you if you want.
I want.
And, so, Amber Lee has quit.
- Gone.
- Kaput.
The producers feel, without a star, we can't open.
The time it would take to find someone who could learn the role and do it well might take weeks, and it would cost too much to keep the production going.
But we want you all to know, it was great almost working with you.
- I'm gonna meet you outside.
- All right.
Thank you for your hard work.
We are so, so sorry, people.
Wait! Wait, it's not over. It's not over.
Look, it doesn't have to be.
Look, there is someone who knows the part by heart and who is amazing.
All right, maybe she's not a star yet, but she will be.
This show will make her one.
Just watch.
Boi, keep your voice down.
Peyton, start shooting the rehearsal.
Boi, go mark. Go mark. Good!
Okay, stay. Stay.
I love when you use that accent, but...
We're not supposed to be in here.
Okay, now let's do the scene where the character Lenore thinks she's lost everything and you come over to console her.
Come on.
Shelby, what is going on?
I feel invisible here.
Nothing is working out the way
I planned it.
I got something inside ofme
Something that needs to be heard
Deep down a voice is guiding me
Hidden emotions have stirred
Why have I let others lead the way
When all along I know what it is
I want to say
Whatever it is
I'll do it
I'm the answer to your prayers
Whatever you want
Stop looking
Nobody else compares
Whatever you've seen before
I'll give you so much more
You'll be totally impressed
I'm New York's best kept secret
I thought I had a perfect plan
Where I would wind up on top
One day I'm thinking, "Yes I can"
Next thing you know, I'm a flop
Why did I ever play this silly game?
I got to shake up the rules
And stake my claim
Whatever it is
I'll do it
I'm the answer to your prayers
Whatever you want
Stop looking
Nobody else compares
Whatever you've seen before
I'll give you so much more
You'll be totally impressed
I'm New York's best kept secret
What if I missed my window?
What if I blew my shot?
What if the only chance
I was going to get
I already got?
I'm not ready to turn the page
Until I'm on stage in a show
No, nobody move
I've got something to prove
Don't you know?
Whatever it is
I'll do it
I'm the answer to your prayers
Whatever you want
Stop looking
Nobody else compares
Whatever you've seen before
I'll give you so much more
You'll be totally impressed
I'm New York's best kept secret
Well, did I tell you?
- Amazing!
- Amazing! You're amahzing!
You have more depth, range and tone in one note than Amber Lee had in her entire surgically reshaped body.
We'll promote you as
"The girl who we're promoting."
The producers will love it.
Wait, wait. What are you saying?
We need you to save the show.
- Seriously?
- We know it's a risk.
- A gamble.
- A risk. Did I do "risk" already?
You did. And, true, we did fire you.
- He fired you.
- But now I'm un-firing you.
- Can we do that?
- Just did.
- Good for us!
- We need you.
What do you say?
Um... I guess we could take the costumes in a few sizes and get everyone used to hearing the songs sung on key, but there's one condition.
Boi and Countess split the role of Shelby the dog equally.
Done!
We've a lot of work to do, people!
- Are we crazy?
- Crazy for theater!
- Let's rehearse!
- Let's rehearse, people!
Where are those wonderful dogs?
- Thank you.
- This is it.
The chance you've been waiting for.
- What if I'm not ready for this?
- Oh, you're ready.
"Ready" isn't as ready as you are.
- What if I'm horrible?
- Won't happen.
- What if I forget my lines?
- Impossible.
- What if I...
- Everything in your life so far has been leading you to this moment.
Your moment. Embrace it.
I'm scared.
Finally.
Let's rehearse, people!
Over here!
Mr. Pinto, Mr. Pinto, over here. Mr. Pinto, look this way.
I've got a feeling inside of me
Running all through my veins
It's like electrical energy
A world about to change
It's an open road
So here I go
The rest of my life
Is starting tonight
Feels like I'm finally on my way
I'm looking ahead
Can't tell where it ends
But I'm gonna take a leap of faith
And I'm gonna hold on tight
And ride this ride
The rest of my life
I'm gonna go for it all out
I know there's no guarantee
But I've been given a chance and now
What's next is up to me
I'm gonna set my sights
So light those lights
The rest of my life
Is starting tonight
Feels like I'm finally on my way
I'm looking ahead
Can't tell where it ends
But I'm gonna take a leap of faith
And I'm gonna hold on tight
And ride this ride
The rest of my life
If all the world's a stage
I'm here to take my place
I know I'll always find a way to shine
The rest of my life
Is starting tonight
Feels like I'm finally on my way
I'm looking ahead
Can't tell where it ends
But I'm gonna take a leap of faith
The rest of my life
Is starting tonight
Feels like I'm finally on my way
It starts with a dream
Of who I could be
Wherever it takes me I can't wait
So I'm gonna hold on tight
And ride this ride
The rest of my life
I want fabulous
That is my simple request
All things fabulous
Bigger and better and best
I need something inspiring to help me get along
I need a little fabulous
Is that so wrong?
Fetch me my Jimmy Choo flip-flops
Where is my pink Prada tote?
A summer like never before
I want more!
She wants fabulous
That is her simple request
All things fabulous
Bigger and better and best
She needs something inspiring to help her get along
She needs a little fabulous
Is that so wrong?
Absolutely...
Not!
English - US - SDH
♪ Flash, aaah
♪ Saviour of the universe... ♪
I wanted us to be massively successful, I mean...
I think almost everybody in this business does.
♪ Flash, aaah
♪ He'll save every one of us... ♪
Certainly by the beginning of the '80s, the world domination they'd craved for was definitely there.
♪ Aaah
♪ He's a miracle... ♪
The hardest thing is to actually maintain the level of success you've achieved because I think when you go all the way up, the only place is to come down.
♪ Flash, aaah
♪ King of the impossible... ♪
You've no idea where you can get to.
It's like the sky's the limit.
♪ He'll save with a mighty hand
♪ Every man, every woman, every child with a mighty Flash... ♪
We didn't want just America, we wanted the whole world, you know.
South America reared its head and we heard rumours that we were... the biggest thing ever in Argentina and Brazil and they started to ask us to go down there.
They were saying, "You can play football stadiums down there."
We went, "You're joking."
In those days under the dictatorship in Argentina, we were negotiating with the army general and he said to me,
"How can I possibly allow 50,000 young people into a stadium
"when I can't control them?
"What happens if somebody suddenly shouts out 'Viva Peron'
"in the middle of a Queen concert and I have a riot on my hands?"
And I tried to explain to him that, rather like gladiatorial matches in Rome, this was panacea to the people, they'd never, ever had this before, this would be an extraordinary experience.
So we got the whole thing together and it was God knows how many jumbo jets full of equipment.
And when we arrived in Buenos Aires, as we're unloading it, you could see spent bullet cases, and thinking,
"Yeah, we really are in a very different place here."
We were looking for a bodyguard for
Freddie, this particular man came in and his opening recommendation was that he'd killed 212 people.
The travel arrangements were very scary.
Driving the wrong way along a raised motorway with outriders, with guys in big jeeps waving their big guns and getting the cars, coming straight towards them, to pull over.
We got caught in a traffic jam and one of the policemen just stood up, put his head through the roof and started firing his gun in the air in order to clear the traffic.
Very hair-raising.
Hello, amigos.
HE SPEAKS PORTUGUESE
Fred, how do you feel playing and singing before 200,000 people?
I haven't done it yet!
I can remember being nervous the first night.
The top tier alone took 80,000 and we were in this sort of dug-out which I guess the football teams would normally be in.
All the windows were broken and I remember thinking this is... You know, it's going to take some balls to walk out there.
Hello, Sao Paulo!
♪ Get your party gown
♪ Get your pigtail down
♪ Get your heart beating, baby
♪ Get your timing right
♪ I got my act all tight
♪ It's gotta be tonight
My little school babe
♪ Your momma says you don't
♪ Your daddy says you won't
And I'm boiling up inside... ♪
They knew all the songs.
These people don't speak English but they could sing along all the Queen songs so they're obviously very genuine fans and they went nuts.
♪ Tie your mother down
Tie your mother down
♪ Lock your daddy out of doors
I don't need him nosing around
♪ Tie your mother down
Tie your mother down
♪ Give me all your love tonight
♪ Tonight... ♪
It also takes a certain ego and a certain drive to want to be in that spotlight and go on display.
And Freddie thrived and got better in bigger arenas.
♪ Yeah
AUDIENCE: # Yeah
♪ Yeah
♪ Yeah
♪ Yeah ye-yeah yeah
♪ Yeah ye-yeah yeah
♪ Yeah yeah ye-ye-yeah
♪ Yeah yeah ye-ye-yeah
♪ All right
All right
♪ All right
All right
♪ Yeah Yeah Yeah Yeah
♪ Yeah Yeah
♪ Yeah Yeah Yeah Yeah
♪ Yeah Yeah Yeah Yeah
♪ Yeah Yeah
♪ Yeah
♪ Yeah, yeah, yeah
♪ Aaaaaaaall right
♪ Aaaaaaaall right
Let's do it to tempo.
Once we'd finished Argentina and Brazil, the band decided to go back into the studio and they had of course bought the studios in Montreux, here.
Mountain Studios was in the casino by the lake in Montreux.
When they first arrived it was, like, the top studio in Europe.
We were in the studio in Montreux and David Bowie lives nearby.
I think we went out for a meal or drinks or something and then landed up back in the studio with the sort of rough intention of doing something.
We were fooling around and just... jamming with tracks and suddenly we said,
"Why don't we just see what we can do on the spur of the moment?"
Then it's the pressure of His Majesty David being there and everybody wanted to look suave and quick with ideas and stuff.
Deacy of course came up with this riff - dun dun dun de de dun dun.
"UNDER PRESSURE" BASS RIFF PLAYS
♪ Bom bom bom buddle der der
♪ Ding ding ding digger ding ding
He kept playing that over and over and over again.
And then we went for a pizza and he forgot it.
Completely escaped his mind!
We got back and I remembered it.
And of course, we're used to playing together and now we have this other guy there who's also inputting, inputting, inputting.
David's idea of putting these clicks and claps and then the track just grew.
By that time,
David was very impassioned.
He had a vision in his head,
I think.
It's quite a difficult process and somebody has to back off and actually I did back off, unusual for me.
♪ Pressure pushing down on me
♪ Pressing down on you
♪ No man ask for
♪ Under pressure
♪ That burns a building down
♪ Splits a family in two
♪ Puts people on streets... ♪
For the vocals, one of them was to be locked out and not allowed to hear what the other one sang and they sang anything off the top of their heads.
♪ It never rains but it pours
♪ Um ba-ba bey... ♪
Fred starts doing his bum-didder-dup and his bits-and-pieces and I see out of the corner of my eye,
I see David sticking his head in, listening.
Then Fred came down, David went up and Freddie was quite impressed that he was counterpointing to what he did before.
♪ ..This world is about
♪ Watching some good friends screaming let me out
♪ Pray tomorrow gets me higher, high, high
♪ Pressure on people
People on streets... ♪
And Fred said,
"What do you make of this?"
I said, "It's kind of easy if you stand in the doorway listening to what you're doing."
And Freddie turned,
"What the BLEEP"?
♪ Cos love's such an old fashioned word
♪ And love dares you
♪ To care for the people on the edge of the night
♪ And love dares you
♪ To change our way of
♪ Caring about ourselves
♪ This is our last dance... ♪
The result is very good but it was a difficult experience, I think, because people pulling in different directions, in a sense.
♪ Under pressure... ♪
Under Pressure, David Bowie, the band, me,
I don't think it mixed too well.
♪ Pressure. ♪
Shame actually, it's...
I thought it was fabulous, we could've done some incredible further things, actually.
Well, here we have a total change of life for all of us, really.
We went back to Munich to do the next album and really, I suppose, things started to go downhill.
It's actually a rather grim place.
It's a studio in the basement of a huge tower block which is a hotel.
And it's kind of depressing.
A lot of people used to jump off that building and kill themselves, off that particular building, it was well known for it.
We didn't know that until we got there, so we went a bit nuts.
By that time, we were getting very finicky about recording and we spent months there.
After the massive success of
Another One Bites The Dust, the thinking was we'll make an album that's slightly more dance orientated.
Not my idea.
Especially in Freddie's entourage,
I won't mention any names like Paul Prenter, for instance, loathed guitars and found that Brian was old fashioned.
Paul Prenter had become
Freddie's personal assistant.
He was a very, very bad influence upon Freddie, hence on the band, really.
He very much wanted our music to sound like you'd just walked in a gay club.
And I didn't.
♪ Back chat, back chat
♪ Criticising all you see
♪ Back chat, back chat
♪ Analysing what I say... ♪
There were a lot of strains in the band that'd happen with four people of that strength of character.
Everybody had their say and the arguments were creative and then it would become personal.
Of course!
It was a sort of emotional roller coaster.
I think less and less time was spent in the studio.
Get up about three o'clock and go and have breakfast and then a bit of work would be done and then you'd have dinner and then one of the roadies would start mixing cocktails and then... other things would...ahem, happen.
♪ Give me... ♪
I'm not saying cocaine and other drugs and loose women had anything to do with that at all.
Wink, wink, nudge, nudge!
♪ Body, body
♪ Give me your body... ♪
It turned into a rather exhausting cycle, I think, in the end.
♪ Don't talk, don't talk, don't talk
♪ Baby, don't talk... ♪
I don't know if I can say this...
Yes, I could probably say this.
We all got ourselves into deep trouble emotionally in Munich and Freddie was no exception, he got himself deep into emotional waters which he couldn't really handle and was very unhappy for some of the time.
♪ Give me your body... ♪
He was being sucked into places which really probably weren't good for him.
And I think we all felt that and realised that he was in some kind of danger.
♪ Give me, yeah
♪ Your body... ♪
I certainly saw the change in Freddie...
♪ Don't talk... ♪
..in the club Heaven in 1983.
I said to him, "Have you modified your behaviour
"in light of 'the new disease'", which as of yet did not have a name.
And with the sweep of his arms in a theatrical fashion, he said,
"Darling, my attitude is fuck it,
I'm doing everything with everybody."
If someone kept a chart of rock and roll royalty,
Queen would have to be at the top.
Now Queen is back on tour and perhaps up against their biggest challenge yet.
Now, most of you know that we've got some new sounds out last week and...
..for what it's worth, we're going to do a few songs in the funk-black category, whatever you call it.
Record sales are not as strong as in the past and that's left everyone wondering.
I don't like everything that we do.
I like a lot of what we do but not everything.
It depends on whatever the four individuals in the group, what music they're into at the time and what songs they're writing.
There might be a couple of songs come out you don't like very much.
I could name a couple!
Well, Hot Space in Queen terms was pretty disastrous, really.
It didn't appeal to some of the hardcore Queen fans who would turn up at concerts with banners saying "disco sucks".
It's only a bloody record, people get so excited about these things.
I mean...
The band...
It was pretty much on the verge of falling apart.
I think we had a couple of meetings and staff to discuss were we still together etc, etc.
What to do if you're a member of an internationally successful rock band but want to blow off creative steam that doesn't fit the band's image.
Our next guest has faced that, he is Roger Taylor.
He's just blown off some of his own steam with his second solo album,
Strange Frontier. Let's look at it.
♪ Sometimes I feel like a man on fire
♪ Sometimes I feel like a man possessed
♪ Sometimes I wanna burn down this crazy town... ♪
I think we decided we needed a break.
Queen propelled us into the world but also in a sense it confined us into a very small space.
We just worked with each other, not the other fabulous musicians.
I ended up in LA and one morning just got up and rang up some mates there and said, "Why don't we do something?"
And it led to the Star Fleet Project.
♪ Star fleet, star fleet
♪ Star fleet, star fleet... ♪
At a certain point we were all ready, there's no doubt.
We'd been off doing our different things, refreshing ourselves but we were ready to get back in the studio.
This is the hardest time for us, this is a big test, we've been in the business 12 years and to keep it going that much further is hard.
The Works was the next album.
We thought we wanted somewhere nice and warm and not freezing bloody cold Munich.
So that really made sense, to go to LA to make that record.
And I think we got back on track in The Works, actually.
They were a complicated musical marriage.
They didn't have one room in a studio, they had three or four.
Studio B, Studio C,
Studio D, Studio E.
But that was a good thing cos it allowed everybody to work on their individual songs.
In the early days it was
Brian and Freddie who really used to write most of the material but over the last five years,
Roger and I have started to contribute more.
I thought John Deacon was kind of a secret weapon because he would come up with these major hits out of nowhere.
He had this track,
I Want To Break Free, and it was pretty much there except this big hole in the middle.
I mean, John did not want a guitar solo so he asked Fred Mandel, a very brilliant keyboard player, to improvise something around the main tune and Fred did this brilliant take.
SYNTHESIZER ON "I WANT TO BREAK FREE"
You know, all their records used to say prominently "no synthesizers" then I come along like another schmuck and put synthesizers on everything.
I wasn't too happy at the time but I gave it my blessing, that's the deal.
The polarity of writing within the band changed.
I think the time has come where we actually... in songwriting, we're completely even.
Roger will come up with something like Radio Ga Ga and it's perfect.
It was Sunday afternoon, my son
Felix came in, he was very young and he just sort of went,
"Ah, radio, caca" cos he's half French.
And, um, I just thought that's quite nice, you know.
I put the backing track together and presented it to Freddie who really loved it.
We took it into the next room and then Fred and I worked on the vocoder parts.
♪ All we hear is
♪ Radio ga ga
♪ Radio goo goo
♪ Radio ga ga... ♪
If you listen, several times it says "radio caca".
♪ Radio ga ga
♪ Radio ga ga... ♪
Radio Ga Ga brought Queen back.
♪ Radio... ♪
It came from a rock thing.
Radio Ga Ga combined the best elements of the '70s with the '80s.
That's where Queen had a strength with The Works.
It was more of a substantial hit even though it didn't actually make the top 10 in America.
But it got played a lot and the video made a big impact.
♪ Let's hope you never
♪ Leave, old friend
♪ Like all good things
♪ On you we depend
♪ So stick around
♪ Cos we might miss you... ♪
We had a killer video which we put a lot of work into.
♪ You had your time
♪ You had the power
♪ You've yet to have... ♪
The whole thing just felt good, of its time.
It felt a bit different.
It felt modern and it was very fresh.
♪ All we hear is radio ga ga
♪ Radio goo goo
♪ Radio ga ga... ♪
All of a sudden people, would participate jointly in Radio Ga Ga situations.
A collective statement that was good on the radio, or on a turntable.
In live, it really was a unification.
♪ All we hear is radio ga ga
♪ Radio goo goo
♪ Radio ga ga... ♪
Freddie said,
"What we do is like the Olympics.
"It's people believing in you and everyone behind you.
"Everyone doing the same thing.
"That's the Olympics."
He said, "That's what we do."
♪ Radio ga ga, radio ga ga... ♪
Suddenly the MTV generation grew up and video became all-important.
The most enjoyable video was
I Want To Break Free because we just laughed.
I was dying to dress up in drag.
Doesn't everybody?
And everybody ran into their frocks quicker than anything.
It was their idea, basically, and I said, "Yeah, let's have a go."
♪ I want to break free
♪ I want to break free
♪ I want to break free from your lies... ♪
That great video was a loving reference to Coronation Street.
♪ I've got to break free... ♪
Americans didn't understand it.
It just looked like we wanted to dress up in drag.
It was unthinkable to most of middle America.
♪ I've got to break free... ♪
It's a very British thing.
Sometimes the humour doesn't translate. I'm Canadian so I get it.
It was just a different style of humour and I don't think it went over with the "MTV generation".
I remember this video being banned.
MTV were very quick on the trigger to ban things then.
I mean, if you thought
Mary Whitehouse was bad, you should have seen some of the geezers running MTV in the very early '80s.
Well, MTV were very narrow-minded.
It was Whitesnake, and fucking Whitesnake, and then another Whitesnake track.
And they decided that they didn't think men in drag was rock enough for them, I guess, so they didn't play the video.
Most Americans were deprived of my, and Freddie's, favourite moment of that video.
I said to Freddie, "I love the way you double-step...
♪ But life still goes on... ♪
..to get from one room to the other.
And he said, "I'm so glad you noticed. That's my favourite part."
♪ ..without you by my side
♪ I don't want to live alone
♪ Hey, God knows
♪ I've got to make it... ♪
The funny thing is, we became global but we lost America.
And we kind of never got it back.
♪ I've got to break free. ♪
Freddie wouldn't go back to tour America unless they were touring a hit, and of course that's the chicken and egg because the less you tour America, the more you lose America.
It was sad, it's a shame, because there's a whole catalogue of hits, worldwide hits, but not in the
States, and that'll never come back.
Appearing at Sun City never helped anybody's image, and sometimes it hurt.
Sun City was this resort of international standard in South Africa and the position taken by most of the rock community was that if you went to South Africa you supported apartheid.
It's very nice to be here in South Africa and I just want to have a good time.
Anything you'd like to say to your fans?
Yeah, we hope you get real excited, because we're pretty excited to be here.
The controversy behind Sun City...
Sun Fucking City - wish I'd never heard of the place.
The principal reason that Queen went there was because they were offered a large amount of money.
There was all sorts of hoo-ha going on, you know - "You mustn't play
Sun City because it's a sign
"that you're supporting apartheid."
Well, it's simply not true.
If you adopted a policy of never playing in a country where you don't approve of the politicians, there'd be very few places you can play.
Did you know you had so many fans in South Africa?
Well, I think we had some idea of our popularity here, but we didn't realise it was quite that.
Jim went down there time after time and I asked if we'd play to mixed audiences.
He said we wouldn't play to segregated audiences.
And it was not an apartheid audience, but it was mainly white.
Are you going to the concert?
Definitely.
What have you heard?
I heard it's a great show.
What are you expecting at the concert? Something fantastic.
I've heard it's the most fantastic show ever.
The band then supported a school for the deaf in Bophutswana that we became very involved with.
The general audience doesn't read the small print.
It just sees the headlines.
If it goes, "You're making a lot of money playing a gig in an apartheid state", it makes it look like you're following apartheid.
It did not help them.
I will say to my dying day that we acted properly according to our conscience as regards South Africa.
Um... We went there to play music, the same as we did in all kinds of other places.
We got so much shit for it.
But we went for good reasons.
But, on balance,
I think it was a mistake to go.
Whenever the band came under pressure, there would be maybe a walkout, a separation, a row.
♪ Sometimes I feel I'm going to break down and cry
♪ Nowhere to go
Nothing to do with my time
♪ I get lonely
♪ So lonely
♪ Living on my own... ♪
I like Queen very much, but I don't want to end up living a quartet.
I'm 37 years old
I want to do something different, otherwise I'll get too damn old and I'll be in a wheelchair.
There was a lot of strain when Freddie did his solo album, mainly because the advance was considerably more than the advances for Queen albums.
♪ Got to be some good times ahead
♪ Sometimes I feel nobody gives me no warning... ♪
There is an inward jealousy - they're all waiting to see if my album does better than the last Queen album, or something like that.
♪ It's not easy
♪ Living on my own... ♪
Sometimes it's nice to break away from a group that's actually been going for so long, meaning staying away.
He was definitely contemplating the idea of what Living On My Own actually means because he lived in Munich for well over a year.
♪ Got to be some good times ahead... ♪
When Freddie was alone in Munich, he had to basically fall back either on the gay community, or, when he needed some sense or decent advice, he would call us.
He was hanging out a lot at our place.
He'd spend a lot of time with the kids.
It was like a family affair.
He said a lot of times that this was the best time in his life.
Out of the songs you've put on this album, Freddie, which one do you find the most rewarding, personally?
Oh, I don't know, the one that sells the most.
Freddie had a very fulfilling experience of creativity, but he didn't have a very fulfilling experience, um...how shall I say, economically.
The Mr Bad Guy album really was a disaster, in terms of sales.
The strength of Queen came from the arguments.
It was the fact that you had to fight your space.
Songs got fine-tuned by that, and Freddie working on his own in
Munich with an orchestra and Mack, there was nobody really to stand up with him.
Well, tomorrow, the pop world's greatest extravaganza, as we've been talking about,
Live Aid, will bring together rock's brightest and best from both sides of the Atlantic, all performing free in the hope of raising millions for the starving people of Africa.
You know, looking back, there was a moment when Queen were thought of as a good group that was predominantly historic.
Radio Ga Ga was their one big hit in four years.
They weren't on a hot streak, and they weren't a particularly productive group at that time.
There was a feeling that maybe that was it.
But Geldof ordered them to regroup and perform.
The thing was, did Freddie want to do it? He wasn't that keen.
Freddie was a bit reticent about doing anything, but Bob came in one day when we talked about Live Aid, and said,
"I told Freddie he's doing it."
And I kind of believe him.
It really is a gathering of the rock world's elite, and already rehearsing in here are some of rock and roll's royalty.
It was rehearsed quite intensely at the Shaw Theatre on Euston Road.
♪ Here we stand and here we fall
♪ History won't care at all
♪ Make the bed, light the light... ♪
Queen took the responsibility more professionally than anyone else on the bill.
♪ You don't waste no time at all
♪ Don't hear the bell but you answer the call... ♪
I went out and bought these big plastic white clocks and put them in the orchestra pit so we could see the time.
There was an 18-minute slot that each artist had, and there were traffic lights at the side of the stage.
And you were warned that the traffic lights after 16 minutes would turn amber from green, and they said, "You won't see them turn red because the power goes off."
So you make it quick and you make it something they know.
Just after 16 hours of live Aid, would you welcome Status Quo!
♪ Here we are and here we are and here we go... ♪
The energy that day was sensational.
♪ Rockin' all over the world... ♪
We were all quite nervous, actually.
Not necessarily our audience because they'd put together the bill of Live Aid before we'd been announced as being on it.
They set the level for the PA with limiters and then when Queen came on, Trip, who was Queen's sound engineer, switched the limiters so that Queen would be louder.
From the word go, he came out of the traps like a champion.
Freddie performed against the advice of his doctor because of a throat condition.
But he went out there and gave one of the greatest live television performances ever.
♪ You don't waste no time at all
♪ Don't hear the bell but you answer the call
♪ Comes to you as to us all, yeah!
♪ And it's time for the hammer to fall... ♪
The ballet with a BBC cameraman was shockingly charismatic.
♪ Every night, every day
♪ A little piece of you is falling away
♪ Lift your face the western way... ♪
And it was as if all the artists backstage had heard a dog whistle.
And their heads turned and the frisson you felt was,
"They're stealing the show."
♪ I've paid my dues
♪ Time after time
♪ I did my sentence
♪ But committed no crime
♪ And bad mistakes
♪ I've made a few
♪ I've had my share of sand kicked in my face
♪ But I've come through
♪ We are the champions, my friend... ♪
I defy anybody who saw it not to have goose pimples on the back of their neck when you saw that sea of people.
♪ We are the champions
♪ We are the champions... ♪
I remember looking up and seeing the whole place going completely bonkers in unison and thinking,
"Oh, this is going well."
♪ ..the champions
♪ We are the champions, my friend
♪ And we'll keep on fighting till the end... ♪
We did have an unfair advantage.
We had done football stadiums.
Freddie particularly learned this magical way of involving everybody.
In a huge football stadium, he could make everybody feel they were in contact.
♪ We are the champions...
♪ ..of the world. ♪
People say, "Was it a career move?"
Well, no, it wasn't a career move but of course that's in the back of everybody's mind.
We got a great reception from the crowd, even at Wembley, and also from the
TV audience as well.
So in fact, it was a great boost of confidence, in a way, for the group.
To have conquered
Live Aid in that way undoubtedly breathed fresh energy into the band.
It was a shot in the arm and we went back in the studio.
We were back in Munich with all its attendant dangers, so we tried to keep ourselves in the studio as much as possible.
Ta-dah!
♪ Hey! One man, one goal
♪ One mission, one heart... ♪
I had a page, a sort of poem that was sort of half nicked off
Martin Luther King's famous speech.
It doesn't fit. It does.
One goddamn decision.
Real decision.
No, it won't fit.
It was all one this and one that.
♪ One God, one soul, make one decision... ♪
Make one decision. One true religion.
♪ One God, one vision
♪ One man, one goal, one true religion
♪ One dump, one turd
Two tits, John Deacon
♪ Woh-oh-oh-oh-oh
♪ Give me one vision... ♪
The Magic Tour was the biggest tour we'd ever undertaken.
♪ No wrong, no right
♪ I'm gonna tell you there's no black and no white... ♪
We planned an entire tour of stadium gigs.
♪ All we need is one world, one vision... ♪
Massive shows all over Europe, and really fantastic reception.
We hit another level.
We were finally in the place we'd always dreamed of being, perhaps.
♪ I had a dream when I was young
♪ A dream, sweet illusion... ♪
That tour had gigs like
Budapest in it, which in itself is a great thing.
Budapest was the first stadium concert behind the Iron Curtain.
People hitch-hiked from all over Eastern Europe.
♪ Look what they've done to my dream... ♪
It was a great tour because it ended up two nights at Wembley.
Hello there, my beauties.
This is happening.
♪ Give me your hands
Give me your hearts... ♪
In addition to Wembley Stadium, we put on an extra one because it sold out so quick, the two nights, so we put Knebworth on.
♪ One voice, one hope
One real decision
♪ Gimme one light One light
Gimme one hope One hope
♪ Just gimme, ah
One man, one man
♪ One bar one night
One day hey hey
Gimme, gimme, gimme, gimme fried chicken. #
They were the final shows with Freddie, and I remember it being pretty much perfect.
MUSIC: "God Save The Queen"
I just got the vibe from Freddie, he felt that he wasn't maybe able to do any more.
I know there'll be a time when I can't run around on stage because it'll be ridiculous. There comes a time when you have to stop.
I think he had an idea that he might not be terribly well.
CHEERING AND APPLAUSE
Freddie told me that he was HIV positive before he told the band.
This put me in a very difficult position because he told me he didn't want me to tell the band.
So there was I, managing a band, knowing something of crucial importance to the band which I couldn't pass on to them.
♪ Every drop of rain that falls in Sahara desert says it all
♪ It's a miracle
♪ All God's creations
Great and small
♪ The Golden Gate and the Taj Mahal
♪ That's a miracle
♪ Test-tube babies being born
♪ Mothers, fathers, dead and gone
♪ It's a miracle... ♪
There were rumours and he was obviously suffering, and we didn't know what it was, and rumour, rumour, rumour...
And so he did sit us down at one point and said,
"Look, you probably know what
I'm going to say.
"You know what I'm suffering from.
You know what the problem is but I don't want to talk about it anymore. I just want to make music until the day I fucking die.
And...let's get on with it.
♪ It's a miracle
♪ It's a miracle... ♪
These are some of our best studio times.
We've made the decision that all the songs we write will be credited to all of us, so it kind of releases a bit of... positive energy in us.
They became closer and closer, without any doubt.
The sharing of writing credits was a major breakthrough.
Some magical things happened,
I think.
There's this track called
The Miracle, itself, which I think is one of Freddie's most beautiful creations.
♪ The one thing
The one thing
♪ We're all waiting for
♪ Is peace on earth
Peace on earth
♪ And an end to war
An end to war... ♪
'I love the track. It's all so optimistic about the world' and the miracles that are being found in the world.
Which is incredible when you think what he's looking at because he knows what he's got and he knows what the prognosis is.
♪ That time will come
One day you'll see
♪ When we can all be friends
♪ That time will come
One day you'll see
♪ When we can all... ♪
APPLAUSE
Special Award for an outstanding contribution to British music goes to John Deacon, Brian May,
Freddie Mercury,
Roger Taylor - Queen.
APPLAUSE
The first indications something wasn't right was Freddie looked a little thinner to me.
And I called John up to see what was going on.
I said, "Is something wrong with
Freddie?" And he wouldn't tell me.
The thing that annoyed me more than anything was a shot of Freddie in The Sun and he'd just come out of the doctor's, I think.
It's a really grainy, full-page shot. "Is this man dying?"
And I thought,
"You fucking wankers."
♪ Scandal
♪ Scandal... ♪
We hid everything and we avoided questions.
♪ Scandal... ♪
I guess we lied.
Because we wanted to protect him.
♪ Scandal... ♪
I would then say anything to anybody. "Is Fred sick?"
"Absolutely not, no.
He was in the gym yesterday.
"Fuck you," you know.
"None of your business."
Everybody had to draw the wagons around him.
Because at that time, to become ill was to have a death sentence.
♪ Today the headlines
Tomorrow hard times
♪ And no-one ever really knows
The truth from the lies... ♪
His house was surrounded by...
I don't know, a couple of hundred, I reckon.
Just like vultures, really.
♪ Deeper and deeper inside... ♪
It was utterly shocking, you know.
Filming the groceries in the back of the car boot.
♪ Scandal... ♪
"Any medicine in there?"
You know, it's absolutely shocking.
It became difficult to work in London, there was such a terrible focus of attention on him.
People sticking cameras through his toilet windows, as soon as the rumours were out there.
So Montreal was a much more peaceful place to work so we ended up doing a lot of stuff there.
SONG: "I'm Going Slightly Mad"
Freddie felt much safer there because people didn't bother.
You know. They weren't intrusively observing him.
At that point we can't play live but in the things that we're doing, it's business as usual.
♪ I'm going slightly mad
♪ I'm going slightly mad... ♪
He was determined to work right up to the last minute.
I was surprised that he did
Going Slightly Mad.
♪ It finally happened... ♪
Which I thought was a good video, actually, and it had lots of humour in it.
♪ I'm slightly mad! ♪
There was a lot more humour in
Freddie than I think the general public realised.
You want to take it? No, I...
Oh! What's it doing?
HOOTS OF LAUGHTER
Roger, what did you do?
It was just really a very close time.
Go for me. Waaa!
Freddie found an amazing tranquillity and I never really heard him complain.
I remember we went out one night and he had horrible problems with his leg.
And Freddie saw me looking at it and said, "Oh, Brian, do you want to see what it's like?"
And he showed me, and I think... he reacted to my face, and he said,
"I'm really sorry. I didn't mean to do that to you."
I never heard him go, "This is really awful. My life is shit.
"I'm going to die."
Never, never, never.
He was an amazingly strong person.
The sicker Freddie got, the more he seemed to need to record, to give himself something to do, you know - some sort of reason to get up.
And he would make it in whenever he could.
So really, it was a period of fairly intense work, actually.
Freddie is becoming weakened by this horrible disease and he finds it hard to stand up a lot of the time but he'll throw a couple of vodkas down and prop himself up on the mixing desk and have his mike there, and go for it.
Roll camera, roll playback.
♪ Sometimes I get to feeling
♪ I was back in the old days
♪ Long ago... ♪
'I can hear the voice is getting thinner.'
♪ Things seemed so perfect
You know... ♪
'I think you can really tell that it's an ailing voice.'
Although he hits the notes.
♪ The sun was always shining
♪ We just lived for fun
♪ Sometimes... ♪
'Roger started writing These Are
The Days Of Our Lives about his kids' and the way he felt about life and how it comes back.
But of course, in that context, it had another meaning.
♪ Those were the days of our lives... ♪
'He looked so ill there.
It was quite scary,' and...I thought that was a very brave thing to do.
And why not, you know?
'He spent hours and hours and hours in make-up, sorting himself out,
'so it would be OK.'
♪ Those days are all gone now but
♪ One thing is true... ♪
I did too many movements.
But I just wanted to see...
No, I know...
♪ I still love you... ♪
I just want to see...
It doesn't look...
It doesn't look...
I think it should be waisted.
Do you know what I mean? I want a little bit of shape here.
A tiny bit.
'Yeah. I like the shape now.'
♪ Those days are all gone now, but
♪ One thing's still true
♪ When I look... ♪
'Freddie actually kind of says a goodbye in that song.'
♪ I still love you... ♪
I still love you.
Innuendo was out on the streets, it was number one and two weeks later they were here in Montreux.
And they started doing more music.
And Freddie, at that time, said,
"Write me stuff. I know I don't have very long.
"Keep writing me words.
Keep giving me things.
"I will sing and then you can do what you like with it afterwards,
"you know, finish it off."
And so I was writing on scraps of paper these lines of Mother Love.
He was dying and he did those things and he knew he would be dead when they were finished.
Because he said to me,
"I'm going to sing it now,
"because I can't wait for them to do the music on this.
"I'll give it to you on a drum machine.
"Give me a drum machine thing...
They'll finish it off."
♪ I don't want to make no waves
♪ You can give me all the love... ♪
Every time I gave him another line, he would sing it, sing it again, and sing it again.
So we had three takes for every line, and that was it.
♪ I long for peace before I die... ♪
Mother Love, I think, was the last one. There's an exceptional spine-chilling note in the middle.
A fantastic bit of singing.
♪ Out in the city
♪ In the cold world outside
♪ I don't want pity
♪ Just a safe place to hide
♪ Mama, please, let me back inside... ♪
It's absolutely...spine-chilling.
And we got to the last verse and he said,
"Oh, I'm not up to this now,
I need to go away and have a rest.
"I'll come back and finish it off", you know.
And he never came back.
That was the last moment that I had with him in the studio.
I went to see Freddie, and it was in fact the last time I saw him.
He said to me, "I haven't given you anything in my will.
"You're my executor, you can do anything with my legacy,
"you can do anything with my music
"but never make me boring."
The last time I saw Freddie was,
Anita and I went to see him and he was in bed, with the curtains open so he could see out into his garden, and I was talking about things in his garden, saying, "That's really interesting" and he said,
"Guys, you don't need to feel like you need to make conversation.
"I'm just so happy that you're here,
"so even if we say nothing, it's just having these moments."
The worst thing was I was actually on my way to see him, and I was about 300 yards away when Peter Freestone rang me to tell me, "Don't bother coming cos he's gone."
It was me who wrote the little epitaph that's on his statue in Montreux which just says, "Freddie Mercury,
Lover of Life - Singer of Songs."
To me, that sums him up because he lived life to the full, there's no question, with all that that entailed.
He was a generous man, a kind man, an impatient man sometimes, but utterly dedicated to what he felt was important, which was making music.
We made the announcement that we were going to do a tribute concert to him when we felt that we could, to send him out in the style which he deserved.
We hope that a lot of you will be able to join us on April 20th at Wembley Stadium for a celebration of Freddie's life and career.
You're all welcome. Please join us.
CHEERING AND APPLAUSE
So we drew up a list of people that we'd like to be on the show.
Roger got the ball rolling.
Roger got up one morning and said,
"Look, we're doing this."
And made a few phone calls.
And Brian said, "Well, if you can get that lot, I'll come."
On stage, Mr Roger Daltrey!
Mr Robert Plant, thank you!
Mr David Bowie!
And...
♪ Any way the wind blo-o-o-o-o-o-o-o-ows! ♪
We got a date, Wembley Stadium...
Had to be Wembley Stadium, didn't it? Had to be.
The scene of Freddie's greatest triumphs.
A lot of amazing things happened.
I'd like to offer something, in a very simple fashion.
David Bowie spontaneously went into the Lord's Prayer which was a surprise to us all.
For thine is the kingdom, the power and the glory for ever and ever,
A-men.
APPLAUSE
God bless Queen.
God bless you.
Thank you, good night.
I want to hear every single person.
See every single pair of hands.
Three, four.
♪ Find me somebody to love
♪ Find me somebody to love
♪ Find me somebody to love
♪ Find me somebody to love
♪ Somebody! Somebody!
♪ Somebody! Somebody!
Somebody! Somebody!
♪ Somebody find me somebody to love
♪ Anybody find me-e-e-e-e-e-e-e-e-e-e-e-e-e...
♪ Somebody to-o-o-o-o-o-o-o-o... ♪
Come on!
AUDIENCE: ♪ Lo-o-o-o-ve. ♪
'It was completely cathartic.'
It was like working out a bit of grief in a way.
Yeah!
♪ Somebody find me somebody to-oo-oo love
♪ Find me somebody to-oo-oo love
Oo-oo-oo-oo-ooh!
♪ Find me is somebody, somebody
♪ To-oo-oo love
♪ Anybody anywhere find me somebody to love
♪ Yeah, yeah
♪ O-o-o-o-o-o-o-o-o-o-oh
♪ O-o-o-o-o-o-o-o-o-o-oh. ♪
CHEERING AND APPLAUSE
And I remember just as we were coming off,
Joe Elliott from Def Leopard put his hand on my arm and said, "Stop, Brian,
"just turn around and look at that audience and remember this moment.
"Nothing like this will ever happen again."
'The incredible thing is, it's 40 years since the band was formed.
'The band is probably as big as it's ever been.'
And yet 20 of those 40 years have been without Freddie.
We don't have John either because he's chosen to be in a very different place.
For Roger and I... there is always that searching.
♪ The show must go on! ♪
What's lurking in the wings was the material we'd done with Freddie which was unfinished, and what were we going to do with this, make an album?
Made In Heaven was obviously different.
It was very weird working with Freddie's voice coming out of the speakers but Brian and I felt that we knew what Freddie would have been thinking so we got there and I was very pleased with the result.
I feel like it was the right completion.
It was, um...it was the right album to finish up on.
Once you've passed your initiation into being a rock star, it never leaves you.
You cannot stop having that feeling inside you that makes you want to play.
♪ The show must go on! ♪
When we did the Paul Rodgers tour, it was great, actually.
Paul was a great singer, completely different.
♪ I've never given in
On with the show
♪ The show must go on. ♪
It constantly amazes me to think we were lucky enough to be in a great band, to have a great band together, and that, actually, people still like the music, you know.
Queen is such a stimulating creative environment, there's really nothing quite that could live up to that.
There was a perfect creative hothouse that was Queen at its best.
♪ One dream, one soul
♪ One prize, one goal
♪ One golden glance of what should be
♪ It's a kind of magic
♪ One flash of light that shows the way
♪ No mortal man
♪ Can win this day
♪ It's a kind of magic
♪ The bell that rings
♪ Inside your mind
♪ Is challenging
♪ The doors of time
♪ This rage that lasts a thousand years
# Will soon be, will soon be
Will soon be...
♪ Will soon be done
♪ Will soon be done
CHEERING AND APPLAUSE
♪ E-e-e-e-e-e-e-e-e-e-e-up
AUDIENCE: # E-e-e-e-e-e-e-e-e-e-e-up
♪ E-e-up
E-e-up
♪ E-e-up
E-e-up
♪ E-e-up
E-e-up
♪ Ee-do-ree-ro-re-ro
♪ Ee-do-ree-ro-re-ro. ♪
Fuck you.
Subtitles by Red Bee Media Ltd
Resync, correction and add few lines by dadans@indofiles.org
[StB] Releases 2011
SimplyTheBOSS http://www.opensubtitles.org/
We must adjust to changing times...
...execute the office of President of the United States...
I challenge a new generation of young Americans...
My biggest fantasy when I was a kid was that I would go to see my favorite band play, and someone would come out and say,
"Sorry, the band can't play tonight, their drummer broke his fuckin' leg.
"Unless there's someone that knows all the songs..."
Then, of course, I would jump up and be the greatest drummer in the world.
I fantasized about that.
With Nirvana, the process of making the music was so entirely simple and pure and real.
Kurt was a great lyricist, he had a beautiful voice, and he wrote really simple songs.
There were things I learned about songwriting from being in a band with Kurt that I don't think anyone else could have taught me.
That record, Nevermind, came out almost a year to the day after I had joined the band.
This song is called Smells Like Teen Spirit.
Before Dave had joined the band, there was a message on my answering machine from Kurt, saying,
"Butch! We have the best drummer in the world! He's the greatest drummer in the world.
"I'm not kidding you. He's awesome, dude!"
And he hung up.
About a week later we were in LA and I walked into a rehearsal space with him.
And Dave walked up - skinny, long hair...
"Hey, man, I'm Dave. Nice to meet you."
He was just full of energy.
I was like, "Let's play.
Play me some songs, you guys."
And they played Teen Spirit.
Dave did the...
...and it just floored me.
Of course, everybody was telling the band that they thought we were great, but I don't think the three of us ever believed a word of anything anyone was telling us.
We never thought we were gonna sell a million records.
None of us had any idea that it was gonna completely change my life and their lives.
But I knew that they sounded really tight and pretty focused, and that they had written some amazingly powerful songs.
We knew something was happening because the atmosphere of the gigs just changed.
They went from being cool, hipster, underground people in a club to, like... jocks were coming to the show.
That was the first thing, like,
"Oh my God, there's jocks here," you know?
"That's kind of strange.
They like our music?
"You used to kick my fucking ass for listening to this music."
I was a really big fan of Nirvana, like everybody else, and I happened to be reading an interview with Kurt where he had mentioned,
Nirvana was always meant to be a four-piece, a two-guitar band.
It was never meant to be a three-piece.
I thought, "Oh, well that's my in."
Pat is from this legendary punk rock band called the Germs that we all grew up listening to.
There was no one more badass than the Germs.
Germs didn't give a fuck.
So Pat shows up in Seattle, and all of us were just like,
"Oh my God, hey, it's Pat Smear from the Germs.
"He's alive?"
So now Nirvana is hitting the big halls, with guitarist Pat Smear helping to make the loud louder.
The day before the first rehearsal
I saw my picture on MTV News, saying,
"Nirvana has a new guitar player, Pat Smear."
I was like, "My God, it's real! There it is!"
I don't think Kurt wanted to be a huge fuckin' rock star.
And I don't think he could handle how complicated it had all become.
No one was very happy with the tour, or the band.
So Kurt decided he wants a break, even though we're on this tour you can't get out of, because you're a big band and you get sued.
We had, like, a week and a half off in between two legs of the tour.
I decided to fly home.
And Kurt went to Rome, where he was meeting Courtney Love, his wife.
Hi, I'm Tabitha Soren, with MTV News.
Nirvana front man Kurt Cobain was hospitalized in a coma in Rome, Italy on Friday morning...
I turn on the TV, and Kurt was being wheeled away in an ambulance in Rome.
I went to the hospital with him, and I didn't know what to do, because I thought,
"Do I say, this is Kurt Cobain, take care of him right away, VIP," or do I say, "This is just some guy, don't call the press"?
I finally went with, "This is Kurt Cobain, VIP.
Do something about it."
Nirvana spokespeople reported encouraging signs, saying they've been told Kurt Cobain was responding to his name, opening his eyes, and squeezing his wife's hand.
When he came home,
I remember talking to him on the phone, and saying, "Hey man,
I don't want you to die, OK?"
And he was very apologetic,
"No, I'm sorry, it was a big mistake.
"I took these pills, I was drinking this champagne and I was in Rome...
"It was, just a... just made a mistake."
It was really sad. I had a message from Kurt, but I wasn't home.
And so whatever help he needed from me,
I couldn't help him.
And that was the last time
I ever talked to him or saw him.
When I found out that he had killed himself...
I was kind of numb.
I knew that it...
He was gone, but I didn't know how to feel.
Kurt Cobain, a sweet and gifted man, dead at the age of 27.
To Courtney Love, one-year-old Frances Bean Cobain,
Dave Grohl, Kris Novoselic and Pat Smear, our deepest sympathies.
Everybody knew Kurt was in a bad way, but that's something you never expect to happen.
When someone is that down and out you still can't comprehend that they're actually gonna commit suicide.
It was terrible.
After Kurt died, I didn't wanna play music.
I didn't wanna play the drums.
When Kurt died, it wasn't just that my friend died.
It was my whole life kinda died around it and with him, you know?
And I quit the music business.
At some point, I was finally motivated.
"I'm gonna get myself out of this funk
I've been in for the last eight months."
Or whatever it was, you know?
I decided that I was gonna take my favorite songs that I'd written over the last four or five years that no one had heard... and I was going to record them...
...at a 24-track studio down the street from my house.
And it was really exciting, because I was doing it totally by myself.
I didn't know why I was doing it.
I just wanted to do something, you know?
So I booked a week at the studio, and at the end of the week, I had a cassette, and it sounded good.
And I started thinking,
"I won't put my name on it.
"People will imagine it's just a band.
"They won't know it's the guy from Nirvana."
In the middle of that session,
I get a call at the studio that Tom Petty wants me to come play drums for him on Saturday Night Live.
I just thought,
"Oh my God, he's a hero of mine."
And I had the opportunity to join the band if I wanted to join the band.
I really had to kind of choose.
Was I going to play drums with Tom Petty, or was I gonna start over from scratch and be the lead singer and guitar player of a band, do something I'd never done before, that I was terrified doing?
Believe me, it was not easy to tell Tom Petty that I wasn't going to be his drummer.
It was not an easy decision to make.
I can still see my hand just putting the phone down, and thinking, "OK, let's see what happens."
There was a band in Seattle called Sunny Day Real Estate.
And a good friend of mine told me that Sunny Day Real Estate were playing a show, and it was gonna be their last show because they were breaking up.
My band was falling apart about the same time that
Dave found himself without a band.
We were broken up while we were doing the tour.
We decided we weren't gonna do it anymore, but had already booked this tour, so we were like,
"This will be the last thing we do."
It was ironic because that was the first tour that we were playing shows where people were actually showing up.
We were like, "Oh, well!"
I went to the show to see them play, knowing it was probably the last time anyone was gonna see them play.
And I was watching them thinking,
"That's a really good rhythm section."
I gave them the cassette, thinking,
"Hey, check it out.
Maybe we could jam sometime."
Dave was the first famous person I'd ever met.
He was just out of Nirvana, you know, like, that was a very big deal.
I remember the first time that
Nate and William and I got together to jam.
It was over at William's parents' house.
I remember going up to William's parents' kitchen and sitting there after we played, and Dave just goes,
"You guys wanna be in the band?"
And I was like, "Hell yeah!"
Playing in front of people was very difficult for me.
I did have a conversation with Dave and I said,
"I don't think that I should do it."
Dave said, "That's exactly why you're the guy that has to do it."
I don't know what that meant but that convinced me, I guess.
After that rehearsal, Dave brings up that he wants a second guitar player, and thinks it should be Pat Smear, who William and I knew from him having played in Nirvana and the Germs.
Then Dave came over, and he gave me a cassette.
I listened to that whole tape, just front to end, and I thought it was all great.
I didn't have anything against Pat.
I didn't know him as a musician or as a person.
But he lived in Los Angeles, and I just thought that was fucking crazy.
The way I'd grown up, you were in a band with your friend from school that you saw every day.
You'd go home after school and get together at somebody's mom's house or basement and work it out.
You can't do that if the guy lives in Los Angeles.
Pat came up, we played, and he was perfect, so I got over that "Him living in LA" thing.
I might have talked to him about trying to move to Seattle.
All of us came from bands that ended prematurely.
We didn't really talk about our former bands.
For me, it was always kind of a touchy subject.
At this point in time,
Kurt had only been dead for a year, and I didn't wanna talk about it.
So we all entered into this new band like it was helping us get through the loss of the bands we'd been in before.
I remember it really vividly,
Dave saying, like, "Let's have it be fun.
"Let's have things be out in the open.
"Let's talk about shit.
Just no drama."
He was like,
"I don't want it to be a stressful thing.
"We're not gonna tour into the ground."
And...
Which I was glad about.
The first tour that we did, was with a musician named Mike Watt.
He is a legendary punk rock bass player.
And he asked me if I would tour with him.
And I said, "Yeah, man.
How about this?
"I'll be in your band if my band can open up on tour."
And Eddie Vedder, from Pearl Jam, had done the same thing.
And we said, "Cool,
"Let's put together a tour where Eddie's other band,
"they were called Hovercraft, my band - Foo Fighters,
"would open up for Watt, and we would all be his band."
It was just this, like, revolving cast of musicians.
Each song would have a different line-up.
Instead of getting a bus for the first tour...
"We'll get a van."
I'd never done a bus tour, so to me it was totally obvious, "Yeah, we'll get a van.
"What, we get to buy a brand new one?
Ha! Awesome!"
We played six shows a week, and the places held maybe anywhere from 3OO to 6OO people, and Foo Fighters were making
5OO bucks a night or something like that.
As the tour was going on, the venues were getting bigger, and we started having that really nice but weird sort of pressure.
There was a lot of attention, because it was Dave's first tour after Nirvana.
The shows had all of these Nirvana fans that came.
They didn't know the songs because the record hadn't been out yet.
So there was a song called Marigold by Nirvana, that Dave had written and sang on.
It was the only thing they knew to yell out when we were playing.
So you'd just hear, "Marigold!"
Marigold! Marigold! Marigold!
Shut up!
And we never played it.
How weird that must have been for Dave.
Arriving in record stores Tuesday was one of the most buzzed-about new releases of the year, the self-titled debut album by Nirvana drummer
Dave Grohl's new band, Foo Fighters, who wowed crowds on Mike Watt's recent club tour.
Personally, to me, it was a big deal when that record came out, because rather than go in and record something as a band, we used the stuff I had recorded on my own.
That cassette.
That's the first record.
Making their network television debut right here with us, we couldn't be happier, ladies and gentlemen, Foo Fighters.
Hi, Jena!
And the winner is...
Foo Fighters, Big Me.
I would like to think of this award as some sort of closure, it's...
Stop throwing Mentos at us at our shows.
That's what I'm trying to say.
There were lots of interviews and, you know,
Dave not wanting to talk about Nirvana.
Every question in every interview was about Nirvana.
You can imagine what they were, like, "Is this song about Kurt?"
Take any song from the record.
"Is that song about Kurt Cobain?"
What's it like to be at a press conference and not be asked any questions?
Fine with me, because I didn't wanna answer any of the questions that were asked.
There were some people that really resented me for starting this band.
"How dare you fucking start another band."
They asked me, like,
"Why did you decide to carry on
"and make music that sounds like Nirvana?"
I said, "Well, wait a minute.
"What do you mean, like loud rock guitars and melodies
"and cymbals crashing and big-ass drums?
"'Cause that's what I do.
"That's... I was in that band and this is, like...
That's what I do.
"You want me to fuckin' make a reggae record?"
The first couple years,
I really felt like I had to explain and defend what I was doing, because, first of all,
"You're just a drummer.
"And, what, you're trying to sing?
"And also, you were in Nirvana, so what the fuck is this shit?"
So there's a... You just get to the point where you just think,
"Fuck you people."
I wasn't sure what was gonna happen.
"Can Dave write more songs?
"How is the writing process gonna work?
Will we suck?"
I had no idea.
"Does this band have a future?"
I knew we were gonna be OK and be able to continue after I heard the song My Hero,
'cause it was great.
There were some songs that we just started writing and throwing into the set.
There were only a couple songs that we had that were really good openers.
I thought, "God, I need to write an opening song for us."
In Europe and in England, when bands play the audience don't beat the shit out of each other like they do in America.
They do this bounce, right?
Everybody bounces.
So I wanted to write a song that everyone would start bouncing to when we first came out and played.
So I had a melody and a riff idea, but I didn't know the tempo.
So I jumped up and down, and I found a tempo by, like, bouncing.
The tempo should be this...
I wrote the song, brought it to sound check, said, "I have this new song.
"Let's learn it, so we can open with it tomorrow night or tonight."
We sound checked, ran through it, the next night we opened with that song, the audience was going...
It worked.
It's like, "Wow, cool. Let's keep it."
We played, like,
18,OOO shows in one year.
I'm exaggerating, but it felt like.
Then we just toured a lot!
Pat was keeping track,
Pat was always...
Every other day he'd look at me and be like,
"12 months. 13 months. 16 months."
I was just like...
I remember each time he would tell me
I'd be like, "No fuckin' way!"
We've been on tour for so long.
We've been a band for almost a year now, and I'd say about seven months out of that year has been spent on the road.
I wasn't some kid who was just like,
"Yeah!" at that point.
It was just kind of like, you know...
I'm older and I'm lazier...
What?
...and still I'm playing the same 2O songs
2 or 3OO nights a year.
This song's called For All The Cows.
This song is called
For All The Cows.
It's called For All The Cows.
This one's called For All The Cows.
This song is called
For All The Cows.
The second album that we made -
The Colour And The Shape, we decided to work with this producer named Gil Norton.
And Gil, at the time, was famous for making the Pixies records.
This was my first real recording process.
Now there's a producer, someone who's not just pressing play but actually is saying, like,
"I think that should be a C.
And you should also play it in time."
We went into the studio with Gil and he worked us hard, real hard.
I was fucking terrible.
And William was having his own challenges.
Gil called Nate and I the "rhythmless section".
So that was encouraging.
I could tell, when I had to do something a million times, that it was taking longer than I wanted, and it was my first realization -
"I'm not a fully-formed musician.
I've got to keep getting better."
Constantly, there was this feeling that, whatever song we were working on,
Dave had a drum... a drum part for it already, in his head or whatever.
When I've written a song,
I have kind of a clear idea of where the basic root accents should lie.
That's a fancy way of saying,
I know what the drums should sound like in my head as I'm doing this thing.
That's not necessarily fair to say that as a songwriter, you know, who's collaborating with other musicians.
You're the drummer for a band where your singer is the greatest rock 'n' roll drummer in the world, looking over your shoulder waiting for you to do it as good as him.
That's just fucked-up pressure.
Regardless of how good you are, that's just fucked-up pressure.
And remember that William was a kid.
He was really young.
I think that William played the best that he could.
And sometimes it was great, and sometimes it wasn't.
What sucked about all that was, you know...
I don't think the drum performances were the best.
They didn't...
They weren't horrible.
If I listen to a song and I don't think it has the thing that it needs, it's not necessarily gonna get past me and get on an album.
We left Seattle, and went to Los Angeles to a different studio to finish this thing up.
And Dave comes in, he's like,
"Listen, we're gonna redo..."
"My Poor Brain."
Or whatever the song is.
"Drum track's not quite right.
Actually, I'm doing the drums on this one.
"We're just gonna redo it."
William's up in Seattle at this point in time.
They'd call me down and say,
"We need you to come play guitar on a song."
And I'd go down and I'd be like,
"Well, I already played this song."
"Well, we did it over."
"Oh, OK."
You know, do it again.
I'd go home, then I'd get called again,
"Come down and play."
I'm like, "All right, cool. Let's do it."
"I already played this song!"
It just kept happening.
"What the fuck is going on here?"
And this happens three or four times, like, "Hey, we're gonna try this one again."
It ended up like, "Wait a minute.
We're just doing this whole album over."
I remember asking, "Does William know?"
William's still up in Seattle, so he doesn't know what's going on and that this is happening.
And I'm stressing pretty hard because that's gonna be a big problem.
I was like, "What's going on?
"Should I book a flight?
I should be down there."
Dave calls me, like, "Don't come down here."
I was like, "Why?"
He goes, "I'm redoing a couple of drum tracks."
I was like..."Whoa. OK."
And I met with Nate.
I said, "What's going on?
Dave's redoing a couple of the tracks?"
He goes, "Is that what he told you?"
I said, "Yeah."
He goes, "He redid 'em all."
The conversation that I eventually had with William was that I really wanted him to stay in the band, and I really wanted him to be the drummer... but...
I was gonna play drums on the record.
I don't know whether it was management, the record company, Gil, all of the above, Dave, that wanted him to play drums and didn't want me to play drums, but him redoing the drum parts has never been explained to me.
It's a tough thing to talk about, because I know that William will never forgive me for playing drums on that record.
I know it.
And I wish things were different.
But I felt like this is what I had to do in order to make this album happen.
We talked and Dave said,
"I still want you to tour the record."
And I was just like,
"Dude, I mean, I have to, you know...
"As it is now, I have to rebuild my soul,
"or refind it, if you know what I mean.
"If I do that, it's like, 'see ya'.
"So... thanks but no thanks."
It was a really weird time, and I was young.
What the fuck?
I heard on the radio...
"Foo Fighters drummer has left the band."
I was like, "Whoa! Really?
"I wonder if they have a drummer yet?"
I remember vividly my brother saying,
"You should be in this band."
I was like, "Well, fuck, yeah, that'd be great, wouldn't it?
"I would love to have been in the Who,
Jane's Addiction and Led Zeppelin too."
Around that time, Taylor Hawkins was playing drums with Alanis Morissette.
And she was blowing up.
I'd seen him play before, and there's no question the dude's a monster on the drums.
It's funny, 'cause back there's Taylor just fuckin' like... Just fuckin' killing it.
Like, "Oh my God!"
We all loved Taylor, but he was in a band, the biggest band around at the time.
We were kind of in a pinch.
We had just recorded this record, and we had to go out and start doing shit.
So Dave calls him up, like,
"Hey, man, do you know any good drummers?"
I was like, "Yeah. I'll be your fuckin' drummer!
Let me try out."
I remember saying to Taylor, "You realize we're not as big as Alanis Morissette?"
I'm like, "I know, but I wanna be in a band.
"I wanna be part of something like that."
So he said,
"Well, if you try out, and if we jam and...
You have to be in the band."
Dave called me like, "Remember Taylor?"
I'm like, "Oh yeah."
He's like, "Yeah, I think he'd be the drummer."
And I reacted poorly to that.
I was hanging out with Dave and me and him were bouncing off the walls, and Nate was going, "Oh no, not another one of these fuckin' guys.
"I can't take two spazzes in one band."
I didn't think our personalities were compatible.
He's just this, like, outgoing Southern California surfer dude.
Say somethin' funny.
I don't know anything funny.
I just came from a different world.
I was like, "That guy...
"He is not a guy I'm gonna be in a band with.
No way."
It's like, "He's really good."
"OK."
- I hear you got a new drummer?
- Got a new drummer.
- From the Alanis Morissette band?
- That's right.
His name's Taylor Hawkins, and...
Is that his last name?
I think it is.
- He's really new!
- We just met him.
So now Taylor’s in the band, and he comes in his first day of rehearsals, and Pat quits the band.
Right then and there.
Pat says, "Can I talk to you guys for a second?" We said, "Yeah, sure."
We walk outside and he goes,
"I gotta leave the band."
I'm like, "What the fuck? Why?"
I was just so sick of it.
I was just so sick of the whole thing.
I didn't wanna go out on another... you know, bazillion-show tour and...
I just don't wanna do this anymore.
When you join a band the first week, and one of the members decides... ever since you've been there, he's gonna quit, you're like, "Obviously, it's me."
I was shocked. I was shocked.
I begged him to stay in the band.
And he said,
"No, man. I'm just not into it anymore."
It was right when we were about to go out and start our tour, like, "Here's these new songs."
Pat quits, and so he's kinda got us in a bad... in a bad spot.
I asked him to stay until we could get someone to replace him.
So we made a deal that I would tour for six weeks, till the new guy was ready.
But it stretched out to, I think, six months maybe.
So Pat has quit the band, but he's still playing with us.
That gives us some time to integrate Franz Stahl, who became the second guitar player in the band.
I'd known Dave for years.
We grew up in the same city.
He was in my first band, this punk rock band called Scream.
When I left Scream to join Nirvana, the one relationship that felt the most strained was my relationship with Franz.
I think that he resented me for leaving.
It took a while, and then we reconciled and we became friends again.
That moment where Pat said,
"I don't wanna be in the band anymore,"
I immediately thought,
"I'm gonna call Franz."
I was on tour in Japan and I get the phone call from Dave and... he wants to know if I'd like to join the Foo Fighters.
There wasn't any sort of musical audition.
I just thought,
"Franz, you wanna be in the Foo Fighters?"
He said, "Yes."
And then the next day
I was on the roof of Radio City Music Hall.
Please give a warm welcome to Foo Fighters!
We were playing at the MTV Awards, on top of the marquee, as kind of a warm-up act.
And so I played the first song, and then I quit.
And then Franz came up and he joined.
It happened just so fast.
And I was still jet-lagged from Japan.
Hello! The last song we played was my last song with the band.
I would like to introduce you to Franz Stahl, who will be taking over.
Thank you! Rock on, guys!
Foo Fighters!
It was all very new to me, because I was used to slumming it.
Sleeping on people's floors, just getting by, you know?
And this was a whole new level.
When I joined the Foo Fighters, it was like, you know, you made it.
You hit it, and you were getting recognized for it. It was awesome.
Once Franz joined the band, we did what we always did, we went on the road.
We played as many places and as many shows as we could, and it was starting to grow.
Like, you could see there were 2,OOO people,
3,OOO people, 4,OOO people at gigs.
We were no longer playing the afternoon slot at the festival, we were playing the evening slot.
And there was a song on the radio,
Everlong, and all of a sudden there were videos on MTV, and it was happening to us, that thing that happens to new bands when they start to get popular.
We got Franz.
I indoctrinated myself.
That's right. Franz joined the band on-air...
That was a great big surprise.
It was awesome.
It's the best year we've had as a band, and Franz is, you know... he's the dude.
I loved the first two records.
And there wasn't a song that I didn't enjoy, you know?
And I certainly was looking forward to writing, and... you know, leaving my mark.
Franz is a great guy.
And a sweet guy.
And I was actually... got really close with him.
It seemed like it would be perfect.
We were rehearsing and writing at the time, and coming up with song ideas... and Taylor and Nate and I seemed to have this thing where we were on the same page, and we were jamming and coming up with something together.
And Franz just didn't seem to find his place in all of that.
In Scream, I wrote all the music, the majority of it.
My brother would write the lyrics.
So I was always,
I was very hands-on, you know?
But it was Dave's band.
And he writes all the music.
I was kinda leery of pushing my ideas, you know, so I wasn't trying to be as vocal about it.
For some reason, the four of us together wasn't right.
It never congealed into feeling like a band.
It's just chemistry.
We had a talk with Dave about it and he didn't wanna hear it, but he knew what the situation was.
My relationship with Franz was much different than everybody else's.
I'd known the guy since I was 18.
And we had cut our teeth together.
It was tough, man.
I mean, honestly, like...
It was just, you know, a great old friend of mine that, unfortunately,
I was asking to leave the band.
That's not to say he's not a fucking great musician, because, of course, everybody knows he is, but when we worked together as four people... it just didn't gel, you know?
We got on some kind of conference call and told him we were gonna get a different guitar player.
There was a lot of sadness and drama.
It was ugly.
Basically, I got a phone call.
I got a fucking phone call.
And it just all ends right there.
I don't even know how to react, you know?
There's just no nice way of saying,
"You're out of the band."
I'm not exactly sure what happened.
You know, I was in the band... and, for whatever reason,
I was out of the band.
But, I mean, it was the best two years of my life, you know?
Most bands go through the same shit that we had been through up until that point.
Before anybody's ever heard of them.
Unfortunately, we went through all of those embarrassing growing pains in public.
By 1998, I would sit down to do an interview, and people'd say,
"OK, so fuckin'...
Who's in the band right now?
"Has anybody else left in the last month and a half?"
But there was always Nate.
I was staying at my mother's house, and I got a call from Nate.
I said, "What's up, man?"
He goes, "I gotta leave the band."
And I just thought,
"Oh, Jesus fucking Christ."
I said, "OK."
At this point... my response to a member leaving was like, "All right, why?"
Sunny Day Real Estate had gotten back together.
I had a lot of really formative experiences with them, so I had this like... high-school crush, kind of irrational... attraction to that project.
And I was tortured, and I called up Dave.
And I was fuckin' pissed.
I think I told him, "OK, you know what?
Call everyone and tell 'em you quit.
"I'm gonna go fuckin' get drunk."
As soon as I got off the phone,
I knew it was the wrong thing to do, that I was gonna be happier in Foo Fighters.
It was a better thing for me to do.
I called a couple friends...
"I quit the band and I feel weird about it."
"Yeah, 'cause that was a dumb idea."
Me and my buddy Jimmy took my rental car out to Ribsters, we got fuckin' shitfaced, rallied my rental car, fuckin' threw rocks at it all night, busted out windows, drove over people's lawns, and I wound up stumbling home and woke up at seven in the morning in the bedroom that I grew up in as a kid, with my mom saying,
"David, Nate's on the phone!"
I called him the next morning at 6 am.
I was wigged out and I think it caught him off guard.
"I don't really wanna quit the band.
I don't know what I was thinking."
He's like, "Good."
I was like, "Yeah.
This is better. Sorry about that."
I was still wasted, too.
I was just lying in bed, like,
"I love you, man.
I'm glad you don't wanna quit."
So we decided that we're gonna make this next record as a three-piece.
We had just made this super hyper-produced record, which we slaved over and lost two band members.
I thought, "I'm gonna buy a house in Virginia, build a studio in the basement,
"and we're gonna make this record without any fuckin' record company
"and no pressure, and no one telling us what to do."
It was different, just having the three of us there, we were starting to form a good identity for the band.
That's when Dave was first starting to become more comfortable as a lyric writer.
A song like Ain't It The Life, without realizing what I was doing,
I was kind of making this wish list of all the things in life I wish I had.
We weren't really on a major deadline, our friend Adam Kasper was down there engineering and co-producing.
I did all of those vocals sitting on a couch.
It was just a laid-back record, and you hear it.
And the Grammy goes to...
And the Grammy goes to...
Learn To Fly, Foo Fighters.
There Is Nothing Left To Lose,
Foo Fighters.
We won three Grammys for that record.
I remember standing there at the podium making the speech, looking out at all those people in tuxedos and diamonds and shit, thinking, "I bet you this is the only record made in a basement
"that's gonna win a Grammy this year."
And I was so fuckin' proud.
Take care, thank you very much, everybody.
Roll camera. OK, and roll sound.
Roll playback!
We take our music really seriously, but music videos?
They're commercials.
They're candy commercials.
So why not make fun of the process?
But once we got into it,
I started having fun with it.
And it became a trademark for this band.
We try not to take ourselves too seriously.
In videos a lot of times, you could easily get caught up in that,
"We're playing on a mountaintop."
The wind's blowing in your hair, and then an eagle flies down and lands on your shoulder.
Or some, you know, like...
I just think that's sort of an outlet of our humor.
I mean, I've seen Dave do stuff on videos, where he's bein' such a fuckin' goofball.
I'm not as good at it.
You know, I did try to make us a trio.
Dude, Police! They're a trio!
Musically, we needed more.
More guitar.
Part of the sound of the Foo Fighters is a lot of guitars. It's just part of the sound.
We argue about it every time we mix a record,
'cause I always want the drums louder, and Dave's like,
"It's the Foo Fighters.
The guitars are really loud."
None of us had the right guy that was a friend, or a friend of a friend...
It wasn't handy.
So we had to have open auditions for a guitar player.
Pin a note at the Guitar Center, like,
"Guitar player wanted for Foo Fighters."
We wound up in this rehearsal space, and I just remember this line of guitar players.
And I was terrified.
It sounded great. I mean, I dig it.
Nice meeting you for the first time.
Hopefully see you again soon.
There's the guy that came in and hugged everybody.
It was like, "Hi. Hi."
It was like...
There was one kid that came in, he was so nervous.
He came in, and was like, "What's up?
Will you sign something for me?"
He just immediately wanted us to sign some shit.
We were like, "Yeah, dude, cool it.
It's cool, you know? Just relax.
"Let's hang, you know? Let's talk."
And we hung out and talked a little bit.
And then he went to open up his guitar case, and it was locked.
He had a brand new guitar, a brand new case, and he fucking locked his guitar in it.
And didn't have a key.
We literally did, like, a week or two of tryouts.
There was one point where it was getting a little dire, we were like, "Fuck!"
A good friend of mine called me and said,
"Hey, I heard Guns N' Roses are auditioning guitar players,
"and I think I could get you an audition."
And I was like, "Well, I don't wanna audition for Guns N' Roses."
But I said, "But I heard the Foo Fighters guitar player quit.
"Try to get me an audition with Foo Fighters."
Everyone, shake hands with Chris.
Chris!
When Chris came in to audition, we somehow came to the realization that we met when we were kids at a punk rock show in Santa Barbara.
Years and years before any of this, when Dave had been the drummer in Scream, and I was playing bass in a band called Rat Pack.
We actually opened up for them.
The fact that he was a part of that underground punk rock thing was really important to me.
So we bonded pretty instantly, because I thought,
"He's gonna get it. He's gonna understand, and he won't take this shit for granted."
Very good, that's very good, man.
He could sing, and he was a shredder, and he was a good guy, and he'd been in bands, and he didn't smell, and he was awesome.
So the next day, just all day,
I just sat there by the phone.
And at like, around five or six, the phone rang and it was Dave and Taylor
And they said,
"All right, you know, you got the gig.
We start rehearsing tomorrow.
"Say goodbye to your friends, you're not gonna see anybody for the next year."
It was like, Chris joined the band and we had our itinerary ready to go.
"Ready? We're gonna leave for ten years.
Let's go."
The Foos found their new best buddy in Chris Shiflett, a former member of punk bands
No Use For A Name and 22 Jacks.
I remember wanting to help Chris feel comfortable.
We went out to dinner a couple of times.
Trying not to have a situation where he comes in and it's like, "OK, go!"
When I joined Nirvana,
I was the fifth drummer of Nirvana.
With Chris, it was maybe the same way, you know?
He was the third guitar player of the Foo Fighters.
In the early days of being in the band
I didn't wanna step on anybody's toes.
I didn't even know what...
I didn't know what my place was.
And I was just genuinely, like, this was everything that I ever wanted - the dream coming true.
Every time Foo Fighters would put out a record,
I would get really excited and miss it so bad.
I found out after being in the band for a couple months that they had almost replaced me with Pat.
Pat almost came back, who they had a lot of history with, and there was a relationship there.
Dave didn't know that I knew that, and probably most of them didn't.
There was at least a couple times where
I called Dave and said, "I want back."
Then when it looked like it might actually happen, I got scared.
After being in the band for a couple months,
I had this feeling,
"This could all end, and I'm gonna enjoy this while it lasts.
"Because it probably will end sooner than I want it to."
That third record, we went on the road with the Red Hot Chili Peppers.
For, like, four months we toured America with them.
We had never played arenas before.
We hadn't done that arena rock thing.
That's when we started coming up with jams onstage and working out, like, a show.
Not a "show," not dancers and shit in the show, but really like kinda work out a good set.
So that it's impressive.
Taylor really drove that home.
It was great.
That changed the band, probably, forever and made us concentrate more on really playing together.
We had a stage setup that we had built for the arena.
It was basically modeled after the Queen Live Killers record cover, it was very seventies.
Hi. This is our dressing room, where we get dressed before we play.
And we had these little uniforms set.
And we brought a wardrobe case
Everything was red and black, or white.
That was our color theme for the tour.
It was the first time we thought in terms of something like,
"Let's look a certain way on stage."
I had the black shirt with white tie and black pants.
Nate had the red shirt with black tie and...
We looked like Kraftwerk or something like that.
We were... It was silly, really.
But we put on this show, and we fuckin' killed it.
OK, we'll see you guys in a town near you,
I hope very soon.
Take care and...
I love you.
It just stands to reason no matter how great a thing that your life or your job is, after a while, you need a break.
That was fun until after two months of doing it.
It feels like Groundhog Day, all those arenas look the same.
You start bringing the bottle of whisky to the stage with you.
It started with, "Let's do a shot before we play." We'd call it "band prayer".
Then that turned into like,
"Let's do ten shots before we play."
And we all started gettin' fuckin' hammered before we went onstage.
And we got really shitty by the end.
I think that's probably why so many musicians wind up getting so fucked up, just 'cause you need something to keep it fun.
Taylor had been struggling with... with drugs, I think.
He and I had talked about it a few times.
I didn't really know how to deal with the way you were supposed to be.
I thought that to be a rock 'n' roller you have to be the fuckin' Keith Richards.
You have to be the dark, partying, fuckin'... the real deal.
That's the only way it's real rock 'n' roll.
Rock 'n' roll!
I would tell him, I'd say,
"You know, dude, I love you like a brother.
"I'm not a cop. I'm not your dad, whatever.
"But I'm worried about you, you know?"
We were in London, and we all went out to a bar across the street from the hotel.
We were having a good time, and I came back to my room early.
And in the morning I got a call that he was on his way to the hospital.
We got word that Taylor’s in a coma at the hospital, and OD'd on, you know, whatever it was.
I think it was heroin that he did.
And our sound man at the time, he was like, "Oh yeah, Taylor fucked up.
"He's gonna die, like, he's fuckin' dead."
It was so weird, like, he hadn't died, but he had overdosed.
And...
I just felt so totally helpless, you know?
What sort of things do you demand on tour?
Instruments.
So I sat with him... for those couple weeks.
Until he woke up.
And when he woke up,
I said to him,
"Dude, it's gonna be OK."
And he looked at me and he said, "Fuck off!"
And I thought,
"Oh, good, everything's gonna be OK."
Dave's my best friend.
And even more than a best friend, he's like a brother. He really is.
And, yeah, he was... as I would be with him, if something happened to Dave where he was on the brink of death,
I would be losing my mind.
And he was losing his mind.
So we get back from London after my fuckin' OD, and then two months after that, we start trying to make this record.
But we weren't ready.
And nobody's really into it.
Everyone's playing half-assed.
I'd do something and Dave would listen and say,
"This has gotta change. This is not working with the vocals. That's too busy."
I was disagreeing.
I had a shitty attitude 'cause I was pissed.
It was bizarre.
It was my first record with the band.
And I was just showing up to the studio every day and was sort of confused, like,
"It's weird, I'm never playing on this.
"I show up at noon every day and I kinda sit here
"and I eat food and drink coffee and then I go home.
"What is this?"
There's starting to...
There's a little bit of infighting and whispers of, "Blah-blah's pissed at blah-blah about wah-dah."
And the vibes just were not happening.
Dave's like, "I feel like you guys are taking the band for granted.
"It's just, show up, make a record, and go on and do our thing.
"There's no... You don't have to show up with a passion for it."
And he had a point.
I would walk in, listen to what we have, and think,
"I don't really know if I want anyone to hear this."
The making of that record was a fuckin'...
It sucked.
We finished it, and... we gave it to our manager, John Silva, and he was like,
"Well, we could put this out,
"but I don't know if we're gonna be able to sell any of them."
Immediately following that,
Dave had done a record with
Queens of the Stone Age as their drummer, and went out and toured on that record.
And was like, "I'm gonna go do this.
"We'll figure out what we're gonna do about this record that didn't work later."
Dave's not happy with the record and he wants to shelve it.
And he's also gonna go on tour with Queens of the Stone Age.
And so it was kind of like,
"Whoa. He's doing what?
"You know, what are we doing again?
What did you say?"
I just started to think that we should stop.
"I don't have to be here,
"and I really fuckin' love doing this other thing, so...
"fuck it."
He went off with Queens, and that went on for a little while.
Then we got together to rehearse, to go play Coachella.
We were signed on to do this show, where Dave was playing with Queens the day before, and then we were playing.
There was so much tension.
Nobody was talking, and we were just rehearsing to get through these songs.
God bless him, Chris at one point in time in the rehearsal just goes,
"I don't know if I'm the only one,
"but you could cut the air in here with a fuckin' knife.
"What the fuck's goin' on?"
Then it was just on.
We had this big fight, one of the biggest arguments we've ever had.
It was mostly between Taylor and Dave.
They had it out, like this serious discussion.
Stuff that had been pent up.
When I went to play drums with Queens of the Stone Age, Taylor resented me for that.
What bands are you listening to now?
The new Queens of the Stone Age CD is amazing, everybody knows that.
He was really upset that
I didn't come see him play drums and how exciting it was for him to be back onstage playing with another band.
I just went through this awful trauma, and I was supposed to be happy that Dave's having such a good time.
But I wasn't, you know?
"I'm not fucking happy for you to go play with another band.
"Why should I be happy for that?"
So Dave was trying to write the set list for the show, and we had an argument about it, just,
"You're a fuckin' asshole."
"If you don't like it, you can leave!"
And the next day, I said,
"I will be leaving. As soon as we finish this.
"As soon as we play Coachella and finish this record,
"do whatever commitments we have,
I'm out of here."
"Look, let's go and do this show,
"and if we never wanna do it again, then let's not."
"The Foo Fighters are over.
And I'm OK with that."
"OK. That's it. Oh well."
I played two nights at that Coachella.
One with the Foo Fighters, and one with Queens of the Stone Age.
And Taylor sat and watched Queens of the Stone Age that night, at Coachella.
At that point, I was OK with it.
I didn't care anymore.
I was like, "Well, this is probably our last show, so, you know,
"maybe Dave will just end up being
Queens of the Stone Age drummer for now
"or whatever, and that'll be what it is."
And then we played the next day and we played great.
Dave was like, a new front man in front of 1O, OOO, 2O, OOO people, however big that fuckin' thing is.
It was really good.
After that, me and Dave went for a walk.
And he said, "Let's go back to Virginia, record a couple songs."
We made a plan to meet and just jam, see what happens.
I said, "I have this new song.
It's called Times Like These."
Times Like These was basically written about the band disappearing for those two or three months.
And me feeling like I wasn't entirely myself.
I just thought,
"OK. I'm not done being in the band.
"I don't know if they are, but I'm not."
It wasn't too long before Dave was excited to get back to work on the record.
We just started picking all the songs and going, "Let's re-record that.
We have a week."
And we re-recorded the album in seven days in my basement.
It was all finished really quickly, and it had the passion, it had the feel and sound that was like... a record we could be proud of.
I remember that being like, the turning point.
Like, "OK, this isn't ending."
We had already spent three months and a million dollars on something that we threw away.
The difference between
All My Life and All My Life was that this one cost a million dollars and sounded like crap.
This one, we did in my basement in half an hour and became the biggest fuckin' song the band ever had.
It was a big record, you know?
Millions of people bought it.
All My Life we just have to play when we play gigs.
To this day, that's by far my favorite song to play live.
Every night, good or bad show, it doesn't matter, when you get to that part of the set, it always goes bananas.
If you're having a bad show, that's the turning point every night.
Ladies and gentlemen, please welcome the Foo Fighters!
Ladies and gentlemen, Foo Fighters.
Please welcome back to the program,
Foo Fighters.
Foo Fighters!
Ladies and gentlemen, Foo Fighters!
We barely got through making a record, and then started kinda going up the ranks as a live band.
We didn't have huge success right up front.
It's been little milestones of things we've been asked to do and been able to do.
It was a fun time.
We were doing these great tours, and the shows were getting bigger, and we were on a good roll.
We'd get asked to play on the MTV Awards, and we'd show up, and we'd be the only fuckin' rock band there.
So it'd be like us and fuckin' boy bands, girl bands, rappers, solo artists.
After a while we got suspicious, like,
"Wait a minute, do they know who we are or do they just need a rock band?"
Thank you.
After One By One,
I went home and started demoing all this really delicate acoustic music.
I thought, "Let's make an album
"where you have one CD that's all the really heavy rock shit,
"then you have another CD
"that's really beautiful acoustic-based, lower dynamic stuff."
And we'll tour for six or seven months on the rock record, then go out on this theatre tour doing the acoustic shows.
Since the acoustic record had additional instrumentation,
I thought, "We need a bigger band."
I always had in the back of my mind that someday I'll get to come and play along with them.
And in 2OO6, Dave called me and said,
"Come out and do this acoustic tour with me."
I didn't actually know Pat, but I was aware that there'd been a couple times through the years when Dave had almost brought him back.
And so, to me, Pat was just a guy that wanted my job.
So when I found out about that, I was just like,
"You gotta be fuckin' kidding me."
Pat is a Foo Fighter, whether he's in the band or not.
He and I have gone through a lot together.
Pat should be in the band.
I definitely thought it must be awkward for Chris.
So I felt awkward only in that...
"I hope this isn't awkward for you."
The first rehearsal, Pat showed up, and we actually instantly hit it off, you know?
I sorta got to be friends with him over the course of doing those shows.
Clive Davis came to see us play at one of the acoustic gigs, and I said, "I think it'd be so cool if we were that band
"where we did the rock show and we had all the people that love the rock show,
"and we did the acoustic show and had all the people that love the acoustic show,
"and they wouldn't necessarily have to go to both."
And Clive was like,
"Yes, but you can do both together."
In a total Yoda moment.
I was like, "Oh my God, you're right!"
And that was the next album,
Echoes, Silence, Patience, & Grace.
Those songs were basically just that.
So that tour and that album before totally shaped the one that happened after.
We were at a point in our career where we thought things couldn't get any bigger.
We've headlined these festivals, played these arenas.
We're perfectly happy with the way things are.
And then John Silva said,
"You guys wanna play Wembley Stadium?"
And I said, "Fuck.
OK, but wait, how big is that place?"
When you do something like that you put it on sale six months ahead of time because that's a lot of tickets -
85,OOO people.
You need six months to get rid of all those tickets.
And we sold it out.
I couldn't believe it.
So we put another one on sale, and it sold out in, like, a few days.
When it sold out like it did,
I think everybody in the band was just like,
"What the fuck?
How did that happen?"
It was this huge responsibility, this great thing like,
"All right. It's our turn now, like, we have to make it great."
It was six months until we had to play the show.
Every night before I went to sleep for six months, I'd think,
"My God,
I have to play fuckin' Wembley Stadium."
Then I'd wake up in the morning, like, "We're playing Wembley!"
Wembley is so big, and it's like this sort of monster bowl you're playing.
It's just sort of the weight and the responsibility I put on myself for a show like that, it's intense.
I remember before the first show,
I was so nervous, and I somehow got hot sauce in my eye backstage, right before we went on,
I was just, "Why now?
Why did this have to happen now?"
You don't just go,
"Yay, they asked us to do this thing
"and we're gonna go and do our best and see what happens."
You wanna make sure it becomes the most memorable show you've done.
And know that you killed it.
It was nerve-wracking, because it's Wembley Stadium.
And if you've ever been there, it's so fucking huge.
It's like an illusion.
How the fuck did this band get this fuckin' big?
Can you tell me that?
When you have 2O, OOO people and there's nosebleeds that are so far away, you wanna be able to bring everybody in.
I want the people up there to feel like they're right there.
You'd imagine that after playing something like Wembley Stadium and playing to 85,OOO people,
"God, what do we do now?"
Yeah, it's good.
It's the same way with records, in a way.
This is our seventh record.
What could we possibly do that's different than the last thing we had done?
And I thought, "Well...
I wanna do the next one in the garage."
It's about making records the way we used to fucking make records.
But let's do it with Butch Vig so it's fucking huge.
Butch Vig is probably most well known for doing Nevermind, the Nirvana record.
But he's done a ton of stuff through the years.
He did the last Green Day record and he was in Garbage, and he's been a working producer for a long time.
Dave said, "I wanna make the record in my garage."
And then he said, "What do you think about making the record on tape?"
I wanna get away from what people think we should do.
I learned how to make records on tape.
And there's something about that process that I love, but you can't fix things like when you're working purely in a digital format.
That's the first thing I said to the band.
"If we're gonna do this on tape, you guys have to play really well.
"Because nothing's gonna be fixed."
I think most people have an idea of how records are made.
They're made on computers.
You can do whatever with computers, but we all grew up making records on tape.
It's got a certain sound.
It's got a certain set of limitations.
You can't go in and just go like,
"Well, that's close enough."
Wow, this is great!
Rock n' roll is imperfection and flaws and four or five or six or eight people playing together.
It's not gonna line up.
It's gonna be a little fucked up. It should be.
Human beings aren't perfect.
You wanna say hello?
Hi!
What was really different was the environment, doing it at Dave's house.
Which is the most comfortable environment you can imagine.
It's like...
It's just fun to be there anyways.
I think the atmosphere of where you're recording has to come out on the record.
I don't see how it couldn't.
Look at this crew.
Look at the Hawkins!
What, are you kidding me?
The engineers and everybody at one point were like,
"OK, we're gonna need this and this and this.
"$7OO, OOO worth of outboard gear."
And Dave's like, "No, no, no.
We're making a record in a garage!"
I love that we're about to make an album at home.
I think the album's gonna sound like that.
I know it will.
If we need to have three different drum sounds, wouldn't it be cool to have them crossfade into each other, like as the other drum sound's starting to come up and the other one's going back?
Wouldn't it be cool if we had a bucket of KFC right now?
So in recording, it usually begins with Taylor and I.
The drums first, with the guitar, and at first it's really to see if Taylor and I lock in with each other.
Did I miss my cue?
Yes, you did.
I go through a process, sort of a self-loathing, "I suck" process when I'm recording drums.
I tend to think
I'm the worst drummer in the world.
Fuck.
Sorry. I messed up the pattern a little bit.
OK.
When I go back and listen to the recording,
I'm like, "I'm all over the place."
It's not great.
Why? Why, God, why?
Sorry, I broke a drumstick!
Then it slowly evolves and comes together after a couple hours, and I have a drum track I'm really proud of.
The drums are finished.
I'm still not sure about These Days.
I could sit there and agonize all day over one little snare hit or fuckin'... the way a groove feels.
- And you will.
- And I will.
They'll play it on the radio and you'll go,
"Damn! That fuckin' snare hit!"
Maybe we should have just ProTooled the fuck out of this record.
At least you know it's perfect.
When you're recording analogue like this, knowing it can't be fixed brings a factor to the way the band thinks about how they're gonna play.
For instance, Nate, before he would do his bass part, would go out in the tent and work out his part, so when he came in to play, he knew everything he was gonna do.
I think it sounds great.
It sounds awesome.
Yeah, it sounds awesome.
Is the bass or anything doing...
Is the bass or anything doing a note coming out of...
Is there anything like that?
Is that gonna, do you want one?
- You know what I mean?
- I'd maybe not do that.
Don't do that.
That was very non-confrontational.
"Maybe don't do that."
I would maybe not ever do that in the song.
I'm the guy that plays the rhythm straight up the middle.
And then you have Chris, and Chris has a really sharp and clean sense of melodic playing.
Then over here, there's Pat.
And it's like... when Pat puts on a guitar it just goes...
All of those things... If they're balanced it sounds like the Foo Fighters.
Did we finally get too grungy?
It's never too grungy! I wonder if it's just, you're losing, like, the notes.
We've had this expanded band now for the last couple albums.
As a musician, it's a dream to be able to play with as many people and do as many different things as you can.
So where should we start?
What do you wanna start with?
We gotta get Bob fuckin' rockin' and rollin'.
What am I doing here?
I just learned the song, I got it in my head.
What do you want me to do?
When you meet someone that really helped you become the musician that you are,
I really think it's important to acknowledge that.
Bob's voice is so signature, and to have him come to my fuckin' house and do it on my fuckin' record blows me away.
All right, cool.
You wanna do the bridge?
What do you wanna do, Bob?
Come on in.
I didn't write the middle section of the song, because I wanted to write it with Bob, while Bob was there.
But I didn't have the words, so I sort of explained it, and we tried it once just with phonetic crap.
Is that gonna make sense?
I think so.
OK, let me write something really quick.
OK, five-minute lyrics.
OK, give me a five-minute lyric break.
Clock's runnin'.
Dad?
Yeah?
Remember you said you'll swim?
I know, I have to write these words really quick, so I can go sing it.
OK.
OK.
One, two, you know what to do...
That sounds so good!
That is so fucking cool, you guys!
You can hear, it's really good.
Some of the songs still had question marks, you know, the biggest song being
I Should Have Known.
That song became sort of the X factor in the album.
Yep, that's cool.
Fuckin' A, right?
I kinda feel like I Should Have Known is a song that's about Dave's past, and I think there are definitely references in there about Nirvana and Kurt.
Fuckin' A, man.
That's really good.
When I first started writing that song, it was about someone else that I was involved with, and at the end of the day,
I said to myself,
"I should have known that this was gonna happen."
But when I sing that song, it's hard not to think about all of the times in my life that's happened.
Hey, Krist!
Hello!
We had Krist Novoselic come in and play bass on I Should Have Known.
That was a very special moment,
'cause I had not been in the same room with Dave and Krist since we finished Nevermind.
It does that back and forth twice, then it does the turnaround chords.
Yeah, it goes, D sharp,
G, D sharp, G, F, C, then it goes back in D sharp,
G, D sharp...
It's like a six chord.
So it goes...
How was the tone?
I think it fuckin' sounds gnarly.
There, it's done. Seriously.
That's all you get, motherfucker.
I was not surprised that Dave asked Krist to play on the record.
I was surprised it hadn't happened any other time in the last 16 years.
You never realize how important the bass sound is to the sound of a band until you put it in another band and go,
"Oh, there it is."
I think what Krist played on the song was the absolute perfect thing for him to do on a Foo Fighters record.
I think that might be the ending.
We've found it.
Yeah, sample my phone.
The ice cream truck.
It usually takes us a while to name an album.
But I decided to call the record
Wasting Light, because I honestly feel like
I don't wanna let one minute of this go without really feeling it.
The best way to prepare to playing to 85,OOO people is to play at these small club gigs.
Because that's kind of a true test.
You go to see an arena rock band.
They're pretty good, but would they be any good at the Roxy?
Hold the fuckin'...
Then bask in the glory for a minute.
Having Scream be the first band on the bill, my heroes from my childhood, the band that
I dropped out of high school to join, to see them sharing the stage with my band Foo Fighters was a really big deal to me.
Yeah, good night, y'all.
Thank you.
You guys wanna hear the new record?
The Foo Fighters sound like the Foo Fighters because it's me, and Taylor, and Nate, and Chris, and Pat.
If it were anyone else, it would sound different.
You never wanna lose anybody, and you never wanna see someone disappear out of your life, but we wouldn't be here if it were different with William.
We wouldn't be here if it were different with Franz.
I feel bad about the bad things,
I feel good about the good things, but I wouldn't change a thing.
We've worked hard, and we've made a great band.
I'm incapable of doing almost anything else at this point in time, so this is what I do.
I'm an adult that plays in a rock band.
How about that?
I've had people say in interviews,
"So, Taylor, what is it like to be a rock star?"
And I'm like, "Fuck you.
I'm not a rock star. I'm a musician."
It's a functional family, you know what I mean?
I go to work coming up here, and I just fucking laugh all day and play great music.
There will probably always, to some extent, be that feeling,
"This could all end tomorrow.
Who the fuck knows, you know?"
We're all pretty lucky that we get to do this and we have to enjoy it while it's here and make the most of it.
It's a crazy feeling when something goes from a spark of imagination to something you can hold in your hands.
That first cassette... made in five fuckin' days or whatever, and here we are. It's just like,
"Whoa. How the fuck did this happen?"
Honestly, had I taken this whole career thing seriously,
I would've named it something else,
'cause it's the worst fuckin' band name in the world!
What am I gonna do?
Oh, shit.
You have to get it now?
Why does everything happen to you first?
Here, take these.
You took Ma's heels?
Like she's ever worn anything twice.
Besides, you should be more worried about her finding out...
- ...how old your skanky boyfriend is.
- Does your boyfriend have a car?
I'm sorry, do you even have a boyfriend?
Maybe I don't want a boyfriend.
No way.
Nice.
You're officially a woman.
Let's fucking celebrate.
Derek, did Marie tell you that she's not wearing any underwear?
Really?
I hope that runs in the family.
Are you just gonna hang around...
...or are you actually gonna buy something this time?
Hey, honey, you're looking in the wrong section.
The Women's section is on the other side.
I want what he's wearing.
Oh, dude.
- Who am l?
- Elvis.
No, man.
I'm the fucking Glycerine Queen.
Suzi Quatro.
- l'm the fucking wild one.
- Yeah!
Mom's gonna kill you.
- lt really looks terrible.
- Good.
Crap.
Here, let me help you.
Fuck.
My brother says that guys don't like girls that are tough.
He says guys like girls that are soft and flirty.
Yeah, he would say that.
He's a pussy.
He does spend a lot of time doing his bangs.
Next contestant, from Mrs. Morgan's 10th grade class...
...Cherie Currie performing
"Lady Grinning Soul."
Nice pants!
Yeah!
- Sit down.
- Love you, Cherie!
You suck.
- I love it!
- Freak.
You go, Cherie!
We love you!
Stay up there, Cherie!
Sit down now, please.
- Cherie!
- She's going off.
Just keep working on those scales.
- I'll see you next week.
- Okay. See you.
Joan Larkin.
It's Jett. Joan Jett.
Come on in, Joan Jett.
All right. Here.
Okay. Well, let's get started.
- So what kind of amps you guys got?
- Amps?
Well, why don't we just keep it unplugged for now, okay?
All right. A--
Well, I wanna play, like, Chuck Berry, you know, "Johnny B. Goode"?
Why don't we just start with a G chord?
A G chord to a C, to a D.
How's that?
G chord, like that.
On top of Old Smokey
All covered with snow
Now we're gonna go to a D.
I lost my poor sweetheart
To the G.
From courting too slow
- You see that? Did you see-- ?
- "Old Smokey"?
That one's goofy, man.
I mean, at least teach me "Smoke on the Water." I know you know that one.
Girls don't play electric guitars.
On top of Old Smokey
- All covered with snow
- Covered with slow
I dumped my poor sweetheart
For screwing too slow
That's not funny, Miss Larkin.
I can teach you to play the guitar, but you're gonna have to--
Excuse me, what are you doing?
Excuse me?
Excuse me, I don't think you ought to do that right now.
Turn that off, please. Turn it off.
Hello?
Happy birthday, kitten.
Hey, Daddy. I saved you the best piece of cake, the one with my name on it.
- Know why?
- Tell me.
Because guess who ruled the school talent show.
- You?
- Yeah.
Well, me and David Bowie.
But when are you gonna get here?
The cake's gonna melt and Mom says there's no room left in the freezer.
Well, I can't, kitten.
I got-- I gotta stay late tonight.
I'm sorry. I'll be by tomorrow, promise.
I only have a few minutes, though...
...so why don't you let me say hi to the other kitten.
Marie's out with her friends.
What, you didn't wanna go?
- No.
- Okay. Well, give her a pet for me.
I love you, kitten.
Love you too, Daddy.
Yeah. So wacky though, right?
- No. I could do all right.
- Right there, that's right.
- You gonna go dance?
- I don't know.
- You like it strong, don't you?
- Yeah, I like it...
No, I can't.
- lt's too much.
- This is fine, okay?
All right. Let's keep it going all night.
Here is more supersonic sounds of London.
Yeah!
That's Kim Fowley.
You see that guy over there?
That's--
He's a famous record producer.
This is Dick Johnson.
He'd like to produce you.
Well, tell Little Richard to heel, all right?
No?
Just...
...stay.
So he got really in.
- Hey.
- Hey.
You need a cab or something?
No.
Yeah.
- He's--
- You're Kim Fowley?
I am the King Hysteria himself.
And let me guess, you sing in a band...
...and it's the greatest band in the world...
...and I am the luckiest dog fucker in outer space...
...because I get to hear it first, right?
I'm Joan Jett.
I play--
I play guitar. Electric guitar.
Joan Jett, that's a cool name.
You guys got a demo?
No.
No, I don't--
No guys.
I wanna start an all-girl rock band.
Really?
Maybe I am the luckiest dog fucker after all. Hey, Sandy.
Hold on, I'll be right back.
Sandy West is a drummer.
Joan Jett claims to be some sort of guitar goddess.
Well, I didn't say that goddess thing.
No, no, it's cool, man. These guys are talking about going to some party...
...on the south side. lt's supposed to be bitchen. You wanna go?
No, I mean, I can't tonight.
But we should jam.
- Yeah.
- You play drums?
Yeah, let's play.
See what kind of noise you two make, call me if you have something...
...that won't make me regret giving you my number, okay?
Okay.
Cool, so we'll play.
Hey.
Okay, I get it. Yeah, that's enough.
Hey. Hey, hey, hey. Joan?
Hello?
Pick up the phone!
- Dog meat!
- Hi, sorry.
Hey, what the fuck you girls been doing over there?
Well, we've been practicing, man, like you said.
Oh, yeah?
Well, get back to it.
You bitches are gonna be bigger than the fucking Beatles.
- Cool.
- Yeah.
All right.
Let's do it.
Ready? One, two, three.
- Hello, Mrs. West. ls Sandy home?
- Oh, God.
Tougher, tougher, tougher.
Come on.
I mean, come on, this is really good music.
There's nothing like this on the radio.
There's nothing.
Elvis and Priscilla got divorced...
...the president is a prowler...
...and all these housewives talk to their fucking plants.
Now, you dogs need to get dirty.
All those little fuck boys out there...
...are wearing dresses and leaving their lipstick...
...on each other's cocks, okay?
Now, I wanna hear you fuck girls growl!
Halt.
I know what we're missing.
- I know what we need.
- What are we missing?
Bitchen.
Hey, I like your pants.
Thanks.
Kim Fowley, record producer.
You've heard of me.
Have l?
I like your style.
A little Bowie, a little Bardot.
A look on your face that says:
"I could kick the shit out of a truck driver."
Joanie.
This is Joan Jett.
And you are?
- Cherie.
- Cherie.
- Cherie what?
- Currie.
Cherie Currie.
Is that your real name?
Well, Cherie Currie, do you sing or play a musical instrument?
Yeah. Yeah, I can sing.
I won a talent show lip-synching to David Bowie.
- Why?
- "Why?"
Asked the maybe-great
Cherie Currie.
Read my lips.
We love your look.
We are choosing you to be a part of rock 'n' roll history.
Do you wanna be in a band?
Are you kidding?
You know any Suzi Quatro?
- Yeah.
- Good.
Learn one of her songs, don't care which.
Audition's Saturday.
Joan will tell you where.
How old are you?
Fifteen.
Jail-fucking-bait. Jack-fucking-pot.
So we practice in a trailer in the Valley.
- lt'll probably happen there.
- Okay.
Come find me.
Crap.
- Oh, hold on.
- Tempo.
- Well, I don't know what--
- Cherie Currie. Cherie Currie.
- Welcome.
- Thanks.
You look great.
What song are you going to sing for us today?
- "Fever."
- "Fever."
Peggy Lee song?
- Who's Peggy Lee?
- My mom likes Peggy Lee.
Kim, you should have told her.
We don't play that shit.
Suzi Quatro covered "Fever."
It's a slow song.
We don't play slow songs.
Well, can you do a different song?
Yeah-- lt's just the only one that I learned for today.
Go.
Wait outside. Go.
Go.
Joan, come here. Bring your guitar.
We'll just have to do it for her,
I guess.
Cherie Currie.
- She's a wild child. She's a wild girl.
- Yeah.
She's a wild girl.
She's a...
She's a firecracker.
Give me something else.
Something else. Firecracker, rocket.
Rocket, bomb. Bomb.
Cherry bomb. Cherry bomb.
Cherry bomb.
Just-- Do it again. Do it.
She's a cherry bomb
- That's good.
- Yeah.
Cherry bomb. All right.
Hello, Daddy
Hello, Mom
I'm your cherry bomb
- That's nice.
- Right? Yeah.
Yeah.
Hey, "His Majestic Hysteric" whatever is ready for you now.
All right? Yeah.
Hello, Daddy
Hello, Mom
I'm your cherry bomb
Hello, world
I'm your wild girl
I'm your cherry bomb
Okay, you do it. Let's go.
Hello, Daddy
Hello, Mom
I'm your cherry bomb
Hello, world
I'm your wild girl
I'm your cherry bomb
Hey, street boy
Want some style?
Your dead-end dreams
Don't make you smile
Hey, street boy
Want some style?
Your dead-end dreams
Don't make you smile
I'll give you something
To live for
Have you, grab you
Until you're sore
I can't say that.
What? Oh, okay. Goodbye.
Go sell Girl Scout Cookies.
Who's next?
Come on, just do it.
It's just a song.
I'll give you something
To live for
Have you, grab you
Till you're sore
No, dog shit.
Dog shit. Urine-soaked dog shit.
Okay, listen...
...rock 'n' roll is a blood sport.
It is a sport of men.
It is for the people in the dark.
The death cats.
The masturbators.
The outcasts who have no voice, no way of saying:
"Hey, I hate the fucking world.
My father's a faggot.
Fuck you! Fuck authority!
I want an orgasm."
Now growl. Moan.
This isn't about women's lib, kiddies.
This is about women's libido.
I want to see the scratch marks down their fucking backs.
All right, do it again. Again. Like...
Like your sister just fucked your boyfriend in your parent's bed.
Like you want a fucking orgasm.
- Yeah.
- Yeah.
I'll give you something
To live for
Have you, grab you
Till you're sore
Hello, Daddy
Hello, Mom
I'm your cherry bomb
Hello, world
I'm your wild girl
I'm your cherry bomb
That's getting pretty good.
That's great. Yeah.
- What do you think, ladies?
- Yeah.
- Yeah.
- Yeah.
- I like it.
- Quite a presence.
Oh, now, don't get cocky.
We have a lot of work left to do.
Hey, foxy, come here!
- Check it out.
- What?
Donny Osmond.
Destroy that shit.
Come on.
Oh, shit.
I wanna go back.
My mom's gonna kill me.
Don't you guys have any kind of curfew?
I don't.
My dad split. He was the strict one.
Yeah, mine too.
He didn't really leave, he was kicked out and replaced.
Do you take the garbage out now too?
Yeah, me and my sister.
Yeah, me too.
What is this?
It ain't baby shampoo.
I call it the dirty sink.
A little bit of everything from my parent's liquor cabinet...
...but just a little so they can't tell
I'm dipping into their stash.
My dad would notice.
He likes his booze.
He an alcoholic?
No, he just likes it.
He says that's the difference.
He likes to drink, he doesn't need to drink.
I like to drink.
A dirty sink is where we're gonna be puking that up tomorrow.
Hey, salt and pepper.
Race you down the hill.
- Let's go.
- Come on.
Oh, my God.
What, you think because you're a big rock star you can smoke in the house?
Shut up.
I never said I was a rock star.
Can those girls even play?
Yeah.
They actually wrote a song about me.
You know how many new bands think they're gonna make it?
- Kim thinks we have a real shot.
- Kim Fowley?
That guy's a total creep.
Seriously. I heard he has a coat made out of dog fur.
Excuse me if I don't wanna wind up...
...working at the Pup 'n Fries for the rest of my life.
It's Mom.
Crap!
- Come on.
- Places, everybody.
Places. Come quickly,
I have the most wonderful news.
What's all the commotion about?
Well, we're moving to lndonesia.
- What?
- What do you mean?
- What do you mean "we"?
- Well--
- You're leaving? You're leaving us?
- No, no. Nobody's leaving anybody.
We're a family.
We'll always be a family.
This is just something that we have to do right now.
Why?
I'll be outside.
Wolfgang and I are getting married and he lives in lndonesia.
You girls are welcome to come along.
I've spoken to your father and he says you're welcome to stay at Aunt Evie's.
Where are we gonna sleep at Aunt Evie's?
He bought you a brand-new sleeper sofa, top of the line.
It's really not that bad.
- Why can't we at least just stay here?
- Because you're 15 years old.
Just calm down.
This is a transition, not a tragedy.
- We're all gonna be fine.
- Stop saying "we."
There's no "we," there's a "you."
Hasn't been a "we"...
...since you kicked Dad out for leaving water rings on the furniture.
Don't be so dramatic, Cherie.
Oh, coming from the actress.
"Places. Places, everyone."
No.
No. Pig stink, okay?
They're gonna eat you alive out there.
Rock 'n' roll music is tough music played in tough venues.
Men don't wanna see women anywhere...
...except in their kitchens or on their knees...
...let alone on stage holding guitars, okay?
Now, you better buckle up and get ready for boot camp, babies...
...because you're gonna get trained like the Viet-fucking-cong. Bring it in.
Okay, filthy pussies.
Today is hecklers drill.
These degenerates here are not your fans.
They're not here to tell you how pretty you look.
They don't want yourfucking autograph.
They wanna hurt you.
They want you to retreat. You don't.
Now, move it, move it. I wanna see you bitches do the death dance. Play!
Incoming!
Hey.
What are you gonna do about it, huh?
- Yeah!
- Hey, watch it.
Oh, did that hurt?
Come on, Joanie.
Hey, man!
Hey! Rat piss.
Dog shit, razor blades.
Watch it.
Oh, man!
Man, I can barely hear you.
They're doing a gig right now.
Killing it. Listen.
You hear that?
That's the sound of hormones raging.
Cherie Currie.
Cherry bomb, sex kitten.
Brigitte Bardot in a trailer park.
Joan Jett, the rock 'n' roll heart, street-tough brunette.
Sandy West, Miss California with a joint in her mouth...
...and a chip on her shoulder.
Lita Ford, love child of Sophia Loren and Ritchie Blackmore.
You do not wanna fuck with Lita.
Robin Robins, the brainy brainiac who's rolling thunder on the bass.
It's incredible.
When do you need the press kits by?
Oh, no problem.
- I'll have it to you then.
- Hey.
Cops!
Oh, shit. The cops? Let's split.
- Hey.
- I gotta go.
Come on. Hey, Terri, wake up.
The cops are here.
- Shit, the cops. Let's go!
- Holy shit.
Come on. Fuck.
Hey. Fucking hecklers drill really worked.
This girl threw a bottle at my face, smashed it back at her.
You did the death dance in there. You showed those punks how to cockfight.
Did you get the money for the concert?
- No, you played for free.
- What?
Takes money to make money in this business.
- Wanna play living rooms or stadiums?
- Stadiums.
I racked up their phone bill booking your tour overseas.
- Overseas, really?
- Yeah. Easy.
You gotta pay your dues first here on the road in a van, then come thejets.
- When?
- I don't go on the road.
I'll talk to your keepers. Scatter!
This.
- Can I take this?
- No.
It's my favorite.
When was the last time you wore this?
Exactly.
I save it for special occasions.
It's not like you're playing the Shrine Auditorium.
Forget it.
Bye, Grandma.
What's wrong?
Yourfather.
He didn't come home last night.
Oh, well...
...he's a big boy,
I'm sure he'll be okay.
I'll call when I get to a pay phone, okay?
- I love you.
- Don't forget the little people.
You're taller.
- Hey.
- Hey.
- Scottie, I'm your roadie.
- Cherie.
Nice to meet you.
Thanks.
- Take care of my sister, okay?
- Yeah, you bet.
Dad?
- Dad!
- What's wrong?
Dad?
What happened?
Dad, are you okay?
Dad?
Is he dead?
He's passed out.
Let's go! We gotta hit the road!
Go. I got it.
Are you sure?
Thanks, Marie. I owe you.
Yeah. Call, okay?
Stop it.
Are we there yet?
How much longer?
What the fuck?
What, we're supposed to share two beds?
I thought we were getting another room?
Fucking Kim, man.
Hey, look, guys, if you need an extra bed, I'm right down the hall.
I gotta make a call.
No. No!
No!
- Hey, Robin, come here.
- What?
It's great.
We each have our own room...
...and there's a pool with a waterfall and a wet bar.
- I wish I was there.
- Yeah, me too.
- Next time for sure. I promise, okay?
- Okay.
Did everything go well after I left?
Grandma Oni keeps asking if Dad's full of dope.
- He looks better.
- Okay.
Cherie, get in. What are you doing?
They're calling me, so l'm gonna go practice.
- But I'll talk to you soon.
- Get offthe phone!
All right. Bye.
Open up, you filthy varmint.
This is compliments of your non-alcoholic father.
How's he doing?
He's okay.
It's still not working.
Dicks aren't even hard.
- You rubbing?
- Yeah.
I think I'm doing it wrong.
Try using the showerhead.
Now, think about someone you have a crush on.
It's still not working.
How about Farrah Fawcett?
You like her?
Yeah, who doesn't?
Wait, I think I feel something.
Oh, shit.
Check. Check. One.
What the fuck? Plug me back in.
Watch your mouth, kid, or we'll have to turn you over to Child Services.
Fuck you, old man.
Hey, what's your fucking problem, man?
What's your fucking problem, man?
Hey, hey, I wouldn't.
- lt's a lose-lose situation.
- How's that?
Well, if you win, you beat up a girl.
If you lose, you get beat up by two.
Teenage ones.
All right, sound check is canceled.
Maybe if you ever headline you'll get one.
Now, why don't you go to your rooms...
...and do your fucking homework or something?
Like we need a sound check.
Pretty soon you'll be opening up for us.
Opening your legs, maybe.
- Dude, it really hurts. lt really hurts.
- Come on.
Oh, shit.
You guys, come on, open up.
I gotta take a piss. Please?
I really gotta piss, man. Come on.
It's too perfect.
Hey, these jerk-offs have betterfood than we did.
Yeah.
You gotta pee, right?
Here.
Pee in this shit.
What are you doing, man?
- You can't pee on their guitar.
- I don't give a fuck.
No, I do, actually.
It'll probably add to their sound.
Oh, shit. There's someone in here.
- Where's your belt?
- Shit.
Come on, man. Just come on.
Thank you.
Whoa, you fucking filthy dog.
Hey, we're on in 10.
Hey, up or down?
Down, girl.
Next up on stage...
...from Los Angeles, California, the Runaways.
Kim, we are fucking rocking it.
I mean, the crowd's been really great.
- I hear you're tearing things up.
- We're running out of money though.
We're fucking hungry.
Can you send us more?
It's a bad time. I'm with an A & R scout, it could be big.
You just keep those dogs in line, okay?
Things are happening, trust me.
Okay.
Yeah, yeah, yeah, you got it.
- just send us some more money--
- I can't come, Joan.
I get vertigo when I travel and my gimpy leg acts up.
Maybe I can get a road manager.
Kim.
Yeah.
Put that back.
Are you fucking kidding me?
- Off!
- I like that song.
All right.
Now I'm gonna introduce Joan Jett...
...with "l Love Playing With Fire!"
Hey, kid. Wake up.
I've got some bad news.
Fucking Kim, man.
- He snaked us.
- What?
All his bullshit about paying your dues...
...that's how you're gonna get a record deal, blah-fucking-blah...
...he was right.
We fucking did it.
- What?
- That Frankenstein...
...crazy-looking motherfucker did it.
Mercury fucking Records.
Mercury fucking Records.
- We got signed?
- Yup.
We're going to Hollywood in an hour.
I'm gonna tell the rest ofthe girls.
Get your little ass ready.
I can't believe it. We got signed.
Hello? Hey. Got a bag?
We got signed!
Yeah.
Yeah, and you know,
I was gonna form a band of dwarves...
...but their hands were too small, they couldn't hold their instruments.
These ladies can hold their instruments.
And their liquor.
See, girls nowadays, they don't have any role models.
This band's about self-empowerment.
Aphrodite, Cleopatra, Eurydice.
No more second-class status...
...sitting at boring concerts with their asshole boyfriends.
The Runaways have the most chance of any group l've seen...
...to do what The Beatles did...
...to tearthis world apart.
It means "thank you very much" in Japanese.
I could do everyone's hair and makeup on tour. What do you think?
Everyone does their own hair and makeup, you know?
Yeah. Okay, well, I had another idea about making bags for everybody.
Like silver clutches with their names on them.
I'm not going, am I?
- l'm not going to Japan.
- I didn't say that.
I'm your sister, Cherie, you don't have to say it. I can hear you.
It'sjust that no one really brings their family, you know?
We don't have the cash, and we don't need the distraction.
I wouldn't be a distraction,
I'd be a help.
- I know.
- You promised.
So, what then?
Am I supposed to stay here again?
Making tacos? Playing nurse?
Taking out the garbage?
I gotta go.
Not until you get this song down.
Now take it again from the chorus.
One, two, three.
Oh, you hideous souls...
...may we not grow old and horrid.
And dreadful.
What are you laughing at?
You think you can sing like that in front of people? In front of a customer?
You bitches have got to start thinking like men, okay?
No more snip snails and puppy dog tails. Men wanna fuck.
Men want this, filthy pugs.
And we're gonna give it to them.
We're gonna put it right in theirface...
...and then take it back, just to break their fucking hearts.
Oh, what, Cherie?
I'm sorry.
- Tell me, seriously, are you tired?
- Yeah.
Yeah?
- Are you bored?
- Yeah, actually I am.
Oh, yeah? Well, guess what, you're not allowed to be tired.
You're not permitted to be bored.
You're an employee.
You are my property and you will do as I say...
...or you can go fold tacos with your better-looking sister.
Kim, we're a band.
I mean, we don't work for you.
Yeah. Okay, I'm losing my voice,
I'm taking a break.
Oh, little diva.
Well, I got a news flash.
This ain't the opera. They're not coming to hear your chops, okay?
They're not coming to see little girls banging on their little drums.
This is the music business, okay?
You wanna be an artist?
Saw off your fucking ear and send to your boyfriend.
You wanna be a rock star, you listen to me.
Okay? Now...
...Cherie's lack of greatness...
...her lack of rock 'n' roll authority is getting in the way of our product.
What is our product?
Lita, what's our product, huh?
Sex, violence, revolt.
Okay, now, l'm going to teach you prima donnas...
...how to think with your cocks, okay?
Get up here.
- Hello?
- Cherie, it's Kim.
I just wanted to call and let you know
I think you're doing a really good job.
And if you keep listening to me, you're gonna be a big star.
- I'm trying my best, Kim.
- I know you are.
Listen, there's a photographer coming by your house in 20 minutes...
...to take some pictures for a Japanese magazine.
Twenty minutes?
Is everybody meeting here?
Solo shots. lt'sjust gonna be you for now. He'll do the rest later.
- So be ready.
- Okay.
Bye, Cherie.
Shit.
Good. Good.
Hey, my arms are connected to me, you know.
Good.
Good, good.
No, they're from the magazine.
They're here to take pictures of me.
Get back in the house.
Good morning.
This is your captain speaking.
- Hey, wake up. We're almost there.
- Welcome to Japan.
And if you're holding any drugs, get rid ofthem now.
What?
Wait, wait, wait.
Please take your seats now.
We are preparing for landing.
Two, three.
I can't do any more.
Oh, shit.
- I think that means we're landing.
- What?
- We're not.
- No.
Cherie, Cherie, Cherie.
This way.
Cherie, Cherie, Cherie.
- Yeah.
- Oh, my God.
Did you see that?
- Japan's not so bad.
- No, man, really, it's great.
I mean, it's bigger than you said.
It's like-- lt's mania.
I didn't train you to be a bunch offailure cocks, did I?
Of course it's going according to plan.
- Yeah.
- Are you becoming one with Japan?
I guess so. I mean,
I learned how to use chopsticks.
That's my girl. I need you to keep it togetherfor me overthere, Joanie.
I know, I am.
I am.
Okay.
What the hell are you wearing?
I'm thinking with my cock.
More like boner.
I think I'm gonna wear it.
Where? Strip club?
You're gonna get us in a lot oftrouble.
I mean, like, arrested.
Sexy, no?
You're ready for the peep-show circuit.
All you need's a porn name.
Ladies.
A toast to the Runaways.
First televised show to over one million Japanese homes.
- Yeah.
- Yeah, man.
- Cheers.
- Cheers.
All right.
Oh, actually, do you have any beer?
Excuse me?
Do you like Japanese food?
Yes, very much.
What is your favorite?
- That one.
- That one?
- Yeah.
- Oh, wasabi.
Yeah.
- Hey, you got the cover.
- What?
- Bigger than Godzilla, huh?
- What?
- Let me see that. Let me see that.
- We got the cover issue.
What? Amazing.
- Yeah, man.
- Cheers.
- Where'd you get this?
- Took forever.
- Yeah.
- Cheers.
We're gonna need another.
- Yeah?
- Hello?
Cherie, can you hear me?
- What?
- lt's me, Marie.
- Dad's sick.
- Who?
Dad. He's sick.
You gotta come home, okay?
- What?
- Turn down the music. lt's me, Marie.
Did you hear what I said?
You have to come home.
I don't have a home.
- Do you have a home?
- What?
What are you talking about?
Cherie, can you hear me?
Cherie?
Wow, it's so crazy.
- Let's eat. You guys hungry?
- Oh, my God.
- Sandy, look at that.
- What? Shit.
Crazy, man.
- What is this?
- What's your problem?
- What's yourfucking problem?
- That is cool.
It's not cool.
Did you know about this?
Kim sent them. Just showed up at my house. What was I supposed to say?
Well, you could say, "No."
You could say,
"I'm the singer in a band."
Not Linda fucking Lovelace.
Look at this.
When did you do this?
It's exactly what Kim wants.
He's gonna be really happy.
But this is all they're ever gonna say about us.
You think anybody's gonna take us seriously?
Son of a bitch. lt'sjust publicity.
It helps everybody.
What were you thinking?
Publicize the music...
...not your crotch.
Don't worry about them.
You're the voice.
It's your face on the T-shirts.
You're the one they want.
How you feeling?
Like a peach.
Like a really bruised peach.
There's an all-girl rock band in Korea now.
Yeah?
Yeah. The singer thinks she's you.
They're shit.
It's pretty cool, though.
Yeah.
Well, if it isn't Mary, mother of God.
What, no disciples?
No cameras?
Just me.
Nice bag.
So original. All the girls get one?
No.
Actually...
...there's one for me and one for you.
Thanks.
So do I actually need to say all the things I wanna say...
...or do we still have the sister thing?
How's Dad?
Well, he hasn't asked about you today, so that's a good thing.
He was worried?
What do you think?
He's been keeping a folder of all your press clips.
Take it to him.
- l'm scared.
- He's been waiting for you.
Hi, kitten.
Hi, Dad.
We have money.
You're gonna be fine.
We're ready for you, Cherie.
Cherie?
I've had it with her shit, man.
What-- ? What's wrong?
It must be a really interesting article.
What are you reading?
"Fowley says handling Cherie's ego...
...is like having a dog urinate in yourface.
The best thing that could happen would be if Cherie hung herself...
...from a shower rod and put herself in the tradition of Marilyn Monroe."
Shit, man.
That's great. That's fucking right.
- Lita.
- What? lt's true.
She's always the center of every photo.
Always the biggest interview in all the articles.
It's like we're the backup for the Cherie Currie Band.
I didn't ask for that shit.
Who cares?
It'sjust a magazine article.
It doesn't mean shit.
Let's finish the song. Come on.
What's the matter?
No flash bulbs?
No one here to fall all over you while you sing?
Stop. Cherie, bring the bottle.
Come on.
- Cherie?
- Hey, Cherie, listen.
I gotta take a piss. Would that be okay with you? lf not, I could hold it.
You can piss yourfucking pants for all I care.
- l'm gonna piss down your throat!
- Calm down!
- Calm down.
- Come on!
Why are you always defending her,
Joan?
Bravo, kiddies. Bravo.
What the fuck is this?
It's pretty nasty, Kim.
This?
This is what we call controversy.
This is what we call publicity.
It's what we call a juicy story!
Oh, and you're welcome.
By the way, thanks to me...
...this article is twice as long and half of it is about you. Okay?
It's press, my budding young starlet, not prestige.
Get used to it.
Get in that booth and finish the song.
We've got this place on lockout. l'm paying out the fucking nose. Let's go.
Let's go. Sing.
Sing.
Sing!
- No.
- No?
No.
- Cherie, we have to finish.
- Yeah, get in the booth, Cherie.
Shut the fuck up, Lita!
- You shut up.
- Shut the fuck up!
Come on. Cherie, come on.
- l'm not singing.
- Oh, Cherie.
Of course you're singing, you're a singer.
That's what you do. You sing and you strut around in your underwear, okay?
But most importantly, you do what I tell you to do.
And right now l'm telling you to get in the booth, so get in the booth.
No.
You get in that booth, Cherie.
No.
Get in the booth before I lose my patience...
...and send you back where I rescued you from.
Good. Send me back.
- I don't give a shit. I wanna go back.
- Careful.
- Get in the booth.
- No.
- Get in the booth!
- No!
I'm not gonna be your little lap dog anymore.
You've been speaking for me this whole time.
You get in the fucking booth.
I'm done.
You dog cunts will be lucky to get a gig singing in the fucking shower.
You know what?
Good fucking job! No, really!
Really! Good fucking job!
Anarchy! Mayhem!
Rock 'n' roll, baby!
Come on, Joanie.
Fuck you! Fuck you!
Fuck you!
Rock 'n' roll.
Fuck me.
I think I just need a break...
...from the band, or something.
If you haven't noticed, we're in the middle of cutting a record.
I just gotta spend time with my family.
Yourfamily?
Who?
No, really, your mom in lndonesia or your drunk dad?
Are we not yourfucked-up family now?
I can't do this anymore.
I need my life back, you know?
This is my life.
The Runaways.
The Runaways, they were a...
...conceptual rock project that failed.
Kim, do you have any regret that the girls turned on you?
No.
I'm glad they turned on me.
It shows spirit.
If l'm training a wild dog...
...and it bites me in the hand...
...then I know I've trained it well.
My hand is made of iron.
That's all it took.
She's 16 years old and she's already a creep.
Am I worried about them?
No, they'll be fine.
I mean, a yearfrom now, they'll all be living in a trailer park in the Valley.
Fat, pregnant, and happy as fleas on a dog.
But me...
...poor me...
...l'm on my way to becoming...
...rock 'n' roll legend.
Put your finger there.
Yeah, something like that.
Cool.
I wish I could play.
I'd be in a band with you.
Yeah, but you can't.
I heard Cherie's doing a movie.
Yeah?
You don't need her.
You should go solo, like Bowie.
Bowie'sjust Bowie.
He doesn't need any band.
It was my band.
I wrote the songs, she just sang them.
Yeah, well, people always remember the singer.
Get up.
Hey, come on. Get up.
Everyone out. Hey.
Come on, get up.
Everyone, get the fuck out!
Come on!
- Hey! Come on!
- What?
Fuck off.
All right, all right.
Yeah, fucking nice.
Stay. Stay right here.
Just keep playing.
I'll see you later.
I can't sell this to you.
I have my ID.
Calling manager to Counter 7.
Yes, what can I do?
I'm sorry, but we won't be able to sell you that.
I'll have you fired...
...replaced...
...just like that.
I'm gonna have to ask you to leave, please.
Right now.
You're nothing but dog shit, mister.
And you...
...you'rejust a filthy pussy.
Pup 'n Fries.
Hola, Pup 'n Fries. Can I help you?
Marie Currie, please.
Cherie?
What are you doing?
I need you to come and pick me up.
I can't, I'm at work.
I have to go.
Places, everyone!
Places! Places!
Places.
Hey, you.
You must obey...
...or you will bleed.
You know I need to get my way.
So now you listen up.
You are my pup.
I beat you up in every way.
And when I speak to you, you answer true.
I'll make you black and blue.
We are not to blame for seeing love is pain.
We're not ashamed...
...to say love is pain.
To say that love is pain.
And I'll do it again!
People have been asking about you at Rodney's.
Sorry for calling you at work.
It's okay.
How's it going over there?
Oh, it's a dream.
Especially when people come in thinking l'm you.
I actually signed an autograph the other day.
This guy came in and asked for one for his daughter...
...but I totally knew it was for him.
Mom called.
She said they're playing "Cherry
Bomb" on the radio in Indonesia.
She tells everyone you're her daughter.
I'm sure she tells them she's my mother.
It's been a year.
You should at least talk to her.
Yeah.
Okay, that was Joan Jett and the Blackhearts...
...with "I Love Rock 'N Roll."
Now, Joan has surprised us...
...by dropping by the station today.
Hi, Joan.
How are you, Rodney?
It's good to see you.
I was a big fan in the English disco days.
Oh, I remember when you would come into the club...
...and you were only about 15 years old.
Yeah.
We used to play a lot ofthe Runaways' music then.
The Runaways was my baby.
We were so young back then too.
Growing up on the road together.
- Hello, chop chop.
- When did you know...
...that you wanted to be a rock 'n' roll musician?
I think I always knew. I mean...
...if it wasn't for rock 'n' roll,
I'd probably be dead or in jail.
It really saved my life.
- You grow up real fast on the road.
- You do. Real fast.
Okay, well, we're gonna take some calls now...
...because we have a lot offans waiting.
Caller, you're on.
Hi, Joan. It's Cherie.
Cherie?
How you doing?
I'm not dead or in jail.
This is Cherie Currie, former lead singer ofthe Runaways.
How exciting.
So, Cherie, what have you been up to?
I'm kind oftrying to do the acting thing.
Now, from what I understand, it's been a while since you two spoke.
You guys must have lots to talk about.
Or maybe not on the air.
I just wanted to say hi.
Yeah.
Call yourfriends on your own time.
Well, I gotta go, Joanie.
Yeah, me too. I gotta run, Cherie.
Okay.
Let's get back to the music.
This is another hit song from the album, "Crimson and Clover."
You're listening to Rodney on the Rocks.
<b><font color="#ffff00">SUBTITLES BY</font>
<font color="#0000ff">LUIS-SUBS</font></b>
It... It's a bit of a walk, you know,
from, you know, back by the drummer over here.
That walk to the front is... is complicated.
Singing background remains
a somewhat unheralded position, you know.
So people make that leap.
So, what you guys do on that part?
♪ I'll help you carry on
It's almost more of a mental leap than... than just the physical act of singing.
It's a conceptual leap,
and if you can comfortably come up with it, you know,
then you may find a spot out there.
♪ Carry on for...
But I know tremendous backup singers who just aren't comfortable in that position.
You gotta have that narcissism, you gotta have that ego.
So shall we do it?
It can be a pretty long walk.
One, two, three!
There's a power to what it is that we do.
No one till right now has publicly acknowledged it, but people love to see the background singers.
I mean, when you think about
Lou Reed, "Walk On The Wild Side," you know, that iconic song with the line that makes a lot of people uncomfortable because it says "colored girls."
But what is he... what is he referencing when he says, "And the colored girls say do-do-do-do-do?"
The fact that there's a power to these women
that stand on stage and sing with these guys.
Backup singers just bring so much more life to the situation.
When a voice opens up, there comes the life.
That's when it's a person-to-person connection.
♪ What about the time you were rolling over?
♪ You fall on your face and you must be having fun
♪ Backsliding
How do you do?
You don't hold on necessarily to your individual vocal persona.
♪ God help us
'Cause you're trying to get your persona to blend and mesh with the other voices.
That's awesome.
- ♪ What's the matter with him?
- ♪ He's all right
- ♪ How do you know?
- ♪ The Lord won't mind
- ♪ Don't play no games
- ♪ He's all right
♪ Love from the bottom to the top
- ♪ Turn like a wheel
- ♪ He's all right
♪ See for yourself...
There's something that happens when you lock in with somebody and all the harmonics ping, and, I mean, if you don't like that, what do you like?
♪ Cool down
Stop acting crazy
♪ They're gonna leave and we'll be on our own
I could... I could be different people, a chameleon, you know.
It's just like you could change up.
You're never bored.
I'm a part of the sisterhood.
I got to earn this.
It wasn't just a dream that I had
I actually got to sing these songs and sing on key.
- ♪ Like a wheel
- ♪ He's all right
- ♪ See for yourself
- ♪ The Lord won't mind
- ♪ We're gonna move
- ♪ Right now
♪ Turn like a wheel
As a background singer, they would like you to come in, make things sound great, take very little credit... and go home quickly.
♪ It's all right
♪ The Lord won't mind
♪ Right now
Turn like a wheel
♪ Inside a wheel
Thank you, Jesus.
Thank you, Father.
♪ I will enter His gates
♪ With thanksgiving in my heart
♪ I will enter His courts with praise
God gave us the ability to create, didn't he?
- Yes, he did.
- OK.
Today we're gonna pin this down to music.
♪ He has made me glad
♪ I will rejoice for He has made me glad
I see these kids doing this slide, I said, "Oh, child."
He think he got that from, uh... James Brown.
I said, "Oh, that came from one of my pastors."
♪ He has made me glad
♪ I will rejoice for
He has made me glad
- My father was a minister.
- My father was a...
- My father was a...
- Pastor's daughter.
- Isn't that cliché?
- That's how I was actually
- introduced to music.
- I started as a four-year-old.
All through grammar school.
♪ I will say this is the day
You come up learning the part that your voice actually fits in.
Nobody tells you that's how singers learn how to do background.
Hallelujah, glory, glory.
Thank you, Lord.
Thank you, Lord.
God gave me this talent and I intend to use it.
And that's what my life has really been all about, trying to make a success of the gift that I have.
Darlene Love is the one that's the cause of all of this.
Darlene Love and Fanita
James, The Blossoms.
They were the first black background singers
working in the studios.
♪ Silver and gold
Silver and gold
♪ Everyone's searching for silver and gold...
When we first got into recordings, it was totally white.
♪ You'll never find comfort in silver and gold...
They were all white girls, and they were very tasteful.
They could do arm movements and they could, you know, get in and go... go to the microphone and come out of the microphone, but that was about it.
♪ Silver and gold, everyone's searching
Suppose silver and gold
Because it was white singers.
We call them the readers.
They couldn't do nothing without that music sitting right in their face.
People would see us walk in.
They wondered what we were doing there.
They handed us our music and we took it like we was pros too, like we would really read this.
Then as you got more into the music, people would want background singers that were free enough to put feeling in what they were singing.
Not saying that those singers back then didn't have feeling, but they were committed to what they saw on the paper.
♪ In silver and gold ♪
- ♪ Shimmy, shimmy to and fro
- ♪ Oh, yeah
♪ Shimmy, shimmy to and fro...
The song that was coming from them was so raw.
That's what it... it was so raw, and so real, that it was hard to deny it.
♪ Shimmy shimmy
It's the dance of the day
♪ Shimmy shimmy
It's new this day
♪ Shimmy shimmy's gonna help us too
♪ With mama and papa and you know who
♪ Shimmy shimmy in my soul
♪ Shimmy shimmy
We'll never grow old
Now this is a surprise!
This is history.
None of us have sung together in 30, 40 years.
I was 15 when I first met them.
- Ain't that something? Fifteen.
- That's not funny.
That's not funny.
But we were really white before you got in,
- and then you added it...
- We had a sweet sound.
She brought guts and... that bottom gospel thing and it made it perfect.
- ♪ Shimmy shimmy
- ♪ Oh, yeah
They made that platform theirs.
The Blossoms made it theirs, and when they came in, every producer in California
and everywhere else, that's the sound they wanted. That was from The Blossoms.
All you had to do is tell them in what direction you were headed, and they took you there.
- See when we had to sound white?
- Yeah, uh-huh.
♪ I met him on a Monday and my heart my stood still
♪ Da-do-ron-ron-ron
Da-do-ron-ron
What was unique about
The Blossoms, we could change our sound.
We worked with people from Buck Owens to James Brown.
♪ Yes, my heart stood still
♪ Yes, his name was Bill
♪ And when he walked me home
♪ Da-do-ron-ron-ron
Da-do-ron-ron ♪
That was perfect, without even rehearsing.
The amazing thing about
Darlene and Fanita and Jean is that they weren't afraid of anybody else that did what they did.
And if that producer asked for a particular person that could do something,
Darlene would say,
"That's not what I do, but I know a girl that can do it."
And that's how she'll get in, and that's how Merry got in.
Can you turn off the radio?
There...
I mean, how could you not have music on,
Morgan, in the Merry Clayton car?
- I know, right?
- That's just...
That's not even logical to me.
See, it's much better for us to add the music later.
I know it, but I'm just saying,
Morgan, how could you...
How could you logically not have a diva have her music on?
I don't get that.
Merry Clayton was always the lead background singer, but she was always a little set apart from that group.
♪ Well, I am a sister
♪ Who can sing
♪ I am a sister who can sing
♪ Oh, but if I die
♪ And my soul be lost
♪ Nobody's fault but mine
I started going to summer school with Merry, and she'd start singing down the street, and I'd go like,
"This girl is amazing."
♪ Nobody's fault but mine
♪ Said nobody's fault
♪ Nobody's fault but mine
♪ I said that no one's fault
- ♪ If I die...
- She had no, uh, no hidden agendas about it.
She just, "That's what I do."
♪ Oh, if I die
♪ And my soul be lost, yeah
♪ Nobody's fault
♪ But mine
♪ Nobody's fault ♪
Ray Charles.
He was the only artist
that my father would allow us to go and see, and I'd stand at the end of the stage with my hand under my chin.
I'd say, "Mm-hmm, I could do this.
I'm gonna be a Raelette one day."
I willed myself to be a Raelette.
Now here are the Raelettes to help us from this portion on.
Mm!
So I was sitting at home one day,
and I got a call from Billy Preston.
"This Bill, what are you doing?"
"Putting some clothes away."
"You gotta drop it and you have to come and sing for Ray."
Oh
♪ When you see me in misery
♪ Come on, baby
See about me now
♪ No, it don't matter
And, of course, you know,
I was totally full of myself by then.
I knew the whole spectrum of what you were supposed to do as a singer.
♪ See the girl with the red dress on
♪ She can filly dog all night long
But I didn't know anything about being an entertainer.
- ♪ Hey
- ♪ Hey
- ♪ Ho
- ♪ Ho
- ♪ Hey, ho
- ♪ Hey, ho
♪ Oh, it's all right
♪ You know it's all right, baby
He said,
"Yes, you're a lead singer, but you're singing with three other ladies, Sister Merry.
So we're gonna teach you how to sing
- with three other people."
- ♪ You know it's all right
♪ It's all right
He's the minister.
The Raelettes are the choir.
He brings that same church format to playing popular music.
Yet he's singing about sex.
- ♪ Shake that thing
- ♪ Shake that thing
- ♪ Hey, baby
- ♪ Shake that thing
Can you imagine
"What'd I Say" that I said already, without kind of an answer to that?
♪ Mmm
♪ Oooh
♪ Uhh... uhh...
- ♪ Shake that thing
- ♪ Shake it, baby
- ♪ Shake that thing
- ♪ Shake that thing ♪
He did a song called
"Together Again."
Oh, Lord, I could not find the second part.
I couldn't hear it.
I did not hit the note, he took his finger
and banged out my note on the piano,
and 5,000 people were in the audience, five... huge show in
Madison Square Garden somewhere.
Bang, bang, bang, bang.
He banged out this note.
After that, I remembered everything.
I was not gonna be made to look like a fool.
- ♪ Baby, let's go home
- ♪ Yeah, let's go home
- ♪ Baby, let's go home
- ♪ Go home, baby
- ♪ Baby, let's go home ♪
- Oh!
A lot of background singers are just background singers.
They don't wanna do all the drama that accompanies trying to be a solo artist.
Actually, very interesting, if you're talking about background singers,
because Lisa made recordings as a solo artist
and she's a brilliant entertainer.
She's really funny.
Sings her butt off.
Could sing alone all day long, but doesn't particularly want to.
Hola.
I don't wanna go to school.
I remember when my mom took me to kindergarten.
I told the teacher, it's like,
"I wrote a song," right?
"I wanna sing it for the class."
She's like, "Oh, yay, good."
I just wouldn't stop.
She had to stop me.
Now she's like, "That was fun."
Being with Lisa is really inspiring, because she's a monster musician.
She just doesn't really talk about it.
I mean, she's as good as it gets.
Everyone knew who Lisa Fischer was.
She was the talk of the town at the time.
It was strange for me to actually see her standing next to two other singers.
It was weird for me.
She's an incredible artist that stands in front of that room, in front of everyone, and demands their attention in a really graceful way.
I love melodies.
I'm... I'm in love with the... the sound vibration and... and what it does with other people.
It's familiar, but it's so special and you're just so happy when you get there.
And you try to stay there for as long as you can.
She's the empress of that world, and, you know, it might not look like she's ego'd out, but it takes a lot of ego to decide you're gonna take that position.
'Cause there's a lot of background singers out there, and she's held...
She's held that fort down for a long time.
For me, singing is about a sharing.
It's never a competition.
But there's this other energy sometimes
that I see going on that just makes me insane, you know.
Gee, who can I call to introduce me to so and so and such and such, but it just... I don't know, something about that feels slimy to me.
I don't know why.
♪ Yeah ♪
To me, there's no more heavenly instrument than the voice.
You can be a great player and you can play things that really move people,
but the voice is the one thing that we all are born with.
I mean, there's so many great singers who are such a massive presence
on so many rock records, people that we don't necessarily know their names,
but that had a huge impact.
I remember, um, yeah, there was a Phil Spector special on.
Um, maybe '65-ish.
♪ Every evening when the sun goes down
- ♪ Whoo
- Hold it. Cut.
And Darlene Love and The
Blossoms were doing this song
that Phil was playing piano on.
♪ Every morning when the sun goes down
- ♪ Whoo
- ♪ Whoo
♪ I lay my head on the pillow down
And I was like 16 maybe.
It just went, like, pow!
That's what you're gonna do.
- Here we go.
- Hey.
- Hi, Darlene.
- Robert.
How about, uh, "Christmas."
- ♪ Christmas
- ♪ Snow coming down
- ♪ Christmas
- ♪ I'm watching it fall
♪ Christmas
Phil Spector was the one that started
with the Wall of Sound.
He wanted everybody to know
it was a Phil Spector session,
not a Darlene Love session or a Crystals session.
It was a Phil Spector session.
♪ They're ringing a song
- ♪ Christmas
- ♪ What a happy sound
They sound so young. Well, they are.
I was 18. I am now 70.
The Spector records...
and it's funny, 'cause though that was a sound we tried to capture ourselves for many, many years.
And did not, because we didn't realize it was the sound of youth, of very young people.
And here Darlene not only had
the incredible personality, but she was a vocal powerhouse.
She captures...
Whatever it is, she captures that particular sound, you know.
Amazing, isn't it?
I was talented and didn't know it.
When we went in to do
"He's a Rebel" I knew it was gonna be for a group he had in New York.
And I went, "This song ain't gonna do nothin' no way.
Let's just go in, take the money."
And it was my first lead voice.
♪ See the way he walks down the street
♪ Watch the way he shuffles his feet
♪ My, he holds his head up high
♪ When he goes walking by
Darlene did a lot of ghosting for records that came out with other people's names on them.
♪ Not just one of the crowd
The Crystals were out on the road with Gene Pitney,
and the record was climbing the charts, going to number one and they had never heard the song before.
♪ He's a rebel and he'll never be any good
♪ He's a rebel 'cause he never ever does what he should
♪ But just because he doesn't do what everybody else does
♪ That's no reason why
I can't give him all my love
It's pretty debilitating to the spirit, I think, to sit at home and watch the song that you sang, and there's someone else lip-synching and no one knows that you did it.
♪ That's no reason why we can't share a love
♪ He is always good to me...
What hurt is when people hear it on the radio
and they go, "Wow, The Crystals.
That's a great song."
And they sitting there telling me that, not knowing I did it.
After the success of
"He's A Rebel," that's when I said, "OK...
He knows how to make hit songs,
so now I need to sign with him."
First of all he changed my name from Darlene Wright
to Darlene Love, and my first record
was supposed to be
"He's Sure The Boy I Love."
So we go into the studio.
I'm signed with him now.
Everything is legal. We record
"He's Sure The Boy I Love," and I'm tootling down the street couple of months later and I hear the disc jockey say,
"Well, the new record by The Crystals."
And I'm going, "Crystals? What'd he do?
Fly them in?" He didn't tell us.
No, it was my voice on "He's Sure
The Boy I Love." So I was really pissed.
You couldn't fit two stars in the room at the same time,
so Phil Spector really kept her in a box.
The best material that she was putting out wasn't even coming out under her name.
What did you think after this song became a hit?
Mad.
'Cause this was a Darlene Love record.
I'm always amazed at how many backup vocalists I've heard and I've encountered who kill me, who I hear 'em and I think,
"Man, you're as good as Chaka
Khan." There's a lot of them.
You won't believe it, man.
Like, um...
Tata Vega, who is an unbelievably great vocalist
and is up there with Aretha. I mean, and... and I'm looking at that,
and I'm thinking to myself,
"What're you doing?"
♪ Speak, Lord
♪ Speak to me
♪ Oh, speak Lord
♪ Won't you speak to me?
I just loved music, is all.
It's all I wanted to do.
♪ I was so lost
I was 16 and I said,
"I wanna go to California.
I don't wanna go to school. I wanna be a famous singer. " Very selfish.
And my dad said, "All right."
You had more of a opportunity on the west coast.
You had exposure.
- Us growing up here in LA...
- Mm-hmm.
- ...was really...
- Hollywood always right down the street.
So we had serious advantage.
Especially with the Motown people.
- With the Motown...
- Yes.
Oh, my God. But I remember too coming up, uh, we would do the long sessions and we would be going home in the morning.
- That's right.
- And people would be just going to work.
Oh, my gosh, Stevie Wonder.
He was it for me.
Tata Vega, uh... incredible voice.
Somebody introduced me, you know, "This is Tata Vega."
"Mm-hmm. Nice to meet you."
And he kept going. I went,
"OK, I gotta do something.
There's a piano."
The only four little teeny chords I know.
And I heard this girl doing all these riffs and like,
I said, "Oh, my God," you know.
He came back.
He said, "You sound like me."
Is that her? Is that the same person? It's like...
Yeah!
I just loved music is all.
It's all I wanted to do.
♪ Oh, listen
♪ The world we know was built on skill
♪ That alone don't count
♪ Ah, you know without the sweat
♪ And toil of mind it wouldn't be worth a dime
It goes back, like I say, to the church call and response.
♪ Pull a fish from the water to the people from the water
♪ To the river to the bank to the happy to the sad
♪ Through the first through the last
There's that guy out front, testifying,
and then there's sorta the community behind him, you know, amen'ing.
♪ Everybody, let's sing
Sing, sing
♪ Well, everybody
Let's sing sing, sing, sing
That was sort of the backup sound
that came straight out of gospel and the church and was secularized.
That was a sound of worldly knowledge.
Ike Turner, oh my goodness. Ike and Tina Turner.
I just... I couldn't believe he asked me if I wanted to start working right away.
And I said,
"Well, yes, of course."
But little did I know he meant that week.
I think we were the first action figures of R&B,
The Ikettes,
the Ike and Tina Turner Review.
The girls were absolutely sensational.
Tina was a force of nature, of course, but they were no slouches either.
They were fantastic.
It was what, peace, love and happiness and, you know, women burning their bras, you know, women's lib,
and the timing was just right for that way to present yourself.
- ♪ Oh!
- ♪ Oh, no
Ike Turner saw himself as a pimp, and he saw his backup singers, even his wife...
- ♪ I do what I wanna do
- ...as the women who worked for him, his hos.
♪ Do what you wanna
♪ When you wanna
♪ Now do your thing, soul sister
He made sure that you had a certain look and that you were able to walk a certain way and dance a certain way.
♪ Now I'm gonna try
There are still artists right now
that view a backup singer as eye candy.
Personally, that's not backup singing.
That's just playing a role.
♪ Let me see you
There's one artist that I've worked with.
I just get chills when I think about how I just was so demoralized, um, at the office.
We were basically naked.
Dress code:
"Make guys excite."
♪ Let me see it
♪ Let me see you
♪ You and I
You know, I tried to look nice
and I tried to carry myself in a decent way, but how it comes across, I mean,
I don't set out to say,
"I'm going to be the sex symbol tonight."
But you posed in Playboy.
There was something in
Playboy, yes, there was.
The English rock scene was just a... a phenomenon.
They were trying to sound black.
Most all of them tried to sound black.
And the only way they could get that sound, they had to use us to get that sound.
Like Led Zeppelin, for example.
Robert Plant or Joe Cocker even.
♪ Once while traveling
♪ Across the sky
♪ This lovely planet caught my eye
Many years ago, when I was singing with Ray,
and I saw this guy contorting in the front row of this concert.
So I'm standing like this, and I'm telling the rest of the girls through my teeth,
"Who is that guy?
What's wrong with him?"
♪ Until we die
♪ We're just learning to live together
♪ Learning to live together
♪ Learning to live together till we die
But what I loved about working with Joe is that he let us be ourselves.
In England, they were like,
"Go for it.
Give us all you have."
That... it was the reason for the innovation of rock and roll.
♪ Oooh
♪ Ooh-hoo
- ♪ Ooh
- ♪ Whoo!
He gave us free rein, and everybody's face would light up, you know.
♪ Whoo!
♪ Ooh
And somebody would start singing something, or someone would start playing something and everybody just...
♪ Until we die
♪ Well, we're learning to live together
And then when I got to A&M, I was coming down the stairs from Lou's office.
Joe was coming on the lot from that front gate and he said,
"There she bloody is."
He said, "I want you to work on all of my records."
♪ Learning to live together
At any moment, you would see
James Taylor coming down the hallway, or you'd see Carole coming out, saying, "Come sing with me."
♪ Till we die ♪
Let me in, honey, to my other home.
Whoo!
What a great studio.
Boy, did we have some times in this studio.
So it was like very late at night and I was very, you know, a little pregnant.
Had curlers and the whole thing in my hair,
getting ready to go to bed.
And we got a call
"Merry, there's a group of guys in town called Rolling...
The Rolling somebodies and they're from England,
and they need somebody that will sing with them."
They picked me up with silk pajamas on, a mink coat, and a
Chanel scarf on my head.
We said, "It'd be wonderful if a woman sang this part about,
that I'd written about rape, murder and all this.
It was in the middle of the night and we thought,
"Well, we would love to have a woman sing this part."
I didn't know her from Adam.
Then she turned up in her curlers.
She was in bed and she got outta bed.
And, you know, it was a kind of raunchy part to sing.
I said, "What?
Rape, murder?
It's just a shot away?"
I started to sing: "it's just a shot away, just a shot away" with Mick.
She sings the lyrics right along me, and with a lot of personality, which is what was needed.
♪ Don't you worry
♪ War, children
♪ It's just a shot away
It's just a shot away
What I liked was that she could sing.
She was able to be Merry.
She didn't have to bring it down.
He said, "You wanna do another one?"
I said, "Sure, I'll do another one."
I mean, she just did it, like, couple of times, you know.
So I said to myself,
"Mm-hmm, I'm gonna do another and I'm gonna blow them outta this room."
I went in again and I did that pass on the part that says,
♪ Rape, murder
Just a shot away
So I had to go up another octave.
♪ Rape, murder
♪ It's just a shot away
It's just a shot away
♪ Rape, murder, yeah
♪ It's just a shot away
It's just a shot away
- ♪ Rape, murder
- Whoo!
♪ It's just a shot away
It's a just shot away
♪ Yeah, yeah
You know, you do these things
at sort of two in the morning, and then you come in the next day and you go, "Bloody hell, that's good."
Yeah. I don't hear a hand clap.
Everybody just tells me,
"You have to bring everything down."
So when the rock and roll world came and said,
"No, we want you to sing," it saved us.
It saved us. Saved our lives.
Lisa, let's practice that.
Lisa, let's do that.
Let's just... just do the coda.
So Vinnie, from the coda.
Just the coda.
♪ Mercury falling
♪ I rise from my bed
♪ Collect my thoughts together
♪ But have to hold my head
- ♪ Seems that she's gone
- ♪ Gone
♪ Leaving me too soon
During "The Hounds of Winter,"
I just indicated to Lisa that she should, you know, vocalize and do something
to evoke the spirit of loneliness.
And out comes this voice, you know, amazing, extraordinary, ghostly voice.
So every time she's performed that with me,
I've asked her to do that.
Lisa, give... you can give me more than that.
Really? OK.
Give me something to play with.
Let me reel you in.
And I'm also intensely proud of my band.
My greatest pleasure is to stand back and let them do what they can do.
And they kick into this song called "Hounds of Winter," and they go to this out vamp.
And Sting was cool enough to say, "All right, go.
Put a spotlight on her and just turn her loose."
Lisa Fischer.
That's a powerhouse voice, you know, and...
I think of her as a star.
She's a star.
She puts her whole self into it and then there's just something totally transcendent that happens.
You're a little feather,
- and somebody just said...
- and you just go.
You just go and you never fall.
You never hit your head.
You just kinda land.
That's what it feels like to me.
The human voice is the most pure expression
coming from your own being.
There's nothing between your soul and your ability and your body and them.
It's not being camouflaged by a trumpet or a saxophone or guitar.
It's pure, and that's why they're so sensitive about it,
because they're putting it out there.
Everything's a mess.
Sorry.
Uh... everything's a mess.
It's just a mess.
Uh, these are old gold albums
I haven't put up yet. Um...
That's something from Tina Turner's tour that was a gift from her.
This is, um, an old poster of Luther Vandross that I love.
I met him right after that tour.
When I auditioned for him,
I walk into the room and he's sitting around the piano and there's this, um, container with some fried chicken in it.
I had to giggle.
I was just like, "Yeah!"
- ♪ And the eagle
- ♪ And the eagle
- ♪ And the eagle flies
- Oh...
And he goes...
♪ And the eagle flies ♪
"Sing this for me."
And I would sing something to him.
He's like, "OK, now can you give that to me with more air?"
And that was like, "More air?"
I was like, "OK."
'Cause, you know, nobody was talking about those subtleties, you know.
A lot of his approach was breath and air.
Sometimes the finesse of a note, like... No turning back
Like, the way you got off a note... Back
- One, two...
- ♪ And there's a rose
I sounded just like that yesterday when I was understudying the note.
He really did.
You know what I'm saying?
I was up there.
- He was up there.
- It was me and John Glenn.
After we were done singing, he says, "Well, " he says,
"if you can dance, you've got this gig."
And I was like, "Yay!"
And then I was like, "Uh-oh."
Wait a minute.
Oh, I've got two left feet.
Lisa.
♪ Are you ready now?
Hoo You sound nice
- ♪ Say it twice
- ♪ Hoo, hoo
♪ Are you ready?
Won't you tell me, doll?
- ♪ Yeah
- ♪ Tell me and then tell me again
- ♪ Hoo, hoo
- ♪ Now do it...
He knew how to pull each gift together and make this beautiful... piece of jewelry.
- ♪ All the way
- ♪ All
You know, when I was a kid buying records
by The Shirelles, by Aretha Franklin, by Dionne Warwick,
one of the first things that appealed to me
were the background vocals, and that remained with me.
Luther was a background singer and a jingle singer in New York.
Back in those days,
Luther was very heavy
and wore three-piece suits, sweating like a pig,
singing like an angel.
Luther Vandross, when I first met Luther Vandross,
I went down to Philadelphia,
David Bowie...
David Bowie invited me down,
1973, to hear...
He was recording
"Young Americans."
And I had one record out and he cut a couple of my songs, and so I was tremendously excited and I took the bus to Philadelphia.
And I went in the studio and I met David and I met the band.
And Luther Vandross was one of the backup singers in David... David Bowie's
Young Americans band.
My God, I can trot on that.
♪ Time, giving it
- ♪ Giving it
- ♪ Keeping it back
That's cool. That's cool.
OK, next one.
Gotta do it this way to get it... One, two...
Well, it was...
It was just fabulous, you know.
And it was David Bowie's soul record, in that sense,
and he called on those voices that were rooted in the church to bring that in, because they bring a world with them, a world with them.
♪ All night
♪ All night
She wants the young American
♪ Young American
Young American
♪ She wants the young American
I believe that, you know, the role of the backup singer evolves as music evolves.
Music was becoming more complicated and richer
and more interesting in the '70s, and so the backgrounds became more sophisticated.
It just became more than vocals.
It was the music.
♪ All night
♪ All night
She wants a young American
♪ Young American
And you find yourself singing what the background singers sang, as much as what the lead singer sang.
♪ Mama's got cramps and look at my hands shake
♪ I heard the news today
Oh, boy
♪ I got a suite and you got defeat
♪ Ain't there a woman
I can sock on the jaw?
♪ Ain't there a man who can say no more?
♪ Ain't there a child I can hold without judging?
♪ Ain't there a pen that will write before they die?
♪ Ain't you proud that you've still got faces?
♪ Ain't there one damn song that can make me
♪ Break down and cry?
- ♪ All night
- ♪ All night
You know, when you
think about the history of pop music
and all the memorable hooks that people sing along with, they're singing with us most of the time, because that's what we do on records.
We come in and sing the hooks.
♪ Wah-wah
♪ You give me a wah-wah
That show was just something that was cosmic.
If you were there to experience it, it will be something you'll take to the grave.
♪ Wah-wah
Claudia Lennear had that exposure, and then the next big moment came for her with, um, The Rolling Stones.
And Claudia Lennear, she was like the really hot one of the... of the Ikettes, you know.
She was a really great dancer, very hot, beautiful girl.
There were a few young ladies in the background world
who were trying to get to the leading men as quickly as possible.
You know, Mick and I had a very special relationship, and we used to have so much fun.
We used to have so much fun, just doing silly things, dressing in each other's clothes.
Just crazy, wacky stuff.
You know,
Mick has his bad boy image
and David had his androgynous look,
but first and foremost, they were just all really sweet.
Well, anyway, she must have enjoyed those times, because she looked like she was.
♪ I don't need no wah-wah
- ♪ Wah-wah
- ♪ And I know how sweet life can be
At that particular time, there was so much going on in the world, with the Civil Rights Movement and the war.
Though there was so much politically going on, you know, you're pretty insulated from it a lot of times
and you only really find it out
when you get out there on the road,
the places that you stay, the people that you talk to.
You're able to see the actual politics and the culture, you know, what's going on in the culture.
It was weird. It was happy, musically, but it was a sad time.
One, two, three.
Turn it up.
I think Clydie King called me for that session.
She said, "There's this guy.
His name is Lynyrd Skynyrd. "
I said, "Really?" She said,
"Yes, and he wants to do this song called 'Sweet Home A...“'
I said, "Alabama?
Honey, nobody wants to sing anything about Alabama."
I certainly didn't wanna sing anything about Alabama.
♪ Well, I heard Mr. Young sing about her
♪ Well, I heard ole Neil put her down
♪ Well, I hope Neil Young will remember
♪ A southern man don't need him around
It was a moment when this idea of black power
had a lot to do with people defining themselves
based on their own ideas, as opposed to white overseer's view
of how one should behave.
We don't give a fuck about whether or not white people are offended.
We're gonna do our thing.
♪ Sweet home Alabama
My husband was 19 years older than I was.
He said, "Oh, you need to sing
'Sweet Home Alabama."'
I said, "Well, why?" He says,
"You'll understand later in life."
He said, "Right now, you don't understand, Merry. You're young.
You don't... you don't really understand."
♪ In Birmingham they love the governor, boo-hoo-hoo
♪ Now we all did what could do
That's what we were doing, we were living.
We were living the moment, living that emotion, creating.
It was basically like a slap in the face. A-ha, sweet home Alabama.
We got your sweet home Alabama.
But we gonna sing you anyway, and we're gonna sing the crap out of you.
If given the opportunity,
we will demonstrate our value beyond any reasonable doubt, so much so that going forward, when you start to define singing, it's going to be based on this transformative sound
coming out of these backup singers' mouths.
My way of being an activist in our struggle as a black people was to do the music.
♪ Lord, Lord, Lord, Lord
It's the last line.
♪ Lord lift us up
♪ Where we belong
♪ Where the eagles cry
♪ On a mountain high
♪ Lord lift us up
♪ Where we belong
♪ Up where the thrill below
♪ Up where the free winds blow ♪
Any song that you can name with background on it, either I was doing it with a bunch of girls,
or either the Waters were doing it.
We always went in the studio with,
"God, we're on this song."
And we would always do our very best, like it was ours.
- Patti LaBelle.
- Patti LaBelle.
- "You Are My Friend."
- "You Are My Friend."
The Bad Girls album.
♪ Toot-toot, ahh, beep-beep
That's when we really cleaned up.
- Whitney Houston.
- Whitney Houston,
"The Greatest Love of All."
- All those LPs.
- The Disney characters.
- Yes.
- That's us on there, the "Small World," you know.
- You hear all that singing.
- Lion King.
- Uh-huh.
- Growing Pains.
As long as we got each other..
The biggest selling record in the history of records,
Michael Jackson's Thriller.
♪ 'Cause this is Thriller
And the biggest selling movie, Avatar.
It's some bird sounds and things like that.
Stuff like that, you know, different things... But doing this kinda just took us away from doing our own records, you know, and stuff like that, which we used to do.
Singing, you know, oohs and aahs and...
It's kinda fun for a minute.
Uh...
I'm not sure if I'd like to do it for a living.
♪ I love you baby like a flower loves the spring
♪ And I love you baby like a robin loves to sing
♪ And I love you baby, like the schoolboy loves to play
♪ Oh, and I love you baby
♪ River deep and mountain high
Phil Spector's name started getting big,
my name started getting big, because the rock and roll people like Bruce and Elton John and Stevie wanted to know who that girl singer was.
♪ I want you baby
I mean, she without question, is a lead singer.
You started to pick up that voice and you began to have an allegiance to that voice.
♪ River deep, mountain high
♪ If I lost you, would I cry?
That made me wanna be out there by myself even more as a solo artist.
♪ Baby, baby ♪
I saw then I'd have to leave that group to become a solo singer.
Singing background, to me, it was like a rehearsal for what I was gonna do for my project.
I wanted to sing as Merry Clayton, to the masses. I wanted to get my stuff out to the masses, and God sent me Lou Adler.
Merry consciously wanted to be a solo artist and a star.
Whenever Merry appeared, standing ovations.
I mean, it's as if they never had seen or heard someone like that.
♪ Southern man
You'd better keep your head
♪ Don't forget what your good book said
When it came to my project, I was gonna kick ass and take names.
♪ Southern man
When will you pay them back?
♪ I heard screaming
♪ Bullwhip cracking
♪ How long? How long?
♪ How long?
Baby, how long?
She made three really good albums.
They all sound like somebody that's as big as Aretha Franklin.
♪ Why don't you get yourself together?
♪ Get your heart, your mind
♪ And your soul together, oh
I think Lou did a great job
and A&M did a great job promoting my records here.
I think you do, number one, have to have that kill spirit,
to really want it.
Now, Merry Clayton got the kill spirit.
I don't know why she wasn't a superstar.
♪ One day I'm gonna cut him down
♪ You see I heard screaming
♪ Bullwhips they were cracking
♪ How long? Oh, how long?
♪ Can you tell me?
♪ Oh, southern man keep your head
We did everything possible, and it just didn't take.
The industry, it was controlled.
There were rules.
She was a gospel singer.
There's only one Aretha.
You know, and that's the way they felt in those days.
It could only be Aretha.
Only could be Diana Ross.
♪ Good book said
♪ Well, you can't forget what your
- ♪ Good book said
- ♪ Oh
Yes, I became frustrated at one time, said, "Damn, the record didn't go any further than this?
What're we doing wrong?"
I felt like if I just gave my heart to what I was doing,
I would automatically be a star.
♪ Southern man ♪
I think what happens with the whole issue of background versus lead singing is, you know, the material that you're given
and how you work with producers.
In the mid '70s, Darlene
Love is finally freed from her contract with Phil Spector.
I had signed with Gamble and Huff.
Who were, at that time, the hottest thing out there.
And I say, "OK, here's my career.
It's gonna really go now."
And, uh, there was another door I ran into.
Within weeks, they sell her contract back to Phil Spector
and the nightmare continues.
This was the new Phil Spector.
He did the Beatles thing and, you know, he was a big star,
so now he's gonna act like a big star in front of this little star,
Darlene Love, and I wasn't having it.
It got to be so bad,
I just said, "You know what?
I've had it."
That's what I said to myself.
Took the earphones off my ears, put 'em in the chain
picked up my coat, put it on and walked out the studio.
I didn't see Phil Spector no more for over 20 years.
Many of these singers came out of the music business at a time when the singer depended on a songwriter, somebody who knew how to feature their voice, somebody who knew how to create a hit arrangement.
Those are a lot of things to be dependent upon, you know.
And I know so many people with incredible voices, but if you don't find someone who understands who you are, you can be a great singer and just not... and that... just not make that next step, you know. There's...
I mean, the country's filled with them, you know.
There's no guarantees in entertainment.
There's no... no guarantees.
I had been offered the chance to go solo several times,
and then ultimately, I ended up with Warner Brothers.
The studio was smoking.
It was just... and it was just amazing.
It was just amazing and...
And how was the record received?
Mm... not that well.
If you are out there and your name is on that doggone marquee, the pressure is on 'em, and sometimes that can... that can cause, uh, problems in a person's life.
I had a contract as a solo artist and then I was kept on, but shelved.
So I was on Motown, but not.
And it hasn't been easy.
You know, there's stuff that goes on with people.
I had a daughter to raise.
I had a band to support.
I mean, it just got crazy.
The kind of feeling that you get
from people screaming in the audience, if you're always looking for that in life, you're gonna crash.
The focus wasn't on music anymore.
I had to send my daughter to live with my brother and his kids, while I was trying to scrape things together to pay the gas bill.
I remember her putting out a record, but then I looked up and then...
I didn't see Claudia anymore.
She said thank you and goodnight, that's what she said.
I thought people would be banging down my door for deals,
and it didn't happen like that.
"You're too fat.
You're too old.
You know, you should seriously think about another career."
And after that, it's hell.
I think if I had "made" it, like what the world... millions of dollars, all that,
I probably wouldn't be sitting in this chair talking to you right know,
'cause I would have OD'd somewhere.
It's not a level playing field.
It never is a level playing field, and you come into life understanding that. It's not about fairness.
It's not really about talent, you know.
It's... circumstance, it's luck. It's destiny.
I don't know what it is, but the best people deal with that.
Working with Michael really did inspire me,
and saying like, "Wow, it's OK to dream this big.
It's OK to realize your dreams."
♪ I still believe
♪ Someday
♪ You'll come around
She's representational of what's happening with background singers at this point. I know she aspires to be a solo artist, though.
♪ I pray
This last tour, I heard from other friends that were with Michael that he just loved her and, of course, she got the job.
You know, we were so excited for him and for us to be able to do this show, and it was coming together.
I can't do that.
But you're fine to do it.
I gotta save my voice.
♪ I ain't going nowhere
♪ 'Cause I...
And then all of a sudden, we're on our way to rehearsal
and we get the news and it's like,
"You gotta be kidding me.
Like, how's that even possible?"
♪ We'll always be waiting
♪ So somewhere in me
It's such an overwhelming shock just to go from
almost on our way to this huge show,
to all of a sudden, he's gone.
♪ You ♪
I was crying throughout the service
and I wasn't really emotionally in a place to sing, but, actually, it wasn't too unfamiliar to me, because that kind of feeling and that reverence
reminded me a lot of church service,
so that's how I felt when I was there.
But, you know, I didn't really realize at the time
billions of people were watching it.
And a star is born.
♪ We are the world
Judith, thank you so much for joining us. Just 24 hours ago,
I think you were brought to the world's attention by doing one of Michael's most famous songs ever.
Well, what you saw...
When you're a background singer, it is a springboard in the beginning, but it can easily become quicksand if that's not what you wanna do.
Ever since the Michael Jackson experience,
I've turned down almost every background singing gig, because I knew that if I kept doing it,
then becoming an artist would become more difficult.
I think the world needs to hear her
and I didn't want her to go the way of background singing.
I put together the girls for Elton to go on tour and they wanted Judith.
Elton loves Judith, but I think she had to make a decision,
"Do I really wanna be a solo artist?"
And she's trying to do it, because she writes songs.
We in the music industry, especially African American people, need to know our worth.
We need to know, as women, we're important.
And I think the breakdown is when a woman doesn't know who she is and she settle for less.
Check out your worth,
because you're worth more than that.
I couldn't sleep.
I was getting in such a depressed state,
I called my mother and father, asked them
if they would take care of my kids.
And the most enjoyment I got back in those days was singing in church.
That's the only place that I was actually singing during those times.
Only thing I thought I could do and make a little money to survive, you know,
I started cleaning houses.
Not the great Darlene Love.
She's not doing... cleaning houses.
I said, "Yes, the great Darlene Love is.
She is cleaning houses. "
One particular Christmas,
I was cleaning this lady's bathroom.
And "Christmas
(Baby Please Come Home)",
my Christmas record,
came on the radio while
I was cleaning this bathroom.
And I just looked up and just said,
"OK, all right, Darlene, this is not where you're supposed to be.
You're supposed to be singing.
There's a whole world out there who wants to hear you sing."
And then the move from California to New York, my career just took off.
Nice to have you here.
Everything OK with you?
- Wonderful.
- Thanks for being here.
- Come and sing it next year.
- Of course.
I hope you have a good holiday.
I have to plan what I'm going to do. I have to take a little job.
The bastards got my daughter.
Just so you can keep your name out there.
But if I didn't do those jobs, then nobody would really know who Darlene Love was.
As a young person,
I thought everybody could sing.
When you start getting older, then you realize, everyone is not the same, that these are gifts,
and you have to share and go out into the world.
Whoo!
Oh, my girlfriend and I took these.
It was supposed to be closed.
You see the zipper is broken.
I swear it was closed.
It started out closed.
Here, yes. It's my Grammy.
I just kinda keep 'em here.
I don't know what to do with it.
I don't know what to do with it.
- You're looking fantastic.
- Thank you.
- I've gotta tell this story.
- OK.
The first time
I met you, I met Lisa, was you were singing background on my record.
- Yes...
- "I Know How To Make You," right.
♪ I know how to make you love me, baby
That's right, that's right.
And I have to tell you,
I mean, everyone in the industry knows Lisa Fischer.
I wasn't deep in search of a record deal.
It was just one of those things that just blossomed, you know, and I was really fortunate.
♪ How can I
♪ Ooh
I just... I think she is a freak of nature
that I've never seen before.
♪ How can I ease
And the Grammy goes to... Lisa Fischer,
"How Can I Ease the Pain?"
- ♪ How can I ease
- ♪ How can I ease the
♪ Oh, pain, baby
I have to thank Luther Vandross.
That's the first thing I have to do.
Without him, none of this would have been possible for me.
She has her own Grammy. She has her own recording contract with Elektra Records.
It's different when you're singing background for someone, you know, because you're so into making them happy, making sure that they have what they need.
But then, once you're doing your own thing, it's like you have to try to understand what it is you need and what's gonna make you happy.
Give it up. Lisa Fischer.
I was working on a second record and...
I don't know, it just took too long.
It took too long, and there was this window, and it just took too long.
I just don't think anyone knew what to do with me.
I don't think
I knew what to do with me.
That's something
I never really understood,
just the business part of it.
It takes a tremendous amount of energy to be a solo artist and a tremendous amount of ego to want to do that.
And she's never had that kind of ego.
I think there is a psychology behind it.
I think most background singers will agree
that we're not really good self-promoters.
You know, the industry is for those who put themselves on display and are willing to play the game, and some people aren't.
In a strange way, the gulf between the lead singer
and that group of backup singers couldn't be wider.
You're going into a group format where you sacrifice individuality in order to arrive at that blend.
And the blend is something that's not just infectious for the listener.
It's... it's the transformative experience for the singer.
And some people just wanna stay there.
Real musicians,
there's a spiritual component to what they do.
It's got nothing to do with worldly success.
Their music is much more of an inner journey.
Any other success is just cream on the cake.
There's this idea that you can go on American Idol and suddenly become a star, but you may bypass the spiritual work that you have to do to get there, and if you bypass that, then your success will be wafer thin.
People lose the heart of a lot of it because they haven't grown up with, you know, having to go through that, what I call wood shedding, having to really say,
"OK, let me focus in on...
this is what we need to do."
There's a budget right now, in every... every recording budget that says "for tuning."
And that's, you know, how many hours are allowed for tuning.
And I said, "What's that?"
"Oh, we have to tune all the vocals."
"Well, why don't they sing in tune?"
"Well, it just takes too much time and it's too hard."
And so they just sing and then they tune 'em all.
And that's ridiculous to me.
Please welcome Kylie Minogue.
Well, good evening, everyone.
How you feeling?
Actually, I've gotten a lot of criticism.
I've done a couple of gigs
I thought I would get, just get away with, you know.
And I even put a wig on.
I put, like, a straight-hair wig.
Like, on this Jay Leno gig,
no one's gonna know it's me. And then
I get these tweets from fans, like,
"How could you do this? You're singing in front of... behind her, and, you know, you go from Michael to..."
And like just criticism, and I'm like,
"How did you even know that was me?"
But I'm, like, right in the transitional stage here.
I am not at a position where
I can turn down everything, because all of these things as an artist are really expensive and my dreams are huge.
So I have been doing some background singing on the side.
♪ I want to stop and thank you with this now
♪ How sweet it is to be loved by you
♪ Oh, yes, it is, yeah
♪ How sweet it is
With Judith, I knew that she had an incredible voice.
I know that she sang in church, and it was a really wonderful thing when I heard her songs.
I said, "You're gonna do something."
♪ How sweet it is to be loved by you
Stevie is very excited about me as an artist as well.
He's really shown that.
But it's just an honor to just be able to... I don't really care.
I mean, I just love singing with him regardless, you know.
As much as you're enjoying this,
don't let your dream disappear, because you wanna be with me or be around me.
You gotta step out there and do your thing.
♪ Sing, dah-dah-dah-dah-dah
People singing together
has always meant to me people coming together.
What moves people is the humanness of it, not the machine.
That's not the same as someone singing and playing to you and putting their heart into it.
And great background singers, you know, it's moving.
For a long time,
I'd say a good five years,
you couldn't hear a background on a record.
You wouldn't hear anybody doing a hum or an "ooh" or a "la" or... or an answer line or anything.
Nothin'.
There's not as much work for background singers,
because different ones have called me over the years and just asked me, "Are you working?
'Cause my phone hasn't been ringing."
A lot of home studios, people have their families singing,
doing all the vocal parts themselves.
It's just put a lot of singers out of work.
When you get to the '90s,
you're starting to see major structural changes.
The big recording sessions associated with the '70s and the '80s,
they're not happening anymore.
People didn't want to pay the background singer,
'cause they don't think they need it.
They were saying,
"Hey, we don't have to...
We don't have to write that check," not realizing that was the sound.
And that's why Joe Cocker and The Stones and Rod Stewart,
David and all of these wonderful people, they have their singers there.
They need those background singers.
You do tend to wonder, is there a cutoff point
or is there a way to leave this occupation or this life without dying of heartbreak or, you know, or just, is it the biggest jones of all?
You get hooked on music, you are fucked, you know.
When you get into a relationship, you know, there's an energy.
It's like when you see a married couple walking into a room.
You see them part, but you still feel that string that binds them.
I never really had that.
So I always felt like I belonged to everyone, you know, a part of my heart, a part of who I am belongs to everybody.
So, I mean, sometimes when I, you know, talk to my friends who have children or who are married,
I think to myself,
"Hmm, maybe I should've gotten married and had some kids and done all that kinda thing."
But... I'm good.
I am so good.
Lisa is so incredibly versatile,
then you almost, you're so talented, you almost get like option anxiety.
Well, what do I do?
Should I stay with the R&B thing?
Well, R&B was so big at the time.
Then you're up against Whitney and Mariah and blah and blah and blah.
Then, maybe I should do a little bit more of the rock thing.
And her phone rings and it's Mick Jagger and he says, "Join The Stones," and that's a hard thing to, you know, to turn away from, you know.
That's a...
♪ Rape, murder
♪ It's just a shot away
It's just a shot away
♪ Rape...
It's great to have the female voice, you know, otherwise it's me, me, me, me and me and then it's a bit of Keith and...
But still, you know, it's still the same kind of masculinity.
And then when you can get someone like Lisa to step out and you've got a whole new voice out there.
It's like, I could hear how Mick was singing it and I, you know, react to him a certain way.
♪ My very life today
Like nobody else was in the room.
It was freeing in a weird way.
♪ Gimme shelter
♪ Or I'm gonna fade away
Why isn't she promoting herself
and why is she out with
The Rolling Stones all the time?
It's because she's comfortable doing that.
She loves doing it and she's got it all to herself.
She's not stupid.
♪ It's just a shot away
It's just a shot away
♪ It's just a shot away
Shot away, shot away
I wanna be able to walk the streets and not have to worry about, you know, putting on sunglasses and hiding out and, you know, the tits up in the air and, you know... I just... I...
I'm just... I'm not feeling that.
I'm just not feeling that.
♪ It's just a kiss away
It's just a kiss away
♪ Kiss away, kiss away
Kiss away
Some people will do anything to be famous, and then there are other people who just will sing.
It's not about anything except being in this special space with people, and that is really the higher calling to me.
Seemingly, every time I get ready to do something really big, or something really, really wonderful, something would just happen that would just knock me to my knees, you know.
You don't want everybody to know you got this at Pick 'n Save.
Ha!
I said, "God, what is this?
Am I not supposed to be doing this?
If I'm not supposed to be doing this, then show me I'm not supposed to be doing this, and I won't do it, you know."
But I never was shown.
- Amen.
- Praise the Lord.
And I just stay cool, stay humble,
stay beautiful and just do the work.
Thank you.
Thank you so much.
If somebody says, "You're gonna become an international superstar, "
of course everyone would spend the money and do that.
But if you're living in a little place and you have no money
and you got a little bit saved and they say,
"You gotta risk all of that and you still might be working
McDonald's tomorrow,"
I think you gotta be absolutely crazy to go after it like that, yeah.
It was just...
I came to a fork in the road and music wasn't on it.
Meaning, "I'm sorry,
I'm very sorry, or..."
I've been teaching
Spanish for ten to 15 years.
♪ Maybe you're where you're supposed to be
♪ Safely kept within the crowd
It's always been a missing link.
♪ You're looking for a reason to break free
It's been a regret that I didn't just hang in there,
especially when I see my contemporaries progressing in their musical lives.
♪ Try to let it out
♪ So much worse
I never said it wasn't for me, never.
If I did, I was lying to myself.
It's always been for me, always.
Just do it. Maybe that's one way to get rid of that gnawing once and for all.
♪ Oh, chance
♪ We all need
We all need, we all need
♪ We all need a little desperation
Let's have a warm, warm welcome for Miss Judith Hill.
♪ Do you want, do you want
♪ Do you want
♪ Do you want a little inspiration?
♪ 'Cause every wound
Every wound, every wound
♪ Really needs a little desperation
There's machines that make people stars that don't have talent.
They don't really sing live.
Someone could have done that for Judith,
but I think what she has is deeper, and maybe selling 500 million records is not the best thing for her.
♪ Let it out
♪ So much worse
if you don't try now
It's more than just leaning on your talent. You gotta be disciplined.
Gotta get up in the morning.
You gotta go do it.
♪ Take a chance
♪ Take a chance...
Opportunity's knocking.
Open the door. Get going, kiddo.
♪ We all need, we all need
We all need
♪ A little desperation
♪ Can I have, can I have
Can I have
In these times that we're living in right now,
a lot of it is based on so many other things
that have nothing to do with music.
♪ Do you want a little inspiration?
But, you know, at the end of the day, it's up to you to perfect that gift that you've been given.
Put your spirit into that song.
Focus on the words that you're singing.
Get into the experience of what you're singing about and sing your heart out.
♪ A little desperation ♪
Every time you get up, you might fall down, but you gotta get back up again, you know, and believe me when I tell you, it's not easy, especially at my age.
I didn't start my solo career till I was 40.
Tonight marks the 25th anniversary of a favorite holiday tradition here at The Late Show.
Ladies and Gentlemen, please welcome the remarkable Darlene Love.
♪ Sometimes in our lives
♪ We all have pain
♪ We all have sorrow
♪ But if we are wise
♪ We know that there's
♪ Always tomorrow
- ♪ Lean on me
- ♪ Lean on me
♪ When you're not strong
♪ And I'll be your friend
♪ I'll help you carry on
And now it is my honor and pleasure to induct into the Rock and Roll Hall of Fame, and about time too,
Miss Darlene Love.
♪ Somebody to lean on
♪ Please follow your pride
Thank you,
Rock and Roll Hall of Fame.
I am truly honored and overwhelmed.
♪ Tomorrow
So many of us,
Merry Clayton, the Waters,
we stand on her shoulders.
My mother told this one lady,
"Oh, my daughter's in New
York now. She's on Broadway.
And they go, "What daughter?" Said,
"The one that used to clean your house."
- ♪ Lean on me
- ♪ Lean on me
- ♪ When you're not strong
- ♪ Lean on me
♪ And I'll be your friend
♪ I'll help you carry on
- ♪ For
- ♪ Lean on me
- ♪ It won't be long
- ♪ Lean on me
♪ Till I'm gonna need
♪ Somebody to lean on
I've seen artists come and go,
and I look around on stage and it's the same players.
They're in the game, or they've stayed in the game and they're legends and they're amazing.
♪ Lean on me
- ♪ When you're not strong
- ♪ When you're not strong
- ♪ I'll be your friend
- ♪ I'll be your friend
- ♪ I'll help you carry on
- ♪ Yes, I will
Singing background, it helped me find me.
It got back to the love of music.
♪ Somebody to lean
- ♪ Lean on me
- ♪ Lean on me
- ♪ When you're not strong
- ♪ When you're not strong
- ♪ I'll be your friend
- ♪ And I'll be your friend
- ♪ I'll help you carry on
- ♪ Yes, I will, yes, I will
- ♪ For it won't be long
- ♪ It won't be long
♪ Till I'm gonna need
We have a gift.
We can hear a song
and find our part and harmonize with it.
Children on the corner's doing it.
Little babies do it when they learn to sing.
It's the gift coming out.
Now, what you do with the gift is you.
Like the old days.
OK, next session.
My boy!
I've got so much love in my heart for him, and I just don't feel like me when he's not around.
Yeah, there are boys and there are boys,
- but he's a...
- ♪ Fine, fine boy
♪ I wanna tell the world about the boy I love
♪ Just the kind of guy
I've been dreaming of
♪ He's so sincere
When he holds me tight
♪ When I'm blue
He makes me feel all right
♪ He even takes me places and buys me things
♪ But love is more important than a diamond ring
♪ All I wanna do is stay by his side
♪ Take care of him and
I'll be satisfied
♪ 'Cause he's got a sweet, sweet kiss
♪ And a true, true heart
♪ Something tells me that we'll never part
♪ He's got a sweet, sweet kiss and a true, true heart
♪ And he's fine, fine, fine
♪ No, he's fine, fine, fine
♪ Let me tell you
He's a fine, fine boy
- ♪ Yeah
- ♪ Fine, fine boy
♪ I know he's fine
And he's mine
- ♪ He's a fine, fine boy
- ♪ Yeah, he's mine
- ♪ He's fine
- ♪ He's a fine, fine boy
♪ Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah
♪ He's mine
He's a fine, fine boy ♪
Whoo!
Darlene Love!
Q-Tip: Look alive.
Look at Phife Dawg.
Q-Tip: What's up, Malik?
You all right? You not talking to me?
Phife: No, not right now.
Q-Tip: What the fuck is wrong with you?
What the fuck is wrong with you?
Phife: I don't give a fuck how you feel.
Fuck you, Kamaal.
Q-Tip:
What the fuck is wrong with you, man?
Q-Tip:
What the fuck is wrong with you?
Ali: I gotta go start the show!
Phife's mom: No, because
I don't want you all to fight, Malik.
I hope it is.
Yeah. It's disappointing.
The guys probably know my sentiments about it.
I'm a fan. To me, I feel like when we see Tribe on-stage...
...we want to believe that there's love.
And if it's really not...
...and behind the scenes it's some BS going on...
...I'd rather them not be up there.
Hey, Chico, how's it going?
Hey, Rosa!
You're listening to "Yesterday's Melodies"
And now for a song that won the "RHC Cadena Azul" contest sixty years ago.
"A Little Taste of Me" by Chico and Rita.
HAVANA 1948
Bourbon!
- Make it two!
- No.
Not whiskey.
Four mojitos, you gotta see what drinking really is!
Ramon...
Kiss me, kiss me, as if tonight was the last time
Ok, ladies, a toast.
To us!
To us!
Time to switch partners!
Who's your hick friend?
Who him?
That's Chico. Unknown, but he's the hottest piano player in Cuba!
Oh, really?
Time to switch partners!
Who do you think you are?
Me? I'm Chico.
You?
- Leave me alone!
- Oh, Miss Leave-Me-Alone!
Is that the Leave-Me-Alones from Santiago or Matanzas?
Try the Leave-Me-Alones from Buzzoff-ville!
Some girls come from far away just to get a little buzz.
Be my guest!
Don't let me stop you!
Nah, I like you better than that!
Right! That explains why you're all over me.
Man, she's just what I need!
Yeah, tell me about it!
No, man, don't you get it? She's the singer we've been looking for.
With her, we'll be shoo-ins to win the contest.
Damn it, you're right!
- We've got to talk to her!
- I know where she hangs out!
- You know her?
- No, but I know where she goes.
Those Yank chicks wanna head over to the Tropicana.
Woody Herman's band is playing there.
How can I say this?
Hey guys, it's time to go!
Relax.
Wow, Chico.
- Come in, the coast is clear!
- Thanks, buddy, I owe you one.
This is the performers' entrance.
- Performers...
- Thanks.
Get lost!
Good evening, ladies and gentlemen, dearest music-lovers.
Please excuse the delay in tonight's main attraction due to technical difficulties.
We hope to be with you shortly.
Meanwhile, we hope you will continue to enjoy the tantalizing sounds of the
Tropicana Orchestra!
This is the best nightclub in Havana!
I'm sorry... sorry.
Are you following me?
Me following you?
What are you, the Queen of Sheba?
Then why don't you leave me alone?
Because if I leave you alone,
I know I'll never be able to live with myself.
I don't know you either and yet I feel like I've been waiting for you all my life!
- I hear you're a piano player!
- The best!
I hope you're right.
Follow me!
What's up man?
The band's piano player had an accident and he's in hospital.
Hey, wait for me!
I'm his agent.
And now, what we've all been waiting for!
Straight from New York:
Woody Herman and the Four Brothers Band!
Who are you?
Rita, at your service.
Coming.
Take it easy, man.
Ok, we get out here.
Hey.
- What do I do with these two?
- Want me to paint you a picture?
Bye!
Bebop.
Be-what?
That's the sound in New York now!
You can play with the best bands.
All the top Cubans are there.
Mario Bauza, Miguelito Valdés,
Machito. Even Chano Pozo!
Chano Pozo is now playing with the Dizzy Gillespie Band!
What's that lovely tune you are playing?
Take it down a key.
- Let me in!
- Not now. Come back later.
Who's in there?
Another one of your Yankees?
I told you to come back later!
No way!
You're planning on taking off to New York with one of them and
I want to see what the big deal is!
I see, this time your little friend's not a Yankee.
Get out of here! There's plenty of men around here! This one's mine!
Was yours!
Now he's my man!
You don't know what this guy's like.
And you don't know who you're messing with. Beat it!
Go on!
I'll show you what it means to steal a man from a woman like me!
Hey, watch those hands!
Don't touch me!
- Get your dirty hands off me!
- Bitch!
- Let me go!
- You let go first!
If I get hold of that face!
Let me go!
Don't scratch me, you bitch!
I'll kill you!
You're crazy!
Tell her to go.
Tell her to get dressed and get lost!
Juana, Juana...
Get outta here!
Ow!
Sure you don't have more girls hiding under the stairs?
Don't worry,
I'm gonna leave the door open so you can service them all!
Get off! Rita!
Let her go, Chico! Let her go!
Rita!
Hey, you, don't run so fast!
You want him?
You can have him!
He's all yours!
I'm leaving too.
Wasn't that what you wanted?
Shit!
Shit!
What gives, Chico?
You've been chosen for the competition and you don't care!
- I need a singer.
- I know a hundred.
That can sing my arrangements?
I get it.
You've fallen in love!
That's it, right?
Hey, buddy, only whites allowed.
Look, man, I just want to give a message to my sister.
If I had a sister, I'd be damned if I let her work here!
Whatever you say, you're the boss!
Ok, see you.
- Ciao!
- Ciao!
See you around, Angel.
I'll come by soon!
Good evening, Rita!
Did you lose something?
I think I just found it.
Well, that's good news.
- Got ten pesos you can spare?
- Ten?
Stick with me and you'll make much more.
Oh, really?
What's your cut?
Twenty percent.
Hey, I don't need anybody hustling me!
So, beat it!
It's been a nightmare of a night.
Rita!
Rita! Hey, wait up!
- What if she doesn't show up?
- Relax, she'll show.
- How can you be so sure?
- Because...
Look, there she is!
Coming up,
Contest Couple Number 21.
Chico and Rita!
For so long we have enjoyed
This love
Our souls got so close
That I keep your taste
But you also carry a taste of me
You got what you wanted.
Satisfied?
Of course, you guys are the perfect couple!
They announce the winners at the Fausto theater at 10 PM tonight.
- Don't let me down!
- But don't forget,
I'm only doing it for the money!
Hey, come here!
What did you tell him?
Me? Nothing. You know me,
I wouldn't breathe a word!
Wait... wait up!
- Where you headed?
- Let me give it a shot!
What are you doing, man?
You don't know the first thing about riding bikes.
I'll bring it back tonight.
Goddammit!
What are you doing here?
Is your neighborhood off-limits?
- I don't like people being nosey.
- Who does that house belong to?
Do I ask you about the floozies crawling around your place?
You telling me you live with another man?
Is that him?
I told you he'd make you suffer.
- Rita, let's just forget it.
- Ok.
I'll forget about you and you forget about me.
Come on, baby!
You mean nothing to me!
I don't know you from Adam!
Don't even think about following me!
You know what?
I'd kiss the ground you walk on if you lived in a cleaner neighborhood.
And now, the moment we've all been waiting for.
Especially our contestants.
The grand prize, as you all know, is 500 pesos plus a one-month contract at the Hotel Nacional.
And the winners of the Fourth Annual RHC
Cadena Azul Amateur Contest are...
Couple Number 21!
Chico and Rita!
A song that was a hit more than fifty years ago.
By Chico and Rita.
You're listening to "Yesterday's Melodies" on Radio Progreso.
I never meant to own you,
I was a nobody, lacking vanity
I gave you
The best of my life
You have a marvelous voice.
One of those voices that you have to listen to with your eyes closed.
Of course, in your case it would be a shame.
You see those girls over there?
I could take any one of them and make a star out of her.
They're dying for somebody to discover them.
Like I've done with you.
What's your price?
The price of success is success.
I mean real success.
And I'm not talking Havana.
I'm talking New York!
New York?
My dream!
Is that a "yes"?
It's an "of course" as in "when do we leave?".
Now you're talking!
But where's Chico's name?
Chico?
Hey, honey, how can I leave without him?
New York is full of piano players.
Chico's not just a piano player.
Chico is... well, Chico.
Wait.
Leave me alone!
Is that what you like?
Having these guys at your beck and call?
I'm sure you didn't tell him to get lost.
You were straight in there.
And where are you going with him?
Oh, let me guess.
Why settle for a shit-hole of a room when you can have a suite at the Nacional?
All settled.
I still don't see Chico's name.
Two names or none!
Chico!
Chico!
What's up?
- I'm looking for Chico.
- I didn't hear him arrive.
She hears what she wants to hear.
She says she's deaf, but she doesn't miss a thing.
- Well, you two sure keep her busy.
- They keep me up every night.
If you want to come up here, we can wait for him together.
- Pour me another!
- Ok, but this one's your last.
C'mon, man, why don't you go home and sleep it off?
Hey, Juana.
Do me a favor and take him home with you.
No problem.
Hey, baby.
Don't worry.
Mommy's gonna take good care of you.
She'll put you to bed, tuck you in...
Juana, I can walk on my own, ok?
Who loves you, baby?
Who loves you, Chico?
Exactly, who loves me, huh?
Your Juanita...
Chico.
Ramon!
So you were leaving without saying goodbye?
Do you want me to say anything to him?
Yeah.
Tell him I don't ever want to see him again!
You know something?
I never would have let you go.
It's a pity
I didn't fall in love with you.
A pity.
Ok, so we're all square!
Chico!
I know how to find Chano Pozo.
His sister gave me a letter for him.
He can make it happen for us over there in New York.
My name is Chico!
It used to be.
Chico!
Chico, get up!
Chico!
Chico, get up!
- Get up, brother!
- What's going on?
Guess what?
We're arriving!
New York!
New York!
Dammit!
Careful, bro.
Let's go. Rita should be getting ready for the first show.
- Rita Labelle?
- La-belle.
I like it. Sounds classy.
Follow me!
Come on.
For Rita Labelle?
I'll take them, thanks.
Here!
Wait.
I'll do the honors!
Scram!
"I needed to kiss you again"
What are you doing here?
Didn't Ramon tell you that
I never wanted to see you again?
- I need to talk to you.
- Where's your girlfriend?
- Why didn't you bring her?
- She means nothing to me!
That's what you said, and then I found you two making out!
Enough already!
One day you drop me, the next you come looking for me!
You think you can do what you want with me?
Rita, I know I've been a jerk, but I'm here now and I love you.
We're not... in Cuba and
I'm not the girl you used to know!
You're still the same girl to me!
Don't you realize that everything's changed?
Look at me!
That girl you reduced to tears stayed back in Havana!
Go away!
Get outta here!
Go and don't come back!
Whatever you say.
Come on, it's not the end of the world.
Hey, we're in New York!
Look... I think this is the place.
It's Charlie Parker!
Look, that one over there is Chano Pozo!
Chano Pozo!
Hey, who's the guy with the hat?
Where did you two escape from?
Did Cuba sink or something?
I was supposed to be down South right now with Dizzy Gillespie.
But you know why I'm here?
Because we're not allowed in a lot of places down there either.
We have to use the service entrance at hotels, sit in the back of buses.
There are even different bathrooms.
There are more sons of bitches there than in Cuba, man.
Shit, be careful!
Gotta keep movin'.
You did right in coming.
Machito, Mario Bauza,
Miguelito Valdes, Arsenio...
They're all here.
People are crazy about Cuban music.
All they wanna dance is mambo, conga...
Our time has come!
Let's get high!
- What the hell is this?
- Let me see.
Shit!
I think they sold you oregano!
- Oregano?
- Oregano!
Gimme that!
That son of a bitch!
- C'mon, man, let's go!
- Where?
If you think you can cheat me, you better think again!
Listen up, Cabito!
Nobody cheats Chano Pozo!
Tell your friends.
Nobody screws with Chano Pozo!
Here, rule number one is: respect!
Your beers are gonna get warm!
It's party time! Cuba!
New York!
What's that Bebop shit?
Cu-bop!
That's what it is!
Mantecaaa!
Chano!
Chano...
Chano!
Chano Pozo,
To your memory I sing this rumba as a tribute to your work
May God take you in His bosom and offer you His goodness
May the Holy Spirit help you rest in peace
Chano Pozo, Chano Pozo,
Cuba and the rumba mourn for you
Those juicy contracts will be coming soon. Trust me.
This is just to keep you finely tuned.
What now?
Another birthday for white kids?
It's a private party on Park Avenue for some big fish.
I think a Hollywood producer is gonna be there.
At least, you'll eat well!
- Where did you leave the car?
- We'll go in yours!
We'll do what?
Kidney beans!
Eat, baby, eat!
- That's delicious!
- Sit down, sit down!
It's an honor to have you right here in my kitchen!
You look like a Yankee!
But I still like kidney beans.
I've seen you in magazines.
You're headed for Hollywood, right?
Aren't you tired of playing Miss Charming?
Don't you like me sitting by your side eating kidney beans?
I like it so much it frightens me.
- What are you frightened of?
- Same thing as you.
Why should I be frightened?
Of listening to your heart for once.
Of leaving your cage and not finding your way back.
You really believe that?
Come with me!
Don't tell me you're gonna leave without finishing.
Yes!
Are you coming or not?
Oh, Mary, Mother of God, what is this?
Easy does it!
Careful!
- Shit! Damn American cars!
- Careful!
- What are you looking at?
- Nothing, nothing!
- So wipe that smirk off your face!
- Ok.
Rita Martinez.
What are you mumbling about?
Rita...
"I needed to kiss you again"
Yeah, same ol' shit!
Yes, yes, yes.
Don't tell me that horse finally won?
What's its name?
Do you remember that investor I told you about?
No.
Well, our hard times are over, Chico.
From now on,
- straight to the top!
- Maybe you are.
So are you.
Look.
- What is this?
- It's a contract.
Dizzy Gillespie needs a piano player for his band.
Tomorrow you fly to Europe.
A month in Paris and then a tour!
The opportunity of a lifetime, Chico!
Sorry, dear, for being late.
- I had no-one to take care of Lily.
- Lily?
My puppy. She's like a baby.
She can't be left alone.
Are you sure you don't want to go for a stroll?
No! I've been told this film is really good!
Oh, c'mon.
The music is so lovely, and she's such a good performer!
Hi, Lily!
Like it?
Another blackout!
What do you need light for at this ungodly hour?
Go to sleep! Tomorrow we've gotta work for our country.
He was reading Granma and the lights went out just when it was getting interesting.
I dream
I love you as I did yesterday.
Sweet scents are reborn and come into play
My soul takes flight and recalls moments divine
Echoes of kisses, two destinies, yours and mine
Rita!
- What a surprise!
- Where is he?
I need to talk to him!
Please Rita, don't go looking for problems, just when things are going so well.
- For who?
- For all of us!
And above all, for you!
You can't be fighting with Ron every night.
Don't you get it?
I can't stand him!
But, you mean everything to him!
Yeah, I'm his biggest investment!
- True, but he made you what you are.
- Yeah.
A miserable wretch!
And who could make you happy, Rita?
Who?
You mind telling me who the hell Lily is?
Lily?
Yeah, Lily!
What's wrong with you?
Are you deaf?
I met her in Paris.
She used to sit by my side whenever I played the piano.
You must have been very fond of her to write a beautiful song like that.
Well... who hasn't been in love at least once in their life?
What happened to her?
She passed away.
I'm sorry.
She also used to like to lick my hand.
Bitch!
She was a tiny dog, silly.
It'd be better ifwe didn't see each other for a few days.
New Years Eve, I debut at the Hotel Pelican in Vegas.
Come the day before...
Have you thought about your career?
About your future?
Future, what future?
The future never gave me anything!
All my hopes are set on the past.
I haven't seen that expression for years!
I'm tying the knot!
Congratulations!
When?
New Year's Eve in Las Vegas.
Are you sure no-one by that name was on the plane to Vegas?
Ok.
Thanks.
What were you expecting?
He did it before!
And good ol' Ron is always there for me, right?
Stop drinking!
Don't spoil it all now!
Your passport will be withheld until further notice.
What?
Chico?
They've cancelled tonight's show!
What?
They don't like this kind of music any more.
Jazz is considered imperialist.
It's the enemy's music!
If you wanna keep on working, you'll have to join the Party.
- That's it!
- But, that's crazy!
Viva Fidel!
And then there was light, brothers.
Now they're screwing with us in the middle of the night.
So the whole point is to protest.
The light goes out, complain, it comes back on...
Comrade, it's just that I was dreaming about...
Well, you know about who.
Who?
About you, baby, who else?
I gotta tell the world about it.
Chico!
Chico!
Chico!
Piss off!
There are some gringos asking about you!
What are you saying?
That singer and her producers.
You know that young singer, man, the pretty one, that big star!
Let them find somebody else.
I'm not a musician any more.
They know that but when they heard you were still alive, they went nuts!
Who said I'm alive?
It's been years since
I've been this close to one.
Maestro...
Don't call me Maestro.
Call me Chico.
I've got all your records.
How's it possible that a girl as young and pretty as you can own all those old records?
That's my favorite song.
I've always dreamed of recording it.
"Lily"!
Lily...
I thought...
What?
That I'd never see you again.
I've been waiting
47 years for you.
Waiting for you everyday to knock on this door.
And, just like that, you're here.
No call, no nothing.
You haven't changed.
You look as beautiful as ever.
Oh, Chico!
All this time... you were... you were here?
They were nice to me.
They let me have this room in exchange for my doing the house-keeping.
May I come in? to Bebo
[ dramatic music plays ]
[ bird cawing ]
[ bird cawing ]
[ film projector whirring ]
[ door latch clicks ]
[ beep ]
[ door closes ]
[ guitar tuning ]
>> okay, you ready?
>> yep.
>> we're rolling.
>> yep.
>> we're rolling.
>> we're rolling.
[ guitar plays folk music ]
We were just kids...
With nothing to lose and nowhere to call home.
With nothing to lose and nowhere to call home.
But we had these songs...
To call home.
But we had these songs...
And we had these dreams.
But we had these songs...
And we had these dreams.
So we threw it all in the back
And we had these dreams.
So we threw it all in the back of an old van and just started
So we threw it all in the back of an old van and just started driving.
Of an old van and just started driving.
[ music intensifies ]
Driving.
[ music intensifies ] our destination -- sound city.
[ music intensifies ] our destination -- sound city.
[ hard rock 'n' roll plays ]
Watching the world through a windshield, there's no looking back.
Windshield, there's no looking back.
We   lefeverything behind.
When you're young, you're not
afraid of what comes next.
You're excited by it.
We were driving a van that could break down at any moment...
Going on tours that could be
Break down at any moment...
Going on tours that could be canceled at any moment...
Going on tours that could be canceled at any moment...
And playing music with people
Canceled at any moment...
And playing music with people who could disappear at any
And playing music with people who could disappear at any moment.
We had no idea that the next 16 days were gonna change our world forever.
But I remember pulling into the parking lot and thinking,
"really?
Parking lot and thinking,
"really?
This is sound city?"
"really?
This is sound city?"
[ door hinges squeak ]
>> you know, it's weird, like, when you walk into sound city, you either love it or you hate
You either love it or you hate it.
>> looks kind of dumpy.
>> it's a shit-hole.
>> it's a shit-hole.
>> everything was secondhand.
>> it was something of a time warp, I think, or something.
Warp, I think, or something.
[ laughs ]
[ laughs ]
>> brown shag carpet on the wall -- that's the kind of thing
>> brown shag carpet on the wall -- that's the kind of thing that you would do to your van.
Wall -- that's the kind of thing that you would do to your van.
>> it was like, "well, the place
That you would do to your van.
>> it was like, "well, the place is already kind of trashed, so
Is already kind of trashed, so anything goes, you know?"
>> it was dirty.Ou know?" didn't really feel like I wanted
Didn't really feel like I wanted to sit on any of the furniture.
>> you could record there and not come back for 15 years and
Not come back for 15 years and walk in, and it's the exact same
Walk in, and it's the exact same as the last time you were there.
As the last time you were there.
>> the parking lot used to
>> the parking lot used to flood, and it used to make a
Flood, and it used to make a wave that came up the hallway of
Wave that came up the hallway of sound city.
>> sound city was like, you know, you could put your
Know, you could put your cigarette out on the floor.
>> a bottle of jack daniel's got spilled all over the carpet.
"who cares? It's sound city.
Spilled all over the carpet.
"who cares? It's sound city.
Who cares?"
>> I always say, you could, you know, piss in the corner and nobody would complain.
Know, piss in the corner and nobody would complain.
[ rapid drumming ]
Nobody would complain.
[ rapid drumming ]
>> it was just a little more
[ rapid drumming ]
>> it was just a little more fucked-up than I thought it
>> it was just a little more fucked-up than I thought it should be.
Fucked-up than I thought it should be.
But walking down the hallway and
Should be.
But walking down the hallway and seeing all of those platinum
But walking down the hallway and seeing all of those platinum records on the wall...
Seeing all of those platinum records on the wall...
[ tom petty's "refugee" plays ]
Records on the wall...
[ tom petty's "refugee" plays ]
>> tom petty.
[ tom petty's "refugee" plays ]
>> tom petty.
>> fleetwood mac.
>> tom petty.
>> fleetwood mac.
[ "don't stop" plays ]
>> fleetwood mac.
[ "don't stop" plays ]
>> rick springfield.
[ "don't stop" plays ]
>> rick springfield.
>> rick springfield.
>> rick springfield.
>> rick springfield.
[ "jessie's girl" plays ]
>> rick springfield.
[ "jessie's girl" plays ]
>> neil young, man.
[ "jessie's girl" plays ]
>> neil young, man.
>> cheap trick.
>> neil young, man.
>> cheap trick.
[ "surrender" plays ]
>> cheap trick.
[ "surrender" plays ]
>> the chili peppers.
[ "surrender" plays ]
>> the chili peppers.
>> rob halford.
>> the chili peppers.
>> rob halford.
>> pat benatar.
>> rob halford.
>> pat benatar.
>> kansas.
>> pat benatar.
>> kansas.
>> guns n' roses.
>> kansas.
>> guns n' roses.
>> nine inch nails.
>> guns n' roses.
>> nine inch nails.
>> nevermind.
>> nine inch nails.
>> nevermind.
[ nirvana plays ]
>> nevermind.
[ nirvana plays ]
>> ♪ hot-blooded
[ nirvana plays ]
>> ♪ hot-blooded
>> foreigner.
>> ♪ hot-blooded
>> foreigner.
>> slayer.
>> foreigner.
>> slayer.
>> ratt.
>> slayer.
>> ratt.
>> johnny cash.
>> ratt.
>> johnny cash.
>> carl perkins.
>> johnny cash.
>> carl perkins.
>> metallica.
>> carl perkins.
>> metallica.
>> r.E.O. Speedwagon.
>> metallica.
>> r.E.O. Speedwagon.
>> ♪ time for me to fight
>> r.E.O. Speedwagon.
>> ♪ time for me to fight
>> michael mcdonald.
>> ♪ time for me to fight
>> michael mcdonald.
>> mick fleetwood.
>> michael mcdonald.
>> mick fleetwood.
>> buckingham nicks.
>> mick fleetwood.
>> buckingham nicks.
[ bachman-turner overdrive's
>> buckingham nicks.
[ bachman-turner overdrive's
" you ain't seen nothing yet"
[ bachman-turner overdrive's
" you ain't seen nothing yet" plays ]
" you ain't seen nothing yet" plays ]
>> ♪ like a rainbow in the
Plays ]
>> ♪ like a rainbow in the dark ♪
>> ♪ like a rainbow in the dark ♪
>> stevie nix.
Dark ♪
>> stevie nix.
>> masters of reality.
>> stevie nix.
>> masters of reality.
>> frank black.
>> masters of reality.
>> frank black.
>> brisbane.
>> frank black.
>> brisbane.
>> rick rubin.
>> brisbane.
>> rick rubin.
>> kyuss.
>> rick rubin.
>> kyuss.
>> weezer.
>> dude, how many fucking amazing albums have been made there?
Amazing albums have been made there?
[ rock 'n' roll plays ]
There?
[ rock 'n' roll plays ]
>> vincent price, telly savalas.
>> vincent price, telly savalas.
We would record anything.
Anybody would walk in the door that could pay the bill.
That could pay the bill.
[ neil young's "southern man"
[ neil young's "southern man" plays ]
Plays ]
>> tom is this big, tall, lanky,
>> tom is this big, tall, lanky, gomer-y kind of guy that just fell off the turnip truck.
Gomer-y kind of guy that just fell off the turnip truck.
He wants you to think that,
Fell off the turnip truck.
He wants you to think that, anyway.
>> first time I was ever walked in a recording studio.
First time I'd ever even seen
In a recording studio.
First time I'd ever even seen one.
First time I'd ever even seen one.
>> ♪ southern man
One.
>> ♪ southern man
>> I was with a west virginia
>> ♪ southern man
>> I was with a west virginia holding company that was buying
>> I was with a west virginia holding company that was buying little businesses.
Joe gottfried and another guy had started sound city in 1969.
He was actually the vocalist for
Had started sound city in 1969.
He was actually the vocalist for the u.S. Army.
He was actually the vocalist for the u.S. Army.
When he was in the army, he was
The u.S. Army.
When he was in the army, he was stationed at a hotel in
Stationed at a hotel in manhattan.
A friend of his, joe leahy, who was a big-band leader and had
Was a big-band leader and had done music for cbs, and they
Done music for cbs, and they were the two main guys in the
Were the two main guys in the studio when I came in, in 1970.
Studio when I came in, in 1970.
Keith olsen was the
Keith olsen was the chief engineer.
>> the only reason why the studio business survived was because the building ownership
Studio business survived was because the building ownership was tom, and tom would not
Because the building ownership was tom, and tom would not foreclose on them.
Was tom, and tom would not foreclose on them.
>> they were about one week away
Foreclose on them.
>> they were about one week away from being closed by the irs.
>> they were about one week away from being closed by the irs.
They owed taxes.
From being closed by the irs.
They owed taxes.
It was kind of chaos, to be
They owed taxes.
It was kind of chaos, to be honest with you.
But there was an opportunity to get into the entertainment
Get into the entertainment business.
Business.
[ fans screaming ]
>> this is beatle land, formerly known as britain, where an epidemic called "beatlemania"
Known as britain, where an epidemic called "beatlemania" has seized the teenage
Epidemic called "beatlemania" has seized the teenage population, especially female.
Has seized the teenage population, especially female.
[ fans screaming ]
Population, especially female.
[ fans screaming ]
>> the big pot at the end of the
[ fans screaming ]
>> the big pot at the end of the rainbow is signing an ex-beatle.
>> the big pot at the end of the rainbow is signing an ex-beatle.
We'd have had a zillion dollars,
We'd have had a zillion dollars, you know?
You know?
>> hi-fi and stereo equipment
>> hi-fi and stereo equipment created an industry with an
Created an industry with an annual income today of
$2.5 billion.
Annual income today of
$2.5 billion.
>> somebody at sound city came
$2.5 billion.
>> somebody at sound city came up with this idea -- "we could
>> somebody at sound city came up with this idea -- "we could start a record company."
Up with this idea -- "we could start a record company."
>> so that was my goal, to
Start a record company."
>> so that was my goal, to produce some records and have a
>> so that was my goal, to produce some records and have a hit record and make a lot of
Produce some records and have a hit record and make a lot of money.
Hit record and make a lot of money.
That was the whole reason we
Money.
That was the whole reason we bought it.
>> sound city -- it was funky.
It was in the valley, but we only used the valley to get to
It was in the valley, but we only used the valley to get to hollywood.
Only used the valley to get to hollywood.
The valley was just this flat
Hollywood.
The valley was just this flat expanse of too many houses
The valley was just this flat expanse of too many houses already.
Expanse of too many houses already.
You know, so it was, like, kind
Already.
You know, so it was, like, kind of not happening at all.
You know, so it was, like, kind of not happening at all.
>> neil young pulled in fast in
Of not happening at all.
>> neil young pulled in fast in a very old car, smoke billowing
>> neil young pulled in fast in a very old car, smoke billowing out of every window.
A very old car, smoke billowing out of every window.
Behind him was two l.A.P.D.
Out of every window.
Behind him was two l.A.P.D.
Officers, guns drawn.
Behind him was two l.A.P.D.
Officers, guns drawn.
[ chuckling ] you know?
Officers, guns drawn.
[ chuckling ] you know?
>> okay, move over the the rear
[ chuckling ] you know?
>> okay, move over the the rear of the car.
>> okay, move over the the rear of the car.
Place your hands on the trunk.
Of the car.
Place your hands on the trunk.
>> I attracted police a lot
Place your hands on the trunk.
>> I attracted police a lot because of the cars that I was
>> I attracted police a lot because of the cars that I was driving.
Because of the cars that I was driving.
And I didn't have a license, you
Driving.
And I didn't have a license, you know, because I was canadian.
And I didn't have a license, you know, because I was canadian.
I wasn't even supposed to be
Know, because I was canadian.
I wasn't even supposed to be there.
I wasn't even supposed to be there.
>> about five minutes later,
There.
>> about five minutes later, they just got in their cars and
>> about five minutes later, they just got in their cars and drove off.
They just got in their cars and drove off.
>> I made the record in my
Drove off.
>> I made the record in my house.
>> I made the record in my house.
Most of it, I did in my house.
House.
Most of it, I did in my house.
And then we went to sound city
Most of it, I did in my house.
And then we went to sound city with briggs, my producer, and we
And then we went to sound city with briggs, my producer, and we put down a piano song called
With briggs, my producer, and we put down a piano song called
"birds" there.
Put down a piano song called
"birds" there.
Then, we did the vocals, and
"birds" there.
Then, we did the vocals, and then they sounded so good that I
Then, we did the vocals, and then they sounded so good that I said, "well, hell, let's just
Then they sounded so good that I said, "well, hell, let's just sing everything."
Said, "well, hell, let's just sing everything." so it's really a hybrid record.
♪ I can love
♪ I can really love
♪ I can really love
>> my dad and joe were partners in crime.
They were very close.
In crime.
They were very close.
They were thick as thieves.
They were very close.
They were thick as thieves.
>> tom was, like, the business
They were thick as thieves.
>> tom was, like, the business guy and stuff like that, but joe
>> tom was, like, the business guy and stuff like that, but joe was the heart of it all, really.
Guy and stuff like that, but joe was the heart of it all, really.
>> sweetest guy in the universe.
Was the heart of it all, really.
>> sweetest guy in the universe.
Absolutely one of the nicest,
>> sweetest guy in the universe.
Absolutely one of the nicest, truest people I've ever known.
>> he wasn't a guy in a suit who was counting money and just trying to rip off as many
Was counting money and just trying to rip off as many musicians as he could.
Trying to rip off as many musicians as he could.
That wasn't his thing.
Musicians as he could.
That wasn't his thing.
He loved the fact that bands
That wasn't his thing.
He loved the fact that bands were coming in and making great
He loved the fact that bands were coming in and making great records there.
>> joe was always, like, positive, more optimistic.
Always, "the next big thing's
Positive, more optimistic.
Always, "the next big thing's gonna be out there."
Always, "the next big thing's gonna be out there."
>> joe gave me time to learn and
Gonna be out there."
>> joe gave me time to learn and to hone what I do.
>> joe gave me time to learn and to hone what I do.
He was quite a guy.
To hone what I do.
He was quite a guy.
>> when we bought the studio, we
He was quite a guy.
>> when we bought the studio, we were struggling for a year or
>> when we bought the studio, we were struggling for a year or two, and we could see we
Were struggling for a year or two, and we could see we couldn't just get the premier
Two, and we could see we couldn't just get the premier acts.
Couldn't just get the premier acts.
You needed state-of-the-art
Acts.
You needed state-of-the-art equipment to get the top acts
You needed state-of-the-art equipment to get the top acts with the top budgets.
Equipment to get the top acts with the top budgets.
So it was my goal to do that.
>> this guy, rupert neve, designed these next-generation consoles.
Designed these next-generation consoles.
I had flown to England, and I
Consoles.
I had flown to England, and I saw one once, and they were like
I had flown to England, and I saw one once, and they were like this, you know, built like a
Saw one once, and they were like this, you know, built like a brick shit house.
This, you know, built like a brick shit house.
>> he was, you know, a genius
Brick shit house.
>> he was, you know, a genius engineer.
>> he was, you know, a genius engineer.
There's only four like this in
Engineer.
There's only four like this in the world, and this is the only
There's only four like this in the world, and this is the only one that was custom-ordered from
The world, and this is the only one that was custom-ordered from the factory by keith.
The neve sound that my ear hast always been attuned to.
Always been attuned to.
>> they're mathematically crisp
>> they're mathematically crisp and very, very good.
And very, very good.
They're just very solid.
It's like a tank or something.
>> the neve thing is -- there just weren't that many made,
>> the neve thing is -- there just weren't that many made, because they're so handmade.
Just weren't that many made, because they're so handmade.
>> this neve board that you talk
Because they're so handmade.
>> this neve board that you talk about, you know, this is not my
>> this neve board that you talk about, you know, this is not my world.
About, you know, this is not my world.
You know, engineers have to
World.
You know, engineers have to spend, like, hours on the
You know, engineers have to spend, like, hours on the kick-drum sound.
Spend, like, hours on the kick-drum sound.
Please, I would rather have a
Kick-drum sound.
Please, I would rather have a blood transfusion.
Please, I would rather have a blood transfusion.
But I do remember that there was
Blood transfusion.
But I do remember that there was something different about the
But I do remember that there was something different about the sound of this board.
Something different about the sound of this board.
And then of course, everybody --
Sound of this board.
And then of course, everybody --
"oh, my god, it's a neve board,"
And then of course, everybody --
"oh, my god, it's a neve board,"
I'll never forget them saying.
"oh, my god, it's a neve board,"
I'll never forget them saying.
>> a recording console is like
I'll never forget them saying.
>> a recording console is like the center of the spaceship.
>> a recording console is like the center of the spaceship.
If you're gonna fly to mars, you
The center of the spaceship.
If you're gonna fly to mars, you got to have something with all
If you're gonna fly to mars, you got to have something with all the master controls.
Got to have something with all the master controls.
>> it looks like, you know, the
The master controls.
>> it looks like, you know, the
enterprise on steroids, from a
>> it looks like, you know, the
enterprise on steroids, from a long time ago.
Enterprise on steroids, from a long time ago.
>> a desk that's like a giant
Long time ago.
>> a desk that's like a giant stereo, except instead of doing
>> a desk that's like a giant stereo, except instead of doing bass, middle, and treble, it's,
Stereo, except instead of doing bass, middle, and treble, it's, like, you can do that on each
Bass, middle, and treble, it's, like, you can do that on each drum, you know, each mike, each
Like, you can do that on each drum, you know, each mike, each thing.
Drum, you know, each mike, each thing.
>> all the microphones in the
Thing.
>> all the microphones in the studio are routed into that
>> all the microphones in the studio are routed into that console.
Studio are routed into that console.
From there, you can change e.Q.,
Console.
From there, you can change e.Q., add effects, change the levels.
From there, you can change e.Q., add effects, change the levels.
And that goes into the tape
Add effects, change the levels.
And that goes into the tape machine, where it's recorded.
And that goes into the tape machine, where it's recorded.
[ drum tests ]
>> this board, if you put a fader up and turn the mike pre
Fader up and turn the mike pre up, and somebody hits a tom-tom
Up, and somebody hits a tom-tom or a snare drum, it sounds
Or a snare drum, it sounds great.
It sounds wide-open.
It sounds huge.
If you turn the mike pre up too
It sounds huge.
If you turn the mike pre up too loud and it distorts, it still
If you turn the mike pre up too loud and it distorts, it still sounds great.
Loud and it distorts, it still sounds great.
>> that's analog.
Sounds great.
>> that's analog.
It's how it sounds.
>> that's analog.
It's how it sounds.
[ pat benatar's "hit me with
It's how it sounds.
[ pat benatar's "hit me with your best shot" plays ]
>> especially neve's, you know,
I mean, everything is just better.
I mean, everything is just better.
The human voice sounds better.
Better.
The human voice sounds better.
When you got harmonies going
The human voice sounds better.
When you got harmonies going together, the kind of meld
When you got harmonies going together, the kind of meld together.
>> ♪ you come on with a come-on ♪
♪ you don't fight fair
Come-on ♪
♪ you don't fight fair
>> the neve console really
♪ you don't fight fair
>> the neve console really embellishes things in the
>> the neve console really embellishes things in the context of rock 'n' roll.
Embellishes things in the context of rock 'n' roll.
It's good on drums.
Context of rock 'n' roll.
It's good on drums.
It's good on bass.
It's good on drums.
It's good on bass.
It's good on guitars.
It's good on bass.
It's good on guitars.
>> it's the facilitator.
It's good on guitars.
>> it's the facilitator.
>> it's a pretty badass console.
>> it's the facilitator.
>> it's a pretty badass console.
>> ♪ hit me with your best
>> it's a pretty badass console.
>> ♪ hit me with your best shot ♪
>> ♪ hit me with your best shot ♪
>> it's unlike any other neve
Shot ♪
>> it's unlike any other neve console that I have ever worked
>> it's unlike any other neve console that I have ever worked on, and I've been lucky enough
Console that I have ever worked on, and I've been lucky enough to work on a ton of them now.
On, and I've been lucky enough to work on a ton of them now.
>> it would always be the
To work on a ton of them now.
>> it would always be the greatest-sounding desk I've ever
>> it would always be the greatest-sounding desk I've ever tracked on.
Greatest-sounding desk I've ever tracked on.
[ guitar solo plays ]
>> there is a large number of modules about which look the same, but which are marginally
Modules about which look the same, but which are marginally different.
The circuit was a microphone amplifier circuit.
Amplifier circuit.
Cross-talk between circuits and
Cross-talk between circuits and between buses was absolutely
Between buses was absolutely paramount.
The way that transformer behaves with dc flowing in it can vary according to the material of the
With dc flowing in it can vary according to the material of the core and the gapping of the
According to the material of the core and the gapping of the core.
Core and the gapping of the core.
If those things are properly
Core.
If those things are properly controlled, you get a very sweet
If those things are properly controlled, you get a very sweet sound.
Controlled, you get a very sweet sound.
[ "hit me with your best shot"
Sound.
[ "hit me with your best shot" fades ]
[ "hit me with your best shot" fades ]
>> rupert neve is a fucking
Fades ]
>> rupert neve is a fucking genius.
>> at the time, that neve console cost $76,000.
To give you an example, I'd just
Console cost $76,000.
To give you an example, I'd just bought a house in toluca lake,
To give you an example, I'd just bought a house in toluca lake, and I paid $38,000 for the
Bought a house in toluca lake, and I paid $38,000 for the house.
And I paid $38,000 for the house.
[ laughs ]
House.
[ laughs ] my wife would've killed me if
[ laughs ] my wife would've killed me if she'd known I was doing that.
My wife would've killed me if she'd known I was doing that.
I thought, "if this place ever
She'd known I was doing that.
I thought, "if this place ever goes under, that's the thing
I thought, "if this place ever goes under, that's the thing that will pay all the debts."
Goes under, that's the thing that will pay all the debts."
>> the first track we cut on
That will pay all the debts."
>> the first track we cut on this was "crying in the night"
>> the first track we cut on this was "crying in the night" with buckingham nicks.
This was "crying in the night" with buckingham nicks.
Very first thing done on that
With buckingham nicks.
Very first thing done on that was that session.
Very first thing done on that was that session.
That's how it started.
Was that session.
That's how it started.
>> ♪ she was that kind of lady
That's how it started.
>> ♪ she was that kind of lady
♪ times were hard, whoa
>> ♪ she was that kind of lady
♪ times were hard, whoa
>> we signed them to a
♪ times were hard, whoa
>> we signed them to a production deal.
>> we signed them to a production deal.
They write their own songs.
Production deal.
They write their own songs.
So all we'd provide would be the
They write their own songs.
So all we'd provide would be the studio, the engineer, and the
So all we'd provide would be the studio, the engineer, and the tape.
>> tom skeeter and joe gottfried were almost like parental figures to us.
Were almost like parental figures to us.
But keith's the one who got us
Figures to us.
But keith's the one who got us out to sound city.
But keith's the one who got us out to sound city.
>> ♪ crying in the night
Out to sound city.
>> ♪ crying in the night
♪ she's back in town
>> ♪ crying in the night
♪ she's back in town when we first moved to l.A., we
♪ she's back in town when we first moved to l.A., we didn't have a place.
When we first moved to l.A., we didn't have a place.
We stayed at keith's house.
Didn't have a place.
We stayed at keith's house.
>> they're starving and they're
We stayed at keith's house.
>> they're starving and they're broke.
>> they're starving and they're broke.
Lindsey was painting, and stevie
Broke.
Lindsey was painting, and stevie was cleaning keith olsen's
Lindsey was painting, and stevie was cleaning keith olsen's house.
Was cleaning keith olsen's house.
>> I'd walk through with my
House.
>> I'd walk through with my broom, and, you know, keith
>> I'd walk through with my broom, and, you know, keith would go, like, "that's the
Broom, and, you know, keith would go, like, "that's the maid."
Would go, like, "that's the maid." and I'd be like...
Maid." and I'd be like...
"I'm not gonna be the maid for
And I'd be like...
"I'm not gonna be the maid for long, just so you know.
"I'm not gonna be the maid for long, just so you know.
Just so y'all know."
Long, just so you know.
Just so y'all know."
♪ but she'll leave you
Just so y'all know."
♪ but she'll leave you
♪ cryin' in the night
♪ but she'll leave you
♪ cryin' in the night
>> ♪ she will leave you
♪ cryin' in the night
>> ♪ she will leave you
♪ cryin' in the night, whoa
>> it was obvious that lindsey and stevie were really special.
>> buckingham nicks came out in
And stevie were really special.
>> buckingham nicks came out in
'73 to great critical acclaim
>> buckingham nicks came out in
'73 to great critical acclaim and then got dropped by polydor.
'73 to great critical acclaim and then got dropped by polydor.
>> the record label dropped
And then got dropped by polydor.
>> the record label dropped them, so they didn't have a
>> the record label dropped them, so they didn't have a record deal.
Them, so they didn't have a record deal.
So they were just hanging around
Record deal.
So they were just hanging around here.
So they were just hanging around here.
>> ♪ she's a come-on lady
Here.
>> ♪ she's a come-on lady
>> it was like our home.
>> ♪ she's a come-on lady
>> it was like our home.
It was like our home away from
>> it was like our home.
It was like our home away from home.
It was like our home away from home.
[ bird chirps ]
Home.
[ bird chirps ]
>> I was living in
[ bird chirps ]
>> I was living in laurel canyon, and I went to the
>> I was living in laurel canyon, and I went to the country store, which is exactly
Laurel canyon, and I went to the country store, which is exactly the same now.
Country store, which is exactly the same now.
And someone I vaguely knew was
The same now.
And someone I vaguely knew was there.
And someone I vaguely knew was there.
He said, "well, what are you up
There.
He said, "well, what are you up to?"
I said, "well, I'm actually in town to find a studio and cost it out and see if we can afford
Town to find a studio and cost it out and see if we can afford it."
It out and see if we can afford it." and he goes, "I'm just the guy."
It." and he goes, "I'm just the guy."
[ chuckles ]
>> this rock 'n' roll guy came to us one day, and he said, "you know, I hang out with all these
To us one day, and he said, "you know, I hang out with all these rock bands, and I go to the
Know, I hang out with all these rock bands, and I go to the clubs and all that.
Rock bands, and I go to the clubs and all that.
If I can bring a band in here,
Clubs and all that.
If I can bring a band in here, will you give me 10%?"
If I can bring a band in here, will you give me 10%?" we said, "all day long.
Will you give me 10%?" we said, "all day long.
Bring them in."
We said, "all day long.
Bring them in."
>> mick fleetwood came in to see
Bring them in."
>> mick fleetwood came in to see the studio.
>> mick fleetwood came in to see the studio.
>> I played him a couple of
The studio.
>> I played him a couple of tracks from stevie and lindsey.
>> I played him a couple of tracks from stevie and lindsey.
[ guitar solo plays ]
Tracks from stevie and lindsey.
[ guitar solo plays ]
>> stevie and I were in
[ guitar solo plays ]
>> stevie and I were in studio "b," in the back.
>> stevie and I were in studio "b," in the back.
And I took a break, and I
Studio "b," in the back.
And I took a break, and I wandered out.
And I took a break, and I wandered out.
And I hear our song,
Wandered out.
And I hear our song,
"frozen love," coming out of
And I hear our song,
"frozen love," coming out of studio "a."
I open the door, and here's this
6'6" guy just -- just grooving on the solo.
And I'm going, "who is that?"
[ "frozen love" guitar solo plays ]
[ "frozen love" guitar solo plays ]
>> I met lindsey literally in
Plays ]
>> I met lindsey literally in passing.
>> I met lindsey literally in passing.
And I went off, not even
Passing.
And I went off, not even thinking anything other than,
And I went off, not even thinking anything other than,
"I've heard some good music that
Thinking anything other than,
"I've heard some good music that was made in the studio that I'm
"I've heard some good music that was made in the studio that I'm gonna use."
Was made in the studio that I'm gonna use."
>> we made a deal to do
Gonna use."
>> we made a deal to do fleetwood mac's next album at
>> we made a deal to do fleetwood mac's next album at sound city.
Fleetwood mac's next album at sound city.
Joe was thrilled -- "god, we're
Sound city.
Joe was thrilled -- "god, we're gonna make our payments!"
Joe was thrilled -- "god, we're gonna make our payments!" everything was good.
Gonna make our payments!" everything was good.
>> fleetwood mac had had a few
Everything was good.
>> fleetwood mac had had a few albums with peter green in
>> fleetwood mac had had a few albums with peter green in
England that had been
Albums with peter green in
England that had been successful.
England that had been successful.
Then after peter left,
Successful.
Then after peter left, bob welch, who then joined the
Then after peter left, bob welch, who then joined the band, was more of a jazz
Bob welch, who then joined the band, was more of a jazz guitarist.
Band, was more of a jazz guitarist.
>> mick called me.
Guitarist.
>> mick called me.
"bob welch just left the band."
>> mick called me.
"bob welch just left the band."
>> I phoned keith olsen.
"bob welch just left the band."
>> I phoned keith olsen.
I said, "you know the tape that
>> I phoned keith olsen.
I said, "you know the tape that you played?
I said, "you know the tape that you played?
Tell me, we're looking for a
You played?
Tell me, we're looking for a guitar player."
Tell me, we're looking for a guitar player."
>> and keith's like, "well,
Guitar player."
>> and keith's like, "well, there is a problem there,
>> and keith's like, "well, there is a problem there, because you will never get him
There is a problem there, because you will never get him without taking her."
Because you will never get him without taking her."
>> he's gonna have to take my
Without taking her."
>> he's gonna have to take my
girlfriend, too.
>> he's gonna have to take my
girlfriend, too.
[ laughs ]
Girlfriend, too.
[ laughs ]
and that was the beginning of
[ laughs ]
and that was the beginning of
it.
>> we joined the band the first
day of 1975.
And then we go straight to
Day of 1975.
And then we go straight to
sound city.
And then we go straight to
sound city.
>> the first days in the studio
Sound city.
>> the first days in the studio
were just amazing.
>> the first days in the studio
were just amazing.
[ "rhiannon" plays ]
Were just amazing.
[ "rhiannon" plays ]
>> really exciting, completely
[ "rhiannon" plays ]
>> really exciting, completely
fresh, because christine,
>> really exciting, completely
fresh, because christine,
john mcvie, and myself came from
Fresh, because christine,
john mcvie, and myself came from
a whole different sensibility
John mcvie, and myself came from
a whole different sensibility
musically, really.
>> ♪ rhiannon rings like a bell
through the night ♪
♪ and wouldn't you love to love
Through the night ♪
♪ and wouldn't you love to love
her ♪
>> john mcvie said to me, "you
know, we're a blues band.
This is really far away from the
Know, we're a blues band.
This is really far away from the
blues."
This is really far away from the
blues."
and I said, "I know, but it's a
Blues."
and I said, "I know, but it's a
lot closer to the bank."
And I said, "I know, but it's a
lot closer to the bank."
>> ♪ all your life you've never
Lot closer to the bank."
>> ♪ all your life you've never
seen a woman taken by the wind ♪
>> ♪ all your life you've never
seen a woman taken by the wind ♪
>> it became pretty clear right
Seen a woman taken by the wind ♪
>> it became pretty clear right
away how this all fit together.
>> it became pretty clear right
away how this all fit together.
And that isn't just musically.
Away how this all fit together.
And that isn't just musically.
It's just as people.
And that isn't just musically.
It's just as people.
>> something is translated, and
It's just as people.
>> something is translated, and
it is real and it is profound.
>> something is translated, and
it is real and it is profound.
Just, in truth, out of
It is real and it is profound.
Just, in truth, out of
necessity.
Just, in truth, out of
necessity.
It's powerful.
Necessity.
It's powerful.
>> it's like true love.
It's powerful.
>> it's like true love.
>> absolutely.
>> it's like true love.
>> absolutely.
But what if that neve board
>> absolutely.
But what if that neve board
hadn't have been there?
But what if that neve board
hadn't have been there?
>> the main reason it was
Hadn't have been there?
>> the main reason it was
important was so that we got a
>> the main reason it was
important was so that we got a
fantastic drum track.
Important was so that we got a
fantastic drum track.
>> [ laughs ]
Fantastic drum track.
>> [ laughs ]
it's the drum sound.
>> [ laughs ]
it's the drum sound.
Let's start there, 'cause it's
It's the drum sound.
Let's start there, 'cause it's
something we all love.
>> the drums and the feel of a
song are like the heartbeat of
the song.
Song are like the heartbeat of
the song.
It can be the backbone of the
The song.
It can be the backbone of the
song.
It can be the backbone of the
song.
It can be the foundation of the
Song.
It can be the foundation of the
song.
It can be the foundation of the
song.
[ drum solo plays ]
Song.
[ drum solo plays ]
so that's the first thing you
[ drum solo plays ]
so that's the first thing you
do.
So that's the first thing you
do.
You set up your kit, and you
Do.
You set up your kit, and you
start putting up your
You set up your kit, and you
start putting up your
microphones.
Start putting up your
microphones.
A room like this has a really
Microphones.
A room like this has a really
nice decay.
A room like this has a really
nice decay.
So, you put mikes around the
Nice decay.
So, you put mikes around the
room to capture that.
So, you put mikes around the
room to capture that.
You put close mikes on the
Room to capture that.
You put close mikes on the
drums.
>> you have all of those
individual mikes spread over a
number of tracks -- 16 tracks or
Individual mikes spread over a
number of tracks -- 16 tracks or
12 tracks.
>> so then you can bring the
faders up or down and balance
those tracks.
Faders up or down and balance
those tracks.
[ drums deaden ]
Those tracks.
[ drums deaden ]
[ cymbals intensify ]
[ drums deaden ]
[ cymbals intensify ]
>> once you get a good drum
[ cymbals intensify ]
>> once you get a good drum
take, then it's like, "oh, okay,
>> once you get a good drum
take, then it's like, "oh, okay,
great.
Take, then it's like, "oh, okay,
great.
Now we got the beginning of a
Great.
Now we got the beginning of a
song.
Now we got the beginning of a
song.
Now we can actually start
Song.
Now we can actually start
putting more shit on it."
Now we can actually start
putting more shit on it."
>> ♪ with the lights out, it's
Putting more shit on it."
>> ♪ with the lights out, it's
less dangerous ♪
>> ♪ with the lights out, it's
less dangerous ♪
♪ here we are now, entertain
Less dangerous ♪
♪ here we are now, entertain
us ♪
♪ here we are now, entertain
us ♪
♪ I feel stupid
Us ♪
♪ I feel stupid
>> the way to pick studios is
♪ I feel stupid
>> the way to pick studios is
through blind-testing drums,
>> the way to pick studios is
through blind-testing drums,
because you can record the
Through blind-testing drums,
because you can record the
guitars pretty much anywhere,
Because you can record the
guitars pretty much anywhere,
and they could sound pretty much
Guitars pretty much anywhere,
and they could sound pretty much
like your guitars.
And they could sound pretty much
like your guitars.
But drums really change from
Like your guitars.
But drums really change from
room to room.
But drums really change from
room to room.
>> that room shouldn't, on
Room to room.
>> that room shouldn't, on
paper, be a great drum room,
>> that room shouldn't, on
paper, be a great drum room,
because it's like a big old
Paper, be a great drum room,
because it's like a big old
square room.
Because it's like a big old
square room.
>> sound city was a vox factory
Square room.
>> sound city was a vox factory
in the '60s, I guess.
>> sound city was a vox factory
in the '60s, I guess.
>> they built vox amps there,
In the '60s, I guess.
>> they built vox amps there,
and then they built the
>> they built vox amps there,
and then they built the
"a" control room in '64.
And then they built the
"a" control room in '64.
>> it's one of those spaces that
"a" control room in '64.
>> it's one of those spaces that
just randomly, haphazardly
>> it's one of those spaces that
just randomly, haphazardly
turned out to be fantastic to
Just randomly, haphazardly
turned out to be fantastic to
record a drum set in.
Turned out to be fantastic to
record a drum set in.
>> that room is the space.
Record a drum set in.
>> that room is the space.
It's, like, what happens between
>> that room is the space.
It's, like, what happens between
the notes, what you're playing.
It's, like, what happens between
the notes, what you're playing.
There's a sound that's pretty
The notes, what you're playing.
There's a sound that's pretty
magical.
There's a sound that's pretty
magical.
>> every room has their sweet
Magical.
>> every room has their sweet
spot for that sound, you know?
>> every room has their sweet
spot for that sound, you know?
This, I think, has always been
Spot for that sound, you know?
This, I think, has always been
sound city's real sweet spot.
This, I think, has always been
sound city's real sweet spot.
>> and the freaky thing is,
Sound city's real sweet spot.
>> and the freaky thing is,
no one designed it.
>> and the freaky thing is,
no one designed it.
A lot of people claim they did.
No one designed it.
A lot of people claim they did.
But no.
A lot of people claim they did.
But no.
>> it's just luck.
But no.
>> it's just luck.
>> luck and magic.
>> it's just luck.
>> luck and magic.
Not meant to be.
>> luck and magic.
Not meant to be.
And you can't control those
Not meant to be.
And you can't control those
things.
And you can't control those
things.
>> selfishly, the drum sound was
Things.
>> selfishly, the drum sound was
probably why we went there.
>> selfishly, the drum sound was
probably why we went there.
I confess.
Probably why we went there.
I confess.
>> [ laughs ]
I confess.
>> [ laughs ]
>> ♪ 'cause when the lovin'
>> [ laughs ]
>> ♪ 'cause when the lovin'
starts and the lights go down ♪
>> ♪ 'cause when the lovin'
starts and the lights go down ♪
♪ there's not another living
Starts and the lights go down ♪
♪ there's not another living
soul around ♪
♪ there's not another living
soul around ♪
>> none of it is planned.
Soul around ♪
>> none of it is planned.
Sound city was welcoming, and we
>> none of it is planned.
Sound city was welcoming, and we
knew that we had a home there.
Sound city was welcoming, and we
knew that we had a home there.
It's a church.
Knew that we had a home there.
It's a church.
By the luck of whatever, I have
It's a church.
By the luck of whatever, I have
the ability to open that door.
By the luck of whatever, I have
the ability to open that door.
>> ♪ say that you love me
The ability to open that door.
>> ♪ say that you love me
>> from that fleetwood mac
>> ♪ say that you love me
>> from that fleetwood mac
album, then we'd get santana and
>> from that fleetwood mac
album, then we'd get santana and
grateful dead.
Once you have big hits like
that, that was huge.
That, that was huge.
>> ♪ dancin' in the streets
>> ♪ dancin' in the streets
♪ dancin', dancin', dancin'
♪ dancin', dancin', dancin'
[ foreigner plays ]
[ cheap trick plays ]
[ r.E.O. Speedwagon plays ]
[ tom petty's
"don't do me like that" plays ]
>> the first real heartbreakers
jam to just feel each other out
was at sound city.
Jam to just feel each other out
was at sound city.
>> the studio was fine, but we
Was at sound city.
>> the studio was fine, but we
just didn't have our shit
>> the studio was fine, but we
just didn't have our shit
together.
Just didn't have our shit
together.
We weren't ready.
Together.
We weren't ready.
We didn't have the songs.
We weren't ready.
We didn't have the songs.
We didn't know how to play
We didn't have the songs.
We didn't know how to play
that well.
We didn't know how to play
that well.
>> this is how you make a
That well.
>> this is how you make a
record.
>> this is how you make a
record.
>> it was cruel, 'cause it
Record.
>> it was cruel, 'cause it
sounded so real.
>> it was cruel, 'cause it
sounded so real.
And you'd go into the control
Sounded so real.
And you'd go into the control
room, and they'd crank up the
And you'd go into the control
room, and they'd crank up the
speakers, and you go, "man, I
Room, and they'd crank up the
speakers, and you go, "man, I
just -- I suck."
Speakers, and you go, "man, I
just -- I suck."
>> I think the vocal mike is
Just -- I suck."
>> I think the vocal mike is
just a little bit loud.
>> I think the vocal mike is
just a little bit loud.
>> that no-frills, no effects,
Just a little bit loud.
>> that no-frills, no effects,
no place to hide -- everything
>> that no-frills, no effects,
no place to hide -- everything
coming out of an amp or
No place to hide -- everything
coming out of an amp or
everything coming right out of a
Coming out of an amp or
everything coming right out of a
speaker or right off a
Everything coming right out of a
speaker or right off a
microphone -- that approach,
Speaker or right off a
microphone -- that approach,
that was sound city.
Microphone -- that approach,
that was sound city.
>> by our third album, we wanted
That was sound city.
>> by our third album, we wanted
to get, you know, somebody that
>> by our third album, we wanted
to get, you know, somebody that
could make a good-sounding
To get, you know, somebody that
could make a good-sounding
record.
Could make a good-sounding
record.
So we hired jimmy iovine.
Record.
So we hired jimmy iovine.
>> he'd been a recording
So we hired jimmy iovine.
>> he'd been a recording
engineer, and he'd worked with
>> he'd been a recording
engineer, and he'd worked with
lennon and with springsteen.
Engineer, and he'd worked with
lennon and with springsteen.
And they were recording live
Lennon and with springsteen.
And they were recording live
tracks.
They weren't overdubbing a ton
of stuff.
You had to learn how to play,
Of stuff.
You had to learn how to play,
and you'd go in and play it.
>> I hired jimmy as an engineer
to do "damn the torpedoes"
there, but he showed up with an
To do "damn the torpedoes"
there, but he showed up with an
engineer without telling me.
There, but he showed up with an
engineer without telling me.
[ laughs ]
Engineer without telling me.
[ laughs ]
he manipulated his way into
[ laughs ]
he manipulated his way into
being the producer of the
He manipulated his way into
being the producer of the
record, along with me.
>> jimmy is brilliant.
I mean, he now owns the music
business.
I mean, he now owns the music
business.
>> when we showed up with jimmy
Business.
>> when we showed up with jimmy
at sound city, he was just
>> when we showed up with jimmy
at sound city, he was just
horrified.
At sound city, he was just
horrified.
Just horrified, like, "what is
Horrified.
Just horrified, like, "what is this place?"
Just horrified, like, "what is this place?" and the first thing he said to
This place?" and the first thing he said to me is, "I don't know that we can
And the first thing he said to me is, "I don't know that we can make a record in here."
Me is, "I don't know that we can make a record in here."
>> somebody should firebomb this
Make a record in here."
>> somebody should firebomb this fucking place.
>> somebody should firebomb this fucking place.
>> I said, "yeah, I think you'll
Fucking place.
>> I said, "yeah, I think you'll be surprised."
>> I said, "yeah, I think you'll be surprised."
[ tom petty's "refugee" plays ]
Be surprised."
[ tom petty's "refugee" plays ]
>> we tracked live, and we
[ tom petty's "refugee" plays ]
>> we tracked live, and we didn't edit from take to take.
>> we tracked live, and we didn't edit from take to take.
So we had to get it right from
Didn't edit from take to take.
So we had to get it right from top to bottom.
So we had to get it right from top to bottom.
>> when you're tracking live,
Top to bottom.
>> when you're tracking live, pressure's on the drummer
>> when you're tracking live, pressure's on the drummer big-time.
Pressure's on the drummer big-time.
Until you get that, you've got
Big-time.
Until you get that, you've got nothing.
Until you get that, you've got nothing.
>> I just thought I should play
Nothing.
>> I just thought I should play straight.
>> I just thought I should play straight.
Throw it where the shaker's
Straight.
Throw it where the shaker's trying to go.
>> whoa!
>> it was emotional.
But, at the same time, I mean, we all wanted to learn.
[ tom petty's "refugee" plays ]
We all wanted to learn.
[ tom petty's "refugee" plays ]
>> "refugee," we played like
[ tom petty's "refugee" plays ]
>> "refugee," we played like
150 damn times or something.
>> "refugee," we played like
150 damn times or something.
>> you're trying to get
150 damn times or something.
>> you're trying to get lightning in a bottle.
>> you're trying to get lightning in a bottle.
>> that was great.
Lightning in a bottle.
>> that was great.
>> yeah, I'm still not
>> that was great.
>> yeah, I'm still not comfortable for some reason.
>> yeah, I'm still not comfortable for some reason.
I'm not quite on my thing here.
Comfortable for some reason.
I'm not quite on my thing here.
>> I think we should do one
I'm not quite on my thing here.
>> I think we should do one more and listen.
>> I think we should do one more and listen.
>> okay.
More and listen.
>> okay.
>> then, you go back and play
>> okay.
>> then, you go back and play the damn song again.
>> then, you go back and play the damn song again.
>> ♪ you don't have to live like
The damn song again.
>> ♪ you don't have to live like
a refugee ♪
>> ♪ you don't have to live like
a refugee ♪
>> ♪ don't have to live like a
A refugee ♪
>> ♪ don't have to live like a
refugee ♪
>> ♪ don't have to live like a
refugee ♪
>> it might look easy, but if
Refugee ♪
>> it might look easy, but if
you're trying to go for
>> it might look easy, but if
you're trying to go for
greatness -- and a lot of times
You're trying to go for
greatness -- and a lot of times
you're gonna fall short, and you
Greatness -- and a lot of times
you're gonna fall short, and you
got to live with that, that
You're gonna fall short, and you
got to live with that, that
night -- it's brutal, you know,
Got to live with that, that
night -- it's brutal, you know,
on your soul.
Night -- it's brutal, you know,
on your soul.
>> god damn you!
On your soul.
>> god damn you!
You're driving me crazy!
>> god damn you!
You're driving me crazy!
You are gonna drive me fucking
You're driving me crazy!
You are gonna drive me fucking
crazy!
You are gonna drive me fucking
crazy!
>> ♪ ohhhh
Crazy!
>> ♪ ohhhh
>> it's a tough room.
>> ♪ ohhhh
>> it's a tough room.
>> you know, music really isn't
>> it's a tough room.
>> you know, music really isn't
supposed to be perfect.
>> you know, music really isn't
supposed to be perfect.
It's all about people relating
Supposed to be perfect.
It's all about people relating
to each other and doing
It's all about people relating
to each other and doing
something that's really from the
To each other and doing
something that's really from the
soul.
Something that's really from the
soul.
You know, it must come from the
Soul.
You know, it must come from the
soul.
You know, it must come from the
soul.
>> ♪ oh! Oh! Oh!
>> tom was great.
You know, his whole approach --
low-key.
You know, his whole approach --
low-key.
He'd come in like it was his own
Low-key.
He'd come in like it was his own
garage studio.
>> paula -- she was kind of like
the field general.
[ laughing ] you know?
The field general.
[ laughing ] you know?
She was in the front lines, you
[ laughing ] you know?
She was in the front lines, you
know?
She was in the front lines, you
know?
>> paula -- she's great.
Know?
>> paula -- she's great.
She was just unflappable.
>> paula -- she's great.
She was just unflappable.
You know, just nothing bothered
She was just unflappable.
You know, just nothing bothered
her.
You know, just nothing bothered
her.
Paula, I think, took over from
Her.
Paula, I think, took over from
jemima when jemima left.
Paula, I think, took over from
jemima when jemima left.
>> jemima eddy, aunt jemima, had
Jemima when jemima left.
>> jemima eddy, aunt jemima, had
this assistant who was a little
>> jemima eddy, aunt jemima, had
this assistant who was a little
girl named barbie who ended up
This assistant who was a little
girl named barbie who ended up
being rick springfield's wife.
Girl named barbie who ended up
being rick springfield's wife.
>> she actually was answering
Being rick springfield's wife.
>> she actually was answering
phones when she was, you know,
>> she actually was answering
phones when she was, you know,
16, 17, getting hit on by all
Phones when she was, you know,
16, 17, getting hit on by all
the bands, of course.
16, 17, getting hit on by all
the bands, of course.
>> and then, after jemima, there
The bands, of course.
>> and then, after jemima, there
was paula.
>> I took one look at her, and I
was totally in love.
She was smoking-hot and as sweet
Was totally in love.
She was smoking-hot and as sweet
as can be.
She was smoking-hot and as sweet
as can be.
>> ♪ do you know where your
As can be.
>> ♪ do you know where your
woman is tonight? ♪
>> ♪ do you know where your
woman is tonight? ♪
>> think about it.
Woman is tonight? ♪
>> think about it.
>> paula salvatore, italiano.
>> think about it.
>> paula salvatore, italiano.
Yeah, italiana, italiana.
>> paula salvatore, italiano.
Yeah, italiana, italiana.
>> every musician that went in
Yeah, italiana, italiana.
>> every musician that went in
there thought that paula was in
>> every musician that went in
there thought that paula was in
love with them.
There thought that paula was in
love with them.
I think.
Love with them.
I think.
Or maybe it was just me.
I think.
Or maybe it was just me.
But I don't think so.
Or maybe it was just me.
But I don't think so.
>> do you remember paula?
But I don't think so.
>> do you remember paula?
>> yeah, I do, actually.
>> do you remember paula?
>> yeah, I do, actually.
The girl that ran the studio?
>> yeah, I do, actually.
The girl that ran the studio?
Paula -- dark-haired girl?
Curly?
>> I was "paula at sound city."
that was my last name for years.
>> I was "paula at sound city."
that was my last name for years.
>> paula was, like, a one-woman
That was my last name for years.
>> paula was, like, a one-woman
audience, you know?
>> paula was, like, a one-woman
audience, you know?
>> ♪ do you know where your
Audience, you know?
>> ♪ do you know where your
woman is tonight? ♪
>> ♪ do you know where your
woman is tonight? ♪
>> whenever we'd get a mix or
Woman is tonight? ♪
>> whenever we'd get a mix or
whenever there'd be a
>> whenever we'd get a mix or
whenever there'd be a
performance that I was really
Whenever there'd be a
performance that I was really
proud of, I'd always go and say,
Performance that I was really
proud of, I'd always go and say,
"paula, come on.
Proud of, I'd always go and say,
"paula, come on.
Check this out.
"paula, come on.
Check this out.
Check out what we just did."
Check this out.
Check out what we just did."
>> paula would say, "I really
Check out what we just did."
>> paula would say, "I really
like this one," you know?
>> paula would say, "I really
like this one," you know?
That could lift my whole day,
Like this one," you know?
That could lift my whole day,
because I knew she didn't have
That could lift my whole day,
because I knew she didn't have
to say that and that she heard
Because I knew she didn't have
to say that and that she heard
music all day long.
To say that and that she heard
music all day long.
But it made me think, like,
Music all day long.
But it made me think, like,
"well, wow.
But it made me think, like,
"well, wow.
Maybe this one's good."
>> paula sang on the first
masters record, actually, yeah.
She and a friend did some backup
Masters record, actually, yeah.
She and a friend did some backup
vocals on it.
Vocals on it.
[ guitar riff plays ]
A lot of girl backup singers
ended up, like, working and
Ended up, like, working and
being secretaries in studios.
When you need a backup singer,
just, you know, call the front
desk, and there's one sitting
Just, you know, call the front
desk, and there's one sitting
there.
Desk, and there's one sitting
there.
>> that was my dream, to play
There.
>> that was my dream, to play
music.
>> that was my dream, to play
music.
And I didn't get that.
Music.
And I didn't get that.
You know, and before I knew it,
And I didn't get that.
You know, and before I knew it,
I was kind of in the thick of
You know, and before I knew it,
I was kind of in the thick of
it.
I was kind of in the thick of
it.
It's totally attitude.
It.
It's totally attitude.
"I want to do this.
It's totally attitude.
"I want to do this.
I'll do whatever it takes.
"I want to do this.
I'll do whatever it takes.
And I'm here."
I'll do whatever it takes.
And I'm here."
>> it's a training ground.
And I'm here."
>> it's a training ground.
You know, six months driving a
>> it's a training ground.
You know, six months driving a
car, and then six months being
You know, six months driving a
car, and then six months being
the night phone-answering guy.
Car, and then six months being
the night phone-answering guy.
And when someone above you quit
The night phone-answering guy.
And when someone above you quit
or got promoted or moved on,
And when someone above you quit
or got promoted or moved on,
then everybody moved up a step.
>> I hired nick 'cause he could
make guac.
Very important, you know.
Make guac.
Very important, you know.
>> I did.
Very important, you know.
>> I did.
I made guacamole all the time.
As a runner, I would go in
there, you know, and empty the
ashtrays and dust the console
There, you know, and empty the
ashtrays and dust the console
and vacuum.
Ashtrays and dust the console
and vacuum.
And that's when I started to
And vacuum.
And that's when I started to
learn the board.
And that's when I started to
learn the board.
>> we had runners that became
Learn the board.
>> we had runners that became
engineers.
>> we had runners that became
engineers.
Then, they became producers.
Engineers.
Then, they became producers.
Lot of people that hung around
Then, they became producers.
Lot of people that hung around
here became really successful in
Lot of people that hung around
here became really successful in
the record business.
Here became really successful in
the record business.
>> you know, recording -- it's a
The record business.
>> you know, recording -- it's a
different art form.
>> you know, recording -- it's a
different art form.
[ laughs ]
[ "I don't care about you"
plays ]
>> ♪ down on south street,
Plays ]
>> ♪ down on south street,
philadelphia ♪
>> when we came to sound city,
the producer, gary lublow, would
say, "no, man, slow it down so
The producer, gary lublow, would
say, "no, man, slow it down so
they can hear the fuckin' song."
Say, "no, man, slow it down so
they can hear the fuckin' song."
we'd say, "this is punk rock!
They can hear the fuckin' song."
we'd say, "this is punk rock!
We don't slow anything down!"
We'd say, "this is punk rock!
We don't slow anything down!"
[ chuckling ] you know?
♪ I don't care about you
♪ fuck you
>> you're getting 50 seconds'
♪ fuck you
>> you're getting 50 seconds' worth of music with the same
>> you're getting 50 seconds' worth of music with the same amount of fucking notes, 'cause
Worth of music with the same amount of fucking notes, 'cause we play then faster.
Amount of fucking notes, 'cause we play then faster.
[ chuckles ]
We play then faster.
[ chuckles ]
♪ I saw a man that was sleeping
[ chuckles ]
♪ I saw a man that was sleeping in puke ♪
♪ I saw a man that was sleeping in puke ♪
♪ and a man with no legs
In puke ♪
♪ and a man with no legs fallin' down fifth street ♪
♪ and a man with no legs fallin' down fifth street ♪
♪ tryin' to get something to
Fallin' down fifth street ♪
♪ tryin' to get something to eat ♪
♪ tryin' to get something to eat ♪
♪ I don't care about you
Eat ♪
♪ I don't care about you
♪ oh, no
>> one of the greatest punk-rock albums -- they made the record at sound city.
Albums -- they made the record at sound city.
That sound comes out of his
At sound city.
That sound comes out of his face, man.
That sound comes out of his face, man.
That's actually his voice.
Face, man.
That's actually his voice.
>> [ wailing ]
That's actually his voice.
>> [ wailing ]
♪ I don't care about you
>> [ wailing ]
♪ I don't care about you
>> gary lublow had been the
♪ I don't care about you
>> gary lublow had been the producer on the
>> gary lublow had been the producer on the r.E.O. Speedwagon record.
Producer on the r.E.O. Speedwagon record.
But what he wound up being was
R.E.O. Speedwagon record.
But what he wound up being was the engineer who fought with me
But what he wound up being was the engineer who fought with me every day.
The engineer who fought with me every day.
[ laughs ]
Every day.
[ laughs ]
[ harmonica plays ]
>> I became a producer by default, because nobody knew what a producer was.
>> the old definition of
"producer" was more watching the budget, scheduling musicians,
"producer" was more watching the budget, scheduling musicians, scheduling studio time.
Budget, scheduling musicians, scheduling studio time.
That's not what they did at
Scheduling studio time.
That's not what they did at sound city.
That's not what they did at sound city.
>> a producer works with the
Sound city.
>> a producer works with the songs.
>> a producer works with the songs.
>> ♪ you don't know how it feels
Songs.
>> ♪ you don't know how it feels to be me ♪
>> ♪ you don't know how it feels to be me ♪
>> a producer says, "hey, I
To be me ♪
>> a producer says, "hey, I think this could be better.
>> a producer says, "hey, I think this could be better.
I think that could be better.
Think this could be better.
I think that could be better.
I think that's amazing.
I think that could be better.
I think that's amazing.
Why can't the rest of it be as
I think that's amazing.
Why can't the rest of it be as great as that?"
Why can't the rest of it be as great as that?"
>> that's not easy to do.
Great as that?"
>> that's not easy to do.
>> everything I try to do is
>> that's not easy to do.
>> everything I try to do is from a fan's perspective.
>> everything I try to do is from a fan's perspective.
I can listen and go, "hmm, this
From a fan's perspective.
I can listen and go, "hmm, this part really speaks to me.
I can listen and go, "hmm, this part really speaks to me.
This part doesn't speak to me so
Part really speaks to me.
This part doesn't speak to me so much."
This part doesn't speak to me so much." it sounds like you're aiming a
Much." it sounds like you're aiming a little lower today than you
It sounds like you're aiming a little lower today than you should be.
Little lower today than you should be.
>> what balls to tell, you know,
Should be.
>> what balls to tell, you know, rock stars that they got
>> what balls to tell, you know, rock stars that they got nothing.
Rock stars that they got nothing.
>> ♪ but let me get to the
Nothing.
>> ♪ but let me get to the point ♪
>> ♪ but let me get to the point ♪
♪ let's roll another joint
Point ♪
♪ let's roll another joint
>> I like to push it during the
♪ let's roll another joint
>> I like to push it during the songs, you know?
>> I like to push it during the songs, you know?
Like, I'll hit the guitar and,
Like, I'll hit the guitar and, like, mess it up.
Like, mess it up.
I want it to be on fire.
>> working with ross was intense as shit.
We did 12 songs the first night we were there.
We were there.
And the whole time, he is
And the whole time, he is throwing potted plants at us.
Throwing potted plants at us.
>> I grabbed one of the candles,
>> I grabbed one of the candles, and I threw it against the wall
And I threw it against the wall as hard as I can.
As hard as I can.
Wax went across his face, and
Wax went across his face, and he's like, "aaaaah!"
He's like, "aaaaah!" screaming into the floor.
Screaming into the floor.
It was so good.
It was so good.
>> ♪ you don't know how it
>> ♪ you don't know how it feels ♪
>> the way I love the term
Feels ♪
>> the way I love the term
"producer" -- it's someone that
>> the way I love the term
"producer" -- it's someone that puts, you know, a cake dish over
"producer" -- it's someone that puts, you know, a cake dish over the bat phone, you know?
They protect you from the outside world, and they help you actualize the sounds in your
Outside world, and they help you actualize the sounds in your head.
Actualize the sounds in your head.
>> producer's job is really
Head.
>> producer's job is really easy.
>> producer's job is really easy.
He's the vehicle to get the
Easy.
He's the vehicle to get the artists' creativity onto tape in
He's the vehicle to get the artists' creativity onto tape in a way that is accessible to your
Artists' creativity onto tape in a way that is accessible to your marketplace.
A way that is accessible to your marketplace.
>> ♪ to be me
Marketplace.
>> ♪ to be me
>> what you have to do is get
>> ♪ to be me
>> what you have to do is get the listener to claim what
>> what you have to do is get the listener to claim what you've done as theirs.
The listener to claim what you've done as theirs.
[ camera shutter clicking ]
>> a girlfriend -- an ex-girlfriend -- it's always an ex-girlfriend -- hooked me up
Ex-girlfriend -- it's always an ex-girlfriend -- hooked me up with this guy that knew joe at
Ex-girlfriend -- hooked me up with this guy that knew joe at sound city.
With this guy that knew joe at sound city.
And he said, "joe's looking for
Sound city.
And he said, "joe's looking for artists to sign."
And he said, "joe's looking for artists to sign."
>> I think we signed him, like,
Artists to sign."
>> I think we signed him, like, in the middle '70s.
>> I think we signed him, like, in the middle '70s.
>> joe's office was under the
In the middle '70s.
>> joe's office was under the car ramp that took the cars up
>> joe's office was under the car ramp that took the cars up to the parking lot on the roof.
Car ramp that took the cars up to the parking lot on the roof.
[ chuckling ] I actually thought
To the parking lot on the roof.
[ chuckling ] I actually thought about not signing because of
[ chuckling ] I actually thought about not signing because of that.
>> ♪ love is all right tonight
>> he was turned down by rca for about five years.
>> I got into the studio when
About five years.
>> I got into the studio when the paying clients had bailed.
>> I got into the studio when the paying clients had bailed.
You know, "tom petty just
The paying clients had bailed.
You know, "tom petty just canceled.
You know, "tom petty just canceled.
We got studio 'a' for four
Canceled.
We got studio 'a' for four hours."
We got studio 'a' for four hours."
>> joe took rick springfield
Hours."
>> joe took rick springfield under his wing, and he kind of
>> joe took rick springfield under his wing, and he kind of developed him.
Under his wing, and he kind of developed him.
>> got him acting lessons.
Developed him.
>> got him acting lessons.
Got him an apartment.
>> got him acting lessons.
Got him an apartment.
Got him some little car.
Got him an apartment.
Got him some little car.
Got him the "general hospital"
Got him some little car.
Got him the "general hospital" thing that started his career.
>>   here's bobbie, one of our
best nurses.
Bobbie spencer, this is
Best nurses.
Bobbie spencer, this is
noah drake.
Bobbie spencer, this is
noah drake.
>>   how are you?
Noah drake.
>>   how are you?
>>   I'm very happy to see you
>>   how are you?
>>   I'm very happy to see you
again.
The first steady money I'd
actually seen in my life was
500 bucks a week.
Actually seen in my life was
500 bucks a week.
That was the first regular money
500 bucks a week.
That was the first regular money
I'd ever had.
That was the first regular money
I'd ever had.
>> joe came to me and asked me
I'd ever had.
>> joe came to me and asked me
to do these couple of songs.
>> joe came to me and asked me
to do these couple of songs.
[ rick springfield's
To do these couple of songs.
[ rick springfield's
"jessie's girl" plays ]
[ rick springfield's
"jessie's girl" plays ]
>> keith olsen picked
"jessie's girl" plays ]
>> keith olsen picked
"jessie's girl" out of the demos
>> keith olsen picked
"jessie's girl" out of the demos
they gave him.
"jessie's girl" out of the demos
they gave him.
I didn't get why he picked it.
They gave him.
I didn't get why he picked it.
I thought there were stronger
I didn't get why he picked it.
I thought there were stronger
songs.
I thought there were stronger
songs.
>> rick didn't think I knew what
Songs.
>> rick didn't think I knew what
I was talking about.
>> rick didn't think I knew what
I was talking about.
>> ♪ well, jessie is a friend
I was talking about.
>> ♪ well, jessie is a friend
♪ and, oh, he's been a good
>> ♪ well, jessie is a friend
♪ and, oh, he's been a good
friend of mine ♪
♪ and, oh, he's been a good
friend of mine ♪
>> keith didn't like my guitar
Friend of mine ♪
>> keith didn't like my guitar
playing, so he had neil geraldo
>> keith didn't like my guitar
playing, so he had neil geraldo
play guitar on "jessie's girl"
Playing, so he had neil geraldo
play guitar on "jessie's girl"
and bass.
Play guitar on "jessie's girl"
and bass.
>> being a record producer,
And bass.
>> being a record producer,
there's a time when you have to
>> being a record producer,
there's a time when you have to
say, "it would really be good
There's a time when you have to
say, "it would really be good
for your career if you let this
Say, "it would really be good
for your career if you let this
go that way."
For your career if you let this
go that way."
>> keith never liked my guitar
Go that way."
>> keith never liked my guitar
playing.
>> keith never liked my guitar
playing.
He's a prick. [ laughs ]
Playing.
He's a prick. [ laughs ]
>> patricia had just finished
He's a prick. [ laughs ]
>> patricia had just finished
the "crimes of passion" record
>> patricia had just finished
the "crimes of passion" record
at sound city.
Then I just met him one day,
and that was -- we just did it.
I mean, I probably knew him for
And that was -- we just did it.
I mean, I probably knew him for
15 minutes before we did the
I mean, I probably knew him for
15 minutes before we did the
song.
>> he had this pit terrier, so
he would bring the dog into the
studio, and he goes, watch this.
He would bring the dog into the
studio, and he goes, watch this.
And he'll throw it a basketball.
Studio, and he goes, watch this.
And he'll throw it a basketball.
And it would take the basketball
And he'll throw it a basketball.
And it would take the basketball
and go pghh!
And it would take the basketball
and go pghh!
And, you know, puncture it with
And go pghh!
And, you know, puncture it with
his teeth.
And, you know, puncture it with
his teeth.
>> with my dog, ron, the sound
His teeth.
>> with my dog, ron, the sound
guys would get this laser light
>> with my dog, ron, the sound
guys would get this laser light
and run it up and down the walls
Guys would get this laser light
and run it up and down the walls
of studio "b."
And run it up and down the walls
of studio "b."
and he'd take chunks out of the
Of studio "b."
and he'd take chunks out of the
wall, and put holes in all the
And he'd take chunks out of the
wall, and put holes in all the
walls.
Wall, and put holes in all the
walls.
>> so, we get ready to do the
Walls.
>> so, we get ready to do the
take.
>> so, we get ready to do the
take.
All of a sudden, the dog comes
Take.
All of a sudden, the dog comes
into the studio, sits down, puts
All of a sudden, the dog comes
into the studio, sits down, puts
his nose right in my crotch.
Into the studio, sits down, puts
his nose right in my crotch.
It's like, if I screw up, he's
His nose right in my crotch.
It's like, if I screw up, he's
gonna bite me.
It's like, if I screw up, he's
gonna bite me.
What the hell is going on here?
Gonna bite me.
What the hell is going on here?
>> ♪ and she's watching him with
What the hell is going on here?
>> ♪ and she's watching him with
those eyes ♪
>> ♪ and she's watching him with
those eyes ♪
>> I made it through the take.
Those eyes ♪
>> I made it through the take.
Might have even been the one we
>> I made it through the take.
Might have even been the one we
used.
Might have even been the one we
used.
It was pretty funny.
Used.
It was pretty funny.
Never moved.
It was pretty funny.
Never moved.
He sat right there.
Never moved.
He sat right there.
It was fantastic.
He sat right there.
It was fantastic.
>> ♪ you know, I wish that I had
It was fantastic.
>> ♪ you know, I wish that I had
jessie's girl ♪
>> ♪ you know, I wish that I had
jessie's girl ♪
♪ I wish that I had jessie's
Jessie's girl ♪
♪ I wish that I had jessie's
girl ♪
♪ I wish that I had jessie's
girl ♪
>> we signed a lot of acts.
Girl ♪
>> we signed a lot of acts.
Every one you signed, you
>> we signed a lot of acts.
Every one you signed, you
thought, "this is gonna be the
Every one you signed, you
thought, "this is gonna be the
big one."
Thought, "this is gonna be the
big one."
you know, "this is gonna be it."
Big one."
you know, "this is gonna be it."
>> I was the only one that
You know, "this is gonna be it."
>> I was the only one that
really finally paid off for him,
>> I was the only one that
really finally paid off for him,
you know?
>> nominated for best male rock
vocal performance, singing about
jessie's girl, is
Vocal performance, singing about
jessie's girl, is
mr. Rick springfield!
Jessie's girl, is
mr. Rick springfield!
[ cheers and applause ]
>> the first check we got from
rca was over a million dollars.
[ laughs ]
Rca was over a million dollars.
[ laughs ]
>> it's mind-blowing.
[ laughs ]
>> it's mind-blowing.
I think joe had pretty good
>> it's mind-blowing.
I think joe had pretty good
karma, and this magic studio
I think joe had pretty good
karma, and this magic studio
sprung up out of this ass-ugly
Karma, and this magic studio
sprung up out of this ass-ugly
complex in van nuys.
Sprung up out of this ass-ugly
complex in van nuys.
And all these people just
Complex in van nuys.
And all these people just
started coming.
And all these people just
started coming.
It was amazing.
>> all during the '80s, we were
booked solid.
You listen to one of these
Booked solid.
You listen to one of these
stations where they played
You listen to one of these
stations where they played
rock 'n' roll, 7 or 8 out of the
Stations where they played
rock 'n' roll, 7 or 8 out of the
10 songs were recorded at
Rock 'n' roll, 7 or 8 out of the
10 songs were recorded at
sound city.
10 songs were recorded at
sound city.
>> describe hollywood in the
Sound city.
>> describe hollywood in the
'80s.
>> hollywood in the '80s -- I
don't remember.
[ laughs ]
>> it was all, like, you know,
the hair bands.
It was all the makeup, all the
The hair bands.
It was all the makeup, all the
pretty boys, you know.
It was all the makeup, all the
pretty boys, you know.
>> ♪ 'cause I'm a wanted man
>> I was wondering who ever used
the board after us if they had a
burning sensation the next
The board after us if they had a
burning sensation the next
morning.
Burning sensation the next
morning.
Then they'd know we were there.
Morning.
Then they'd know we were there.
[ laughs ]
Then they'd know we were there.
[ laughs ]
>> ♪ some kind, some kind
[ laughs ]
>> ♪ some kind, some kind
of friend you turned out to be ♪
>> ♪ some kind, some kind
of friend you turned out to be ♪
I only did one record at
Of friend you turned out to be ♪
I only did one record at
sound city.
I only did one record at
sound city.
It was more family than any
Sound city.
It was more family than any
studio I've ever been to.
It was more family than any
studio I've ever been to.
>> you know, "family" might be a
Studio I've ever been to.
>> you know, "family" might be a
bit heavy, but it was a warm
>> you know, "family" might be a
bit heavy, but it was a warm
feeling between us and the
Bit heavy, but it was a warm
feeling between us and the
people that worked there.
Feeling between us and the
people that worked there.
>> dio, "holy diver."
People that worked there.
>> dio, "holy diver."
>> yeah, you know that record.
>> dio, "holy diver."
>> yeah, you know that record.
[ dio's "stand up and shout"
>> yeah, you know that record.
[ dio's "stand up and shout"
plays ]
[ dio's "stand up and shout"
plays ]
>> ♪ stand up and shout
♪ let it out
♪ stand up and shout
>> paula was italian. [ laughs ]
♪ stand up and shout
>> paula was italian. [ laughs ]
that's an in.
>> paula was italian. [ laughs ]
that's an in.
Ronnie and I are italian, so we
That's an in.
Ronnie and I are italian, so we
got on with her great, and they
Ronnie and I are italian, so we
got on with her great, and they
just let us do whatever we
Got on with her great, and they
just let us do whatever we
wanted.
Just let us do whatever we
wanted.
It was so cool.
Wanted.
It was so cool.
We were having such a good time
We were having such a good time
at sound city, almost like it
At sound city, almost like it
was a hang, and we just had to
Was a hang, and we just had to
play.
Play.
[ rick springfield's
"I get excited" plays ]
[ rick springfield's
"I get excited" plays ]
>> I think it was a lucky thing,
"I get excited" plays ]
>> I think it was a lucky thing,
I think, for all of us.
>> I think it was a lucky thing,
I think, for all of us.
I met barbara there -- I met her
I think, for all of us.
I met barbara there -- I met her
for the first time in front of
I met barbara there -- I met her
for the first time in front of
that board.
For the first time in front of
that board.
♪ baby's got the cold feet
That board.
♪ baby's got the cold feet
♪ oh, baby, stay
♪ baby's got the cold feet
♪ oh, baby, stay
♪ we got all night
♪ oh, baby, stay
♪ we got all night
I have a lot of stuff that
♪ we got all night
I have a lot of stuff that
formed me in that place, in
I have a lot of stuff that
formed me in that place, in
sound city.
Formed me in that place, in
sound city.
>> you know, you're in your 20s
Sound city.
>> you know, you're in your 20s
and you don't realize that this
>> you know, you're in your 20s
and you don't realize that this
might not last forever.
And you don't realize that this
might not last forever.
>> ♪ ...On my knees tonight
Might not last forever.
>> ♪ ...On my knees tonight
♪ tonight
>> ♪ ...On my knees tonight
♪ tonight
>> you don't know what's coming
♪ tonight
>> you don't know what's coming
after.
>> you don't know what's coming
after.
>>   considering its quality and
After.
>>   considering its quality and
size, the compact disc most
>>   considering its quality and
size, the compact disc most
certainly will become a part of
Size, the compact disc most
certainly will become a part of
our lives in the future.
Certainly will become a part of
our lives in the future.
>>   it's all based on something
Our lives in the future.
>>   it's all based on something
called "digital sound," an
>>   it's all based on something
called "digital sound," an
innovative technique that uses
Called "digital sound," an
innovative technique that uses
lasers.
>> we've been sold a bill of
goods about digital being
so great.
Goods about digital being
so great.
"you can duplicate it forever,
So great.
"you can duplicate it forever,
and you never lose anything."
>>   the industry is behind it
unanimously.
11 companies, from mitsubishi
Unanimously.
11 companies, from mitsubishi
to sony, have all agreed on
11 companies, from mitsubishi
to sony, have all agreed on
using the same compact disc and
To sony, have all agreed on
using the same compact disc and
the same equipment.
Using the same compact disc and
the same equipment.
>> everybody thought that was
The same equipment.
>> everybody thought that was
great.
>> everybody thought that was
great.
But the thing that was wrong was
Great.
But the thing that was wrong was
they'd already lost everything
But the thing that was wrong was
they'd already lost everything when they did that.
They'd already lost everything when they did that.
>>   it plays, theoretically,
When they did that.
>>   it plays, theoretically,
pure, perfect sound forever.
>>   it plays, theoretically,
pure, perfect sound forever.
>> in the beginning, when they
Pure, perfect sound forever.
>> in the beginning, when they
created the algorithms that
>> in the beginning, when they
created the algorithms that
decide how music is recorded
Created the algorithms that
decide how music is recorded
into the digital domain, there's
Decide how music is recorded
into the digital domain, there's
a mistake in it.
Into the digital domain, there's
a mistake in it.
So, of course, you can duplicate
A mistake in it.
So, of course, you can duplicate
this.
So, of course, you can duplicate
this.
You know, it was kind of a
This.
You know, it was kind of a
mirage.
You know, it was kind of a
mirage.
>>   the official company
Mirage.
>>   the official company
spokesman, mr. Spock,
>>   the official company
spokesman, mr. Spock,
leonard nimoy.
Spokesman, mr. Spock,
leonard nimoy.
>>   the sound is great.
Leonard nimoy.
>>   the sound is great.
We've been using it on the
>>   the sound is great.
We've been using it on the
enterprise for decades.
We've been using it on the
enterprise for decades.
It's about time it got to
Enterprise for decades.
It's about time it got to
earth.
It's about time it got to
earth.
>> everything changed.
Earth.
>> everything changed.
You had a lot of things coming
>> everything changed.
You had a lot of things coming
at you at once.
You had a lot of things coming
at you at once.
The techno side of it...
At you at once.
The techno side of it...
>> this guy named roger linn,
The techno side of it...
>> this guy named roger linn,
who is a friend of ours, I
>> this guy named roger linn,
who is a friend of ours, I
remember tom and I once went
Who is a friend of ours, I
remember tom and I once went
over to his house, and
Remember tom and I once went
over to his house, and
jim keltner was there.
Over to his house, and
jim keltner was there.
And there were all these wires
Jim keltner was there.
And there were all these wires
and gadgets out on the desk.
And there were all these wires
and gadgets out on the desk.
Roger was tinkering.
And gadgets out on the desk.
Roger was tinkering.
"what are you doing?"
Roger was tinkering.
"what are you doing?"
he goes, "I'm building a drum
"what are you doing?"
he goes, "I'm building a drum
machine."
>> all the drum samples were my
own drums.
You had to be a drummer to
Own drums.
You had to be a drummer to
sample drum sounds in those
You had to be a drummer to
sample drum sounds in those
days.
>> ♪ hey
[ tom petty's "don't come around
here no more" plays ]
[ tom petty's "don't come around
here no more" plays ]
>> I got really, really good at
Here no more" plays ]
>> I got really, really good at
it, and I really loved it.
>> I got really, really good at
it, and I really loved it.
And it's just a tool.
It, and I really loved it.
And it's just a tool.
It's just another way to make
And it's just a tool.
It's just another way to make
music.
It's just another way to make
music.
>> ♪ don't come around here no
Music.
>> ♪ don't come around here no
more ♪
>> ♪ don't come around here no
more ♪
>> digital was in its infancy.
More ♪
>> digital was in its infancy.
In the '80s, everybody was
>> digital was in its infancy.
In the '80s, everybody was
trying to be state-of-the-art.
In the '80s, everybody was
trying to be state-of-the-art.
People were saying, "you only
Trying to be state-of-the-art.
People were saying, "you only
have 24 faders, and we want 32,
People were saying, "you only
have 24 faders, and we want 32,
64.
Have 24 faders, and we want 32,
64.
We want 72."
64.
We want 72."
[ chuckles ] whoop-de-doo.
We want 72."
[ chuckles ] whoop-de-doo.
>> ♪ getting stronger
[ chuckles ] whoop-de-doo.
>> ♪ getting stronger
>> ♪ don't come around here no
>> ♪ getting stronger
>> ♪ don't come around here no
more ♪
>> ♪ don't come around here no
more ♪
>> keith olsen left sound city
More ♪
>> keith olsen left sound city
and built a studio right next
>> keith olsen left sound city
and built a studio right next
door.
And built a studio right next
door.
That was the weirdest thing, you
Door.
That was the weirdest thing, you
know?
That was the weirdest thing, you
know?
You'd go out in the parking lot,
Know?
You'd go out in the parking lot,
there'd be keith olsen.
You'd go out in the parking lot,
there'd be keith olsen.
>> I did this thing with
There'd be keith olsen.
>> I did this thing with
rick springfield.
>> I did this thing with
rick springfield.
I told joe gottfried, "I want
Rick springfield.
I told joe gottfried, "I want
you to build me a studio.
I told joe gottfried, "I want
you to build me a studio.
And I will give you the specs,
You to build me a studio.
And I will give you the specs,
and I'll put in the gear."
And I will give you the specs,
and I'll put in the gear."
>> he told me one day, "you got
And I'll put in the gear."
>> he told me one day, "you got
to see this studio I built."
>> he told me one day, "you got
to see this studio I built."
you know, and so I go in, and
To see this studio I built."
you know, and so I go in, and
he's got a board with one fader.
You know, and so I go in, and
he's got a board with one fader.
And I said, "well, what do you
He's got a board with one fader.
And I said, "well, what do you
do with that?"
And I said, "well, what do you
do with that?"
he goes, "that's all I need."
Do with that?"
he goes, "that's all I need."
you know, "it's all in the
He goes, "that's all I need."
you know, "it's all in the
computer."
You know, "it's all in the
computer."
he goes, "wait till you hear
Computer."
he goes, "wait till you hear
what I'm doing."
He goes, "wait till you hear
what I'm doing."
you know, and I thought, "well,
What I'm doing."
you know, and I thought, "well,
I don't give a fuck."
You know, and I thought, "well,
I don't give a fuck."
♪ hey
I don't give a fuck."
♪ hey
I want some shit to play with.
♪ hey
I want some shit to play with.
You know, I want to turn knobs,
I want some shit to play with.
You know, I want to turn knobs,
and I can't trust this.
You know, I want to turn knobs,
and I can't trust this.
>> keith olsen clearly had a lot
And I can't trust this.
>> keith olsen clearly had a lot
to do with making sound city
>> keith olsen clearly had a lot
to do with making sound city
what it is.
To do with making sound city
what it is.
But then, if you went to his
What it is.
But then, if you went to his
studio next door, it was nothing
But then, if you went to his
studio next door, it was nothing
like sound city.
Studio next door, it was nothing
like sound city.
It was the precursor to the
Like sound city.
It was the precursor to the
digital studio.
It was the precursor to the
digital studio.
>> that was an interesting time
Digital studio.
>> that was an interesting time
in music, where sequencers were
>> that was an interesting time
in music, where sequencers were
starting to come out.
Now you can record audio into
the computer.
Wow.
We could manipulate it in ways
we never could've done on tape
before.
We never could've done on tape
before.
And then you can think about
Before.
And then you can think about
stuff in different ways.
And then you can think about
stuff in different ways.
>> it was a whole new world.
>> ♪ here I go again on my own
♪ going down the only road I've
ever known ♪
♪ going down the only road I've
ever known ♪
♪ but here I go again
>> in the '80s, everything was a
lot more digital.
Things started to get more
processed.
>> everything started sounding
Processed.
>> everything started sounding
really overproduced, with a
>> everything started sounding
really overproduced, with a
cannon-shot snare.
Really overproduced, with a
cannon-shot snare.
>> ♪ here I go-o-o-o-o
Cannon-shot snare.
>> ♪ here I go-o-o-o-o
>> sound city couldn't keep up.
>> ♪ here I go-o-o-o-o
>> sound city couldn't keep up.
Joe was way over his head,
>> sound city couldn't keep up.
Joe was way over his head,
and not just with the studio.
Joe was way over his head,
and not just with the studio.
>> at that time, we made a lot
And not just with the studio.
>> at that time, we made a lot
of mistakes.
>> at that time, we made a lot
of mistakes.
We'd spent a lot of money
Of mistakes.
We'd spent a lot of money
chasing other acts.
We'd spent a lot of money
chasing other acts.
And then, one day, rick decided
Chasing other acts.
And then, one day, rick decided
he wanted to go with the
And then, one day, rick decided
he wanted to go with the
younger, better manager, in his
He wanted to go with the
younger, better manager, in his
opinion.
Younger, better manager, in his
opinion.
>> I was kind of talked into
Opinion.
>> I was kind of talked into
switching managers.
>> I was kind of talked into
switching managers.
And, um, I didn't do it very
Switching managers.
And, um, I didn't do it very
well.
And, um, I didn't do it very
well.
>> it was supposed to be that
Well.
>> it was supposed to be that
joe was like colonel parker, and
>> it was supposed to be that
joe was like colonel parker, and
rick was elvis, you know?
Joe was like colonel parker, and
rick was elvis, you know?
That's the way we all thought
Rick was elvis, you know?
That's the way we all thought
about it, you know?
That's the way we all thought
about it, you know?
>> rick springfield made some
About it, you know?
>> rick springfield made some
money for joe and stuff, but joe
>> rick springfield made some
money for joe and stuff, but joe
became like a second father to
Money for joe and stuff, but joe
became like a second father to
him.
Became like a second father to
him.
Rick was his baby.
Him.
Rick was his baby.
>> this guy talked me into, you
Rick was his baby.
>> this guy talked me into, you
know, dumping joe.
>> this guy talked me into, you
know, dumping joe.
And there was a lot of untruths
Know, dumping joe.
And there was a lot of untruths
told, you know?
And there was a lot of untruths
told, you know?
>> joe was completely shattered
Told, you know?
>> joe was completely shattered
when it happened.
>> joe was completely shattered
when it happened.
It shattered me, too, but not
When it happened.
It shattered me, too, but not
personal like it did to him.
It shattered me, too, but not
personal like it did to him.
>> it was really a bad day for
Personal like it did to him.
>> it was really a bad day for
him, you know?
>> it was really a bad day for
him, you know?
That happened, then drum
Him, you know?
That happened, then drum
machines and all that stuff.
That happened, then drum
machines and all that stuff.
And, you know, synthesizers and
Machines and all that stuff.
And, you know, synthesizers and
stuff like that started taking
Stuff like that started taking
over.
Over.
It just got a little haywire.
>> by the late '80s, sound city,
It just got a little haywire.
>> by the late '80s, sound city,
it just couldn't compete.
>> by the late '80s, sound city,
it just couldn't compete.
[ hard rock plays ]
It just couldn't compete.
[ hard rock plays ]
>> I guess there was a time when
[ hard rock plays ]
>> I guess there was a time when
studios got nicer and nicer.
>> I guess there was a time when
studios got nicer and nicer.
Like, some studios had hot tubs.
Studios got nicer and nicer.
Like, some studios had hot tubs.
But, at sound city, you just
Like, some studios had hot tubs.
But, at sound city, you just
wanted to work and get the hell
But, at sound city, you just
wanted to work and get the hell
out of there.
Wanted to work and get the hell
out of there.
It was not a place you wanted to
Out of there.
It was not a place you wanted to
spend time.
It was not a place you wanted to
spend time.
And it seemed like it would've
Spend time.
And it seemed like it would've
been so easy to clean it up.
And it seemed like it would've
been so easy to clean it up.
But just no one took it upon
Been so easy to clean it up.
But just no one took it upon
themselves to do that.
But just no one took it upon
themselves to do that.
>> ♪ aaaaaaaaaah
Themselves to do that.
>> ♪ aaaaaaaaaah
>> I got up, after nine years at
>> ♪ aaaaaaaaaah
>> I got up, after nine years at
sound city, $29,000 for the
>> I got up, after nine years at
sound city, $29,000 for the
year, no health insurance.
Sound city, $29,000 for the
year, no health insurance.
Joe took it away.
Year, no health insurance.
Joe took it away.
He couldn't afford it.
Joe took it away.
He couldn't afford it.
And then when joe wouldn't give
He couldn't afford it.
And then when joe wouldn't give
me my second week vacation,
And then when joe wouldn't give
me my second week vacation,
that's when I said, "I'm
Me my second week vacation,
that's when I said, "I'm
leaving."
That's when I said, "I'm
leaving."
>> by the time I got to
Leaving."
>> by the time I got to
sound city, it was really dying.
>> by the time I got to
sound city, it was really dying.
We had a tech who was dealing
Sound city, it was really dying.
We had a tech who was dealing
drugs, receptionist who wanted
We had a tech who was dealing
drugs, receptionist who wanted
to hang out with keith olsen
Drugs, receptionist who wanted
to hang out with keith olsen
more than be at the studio.
To hang out with keith olsen
more than be at the studio.
So I got rid of her.
More than be at the studio.
So I got rid of her.
I remember keith telling me
So I got rid of her.
I remember keith telling me
I was wasting my time and the
I remember keith telling me
I was wasting my time and the
studio would be closed in
I was wasting my time and the
studio would be closed in
six months.
Studio would be closed in
six months.
I told him to go fuck himself
Six months.
I told him to go fuck himself
and get out.
I told him to go fuck himself
and get out.
I took the last 200 bucks out of
And get out.
I took the last 200 bucks out of
my checking account and bought
I took the last 200 bucks out of
my checking account and bought
paint, and we painted the walls.
My checking account and bought
paint, and we painted the walls.
Sound city was dead.
Paint, and we painted the walls.
Sound city was dead.
It was dead.
[ nirvana's "in bloom" plays ]
>> to be honest, I don't even
remember how the fuck we picked
>> to be honest, I don't even
remember how the fuck we picked
sound city.
>> it's a gritty place, but we
were used to living on the edge,
so it's just like -- it was
Were used to living on the edge,
so it's just like -- it was
roomy.
So it's just like -- it was
roomy.
It was comfortable.
>> I think it was like 600 bucks
a day.
16 days in the studio, and then
A day.
16 days in the studio, and then
accommodations.
16 days in the studio, and then
accommodations.
I think maybe $60k was the
Accommodations.
I think maybe $60k was the
budget for the whole record.
I think maybe $60k was the
budget for the whole record.
>> we had these songs, and we
Budget for the whole record.
>> we had these songs, and we
busted them out.
>> we had these songs, and we
busted them out.
We had a pretty good idea of
Busted them out.
We had a pretty good idea of
what we wanted to do.
We had a pretty good idea of
what we wanted to do.
>> ♪ he's the one who likes
What we wanted to do.
>> ♪ he's the one who likes
all our pretty songs ♪
>> ♪ he's the one who likes
all our pretty songs ♪
>> as much as we loved noise and
All our pretty songs ♪
>> as much as we loved noise and
we loved crazy-ass punk-rock
>> as much as we loved noise and
we loved crazy-ass punk-rock
shit, we wanted to be a good
We loved crazy-ass punk-rock
shit, we wanted to be a good
band.
Shit, we wanted to be a good
band.
We loved the beatles.
Band.
We loved the beatles.
>> ♪ don't know what it means
We loved the beatles.
>> ♪ don't know what it means
♪ don't know what it means
>> ♪ don't know what it means
♪ don't know what it means
>> one of the craziest songs
♪ don't know what it means
>> one of the craziest songs
that we recorded was "lithium."
>> one of the craziest songs
that we recorded was "lithium."
for whatever reason, the band
That we recorded was "lithium."
for whatever reason, the band
and dave kept speeding up.
For whatever reason, the band
and dave kept speeding up.
Not subtly, but a lot.
And dave kept speeding up.
Not subtly, but a lot.
It would start out a certain
Not subtly, but a lot.
It would start out a certain
tempo and then keep going faster
It would start out a certain
tempo and then keep going faster
and faster.
Tempo and then keep going faster
and faster.
Racing along, basically.
And faster.
Racing along, basically.
I said, "dave, have you ever
Racing along, basically.
I said, "dave, have you ever
played with a click track
I said, "dave, have you ever
played with a click track
before?"
Played with a click track
before?"
>> my heart just went crack!
Before?"
>> my heart just went crack!
Aaaah!
>> my heart just went crack!
Aaaah!
I was fucking -- I just felt
Aaaah!
I was fucking -- I just felt
like someone had stabbed me in
I was fucking -- I just felt
like someone had stabbed me in
the fucking brain.
Like someone had stabbed me in
the fucking brain.
When you're a drummer, you don't
The fucking brain.
When you're a drummer, you don't
want anyone to ask you to play
When you're a drummer, you don't
want anyone to ask you to play
to a click track, you know?
Want anyone to ask you to play
to a click track, you know?
That human feel is what gives a
To a click track, you know?
That human feel is what gives a
player their personality.
That human feel is what gives a
player their personality.
[ clicking ]
Player their personality.
[ clicking ]
>> some drummers don't really
[ clicking ]
>> some drummers don't really
know how to play to something
>> some drummers don't really
know how to play to something
that's keeping them in line like
Know how to play to something
that's keeping them in line like
a click track.
That's keeping them in line like
a click track.
[ nirvana's "lithium" plays ]
A click track.
[ nirvana's "lithium" plays ]
>> ♪ I'm so happy 'cause
[ nirvana's "lithium" plays ]
>> ♪ I'm so happy 'cause
today I found my friends ♪
>> ♪ I'm so happy 'cause
today I found my friends ♪
>> lo and behold, the first
Today I found my friends ♪
>> lo and behold, the first
take, man, he locked in like
>> lo and behold, the first
take, man, he locked in like
he'd played to a click a
Take, man, he locked in like
he'd played to a click a
thousand times.
He'd played to a click a
thousand times.
And I think we got the song,
Thousand times.
And I think we got the song,
like, the first or second take.
And I think we got the song,
like, the first or second take.
>> ♪ yea-ea-ea-h-h
Like, the first or second take.
>> ♪ yea-ea-ea-h-h
♪ yea-ea-h yea-ea-ea-h-h
>> ♪ yea-ea-ea-h-h
♪ yea-ea-h yea-ea-ea-h-h
>> and then, when I listened to
♪ yea-ea-h yea-ea-ea-h-h
>> and then, when I listened to
it, I'm like, "well, now it
>> and then, when I listened to
it, I'm like, "well, now it
sounds like the fucking chorus
It, I'm like, "well, now it
sounds like the fucking chorus
is slowing down.
Sounds like the fucking chorus
is slowing down.
It's okay to speed up a little
Is slowing down.
It's okay to speed up a little
isn't it?"
>> ♪ yea-ea-h
♪ yea-ea-ea-h-h
>> I remember, every night, we'd
bring a cassette back from
sound city to the oakwood
Bring a cassette back from
sound city to the oakwood
apartments, where we were
Sound city to the oakwood
apartments, where we were
staying, and listen to what we
Apartments, where we were
staying, and listen to what we
had done that day.
Staying, and listen to what we
had done that day.
[ rock 'n' roll plays ]
Had done that day.
[ rock 'n' roll plays ]
those imperfections, that's
[ rock 'n' roll plays ]
those imperfections, that's
cool.
Those imperfections, that's
cool.
And it makes it sound like
Cool.
And it makes it sound like
people.
And it makes it sound like
people.
And kurt was entirely about
People.
And kurt was entirely about
performance.
And kurt was entirely about
performance.
To us, it was most important
Performance.
To us, it was most important
that there was an honesty and
To us, it was most important
that there was an honesty and
truth to what we were doing.
That there was an honesty and
truth to what we were doing.
>> ♪ I don't care
Truth to what we were doing.
>> ♪ I don't care
♪ I don't care
>> ♪ I don't care
♪ I don't care
♪ I don't care
♪ I don't care
♪ I don't care
♪ I don't care
♪ I don't care
♪ I don't care
♪ I don't care
♪ I don't care
♪ I don't care
>> the music came through the
♪ I don't care
>> the music came through the
speakers in a way that was
>> the music came through the
speakers in a way that was
primal.
Speakers in a way that was
primal.
You could hear the sweat in the
Primal.
You could hear the sweat in the
tracks.
You could hear the sweat in the
tracks.
You could hear kurt's vocal
Tracks.
You could hear kurt's vocal
cords.
You could hear kurt's vocal
cords.
>> ♪ if you have, if you need
Cords.
>> ♪ if you have, if you need
>> looking back at sound city, I
>> ♪ if you have, if you need
>> looking back at sound city, I
realize so much of that record
>> looking back at sound city, I
realize so much of that record
is about performance.
Realize so much of that record
is about performance.
[ guitar plays nirvana's
Is about performance.
[ guitar plays nirvana's
"something in the way" ]
[ guitar plays nirvana's
"something in the way" ]
>> when we tried to record
"something in the way" ]
>> when we tried to record
"something in the way," the band
>> when we tried to record
"something in the way," the band
tried to record it live in the
"something in the way," the band
tried to record it live in the
big tracking room, and it was
Tried to record it live in the
big tracking room, and it was
just too, kind of, big and
Big tracking room, and it was
just too, kind of, big and
bombastic-sounding.
Just too, kind of, big and
bombastic-sounding.
>> that song had to be right
Bombastic-sounding.
>> that song had to be right
because it was such a delicate,
>> that song had to be right
because it was such a delicate,
fragile composition.
Because it was such a delicate,
fragile composition.
>> ♪ underneath the bridge
Fragile composition.
>> ♪ underneath the bridge
♪ the tarp has sprung a leak
>> ♪ underneath the bridge
♪ the tarp has sprung a leak
>> kurt came into the control
♪ the tarp has sprung a leak
>> kurt came into the control
room, and he started playing
>> kurt came into the control
room, and he started playing
the song.
Room, and he started playing
the song.
He laid in front of the neve on
The song.
He laid in front of the neve on
this couch, and I turned off the
He laid in front of the neve on
this couch, and I turned off the
fans and the phones and
This couch, and I turned off the
fans and the phones and
everything, and he played the
Fans and the phones and
everything, and he played the
song just barely mumbling,
Everything, and he played the
song just barely mumbling,
barely singing, and barely
Song just barely mumbling,
barely singing, and barely
playing that 5-string guitar.
Barely singing, and barely
playing that 5-string guitar.
>> ♪ and the drippings from the
Playing that 5-string guitar.
>> ♪ and the drippings from the
ceiling ♪
>> ♪ and the drippings from the
ceiling ♪
>> you had to focus on making it
Ceiling ♪
>> you had to focus on making it
correct and the way it should
>> you had to focus on making it
correct and the way it should
be, which isn't necessarily
Correct and the way it should
be, which isn't necessarily
perfect.
Be, which isn't necessarily
perfect.
It just feels right.
Perfect.
It just feels right.
>> ♪ something in the way
It just feels right.
>> ♪ something in the way
♪ mmm-mmm
>> ♪ something in the way
♪ mmm-mmm
>> that was when I first saw a
♪ mmm-mmm
>> that was when I first saw a computer used with music,
>> that was when I first saw a computer used with music, because it was so hard to play
Computer used with music, because it was so hard to play to that guitar.
Because it was so hard to play to that guitar.
>> I couldn't really figure out
To that guitar.
>> I couldn't really figure out how to get the performances
>> I couldn't really figure out how to get the performances locked together without trying
How to get the performances locked together without trying to do crazy edits with him.
Locked together without trying to do crazy edits with him.
Somebody had told me about this
To do crazy edits with him.
Somebody had told me about this new digital machine.
Somebody had told me about this new digital machine.
>> so, this technician brought
New digital machine.
>> so, this technician brought in a computer and a screen, and
>> so, this technician brought in a computer and a screen, and it was like the -- it was
In a computer and a screen, and it was like the -- it was basically like pro tools or
It was like the -- it was basically like pro tools or something.
Basically like pro tools or something.
>> ♪ mmm-mmm
Something.
>> ♪ mmm-mmm
>> it was archaic.
>> ♪ mmm-mmm
>> it was archaic.
It was incredibly slow.
>> it was archaic.
It was incredibly slow.
You can't do what you can these
It was incredibly slow.
You can't do what you can these days in pro tools.
You can't do what you can these days in pro tools.
You had this "render" button,
Days in pro tools.
You had this "render" button, and it would take like two
You had this "render" button, and it would take like two hours.
And it would take like two hours.
>> we used to call it
Hours.
>> we used to call it
"slow tools," 'cause it just
>> we used to call it
"slow tools," 'cause it just used to just slow everything
"slow tools," 'cause it just used to just slow everything down.
Used to just slow everything down.
>> and then, when you finally
Down.
>> and then, when you finally listened to it, if you didn't
>> and then, when you finally listened to it, if you didn't like it, you had to hit "undo"
Listened to it, if you didn't like it, you had to hit "undo" and try another one and hit
Like it, you had to hit "undo" and try another one and hit
"render" again.
And try another one and hit
"render" again.
It would take, like, another
"render" again.
It would take, like, another two hours.
It would take, like, another two hours.
>> the computer was such a pain
Two hours.
>> the computer was such a pain in the butt.
>> the computer was such a pain in the butt.
It's just like, this will
In the butt.
It's just like, this will just -- this is a gimmicky
It's just like, this will just -- this is a gimmicky thing.
Just -- this is a gimmicky thing.
Good thing we have tape.
Thing.
Good thing we have tape.
This will never take off."
Good thing we have tape.
This will never take off."
[ nirvana's "smells like
This will never take off."
[ nirvana's "smells like teen spirit" plays ]
[ nirvana's "smells like teen spirit" plays ]
>> when I hear
Teen spirit" plays ]
>> when I hear
"smells like teen spirit" on the
>> when I hear
"smells like teen spirit" on the radio, I remember those really
"smells like teen spirit" on the radio, I remember those really simple moments of being in the
Radio, I remember those really simple moments of being in the studio.
Simple moments of being in the studio.
And those 15 days or 16 days,
Studio.
And those 15 days or 16 days, whatever it was, that board --
And those 15 days or 16 days, whatever it was, that board -- totally changed my life.
Whatever it was, that board -- totally changed my life.
>> nirvana!
Totally changed my life.
>> nirvana!
[ cheers and applause ]
>> nirvana!
[ cheers and applause ]
>> nirvana!
[ cheers and applause ]
>> nirvana!
>> nirvana!
>> nirvana!
>> nirvana!
>> ♪ here we are now
>> nirvana!
>> ♪ here we are now
♪ entertain us
>> ♪ here we are now
♪ entertain us
>> sound city would not have
♪ entertain us
>> sound city would not have survived if it was not for that
>> sound city would not have survived if it was not for that record.
Survived if it was not for that record.
You know?
Record.
You know?
>> nobody had ever heard of
You know?
>> nobody had ever heard of nirvana, but it went right up to
>> nobody had ever heard of nirvana, but it went right up to number one.
Nirvana, but it went right up to number one.
We knew right after that we'd
Number one.
We knew right after that we'd get a lot of business.
We knew right after that we'd get a lot of business.
>> ♪ a denial
Get a lot of business.
>> ♪ a denial
>> it was like fleetwood mac all
>> ♪ a denial
>> it was like fleetwood mac all over again.
>> it was like fleetwood mac all over again.
>> joe was always really good
Over again.
>> joe was always really good to me.
>> joe was always really good to me.
There was a plaque that he had
To me.
There was a plaque that he had brought over to me when
There was a plaque that he had brought over to me when
"nevermind" hit number one.
Brought over to me when
"nevermind" hit number one.
And we hung it on the wall, and
"nevermind" hit number one.
And we hung it on the wall, and it was just a couple weeks later
And we hung it on the wall, and it was just a couple weeks later that joe actually passed away.
>> he was absolutely a beautiful person, so absolutely a doll of a guy.
Person, so absolutely a doll of a guy.
And I didn't -- I didn't treat
A guy.
And I didn't -- I didn't treat him very well.
And I didn't -- I didn't treat him very well.
You know, with the separation.
Him very well.
You know, with the separation.
And, um...
You know, with the separation.
And, um...
So I'm really glad we made up,
And, um...
So I'm really glad we made up, you know, before he died.
>> it was a sad day.
He helped a lot of people do a lot of things in their career.
>> I remember coming back to sound city.
I hadn't been there in a while.
Sound city.
I hadn't been there in a while.
And the record had gotten big.
I hadn't been there in a while.
And the record had gotten big.
And they sent them a platinum
And the record had gotten big.
And they sent them a platinum record.
And they sent them a platinum record.
[ hinges squeak ]
Record.
[ hinges squeak ]
I remember opening the door and
[ hinges squeak ]
I remember opening the door and seeing that.
I remember opening the door and seeing that.
And it was such a huge moment
Seeing that.
And it was such a huge moment for me.
And it was such a huge moment for me.
I was just like...
For me.
I was just like...
Because I remembered walking in
I was just like...
Because I remembered walking in there for the first time and
Because I remembered walking in there for the first time and seeing all of those other
There for the first time and seeing all of those other records.
Seeing all of those other records.
To me, sound city represents
Records.
To me, sound city represents some sort of integrity like a
To me, sound city represents some sort of integrity like a truth, which is very human.
Some sort of integrity like a truth, which is very human.
Actual people doing this thing
Truth, which is very human.
Actual people doing this thing that inspired millions and
Actual people doing this thing that inspired millions and millions of fans all over the
That inspired millions and millions of fans all over the place to do the same thing.
Millions of fans all over the place to do the same thing.
>> that September, the phones
Place to do the same thing.
>> that September, the phones just blew up.
>> that September, the phones just blew up.
I mean, you come in the morning,
Just blew up.
I mean, you come in the morning, there'd be, like, 50 messages.
I mean, you come in the morning, there'd be, like, 50 messages.
>> it's like this tidal wave of
There'd be, like, 50 messages.
>> it's like this tidal wave of interest, and it was a
>> it's like this tidal wave of interest, and it was a no-brainer -- sound city.
>> we chose sound city because
"nevermind" was recorded there.
[ laughs ]
"nevermind" was recorded there.
[ laughs ]
>> I had never been in a studio
[ laughs ]
>> I had never been in a studio before.
>> I had never been in a studio before.
There was a lot of time spent,
Before.
There was a lot of time spent, like, cutting a tape at an angle
There was a lot of time spent, like, cutting a tape at an angle and taping it together.
It just, to me, seemed crazy.
Like, that didn't make any sense to me.
Like, that didn't make any sense to me.
>> ♪ killing in the name of
Sense to me.
>> ♪ killing in the name of
>> we did our record at
>> ♪ killing in the name of
>> we did our record at sound city like a live show.
>> we did our record at sound city like a live show.
>> we brought monitors in, and
Sound city like a live show.
>> we brought monitors in, and we invited a bunch of our
>> we brought monitors in, and we invited a bunch of our friends down.
We invited a bunch of our friends down.
I think we got half the record
Friends down.
I think we got half the record in that one night.
I think we got half the record in that one night.
[ "killing in the name" plays ]
In that one night.
[ "killing in the name" plays ]
>> ♪ killing in the name of
[ "killing in the name" plays ]
>> ♪ killing in the name of
>> things got a lot more raw and
>> ♪ killing in the name of
>> things got a lot more raw and down-to-earth again.
>> things got a lot more raw and down-to-earth again.
[ frank black and the catholics'
Down-to-earth again.
[ frank black and the catholics'
"all my ghosts" plays ]
[ frank black and the catholics'
"all my ghosts" plays ]
>> I had started to get into
"all my ghosts" plays ]
>> I had started to get into simplification and analog tape
>> I had started to get into simplification and analog tape and vintage equipment and that
Simplification and analog tape and vintage equipment and that kind of thing.
And vintage equipment and that kind of thing.
And so, obviously, all roads led
Kind of thing.
And so, obviously, all roads led to a place like sound city.
It became the center of my life.
♪ I had a date for the 11th hour ♪
♪ ohhhhhhhh all the catholics stuff, that was all live to two-track, no
All the catholics stuff, that was all live to two-track, no overdubs.
Was all live to two-track, no overdubs.
After making records in the '80s
Overdubs.
After making records in the '80s and working towards perfection
After making records in the '80s and working towards perfection and click tracks, and all this
And working towards perfection and click tracks, and all this kind of stuff, suddenly to just
And click tracks, and all this kind of stuff, suddenly to just do, like, rocking out and have
Kind of stuff, suddenly to just do, like, rocking out and have it recorded, and it's all done,
Do, like, rocking out and have it recorded, and it's all done, it just felt really right.
It recorded, and it's all done, it just felt really right.
♪ well, who needs that now?
It just felt really right.
♪ well, who needs that now?
♪ ah, who needs that now?
♪ well, who needs that now?
♪ ah, who needs that now?
>> I kept working there pretty
♪ ah, who needs that now?
>> I kept working there pretty much into the '90s with rick.
>> I kept working there pretty much into the '90s with rick.
>> all they kept on saying about
Much into the '90s with rick.
>> all they kept on saying about was, "ah, there's no paula.
>> all they kept on saying about was, "ah, there's no paula.
This is really weird."
Was, "ah, there's no paula.
This is really weird." and I was just, like, "you know,
This is really weird." and I was just, like, "you know, seriously?"
And I was just, like, "you know, seriously?"
>> shivaun was great.
Seriously?"
>> shivaun was great.
She didn't take no shit off
>> shivaun was great.
She didn't take no shit off nobody.
She didn't take no shit off nobody.
♪ yeah
Nobody.
♪ yeah
♪ you wreck me, baby
♪ yeah
♪ you wreck me, baby
♪ yeah, you break me in two
♪ you wreck me, baby
♪ yeah, you break me in two then, right after that, rick did
♪ yeah, you break me in two then, right after that, rick did a record with johnny cash.
Then, right after that, rick did a record with johnny cash.
[ johnny cash's "rusty cage"
A record with johnny cash.
[ johnny cash's "rusty cage" plays ]
[ johnny cash's "rusty cage" plays ]
>> he was the coolest guy in the
Plays ]
>> he was the coolest guy in the world, and he was really humble.
>> he was the coolest guy in the world, and he was really humble.
He was sick during the making of
He was sick during the making of that record, and there were
That record, and there were times where we would have to take breaks, but he loved
Times where we would have to take breaks, but he loved recording.
Take breaks, but he loved recording.
He loved being an artist.
>> ♪ too cold to start a fire
♪ I'm burnin' diesel, burnin' dinosaur bones ♪
>> we kept on calling him
"mr. Cash," and he would get upset.
"mr. Cash," and he would get upset.
He said, "no, call me johnny."
Upset.
He said, "no, call me johnny." so we all started calling him
He said, "no, call me johnny." so we all started calling him
"mr. Cash" behind his back.
So we all started calling him
"mr. Cash" behind his back.
>> johnny wanted to play with
"mr. Cash" behind his back.
>> johnny wanted to play with a band, and he picked us, which
>> johnny wanted to play with a band, and he picked us, which was totally off the map for me.
A band, and he picked us, which was totally off the map for me.
>> it was never like
Was totally off the map for me.
>> it was never like the heartbreakers playing their
>> it was never like the heartbreakers playing their normal stuff, because, for each
The heartbreakers playing their normal stuff, because, for each song, everybody would pick up
Normal stuff, because, for each song, everybody would pick up different instruments.
Song, everybody would pick up different instruments.
>> ♪ gonna break my rusty cage
Different instruments.
>> ♪ gonna break my rusty cage
♪ and run
>> ♪ gonna break my rusty cage
♪ and run
>> one of my greatest nights was
♪ and run
>> one of my greatest nights was when carl perkins came down.
>> I was the runner, and I'll never forget sitting at the front desk at sound city and
Never forget sitting at the front desk at sound city and tom petty and carl perkins and
Front desk at sound city and tom petty and carl perkins and john fogerty walked in, and it
Tom petty and carl perkins and john fogerty walked in, and it was just like...
John fogerty walked in, and it was just like...
"wow."
Was just like...
"wow."
>> ♪ come on, go with me, babe
"wow."
>> ♪ come on, go with me, babe
♪ come on, go with me, girl
>> ♪ come on, go with me, babe
♪ come on, go with me, girl
>> tom petty never loses his
♪ come on, go with me, girl
>> tom petty never loses his cool, and he walked out of the
>> tom petty never loses his cool, and he walked out of the control room totally calm, and
Cool, and he walked out of the control room totally calm, and he just, like, slammed his hands
Control room totally calm, and he just, like, slammed his hands down on the table and goes,
He just, like, slammed his hands down on the table and goes,
"it's carl fucking perkins.
Down on the table and goes,
"it's carl fucking perkins.
Can you believe it?"
"it's carl fucking perkins.
Can you believe it?"
>> good ol' sound city came
Can you believe it?"
>> good ol' sound city came through for us again.
>> good ol' sound city came through for us again.
[ tom petty's
Through for us again.
[ tom petty's
"cabin down below" plays ]
"cabin down below" plays ]
>> other rooms in other studios
>> other rooms in other studios all around town started to shift
All around town started to shift because more and more people started to use pro tools.
Because more and more people started to use pro tools.
>> everybody just jumped on this
Started to use pro tools.
>> everybody just jumped on this bandwagon of, you know,
>> everybody just jumped on this bandwagon of, you know,
"everything's got to be
Bandwagon of, you know,
"everything's got to be digital" -- digital consoles,
"everything's got to be digital" -- digital consoles, digital tape machines.
Digital" -- digital consoles, digital tape machines.
>> I mean, they hadn't decorated
Digital tape machines.
>> I mean, they hadn't decorated since 1974.
>> I mean, they hadn't decorated since 1974.
They sure as shit weren't gonna
Since 1974.
They sure as shit weren't gonna spend 20 grand on a fucking
They sure as shit weren't gonna spend 20 grand on a fucking pro tools rig, you know?
Spend 20 grand on a fucking pro tools rig, you know?
>> when you came to work at
Pro tools rig, you know?
>> when you came to work at sound city, you knew what you
>> when you came to work at sound city, you knew what you were getting.
Sound city, you knew what you were getting.
It was a tape-based studio.
Were getting.
It was a tape-based studio.
>> at some point, it became
It was a tape-based studio.
>> at some point, it became cultural -- "we're against
>> at some point, it became cultural -- "we're against that."
Cultural -- "we're against that." starts from the runner all the
That." starts from the runner all the way up to all the engineers and
Starts from the runner all the way up to all the engineers and the studio manager.
Way up to all the engineers and the studio manager.
They were just against it.
The studio manager.
They were just against it.
Like, digital sucks.
They were just against it.
Like, digital sucks.
>> you know, bring them in the
Like, digital sucks.
>> you know, bring them in the room and mike them up and just
>> you know, bring them in the room and mike them up and just let tape roll.
Room and mike them up and just let tape roll.
>> ♪ well, I've got a secret I
Let tape roll.
>> ♪ well, I've got a secret I cannot say ♪
>> ♪ well, I've got a secret I cannot say ♪
♪ blame all the movement to give
Cannot say ♪
♪ blame all the movement to give it away ♪
>> that's what queens was all about.
We were not only analog.
About.
We were not only analog.
It needed to be live.
We were not only analog.
It needed to be live.
It needed to be something you
It needed to be live.
It needed to be something you could be proud of that you had
It needed to be something you could be proud of that you had done, you know?
It was just what you had to do if you were a real musician.
>> ♪ whatever you do
If you were a real musician.
>> ♪ whatever you do
♪ don't tell anyone
>> ♪ whatever you do
♪ don't tell anyone
>> sound city was a place where
♪ don't tell anyone
>> sound city was a place where real men went to make records.
>> sound city was a place where real men went to make records.
It wasn't gonna be easy.
Real men went to make records.
It wasn't gonna be easy.
But, you know, all good things
It wasn't gonna be easy.
But, you know, all good things take an effort.
But, you know, all good things take an effort.
[ whooshing ]
Take an effort.
[ whooshing ]
>> and make a mark on the tape.
[ whooshing ]
>> and make a mark on the tape.
And that is gonna be where I'm
>> and make a mark on the tape.
And that is gonna be where I'm gonna cut.
And that is gonna be where I'm gonna cut.
>> when you have to record on
Gonna cut.
>> when you have to record on tape, it's pretty difficult to
>> when you have to record on tape, it's pretty difficult to manipulate the sound.
Tape, it's pretty difficult to manipulate the sound.
[ whooshing ]
Manipulate the sound.
[ whooshing ]
>> we do the same thing there.
[ whooshing ]
>> we do the same thing there.
>> you have to really focus,
>> we do the same thing there.
>> you have to really focus, one, on how it sounds going in,
>> you have to really focus, one, on how it sounds going in, and then, two, the performance
One, on how it sounds going in, and then, two, the performance has to be amazing.
And then, two, the performance has to be amazing.
>> okay.
Has to be amazing.
>> okay.
>> part of making it in the
>> okay.
>> part of making it in the record business back in the old
>> part of making it in the record business back in the old days was that there was
Record business back in the old days was that there was something you could do and
Days was that there was something you could do and nobody else could do that.
Something you could do and nobody else could do that.
Pro tools has enabled people --
Nobody else could do that.
Pro tools has enabled people -- any average, ordinary person --
Pro tools has enabled people -- any average, ordinary person -- to achieve those sorts of
Any average, ordinary person -- to achieve those sorts of results now.
To achieve those sorts of results now.
>> to do that same thing with
Results now.
>> to do that same thing with pro tools -- there we go,
>> to do that same thing with pro tools -- there we go, done -- it's really that simple.
Pro tools -- there we go, done -- it's really that simple.
>> when pro tools came in, it
Done -- it's really that simple.
>> when pro tools came in, it freaked me out when I realized
>> when pro tools came in, it freaked me out when I realized that you could drag music onto
Freaked me out when I realized that you could drag music onto the grid and make it sound
That you could drag music onto the grid and make it sound perfect.
The grid and make it sound perfect.
>> the good thing about the
Perfect.
>> the good thing about the digital technology is if
>> the good thing about the digital technology is if somebody makes a mistake, like
Digital technology is if somebody makes a mistake, like the bass player hits a wrong
Somebody makes a mistake, like the bass player hits a wrong note or something, you might be
The bass player hits a wrong note or something, you might be able to fix it much easier than
Note or something, you might be able to fix it much easier than we used to.
Able to fix it much easier than we used to.
>> the not-so-great is, it's
We used to.
>> the not-so-great is, it's kind of enabled people that have
>> the not-so-great is, it's kind of enabled people that have no business being in a band or
Kind of enabled people that have no business being in a band or the music industry to become
No business being in a band or the music industry to become stars.
The music industry to become stars.
>> I heard some young guy in a
Stars.
>> I heard some young guy in a band say, "well, you don't have
>> I heard some young guy in a band say, "well, you don't have to practice anymore.
You know, you just slice it up in the machine," meaning the computer, "and it comes out
In the machine," meaning the computer, "and it comes out perfectly."
Computer, "and it comes out perfectly."
[ guitar plays classical music ]
Perfectly."
[ guitar plays classical music ] somebody like andrés segovia,
[ guitar plays classical music ] somebody like andrés segovia, you know, who played the guitar
Somebody like andrés segovia, you know, who played the guitar beautifully.
You know, who played the guitar beautifully.
There's no machine is gonna do
Beautifully.
There's no machine is gonna do that.
>> I am not a pro tools fan.
But trent and atticus, they really use it as a tool, and a
But trent and atticus, they really use it as a tool, and a real creative tool.
Really use it as a tool, and a real creative tool.
[ nine inch nails plays ]
>> I never went into the kind of fear of, "it's cheating."
I never use samplers as a way to
Fear of, "it's cheating."
I never use samplers as a way to sound like the real thing.
I never use samplers as a way to sound like the real thing.
It was really amazing, 'cause
Sound like the real thing.
It was really amazing, 'cause here's a thing that can record
It was really amazing, 'cause here's a thing that can record sound like tape, but you can
Here's a thing that can record sound like tape, but you can fuck with it in million
Sound like tape, but you can fuck with it in million different ways.
It's just a wildly inspiring tool, really.
♪ I believe I can see the
Tool, really.
♪ I believe I can see the future ♪
♪ I believe I can see the future ♪
>> I like to record it in analog
Future ♪
>> I like to record it in analog at the highest level and listen
>> I like to record it in analog at the highest level and listen to it that way.
At the highest level and listen to it that way.
But that's not what's happening
To it that way.
But that's not what's happening on the street.
But that's not what's happening on the street.
That's not where our audience
On the street.
That's not where our audience is.
That's not where our audience is.
You want them to live their
Is.
You want them to live their lives the way they want to live
You want them to live their lives the way they want to live it.
Lives the way they want to live it.
>> I think it makes a lot of
It.
>> I think it makes a lot of independent music right now
>> I think it makes a lot of independent music right now possible.
Independent music right now possible.
It's one of the reasons why
Possible.
It's one of the reasons why we're able to make records for a
It's one of the reasons why we're able to make records for a couple hundred bucks.
We're able to make records for a couple hundred bucks.
>> I think one of the big tape
Couple hundred bucks.
>> I think one of the big tape manufacturers went out of
>> I think one of the big tape manufacturers went out of business, so that really pushed
Manufacturers went out of business, so that really pushed everybody into the digital world
Business, so that really pushed everybody into the digital world and the pro tools world.
Everybody into the digital world and the pro tools world.
The days of moving into the
And the pro tools world.
The days of moving into the studio and writing your record
The days of moving into the studio and writing your record and recording your record and
Studio and writing your record and recording your record and mixing your record, those days
And recording your record and mixing your record, those days are gone now.
Mixing your record, those days are gone now.
>> they used to have $200,000,
Are gone now.
>> they used to have $200,000,
$300,000 $400,000 budgets to do
>> they used to have $200,000,
$300,000 $400,000 budgets to do an album.
$300,000 $400,000 budgets to do an album.
Now the money is just not there
An album.
Now the money is just not there the way it used to be.
Now the money is just not there the way it used to be.
>> budgets were so small, we'd
The way it used to be.
>> budgets were so small, we'd be tracking late five days,
>> budgets were so small, we'd be tracking late five days,
10 days.
Be tracking late five days,
10 days.
>> it was always last-minute,
10 days.
>> it was always last-minute,
"can you work this afternoon?"
>> it was always last-minute,
"can you work this afternoon?" or whatever.
"can you work this afternoon?" or whatever.
So...
Or whatever.
So...
[ neil young's "birds" plays ]
So...
[ neil young's "birds" plays ]
>> in the end, it was a little
[ neil young's "birds" plays ]
>> in the end, it was a little hard to swallow.
>> in the end, it was a little hard to swallow.
You know, we started selling off
Hard to swallow.
You know, we started selling off the gear in studio "b," 'cause
You know, we started selling off the gear in studio "b," 'cause the studio was way behind on
The gear in studio "b," 'cause the studio was way behind on bills.
The studio was way behind on bills.
>> ♪ lover, there will be
Bills.
>> ♪ lover, there will be another one ♪
>> ♪ lover, there will be another one ♪
♪ who'll hover over you
Another one ♪
♪ who'll hover over you beneath the sun ♪
♪ who'll hover over you beneath the sun ♪
>> most of the great studios
Beneath the sun ♪
>> most of the great studios have gone out of business, and a
>> most of the great studios have gone out of business, and a lot of what you hear on the
Have gone out of business, and a lot of what you hear on the radio was made on people's
Lot of what you hear on the radio was made on people's laptops.
Radio was made on people's laptops.
>> I think pro tools just really
Laptops.
>> I think pro tools just really was, to a lot of people, was the
>> I think pro tools just really was, to a lot of people, was the death knell.
Was, to a lot of people, was the death knell.
>> it always was an insider
Death knell.
>> it always was an insider place -- always.
>> it always was an insider place -- always.
But it could not survive against
Place -- always.
But it could not survive against pro tools.
But it could not survive against pro tools.
You know, the internet's cool
Pro tools.
You know, the internet's cool for some stuff, but, like many
You know, the internet's cool for some stuff, but, like many things, there's no bookstore,
For some stuff, but, like many things, there's no bookstore, there's no music store, and
Things, there's no bookstore, there's no music store, and there's no sound city.
There's no music store, and there's no sound city.
>> ♪ and show you the way to
There's no sound city.
>> ♪ and show you the way to go ♪
>> ♪ and show you the way to go ♪
♪ it's over
Go ♪
♪ it's over
♪ it's over
♪ it's over
♪ it's over
>> I had heard that sound city
♪ it's over
>> I had heard that sound city was about to close.
>> I had heard that sound city was about to close.
Someone said, "you should call
Was about to close.
Someone said, "you should call shivaun."
Someone said, "you should call shivaun." and I talked to shivaun, and she
Shivaun." and I talked to shivaun, and she was in tears, man.
And I talked to shivaun, and she was in tears, man.
It was -- it was heavy.
Was in tears, man.
It was -- it was heavy.
>> sound city was my home.
It was -- it was heavy.
>> sound city was my home.
And, basically, after all those
>> sound city was my home.
And, basically, after all those years -- after 19 years, laid
And, basically, after all those years -- after 19 years, laid off, no severance pay, no
Years -- after 19 years, laid off, no severance pay, no medical, nothing.
Off, no severance pay, no medical, nothing.
>> shivaun was like -- she was
Medical, nothing.
>> shivaun was like -- she was like a mom to me, you know?
>> shivaun was like -- she was like a mom to me, you know?
I -- I left my mom.
Like a mom to me, you know?
I -- I left my mom.
My mom was in tennessee and then
I -- I left my mom.
My mom was in tennessee and then
I was out here, and shivaun was
My mom was in tennessee and then
I was out here, and shivaun was so cool, man.
I was out here, and shivaun was so cool, man.
I love her so much.
So cool, man.
I love her so much.
>> ♪ shadow on the things you
I love her so much.
>> ♪ shadow on the things you know ♪
>> ♪ shadow on the things you know ♪
>> [ sniffles ] sorry.
Know ♪
>> [ sniffles ] sorry.
>> ♪ feathers fall around you
>> [ sniffles ] sorry.
>> ♪ feathers fall around you
>> yes, it's been hard.
>> ♪ feathers fall around you
>> yes, it's been hard.
It still -- I try to move on,
>> yes, it's been hard.
It still -- I try to move on, but it's -- it's hard.
It still -- I try to move on, but it's -- it's hard.
>> ♪ it's over
But it's -- it's hard.
>> ♪ it's over
♪ it's over
>> ♪ it's over
♪ it's over
♪ ooh, ooh
♪ it's over
♪ ooh, ooh
[ music fades ]
>> looking back, I was just a kid when I walked into sound city, and that board is
Kid when I walked into sound city, and that board is the reason I'm here right now.
Sound city, and that board is the reason I'm here right now.
I'd do anything for it.
The reason I'm here right now.
I'd do anything for it.
>> this big room and that neve
I'd do anything for it.
>> this big room and that neve console is what got us all the
>> this big room and that neve console is what got us all the big rock 'n' roll bands.
Console is what got us all the big rock 'n' roll bands.
We're digging out all this
Big rock 'n' roll bands.
We're digging out all this stuff, and I never dreamed, in a
We're digging out all this stuff, and I never dreamed, in a million years, I could find
Stuff, and I never dreamed, in a million years, I could find this.
Million years, I could find this.
Here's the original order for
This.
Here's the original order for the neve console.
Here's the original order for the neve console.
>> oh, my god.
The neve console.
>> oh, my god.
Really?
>> oh, my god.
Really?
Wow!
Really?
Wow!
And whose signature -- is that
Wow!
And whose signature -- is that rupert neve's signature?
And whose signature -- is that rupert neve's signature?
Who's that?
Rupert neve's signature?
Who's that?
>> I'm gonna give that to you if
Who's that?
>> I'm gonna give that to you if you'd like it.
>> I'm gonna give that to you if you'd like it.
>> tom, thank you so much, man.
You'd like it.
>> tom, thank you so much, man.
>> you're welcome.
>> tom, thank you so much, man.
>> you're welcome.
Historic document, there.
>> you're welcome.
Historic document, there.
>> it really is.
Historic document, there.
>> it really is.
Thank you very much, my friend.
>> it really is.
Thank you very much, my friend.
>> thank you.
Thank you very much, my friend.
>> thank you.
>> tom, that's great, man.
>> thank you.
>> tom, that's great, man.
Wow!
>> tom, that's great, man.
Wow!
>> that neve console, we sold to
Wow!
>> that neve console, we sold to
dave, and that's how all this
>> that neve console, we sold to
dave, and that's how all this
all started.
>> all right. Let's do this.
>> to me, it's, like -- it's a
living, breathing piece of the
music that we've made.
Living, breathing piece of the
music that we've made.
It's just as instrumental as any
Music that we've made.
It's just as instrumental as any
instrument that's run through
It's just as instrumental as any
instrument that's run through
it.
Instrument that's run through
it.
It's the sound of the records
It.
It's the sound of the records
that were made at sound city.
It's the sound of the records
that were made at sound city.
This thing is a piece of
That were made at sound city.
This thing is a piece of
rock 'n' roll history.
This thing is a piece of
rock 'n' roll history.
I thought that board would
Rock 'n' roll history.
I thought that board would
just go straight to the
I thought that board would
just go straight to the
rock 'n' roll hall of fame.
Just go straight to the
rock 'n' roll hall of fame.
I thought no one was gonna get
Rock 'n' roll hall of fame.
I thought no one was gonna get
that board.
I think they knew, like, I
wasn't just gonna bubble-wrap it
and stick it in a warehouse.
I was gonna fucking use it...
A lot.
Trying to pull it through a
A lot.
Trying to pull it through a
window.
Trying to pull it through a
window.
[ laughs ]
Window.
[ laughs ]
>> I spent so much time sitting
[ laughs ]
>> I spent so much time sitting
over here, playing with these
>> I spent so much time sitting
over here, playing with these
things.
Over here, playing with these
things.
[ laughter ]
Things.
[ laughter ]
>> well, was it still sitting
[ laughter ]
>> well, was it still sitting
there, dave?
>> well, was it still sitting
there, dave?
>> yeah, you know, it had been
There, dave?
>> yeah, you know, it had been
working.
>> yeah, you know, it had been
working.
So, the first thing I really
Working.
So, the first thing I really
wanted to do was invite everyone
So, the first thing I really
wanted to do was invite everyone
back to make this new record.
Wanted to do was invite everyone
back to make this new record.
Giving that old board this new
Back to make this new record.
Giving that old board this new
life with new music.
Giving that old board this new
life with new music.
[ stevie nicks'
Life with new music.
[ stevie nicks'
"you can't fix this" plays ]
[ stevie nicks'
"you can't fix this" plays ]
telling the story of sound city
"you can't fix this" plays ]
telling the story of sound city
is one thing.
Telling the story of sound city
is one thing.
Plugging in and actually putting
Is one thing.
Plugging in and actually putting
it through the board and putting
Plugging in and actually putting
it through the board and putting
it on a 2-inch reel?
It through the board and putting
it on a 2-inch reel?
That's what I'm talking about.
>> ♪ they don't talk much about
it ♪
♪ it goes back so many years
It ♪
♪ it goes back so many years
♪ all the times we almost didn't
♪ it goes back so many years
♪ all the times we almost didn't
make it ♪
♪ we stayed clear
♪ we walked through the
darkness ♪
♪ we walked through the
darkness ♪
♪ and made a pact not to dance
Darkness ♪
♪ and made a pact not to dance
with the devil ♪
♪ and made a pact not to dance
with the devil ♪
♪ even when the devil seemed to
With the devil ♪
♪ even when the devil seemed to
have a heart ♪
♪ even when the devil seemed to
have a heart ♪
♪ he said we'd never be sorry
Have a heart ♪
♪ he said we'd never be sorry
♪ for what we've done
♪ he said we'd never be sorry
♪ for what we've done
♪ and we never allowed the devil
♪ for what we've done
♪ and we never allowed the devil
to come to the party ♪
♪ and we never allowed the devil
to come to the party ♪
I messed up.
To come to the party ♪
I messed up.
>> it's amazing.
I messed up.
>> it's amazing.
Want to do another?
>> it's amazing.
Want to do another?
>> sure.
Want to do another?
>> sure.
>> you want to take it up
>> sure.
>> you want to take it up
through verse one and verse two,
>> you want to take it up
through verse one and verse two,
up to that first chorus?
Through verse one and verse two,
up to that first chorus?
>> yeah.
Up to that first chorus?
>> yeah.
>> what we're hoping to do on
>> yeah.
>> what we're hoping to do on
this album is to catch a little
>> what we're hoping to do on
this album is to catch a little
bit of that vibe that was
This album is to catch a little
bit of that vibe that was
captured when all those classic
Bit of that vibe that was
captured when all those classic
records were made at sound city.
Captured when all those classic
records were made at sound city.
We'll try to put some of that
Records were made at sound city.
We'll try to put some of that
into this album.
We'll try to put some of that
into this album.
>> ♪ ...Sorry
Into this album.
>> ♪ ...Sorry
♪ for what we've done
>> ♪ ...Sorry
♪ for what we've done
♪ and we never allowed the devil
♪ for what we've done
♪ and we never allowed the devil
to come to the party ♪
♪ and we never allowed the devil
to come to the party ♪
♪ you can't fix this
To come to the party ♪
♪ you can't fix this
♪ you lost a friend
♪ you can't fix this
♪ you lost a friend
♪ hearts breaking
♪ you lost a friend
♪ hearts breaking
♪ right and left
♪ hearts breaking
♪ right and left
>> fuckin' "a."
♪ right and left
>> fuckin' "a."
that girl can sing.
>> fuckin' "a."
that girl can sing.
>> any input from the foos?
That girl can sing.
>> any input from the foos?
>> just go.
>> any input from the foos?
>> just go.
I'm not -- just do what you do.
>> just go.
I'm not -- just do what you do.
>> I am kind of radical, you
I'm not -- just do what you do.
>> I am kind of radical, you
know.
>> I am kind of radical, you
know.
♪ never dance with the devil
Know.
♪ never dance with the devil
♪ keep running, yeah
♪ never dance with the devil
♪ keep running, yeah
>> there's a reason why these
♪ keep running, yeah
>> there's a reason why these
people have achieved these
>> there's a reason why these
people have achieved these
things that they've achieved.
People have achieved these
things that they've achieved.
You can hear it. You can see it.
Things that they've achieved.
You can hear it. You can see it.
>> ♪ don't ever dance with the
You can hear it. You can see it.
>> ♪ don't ever dance with the
devil ♪
>> ♪ don't ever dance with the
devil ♪
♪ he will burn you dow-ow-n
Devil ♪
♪ he will burn you dow-ow-n
♪ you can't fix this
♪ he will burn you dow-ow-n
♪ you can't fix this
[ music fades ]
♪ you can't fix this
[ music fades ]
>> that's rad. Sounds rad.
[ music fades ]
>> that's rad. Sounds rad.
>> and I get to do my snake
>> that's rad. Sounds rad.
>> and I get to do my snake
dance.
>> and I get to do my snake
dance.
[ laughter ]
Dance.
[ laughter ]
I'm just feeling very wonderful
[ laughter ]
I'm just feeling very wonderful
to be in your studio with this
I'm just feeling very wonderful
to be in your studio with this
board and know that this board
To be in your studio with this
board and know that this board
was the first place that we did
Board and know that this board
was the first place that we did
"buckingham nicks."
Was the first place that we did
"buckingham nicks."
"15458 cabrito road, van nuys,
"buckingham nicks."
"15458 cabrito road, van nuys,
california."
"15458 cabrito road, van nuys,
california."
this is a letter that I wrote to
California."
this is a letter that I wrote to
my mom and dad and my brother in
This is a letter that I wrote to
my mom and dad and my brother in
the middle of the making of
My mom and dad and my brother in
the middle of the making of
"buckingham nicks."
The middle of the making of
"buckingham nicks."
"dear mom and dad and chris,
"buckingham nicks."
"dear mom and dad and chris,
well, here I am once again at
"dear mom and dad and chris,
well, here I am once again at
the famous sound city recording
Well, here I am once again at
the famous sound city recording
studio."
The famous sound city recording
studio."
"sound city, inc."
Studio."
"sound city, inc."
ta-da!
"sound city, inc."
ta-da!
"I'm getting very tired of
Ta-da!
"I'm getting very tired of
sitting around listening to
"I'm getting very tired of
sitting around listening to
12 hours of music per day.
Sitting around listening to
12 hours of music per day.
Oh, well.
12 hours of music per day.
Oh, well.
I know it will pay off in the
Oh, well.
I know it will pay off in the
end.
I know it will pay off in the
end.
It will all be worth it.
End.
It will all be worth it.
I hope that all of my little
It will all be worth it.
I hope that all of my little
family is doing fine and not
I hope that all of my little
family is doing fine and not
working too hard.
Family is doing fine and not
working too hard.
Moving right along, I just want
Working too hard.
Moving right along, I just want
to say that I certainly do miss
Moving right along, I just want
to say that I certainly do miss
you all and wish you could be
To say that I certainly do miss
you all and wish you could be
here to hear some of this stuff.
You all and wish you could be
here to hear some of this stuff.
Lindsey may go down in history
Here to hear some of this stuff.
Lindsey may go down in history
as one of the greats in guitar
Lindsey may go down in history
as one of the greats in guitar
playing.
As one of the greats in guitar
playing.
It really is quite amazing.
Playing.
It really is quite amazing.
Well, no more news as of yet.
It really is quite amazing.
Well, no more news as of yet.
So much love to you all, and
Well, no more news as of yet.
So much love to you all, and
hold good thoughts about this
So much love to you all, and
hold good thoughts about this
thing.
Hold good thoughts about this
thing.
I love you. Stevie."
>> I think it really is a
testament to how many people
actually did love sound city and
Testament to how many people
actually did love sound city and
do love that neve console and
Actually did love sound city and
do love that neve console and
want to be part of history.
>> I was bragging to everybody.
"guess who I'm calling tonight?
Rick fucking springfield."
"guess who I'm calling tonight?
Rick fucking springfield."
[ guitar solo plays ]
>> I've always just been a big
believer in the power of the
song.
Believer in the power of the
song.
To me, the highest I ever feel
Song.
To me, the highest I ever feel
is in the middle of writing a
To me, the highest I ever feel
is in the middle of writing a
song that I think I've hooked
Is in the middle of writing a
song that I think I've hooked
into something, you know?
Song that I think I've hooked
into something, you know?
I had an idea.
Into something, you know?
I had an idea.
I don't know if it would work.
I had an idea.
I don't know if it would work.
But would you want to try
I don't know if it would work.
But would you want to try
something?
But would you want to try
something?
So, if we played over the riff,
Something?
So, if we played over the riff,
it goes...
So, if we played over the riff,
it goes...
[ vocalizing guitar riff ]
>> that'd be really cool.
Let's try it from the top and
see how that sounds.
Let's try it from the top and
see how that sounds.
[ up-tempo rock 'n' roll plays ]
>> yeah.
I think it's a great part.
>> it's got "rick springfield"
I think it's a great part.
>> it's got "rick springfield"
written all over it.
>> it's got "rick springfield"
written all over it.
>> it's awesome.
Written all over it.
>> it's awesome.
>> I love it.
>> it's awesome.
>> I love it.
It's got that stress rock.
>> I love it.
It's got that stress rock.
I like that.
It's got that stress rock.
I like that.
>> I just want to go hang out in
I like that.
>> I just want to go hang out in
the studio.
>> I just want to go hang out in
the studio.
I just like the process.
The studio.
I just like the process.
I love doing things on the fly
I just like the process.
I love doing things on the fly
and in the studio...
I love doing things on the fly
and in the studio...
>> I'm just trying to think what
And in the studio...
>> I'm just trying to think what
would be nice to -- if we -- to
>> I'm just trying to think what
would be nice to -- if we -- to
get back into that section.
Would be nice to -- if we -- to
get back into that section.
>> ...And just kind of play
Get back into that section.
>> ...And just kind of play
arrangements in a repetitive
>> ...And just kind of play
arrangements in a repetitive
fashion over and over and over
Arrangements in a repetitive
fashion over and over and over
until some little change
Fashion over and over and over
until some little change
happened.
Until some little change
happened.
>> what did you just do?
Happened.
>> what did you just do?
You did something kind of cool.
>> what did you just do?
You did something kind of cool.
>> "d," "a."
You did something kind of cool.
>> "d," "a."
>> a little happy accident or
>> "d," "a."
>> a little happy accident or
whatever, and it's like,
>> a little happy accident or
whatever, and it's like,
everyone, "oh, what was that
Whatever, and it's like,
everyone, "oh, what was that
that just happened?"
Everyone, "oh, what was that
that just happened?"
that's part of the arrangement
That just happened?"
that's part of the arrangement
now.
That's part of the arrangement
now.
>> oh, that'd be so great, and
Now.
>> oh, that'd be so great, and
then right out of there, you
>> oh, that'd be so great, and
then right out of there, you
just fucking go, "aah!"
Then right out of there, you
just fucking go, "aah!"
>> it's the perfect pair of
Just fucking go, "aah!"
>> it's the perfect pair of
pants.
>> it's the perfect pair of
pants.
It really is.
Pants.
It really is.
[ up-tempo rock 'n' roll plays ]
It really is.
[ up-tempo rock 'n' roll plays ]
>> but the good thing about
[ up-tempo rock 'n' roll plays ]
>> but the good thing about
learning while you're recording,
>> but the good thing about
learning while you're recording,
what you sometimes accidentally
Learning while you're recording,
what you sometimes accidentally
get is something good if you
What you sometimes accidentally
get is something good if you
don't have any idea what you're
Get is something good if you
don't have any idea what you're
doing.
Don't have any idea what you're
doing.
>> and the sense of discovery,
Doing.
>> and the sense of discovery,
like, is a big part of it.
>> and the sense of discovery,
like, is a big part of it.
>> everybody gets it all at
Like, is a big part of it.
>> everybody gets it all at
once, and that's the first time
>> everybody gets it all at
once, and that's the first time
you ever played it, and it's got
Once, and that's the first time
you ever played it, and it's got
everything new for the first
You ever played it, and it's got
everything new for the first
time.
Everything new for the first
time.
It's like your first anything.
Time.
It's like your first anything.
And that's the cherry of all
It's like your first anything.
And that's the cherry of all
time.
And that's the cherry of all
time.
>> what if we tried doing the
Time.
>> what if we tried doing the
rick part as a pre-chorus?
>> what if we tried doing the
rick part as a pre-chorus?
>> yes! Ha!
Rick part as a pre-chorus?
>> yes! Ha!
That's so good!
>> yes! Ha!
That's so good!
>> [ laughs ]
That's so good!
>> [ laughs ]
>> 'cause then it goes into the
>> [ laughs ]
>> 'cause then it goes into the
chorus.
>> 'cause then it goes into the
chorus.
That's awesome!
Chorus.
That's awesome!
>> better be good now, pat.
That's awesome!
>> better be good now, pat.
>> I know.
>> better be good now, pat.
>> I know.
[ laughter ]
>> 2.
[ guitar plays ]
>> ♪ I can't say that I like her
manner ♪
♪ I can't say that I like her
Manner ♪
♪ I can't say that I like her
face ♪
♪ I can't say that I like her
face ♪
♪ I'm carved up on a silver
Face ♪
♪ I'm carved up on a silver
platter ♪
♪ I'm carved up on a silver
platter ♪
♪ serve warm
Platter ♪
♪ serve warm
♪ she's a real head case
♪ serve warm
♪ she's a real head case
♪ I won't wait for an
♪ she's a real head case
♪ I won't wait for an
invitation ♪
♪ I won't wait for an
invitation ♪
♪ I can't stand for the
Invitation ♪
♪ I can't stand for the
sacrifice ♪
♪ I can't stand for the
sacrifice ♪
♪ I won't die as an unknown
Sacrifice ♪
♪ I won't die as an unknown
soldier ♪
♪ I won't die as an unknown
soldier ♪
♪ I won't even try
Soldier ♪
♪ I won't even try
>> we came in, we practiced the
♪ I won't even try
>> we came in, we practiced the
song, played it a few times --
>> we came in, we practiced the
song, played it a few times --
kind of a bunch of times -- and
Song, played it a few times --
kind of a bunch of times -- and
we did it live.
Kind of a bunch of times -- and
we did it live.
How special was that?
We did it live.
How special was that?
>> ♪ just like the man that
How special was that?
>> ♪ just like the man that
never was ♪
>> ♪ just like the man that
never was ♪
♪ just like
Never was ♪
♪ just like
♪ just like
♪ just like
♪ just like
♪ just like the man that never
♪ just like
♪ just like the man that never
was ♪
♪ just like the man that never
was ♪
♪ just like the man that never
Was ♪
♪ just like the man that never
was ♪
All the elements of it -- the
playing, the writing -- it's
something that will pull you out
Playing, the writing -- it's
something that will pull you out
of bed every morning and make
Something that will pull you out
of bed every morning and make
you resist going to bed at
Of bed every morning and make
you resist going to bed at
night, 'cause you want to keep
You resist going to bed at
night, 'cause you want to keep
working on it.
Night, 'cause you want to keep
working on it.
Music's been that for me.
Working on it.
Music's been that for me.
♪ I am the man that never was
[ music stops ]
>> great. Thank you.
>> there's darkness in you, boy.
>> great. Thank you.
>> there's darkness in you, boy.
>> oh, yeah, a lot of darkness
>> there's darkness in you, boy.
>> oh, yeah, a lot of darkness
in me.
>> oh, yeah, a lot of darkness
in me.
>> it's dark and so cool, man.
In me.
>> it's dark and so cool, man.
>> I've spent a lot of time in
>> it's dark and so cool, man.
>> I've spent a lot of time in
front of that board.
>> I've spent a lot of time in
front of that board.
Thanks, dave.
Front of that board.
Thanks, dave.
It's a great enabler.
Thanks, dave.
It's a great enabler.
>> great, man.
It's a great enabler.
>> great, man.
Anybody that's been to
>> great, man.
Anybody that's been to
sound city knows exactly why I'm
Anybody that's been to
sound city knows exactly why I'm
making this record.
Sound city knows exactly why I'm
making this record.
They get it.
Making this record.
They get it.
I have an idea.
They get it.
I have an idea.
Why don't we just start it
I have an idea.
Why don't we just start it
lee ving style where you go...
Why don't we just start it
lee ving style where you go...
1, 2, 3, 4! 1, 2, 3, 4!
Lee ving style where you go...
1, 2, 3, 4! 1, 2, 3, 4!
>> oh, I'm on it!
1, 2, 3, 4! 1, 2, 3, 4!
>> oh, I'm on it!
1, 2, 3, 4! 1, 2, 3, 4!
>> oh, I'm on it!
1, 2, 3, 4! 1, 2, 3, 4!
[ "your wife is calling" plays ]
>> ♪ your wife is calling
>> ♪ tell her I'm not here
>> ♪ your wife is calling
>> ♪ tell her I'm not here
>> ♪ your wife is calling
>> ♪ just having one beer
>> ♪ your wife is calling
>> ♪ just having one beer
♪ your wife is calling
>> ♪ da uber frau ♪
>> ♪ your wife is calling
>> ♪ be home in half an hour
>> ♪ your wife is calling
>> ♪ be home in half an hour
>> ♪ your wife is calling
>> ♪ be home in half an hour
>> ♪ your wife is calling
>> ♪ you say something, dear?
>> ♪ your wife is calling
>> ♪ you say something, dear?
>> ♪ your wife is calling
>> ♪ you say something, dear?
>> ♪ your wife is calling
>> ♪ just having more beer
>> ♪ your wife is calling
>> ♪ just having more beer
>> ♪ your wife is calling
>> ♪ just having more beer
>> ♪ your wife is calling
>> ♪ you've not to fear
>> ♪ your wife is calling
>> ♪ you've not to fear
>> ♪ your wife is calling
>> ♪ you've not to fear
>> ♪ your wife is calling
>> ♪ lift your voice, sing for
>> ♪ your wife is calling
>> ♪ lift your voice, sing for beer ♪
>> ♪ lift your voice, sing for beer ♪
[ up-tempo rock 'n' roll plays ]
>> in the studio, you're trying to boost your own performance from the energy that you're
To boost your own performance from the energy that you're feeding from in your partners.
From the energy that you're feeding from in your partners.
>> ♪ your wife is calling
Feeding from in your partners.
>> ♪ your wife is calling
♪ your wife is calling
>> ♪ your wife is calling
♪ your wife is calling
>> you can't do that if you're
♪ your wife is calling
>> you can't do that if you're standing there alone.
>> ♪ your wife is calling
♪ your wife is calling
♪ your wife is calling
♪ your wife is calling
♪ your wife is calling
♪ your wife is calling
♪ your wife is calling
♪ your wife is calling
♪ your wife is calling
♪ your wife is calling
♪ your wife is calling
[ music stops ]
♪ your wife is calling
[ music stops ]
[ laughter ]
[ music stops ]
[ laughter ]
>> fuck, yeah.
[ laughter ]
>> fuck, yeah.
It's a conversation, and that's
>> fuck, yeah.
It's a conversation, and that's a musical relationship that I
It's a conversation, and that's a musical relationship that I think everybody searches for.
A musical relationship that I think everybody searches for.
[ soft music plays ]
>> I think the downside these days is thinking that, "I can do this all on my own."
Days is thinking that, "I can do this all on my own." yes, you can do this all on your
This all on my own." yes, you can do this all on your own, but you'll be a much
Yes, you can do this all on your own, but you'll be a much happier human being to do it
Own, but you'll be a much happier human being to do it with other human beings, and I
Happier human being to do it with other human beings, and I can guarantee you that.
>> how would you define "feel"?
>> feel is -- is just a part of who you are.
>> feel is -- is just a part of who you are.
It just comes from where you --
Who you are.
It just comes from where you -- where you're coming from
It just comes from where you -- where you're coming from
>> it's just the way your heart
Where you're coming from
>> it's just the way your heart beats, you know?
Everybody's heart beats a little different.
Everybody's got a little
Different.
Everybody's got a little different feel.
Everybody's got a little different feel.
>> "feel" doesn't mean you're in
Different feel.
>> "feel" doesn't mean you're in time.
>> "feel" doesn't mean you're in time.
You know, 'cause something might
Time.
You know, 'cause something might have a really out-of-time kind
You know, 'cause something might have a really out-of-time kind of feel.
Have a really out-of-time kind of feel.
It might be gloriously out of
Of feel.
It might be gloriously out of tune and just be awesome.
>> it's a chemistry -- something that happens between people.
Feel is not something that you learn in a book.
Feel is something that you find
Learn in a book.
Feel is something that you find as a musician.
Feel is something that you find as a musician.
>> it's like when you take in a
As a musician.
>> it's like when you take in a breath, your body swells up.
>> it's like when you take in a breath, your body swells up.
When you exhale, it collapses a
Breath, your body swells up.
When you exhale, it collapses a bit, and sometimes music does
When you exhale, it collapses a bit, and sometimes music does that so subtle.
Bit, and sometimes music does that so subtle.
But feel is being human.
That so subtle.
But feel is being human.
[ "if I were me" continues ]
>> no two musicians are the same, even if we're playing the same song.
Same, even if we're playing the same song.
No two musicians do it the same
Same song.
No two musicians do it the same way.
No two musicians do it the same way.
>> it's so hard to be understood
Way.
>> it's so hard to be understood in life, and that's why, when
>> it's so hard to be understood in life, and that's why, when you meet someone where you
In life, and that's why, when you meet someone where you understand each other at that
You meet someone where you understand each other at that moment, you sort of want to hold
Understand each other at that moment, you sort of want to hold on to it, you know?
Moment, you sort of want to hold on to it, you know?
When someone has great feel,
On to it, you know?
When someone has great feel, whether it's a drummer or a
When someone has great feel, whether it's a drummer or a guitar player, it kind of makes
Whether it's a drummer or a guitar player, it kind of makes you fall in love with their
Guitar player, it kind of makes you fall in love with their personality.
You fall in love with their personality.
You realize what a beautiful
Personality.
You realize what a beautiful person they are, you know?
You realize what a beautiful person they are, you know?
[ music fades ]
Person they are, you know?
[ music fades ]
[ guitar plays up-tempo music ]
[ music fades ]
[ guitar plays up-tempo music ]
[ music stops ]
[ guitar plays up-tempo music ]
[ music stops ]
[ guitar plays up-tempo music ]
>> there's a lot of people growing up now that won't do studio time and have never
Growing up now that won't do studio time and have never touched a compressor that's the
Studio time and have never touched a compressor that's the one that's being emulated as the
Touched a compressor that's the one that's being emulated as the picture on their plug-in on
One that's being emulated as the picture on their plug-in on their laptop.
Picture on their plug-in on their laptop.
They're missing out on
Their laptop.
They're missing out on something.
They're missing out on something.
You know?
Something.
You know?
[ hi-hat cymbals play ]
[ drum plays ]
[ guitar plays mid-tempo music ]
>> trent is using technology as an instrument, not as a crutch.
He doesn't need it.
An instrument, not as a crutch.
He doesn't need it.
He's one of the most brilliant
He doesn't need it.
He's one of the most brilliant people I've ever met in my
He's one of the most brilliant people I've ever met in my entire life.
People I've ever met in my entire life.
He's the person that could
Entire life.
He's the person that could inspire the digital end of this
He's the person that could inspire the digital end of this conversation.
Inspire the digital end of this conversation.
[ music stops ]
Conversation.
[ music stops ]
>> hey, you guys, no fucking way
[ music stops ]
>> hey, you guys, no fucking way with the smoke machine.
>> hey, you guys, no fucking way with the smoke machine.
[ laughing ] there's no fucking
With the smoke machine.
[ laughing ] there's no fucking way that's gonna go down.
[ laughing ] there's no fucking way that's gonna go down.
>> I'll take the smoke machine
Way that's gonna go down.
>> I'll take the smoke machine in here.
>> I'll take the smoke machine in here.
[ "mantra" plays ]
In here.
[ "mantra" plays ]
>> my grandma pushed me into
[ "mantra" plays ]
>> my grandma pushed me into piano.
>> my grandma pushed me into piano.
I remember, when I was 5, I
Piano.
I remember, when I was 5, I started taking classical
I remember, when I was 5, I started taking classical lessons.
Started taking classical lessons.
I liked it, and I felt I was
Lessons.
I liked it, and I felt I was good at it.
I liked it, and I felt I was good at it.
I knew, in life, I was supposed
Good at it.
I knew, in life, I was supposed to make music.
I knew, in life, I was supposed to make music.
Feels like a need a
To make music.
Feels like a need a differentiator there -- a cool
Feels like a need a differentiator there -- a cool bass part.
Differentiator there -- a cool bass part.
[ music continues ]
The sound I have is not right.
That's not helping things at the moment.
That's not helping things at the moment.
>> I could do better than that.
Moment.
>> I could do better than that.
[ drum plays ]
>> I could do better than that.
[ drum plays ]
>> are you hearing something you
[ drum plays ]
>> are you hearing something you want to try with the bass here?
>> are you hearing something you want to try with the bass here?
You're not stepping on my toes.
Want to try with the bass here?
You're not stepping on my toes.
[ music takes on syncopated
You're not stepping on my toes.
[ music takes on syncopated rhythm ]
I practiced long and hard and studied and learned how to play an instrument that provided me a
Studied and learned how to play an instrument that provided me a foundation where I can base
An instrument that provided me a foundation where I can base everything I think of in terms
Foundation where I can base everything I think of in terms of where it sits on the piano.
Everything I think of in terms of where it sits on the piano.
>> I sort of liked that, at one
Of where it sits on the piano.
>> I sort of liked that, at one point, it kind of got there, and
>> I sort of liked that, at one point, it kind of got there, and then it backed off.
Point, it kind of got there, and then it backed off.
>> it can kind of brood and be
Then it backed off.
>> it can kind of brood and be really simple and empty and sort
>> it can kind of brood and be really simple and empty and sort of kind of like lift the curtain
Really simple and empty and sort of kind of like lift the curtain on it, and it can expand.
Of kind of like lift the curtain on it, and it can expand.
[ music stops ]
On it, and it can expand.
[ music stops ]
>> all right, can I just say
[ music stops ]
>> all right, can I just say that that is fucking awesome?
>> all right, can I just say that that is fucking awesome?
That, right there, sounds so
That that is fucking awesome?
That, right there, sounds so fucking beautiful.
That, right there, sounds so fucking beautiful.
I really like the sound of these
Fucking beautiful.
I really like the sound of these three things together.
I really like the sound of these three things together.
I think it sounds really cool.
Three things together.
I think it sounds really cool.
>> okay, then let's keep doing
I think it sounds really cool.
>> okay, then let's keep doing it that way.
>> okay, then let's keep doing it that way.
[ music resumes ]
It that way.
[ music resumes ]
>> this whole thing should just
[ music resumes ]
>> this whole thing should just sunrise.
>> this whole thing should just sunrise.
It would make it beautiful,
Sunrise.
It would make it beautiful, you know?
It would make it beautiful, you know?
It sort of, like, evolves until
You know?
It sort of, like, evolves until it hits this point and maybe
It sort of, like, evolves until it hits this point and maybe goes zoom!
It hits this point and maybe goes zoom!
[ bass guitar solo ]
Goes zoom!
[ bass guitar solo ] when I'm writing music today,
[ bass guitar solo ] when I'm writing music today, rarely do I sit down and think,
When I'm writing music today, rarely do I sit down and think,
"oh, this should resolve to that
Rarely do I sit down and think,
"oh, this should resolve to that suspended..."
"oh, this should resolve to that suspended..." you know, I don't think of that
Suspended..." you know, I don't think of that shit.
You know, I don't think of that shit.
But, subconsciously, I know I
Shit.
But, subconsciously, I know I do.
But, subconsciously, I know I do.
And just when you've sold that
Do.
And just when you've sold that enough, that's the time to
And just when you've sold that enough, that's the time to change to an ending and sort of
Enough, that's the time to change to an ending and sort of like let it rip a little bit.
Change to an ending and sort of like let it rip a little bit.
You know what I mean?
Like let it rip a little bit.
You know what I mean?
[ music intensifies ]
You know what I mean?
[ music intensifies ]
I like having that foundation in
[ music intensifies ]
I like having that foundation in there, and that's a very
I like having that foundation in there, and that's a very un-punk-rock thing to say.
There, and that's a very un-punk-rock thing to say.
[ music intensifies ]
But understanding an instrument and thinking about it and learning that skill has been
And thinking about it and learning that skill has been invaluable to me.
Learning that skill has been invaluable to me.
[ music softens ]
Invaluable to me.
[ music softens ]
[ music stops ]
[ music softens ]
[ music stops ]
>> [ sighing ] ah.
[ music stops ]
>> [ sighing ] ah.
That was pretty good.
>> [ sighing ] ah.
That was pretty good.
>> sounded pretty good to me,
That was pretty good.
>> sounded pretty good to me, too.
>> sounded pretty good to me, too.
I've found now, as processors
Too.
I've found now, as processors have gotten faster and
I've found now, as processors have gotten faster and programmers have gotten
Have gotten faster and programmers have gotten smarter...
Programmers have gotten smarter...
[ chord plays ]
Smarter...
[ chord plays ]
...There's some pretty music
[ chord plays ]
...There's some pretty music tools that are showing up in the
...There's some pretty music tools that are showing up in the digital world.
Tools that are showing up in the digital world.
>> yeah, take me to the top of
Digital world.
>> yeah, take me to the top of the drop.
>> yeah, take me to the top of the drop.
[ music resumes ]
The tools are better.
You know, tools are much better today than they were five years
You know, tools are much better today than they were five years ago -- certainly, 30 years ago.
Today than they were five years ago -- certainly, 30 years ago.
[ music continues ]
Ago -- certainly, 30 years ago.
[ music continues ] now that everyone is empowered
[ music continues ] now that everyone is empowered with these tools to create
Now that everyone is empowered with these tools to create stuff, has there been a lot more
With these tools to create stuff, has there been a lot more great shit coming out?
Stuff, has there been a lot more great shit coming out?
Not really.
Great shit coming out?
Not really.
You still have to have something
Not really.
You still have to have something to do with those tools.
You still have to have something to do with those tools.
[ music fades ]
To do with those tools.
[ music fades ]
>> rad.
[ music fades ]
>> rad.
Yeah, just, you know...
>> rad.
Yeah, just, you know...
>> you should really try to have
Yeah, just, you know...
>> you should really try to have something to say.
>> you should really try to have something to say.
[ canned air whooshing ]
Something to say.
[ canned air whooshing ]
>> it all started with this idea
[ canned air whooshing ]
>> it all started with this idea that I wanted to tell the story
>> it all started with this idea that I wanted to tell the story of the board.
That I wanted to tell the story of the board.
The conversation became
Of the board.
The conversation became something much bigger.
The conversation became something much bigger.
Like, in this age of technology,
Something much bigger.
Like, in this age of technology, where you can simulate or
Like, in this age of technology, where you can simulate or manipulate anything, how do we
Where you can simulate or manipulate anything, how do we retain that human element?
Manipulate anything, how do we retain that human element?
How do we keep music to sound
Retain that human element?
How do we keep music to sound like people -- that feeling that
How do we keep music to sound like people -- that feeling that
I got when I was young -- "oh,
Like people -- that feeling that
I got when I was young -- "oh,
I can do that, too"?
I got when I was young -- "oh,
I can do that, too"?
>> let's go do it.
I can do that, too"?
>> let's go do it.
>> my musical foundation was
>> let's go do it.
>> my musical foundation was the beatles.
>> my musical foundation was the beatles.
Everything I know about playing
The beatles.
Everything I know about playing guitar and song structure,
Everything I know about playing guitar and song structure, composition, all of it, it all
Guitar and song structure, composition, all of it, it all started with the beatles.
Composition, all of it, it all started with the beatles.
I like the chandelier, too, man.
Started with the beatles.
I like the chandelier, too, man.
It's a nice touch.
I like the chandelier, too, man.
It's a nice touch.
>> um, so, we don't know what
It's a nice touch.
>> um, so, we don't know what we're doing...
>> um, so, we don't know what we're doing...
>> [ chuckles ]
We're doing...
>> [ chuckles ]
>> ...So we can just do
>> [ chuckles ]
>> ...So we can just do anything.
>> ...So we can just do anything.
Just -- yeah.
Anything.
Just -- yeah.
[ "cut me some slack" plays ]
>> I think he knows how you feel when you play with him.
I don't know.
When you play with him.
I don't know.
I can't really describe it.
I don't know.
I can't really describe it.
I drop from the most nervous
I can't really describe it.
I drop from the most nervous
I've ever been down to like,
I drop from the most nervous
I've ever been down to like,
"oh, this is -- okay."
I've ever been down to like,
"oh, this is -- okay."
[ laughs ]
"oh, this is -- okay."
[ laughs ]
>> yeah!
[ laughs ]
>> yeah!
Yeah.
>> yeah!
Yeah.
♪ mama
Yeah.
♪ mama
♪ won't you set me free?
♪ mama
♪ let me be
>> about halfway through the session, I kind of looked over at krist when we were playing,
Session, I kind of looked over at krist when we were playing, and we were going for it.
At krist when we were playing, and we were going for it.
And you know, krist was moving
And we were going for it.
And you know, krist was moving the way he used to move, and you
And you know, krist was moving the way he used to move, and you were getting into it...
The way he used to move, and you were getting into it...
>> [ chuckles ]
Were getting into it...
>> [ chuckles ]
>> ...And I was playing.
>> [ chuckles ]
>> ...And I was playing.
And I thought, "oh, my god!
>> ...And I was playing.
And I thought, "oh, my god!
This is like nirvana!"
And I thought, "oh, my god!
This is like nirvana!" and then, "wait.
This is like nirvana!" and then, "wait.
Paul mccartney is here?"
And then, "wait.
Paul mccartney is here?"
>> [ laughing ]
Paul mccartney is here?"
>> [ laughing ]
[ music continues ]
>> this is the best way to make records, when you get people in a room together and you don't
Records, when you get people in a room together and you don't know what's gonna happen.
A room together and you don't know what's gonna happen.
You just hit "record" and keep
Know what's gonna happen.
You just hit "record" and keep your fingers crossed that it's
You just hit "record" and keep your fingers crossed that it's gonna explode.
Your fingers crossed that it's gonna explode.
[  "cut me some slack" plays]
Gonna explode.
[  "cut me some slack" plays]
>> ♪ mama!
>> the limitations of this -- it forces you to make decisions based on what's most important
Forces you to make decisions based on what's most important to translating that song.
>> if we start...
♪ gah gah gah gah
♪ gah gah gah
♪ gah gah gah gah
♪ gah gah gah
>> one of the things, I think,
♪ gah gah gah
>> one of the things, I think, that makes good music is some
>> one of the things, I think, that makes good music is some sort of restriction.
That makes good music is some sort of restriction.
And then you want to go to
Sort of restriction.
And then you want to go to the -- should we -- and then go
And then you want to go to the -- should we -- and then go into the...
The -- should we -- and then go into the...
[ guitar plays ]
Into the...
[ guitar plays ]
>> and that's where 24-track
[ guitar plays ]
>> and that's where 24-track mentality comes in.
>> and that's where 24-track mentality comes in.
You commit to what it is.
Mentality comes in.
You commit to what it is.
With pro tools, you can always
You commit to what it is.
With pro tools, you can always come back to it, or you can
With pro tools, you can always come back to it, or you can change it or you can add to it,
Come back to it, or you can change it or you can add to it, to try and make it work.
Change it or you can add to it, to try and make it work.
You know?
To try and make it work.
You know?
'cause you're not being forced
You know?
'cause you're not being forced to make choices -- creative
'cause you're not being forced to make choices -- creative ones.
To make choices -- creative ones.
>> maybe then go to the...
Ones.
>> maybe then go to the...
♪ "a"
>> maybe then go to the...
♪ "a"
[ vocalizing ]
♪ "a"
[ vocalizing ]
♪ we don't know what's gonna
[ vocalizing ]
♪ we don't know what's gonna come on top of this ♪
♪ we don't know what's gonna come on top of this ♪
♪ but something is
Come on top of this ♪
♪ but something is
[ vocalizing ]
♪ but something is
[ vocalizing ]
♪ that, we'll find out later
[ vocalizing ]
♪ that, we'll find out later
♪ and then go to the riff
♪ that, we'll find out later
♪ and then go to the riff
♪ breakdown
♪ and then go to the riff
♪ breakdown
[ vocalizing ]
♪ breakdown
[ vocalizing ] like the intro.
[ vocalizing ] like the intro.
>> I think you should go to that
Like the intro.
>> I think you should go to that
"a" maybe one more time.
>> I think you should go to that
"a" maybe one more time.
It's such a lift.
"a" maybe one more time.
It's such a lift.
>> yeah.
It's such a lift.
>> yeah.
>> after staying in that "d" for
>> yeah.
>> after staying in that "d" for so long, it just has such a
>> after staying in that "d" for so long, it just has such a great impact when it goes up
So long, it just has such a great impact when it goes up there, and it's so quick.
Great impact when it goes up there, and it's so quick.
It's just four times through.
There, and it's so quick.
It's just four times through.
>> if this mike was in the
It's just four times through.
>> if this mike was in the room [speaking indistinctly]
>> if this mike was in the room [speaking indistinctly] so it's live.
Room [speaking indistinctly] so it's live.
>> that's all right.
So it's live.
>> that's all right.
>> do it. Make it simple.
>> that's all right.
>> do it. Make it simple.
Make it fast.
>> do it. Make it simple.
Make it fast.
Don't overthink it.
Make it fast.
Don't overthink it.
Let it, like, come straight out
Don't overthink it.
Let it, like, come straight out of you, and do it.
[ mid-tempo music plays ]
[ music intensifies ]
>> ♪ dear mama
♪ set me free
♪ oh, mama
♪ set me free
♪ oh, mama
♪ let me be
♪ oh, mama
♪ let me be
♪ oh, mama
♪ let me be
♪ oh, mama
♪ watch me run
♪ oh, mama
♪ watch me run
♪ mama
♪ watch me run
♪ mama
♪ I wanna have some fun
♪ mama
♪ I wanna have some fun
♪ whoo ooh-ooh-ooh ooh ooh
♪ whoo ooh-ooh-ooh ooh ooh
[ instrumental music plays ]
♪ well, mama
♪ don't let me down
♪ mama
♪ don't let me down
♪ mama
♪ wanna go to town
♪ mama
♪ wanna go to town
♪ yeah
♪ wanna go to town
♪ yeah
[ instrumental music plays ]
[ music fades ] magical.
>> you didn't even know what the
Magical.
>> you didn't even know what the hell you were doing, but it's
>> you didn't even know what the hell you were doing, but it's genius.
Hell you were doing, but it's genius.
>> exactly.
Genius.
>> exactly.
>> that's my autobiography.
>> exactly.
>> that's my autobiography.
>> "I didn't know what the hell
>> that's my autobiography.
>> "I didn't know what the hell
I was doing."
>> "I didn't know what the hell
I was doing."
>> "I wasn't thinking: The
I was doing."
>> "I wasn't thinking: The krist novoselic story."
>> "I wasn't thinking: The krist novoselic story."
>> "what was I thinking?"
Krist novoselic story."
>> "what was I thinking?"
>> "I wasn't thinking."
>> "what was I thinking?"
>> "I wasn't thinking."
>> there's a lift.
>> "I wasn't thinking."
>> there's a lift.
>> yeah.
>> there's a lift.
>> yeah.
>> it would be nice if this
>> yeah.
>> it would be nice if this would sort of...
>> it would be nice if this would sort of...
>> yeah.
Would sort of...
>> yeah.
>> "ah."
>> yeah.
>> "ah." maybe even if it came after the
>> "ah." maybe even if it came after the lift.
Maybe even if it came after the lift.
[ vocalizing ]
Lift.
[ vocalizing ]
♪ ah
[ vocalizing ]
♪ ah you let the lift happen.
♪ ah you let the lift happen.
And then take it further with a
You let the lift happen.
And then take it further with a chord -- vocal chord.
And then take it further with a chord -- vocal chord.
>> yeah.
Chord -- vocal chord.
>> yeah.
>> ♪ ah
>> yeah.
>> ♪ ah whatever it is.
>> ♪ ah whatever it is.
>> ♪ ah
Whatever it is.
>> ♪ ah
>> who sings? You do?
>> ♪ ah
>> who sings? You do?
>> me and you.
>> who sings? You do?
>> me and you.
>> krist?
>> me and you.
>> krist?
>> no.
>> krist?
>> no.
>> no. I'm just checking.
>> no.
>> no. I'm just checking.
>> how long do you want to
>> no. I'm just checking.
>> how long do you want to be here?
>> how long do you want to be here?
Are you double-parked?
Be here?
Are you double-parked?
>> just checking.
Are you double-parked?
>> just checking.
So, let's just try it, and then
>> just checking.
So, let's just try it, and then you tell us what's wrong with
So, let's just try it, and then you tell us what's wrong with it.
You tell us what's wrong with it.
>> yeah, let's tell
It.
>> yeah, let's tell paul mccartney what to do.
>> yeah, let's tell paul mccartney what to do.
[ laughter ]
Paul mccartney what to do.
[ laughter ]
[ "cut me some slack" plays ]
[ laughter ]
[ "cut me some slack" plays ]
>> ♪ ahhhh
[ "cut me some slack" plays ]
>> ♪ ahhhh
♪ ahhhh
>> ♪ ahhhh
♪ ahhhh
[ music stops ]
♪ ahhhh
[ music stops ]
>> sounds pretty cool.
[ music stops ]
>> sounds pretty cool.
>> should we do it in the other
>> sounds pretty cool.
>> should we do it in the other section, too?
>> should we do it in the other section, too?
>> okay.
Section, too?
>> okay.
>> why can't it always be this
>> okay.
>> why can't it always be this easy?
>> why can't it always be this easy?
>> it is.
Easy?
>> it is.
♪ yeah-eah
>> it is.
♪ yeah-eah
♪ whoo-ooh-ooh
♪ yeah-eah
♪ whoo-ooh-ooh
♪ ahhh
♪ whoo-ooh-ooh
♪ ahhh
♪ if you want to take a ride,
♪ ahhh
♪ if you want to take a ride, you got to cut me some slack ♪
♪ if you want to take a ride, you got to cut me some slack ♪
♪ don't get me wrong
You got to cut me some slack ♪
♪ don't get me wrong
♪ I might not come back
♪ don't get me wrong
♪ I might not come back
>> getting a chance to play
♪ I might not come back
>> getting a chance to play music with the person that is
>> getting a chance to play music with the person that is the reason why I'm a musician,
Music with the person that is the reason why I'm a musician, and recording through the board
The reason why I'm a musician, and recording through the board that's the reason why I'm here
And recording through the board that's the reason why I'm here today, it was a huge full-circle
That's the reason why I'm here today, it was a huge full-circle moment for me.
Today, it was a huge full-circle moment for me.
[ music intensifies ]
>> I think it's really important -- and it's a lesson I didn't learn until in my late
Important -- and it's a lesson I didn't learn until in my late teens - is that whatever bands
Didn't learn until in my late teens - is that whatever bands that you love, go find out what
Teens - is that whatever bands that you love, go find out what bands they love and what bands
That you love, go find out what bands they love and what bands turn them on.
Bands they love and what bands turn them on.
And then you really start
Turn them on.
And then you really start getting into the human aspect of
And then you really start getting into the human aspect of it, because the further back you
Getting into the human aspect of it, because the further back you go in time, the less technology
It, because the further back you go in time, the less technology you had and, consequently, the
Go in time, the less technology you had and, consequently, the better records that you had.
There's this incredible library of music, thank god, that is still there.
Of music, thank god, that is still there.
[ music continues ]
>> ♪ ahhh
♪ if you want to take a ride, you got to cut me some slack ♪
♪ if you want to take a ride, you got to cut me some slack ♪
♪ don't get me wrong
You got to cut me some slack ♪
♪ don't get me wrong
♪ I might not come back
♪ don't get me wrong
♪ I might not come back
♪ whoo ooh-ooh-ooh ooh ooh
♪ I might not come back
♪ whoo ooh-ooh-ooh ooh ooh
♪ whoo ooh-ooh-ooh ooh ooh
>> be true to yourself and make the music that you love.
Go out and play.
The music that you love.
Go out and play.
Turn people on to your music.
Go out and play.
Turn people on to your music.
Spread it yourself.
Turn people on to your music.
Spread it yourself.
Don't think it happens any other
Spread it yourself.
Don't think it happens any other way.
Don't think it happens any other way.
>> ♪ let me be
Way.
>> ♪ let me be
>> let's rock, let's play, let's
>> ♪ let me be
>> let's rock, let's play, let's record, let's play it back.
"wait till you hear this."
I can't wait to get in my car to hear it.
I can't wait to get in my car to hear it.
I'm gonna play it for my friend.
Hear it.
I'm gonna play it for my friend.
I'm making a copy.
I'm gonna play it for my friend.
I'm making a copy.
I'm gonna blast for fucking
I'm making a copy.
I'm gonna blast for fucking
10 hours, and I'm gonna listen
I'm gonna blast for fucking
10 hours, and I'm gonna listen to it.
10 hours, and I'm gonna listen to it.
>> ♪ mama, ma-ma-mama watch me
To it.
>> ♪ mama, ma-ma-mama watch me go ♪
>> ♪ mama, ma-ma-mama watch me go ♪
♪ mama, watch me rock
Go ♪
♪ mama, watch me rock
♪ wanna have some fun
♪ mama, watch me rock
♪ wanna have some fun
♪ just wanna have some fun
♪ wanna have some fun
♪ just wanna have some fun
♪ yeah, set me free
♪ just wanna have some fun
♪ yeah, set me free
♪ set me free
♪ yeah, set me free
♪ set me free
♪ yeah, yeah, yeah
♪ set me free
♪ yeah, yeah, yeah
♪ ohhhhhh, yeah
♪ yeah, yeah, yeah
♪ ohhhhhh, yeah
♪ whoo
♪ ohhhhhh, yeah
♪ whoo
[ extended guitar chord ]
[ music stops ]
[ up-tempo rock 'n' roll plays ]
>> [ singing indistinctly ]
>> what was the name of your first band?
>> the icy blues.
First band?
>> the icy blues.
>> it was called bloodfest.
>> the icy blues.
>> it was called bloodfest.
Yeah! Good name.
>> it was called bloodfest.
Yeah! Good name.
>> my first band was called
Yeah! Good name.
>> my first band was called fury, and we were a kiss cover
>> my first band was called fury, and we were a kiss cover band.
Fury, and we were a kiss cover band.
>> which was your favorite?
Band.
>> which was your favorite?
>> my favorite kiss record?
>> which was your favorite?
>> my favorite kiss record?
>> yeah.
>> my favorite kiss record?
>> yeah.
>> oh, I -- I could never
>> yeah.
>> oh, I -- I could never choose.
>> oh, I -- I could never choose.
>> what was your first band?
Choose.
>> what was your first band?
>> my first band was autocracy.
>> what was your first band?
>> my first band was autocracy.
Huh?
>> my first band was autocracy.
Huh?
>> a band called the senders.
Huh?
>> a band called the senders.
>> the pixies?
>> a band called the senders.
>> the pixies?
>> the pixies was your first
>> the pixies?
>> the pixies was your first band?
>> the pixies was your first band?
>> absolutely.
Band?
>> absolutely.
>> no band before that?
>> absolutely.
>> no band before that?
>> no. [ chuckles ]
>> no band before that?
>> no. [ chuckles ]
>> really?
>> no. [ chuckles ]
>> really?
>> yeah.
>> really?
>> yeah.
>> wow.
>> yeah.
>> wow.
>> I'd been in practically every
>> wow.
>> I'd been in practically every other kind of band -- blues
>> I'd been in practically every other kind of band -- blues bands, punk-rock bands, standard
Other kind of band -- blues bands, punk-rock bands, standard rock 'n' roll bands, top-40
Bands, punk-rock bands, standard rock 'n' roll bands, top-40 bands, jazz-rock fusion bands.
Rock 'n' roll bands, top-40 bands, jazz-rock fusion bands.
In new york, I had a band called
Bands, jazz-rock fusion bands.
In new york, I had a band called daybreak.
In new york, I had a band called daybreak.
>> did you have a band?
Daybreak.
>> did you have a band?
>> had a band.
>> did you have a band?
>> had a band.
>> what was the band?
>> had a band.
>> what was the band?
>> the pricks.
>> what was the band?
>> the pricks.
>> [ singing indistinctly ]
[ music intensifies ]
[ singing indistinctly ]
[ music de-intensifies ]
[ music fades ]
[ music stops ]
>> made sense to me, too.
[ music stops ]
>> made sense to me, too.
Okay, so, coming up on the
>> made sense to me, too.
Okay, so, coming up on the right, you know, we have the
Okay, so, coming up on the right, you know, we have the budweiser brewery, which...
Right, you know, we have the budweiser brewery, which...
On a good night...
Budweiser brewery, which...
On a good night...
Smells like someone burping
On a good night...
Smells like someone burping right in your face.
Smells like someone burping right in your face.
[ laughter ]
Right in your face.
[ laughter ]
>> the thing that was cool about
[ laughter ]
>> the thing that was cool about the brewery is, like, every band
>> the thing that was cool about the brewery is, like, every band that came there always wanted to
The brewery is, like, every band that came there always wanted to go take the tour.
That came there always wanted to go take the tour.
So they would always go over
Go take the tour.
So they would always go over there and come back with cases
So they would always go over there and come back with cases of budweiser and then sit around
There and come back with cases of budweiser and then sit around and get hammered all the rest of
Of budweiser and then sit around and get hammered all the rest of the night.
And get hammered all the rest of the night.
But that smell -- I'll never
The night.
But that smell -- I'll never forget that smell when the front
But that smell -- I'll never forget that smell when the front doors of sound city were open on
Forget that smell when the front doors of sound city were open on a good, windy day.
Doors of sound city were open on a good, windy day.
The smell of hops would just
A good, windy day.
The smell of hops would just fill the whole building.
The smell of hops would just fill the whole building.
It was just, "ew, what is that?"
Fill the whole building.
It was just, "ew, what is that?"
>> beer smells like poop.
It was just, "ew, what is that?"
>> beer smells like poop.
You know, apparently, budweiser
>> beer smells like poop.
You know, apparently, budweiser smells like poops.
You know, apparently, budweiser smells like poops.
>> and the funny thing I
Smells like poops.
>> and the funny thing I remember, when gladys knight and
>> and the funny thing I remember, when gladys knight and the pips were there, and they
Remember, when gladys knight and the pips were there, and they walked out and they went,
The pips were there, and they walked out and they went,
"whoo-whee! Is that you?"
Walked out and they went,
"whoo-whee! Is that you?" you know, they were, like,
"whoo-whee! Is that you?" you know, they were, like, kidding each other about it.
You know, they were, like, kidding each other about it.
But it was pretty strong --
Kidding each other about it.
But it was pretty strong -- pretty...
But it was pretty strong -- pretty...
>> see? Smell it.
Pretty...
>> see? Smell it.
>> hmm.
>> see? Smell it.
>> hmm.
>> there you go. You got it.
>> hmm.
>> there you go. You got it.
Gonna be a good night.
>> there you go. You got it.
Gonna be a good night.
>> [ chuckles ]
Gonna be a good night.
>> [ chuckles ]
[ up-tempo music plays ]
>> [ chuckles ]
[ up-tempo music plays ]
>> ♪ heard a song on the radio
[ up-tempo music plays ]
>> ♪ heard a song on the radio just after school ♪
>> ♪ heard a song on the radio just after school ♪
♪ back from the '80s,
Just after school ♪
♪ back from the '80s, before reagan was cool ♪
♪ back from the '80s, before reagan was cool ♪
♪ the band wore leather, and the
Before reagan was cool ♪
♪ the band wore leather, and the boys were lookin' so pretty ♪
♪ the band wore leather, and the boys were lookin' so pretty ♪
♪ they rocked all the clubs
Boys were lookin' so pretty ♪
♪ they rocked all the clubs down on sunset ♪
♪ they rocked all the clubs down on sunset ♪
♪ doin' all the things
Down on sunset ♪
♪ doin' all the things that we try to forget ♪
♪ doin' all the things that we try to forget ♪
♪ when they screamed out there,
That we try to forget ♪
♪ when they screamed out there, the guitars sounded so pretty ♪
♪ when they screamed out there, the guitars sounded so pretty ♪
♪ if it sounds as good in your
The guitars sounded so pretty ♪
♪ if it sounds as good in your room as it does in your car ♪
♪ if it sounds as good in your room as it does in your car ♪
♪ you're on your way
Room as it does in your car ♪
♪ you're on your way to be a rock 'n' roll star ♪
♪ you're on your way to be a rock 'n' roll star ♪
♪ it's a good thing to say,
To be a rock 'n' roll star ♪
♪ it's a good thing to say,
"hey, boys, you're gonna go
♪ it's a good thing to say,
"hey, boys, you're gonna go far ♪
"hey, boys, you're gonna go far ♪
♪ I wanna play a song,
Far ♪
♪ I wanna play a song, everyone sing along ♪
♪ I wanna play a song, everyone sing along ♪
♪ standin' on the stage
Everyone sing along ♪
♪ standin' on the stage with the lights turned on ♪
♪ standin' on the stage with the lights turned on ♪
♪ wearin' those trends
With the lights turned on ♪
♪ wearin' those trends with all my friends ♪
♪ wearin' those trends with all my friends ♪
♪ rockin' all night
With all my friends ♪
♪ rockin' all night like it'll never end ♪
♪ rockin' all night like it'll never end ♪
♪ with all our dreams
Like it'll never end ♪
♪ with all our dreams hangin' on one little ditty ♪
♪ with all our dreams hangin' on one little ditty ♪
♪ yeah, we got it on 2-inch tape
Hangin' on one little ditty ♪
♪ yeah, we got it on 2-inch tape down at sound city ♪
♪ yeah, we got it on 2-inch tape down at sound city ♪
♪ I wanna play a song,
Down at sound city ♪
♪ I wanna play a song, everyone sing along ♪
♪ I wanna play a song, everyone sing along ♪
♪ standin' on the stage
Everyone sing along ♪
♪ standin' on the stage with the lights turned on ♪
♪ standin' on the stage with the lights turned on ♪
♪ wearin' those trends
With the lights turned on ♪
♪ wearin' those trends with all my friends ♪
♪ wearin' those trends with all my friends ♪
♪ rockin' all night
With all my friends ♪
♪ rockin' all night like it'll never end ♪
♪ rockin' all night like it'll never end ♪
♪ I wanna play a song,
Like it'll never end ♪
♪ I wanna play a song, everyone sing along ♪
♪ I wanna play a song, everyone sing along ♪
♪ standin' on the stage
Everyone sing along ♪
♪ standin' on the stage with the lights turned on ♪
♪ standin' on the stage with the lights turned on ♪
♪ wearin' those trends
With the lights turned on ♪
♪ wearin' those trends with all my friends ♪
♪ wearin' those trends with all my friends ♪
♪ rockin' all night
With all my friends ♪
♪ rockin' all night like it'll never end ♪
♪ rockin' all night like it'll never end ♪
♪ all those epic songs
Like it'll never end ♪
♪ all those epic songs with a phrase so witty ♪
♪ all those epic songs with a phrase so witty ♪
♪ there's always room for two to
With a phrase so witty ♪
♪ there's always room for two to a car that offers no pity ♪
♪ there's always room for two to a car that offers no pity ♪
♪ all our dreams
A car that offers no pity ♪
♪ all our dreams hangin' on one little ditty ♪
♪ all our dreams hangin' on one little ditty ♪
♪ yeah, we got it on 2-inch tape
Hangin' on one little ditty ♪
♪ yeah, we got it on 2-inch tape down at sound city ♪
♪ yeah, we got it on 2-inch tape down at sound city ♪
♪ oh, yeah
Down at sound city ♪
♪ oh, yeah
♪ got it on 2-inch tape
♪ oh, yeah
♪ got it on 2-inch tape down at sound city ♪
♪ got it on 2-inch tape down at sound city ♪
♪ whoo-hoo-hoo
Down at sound city ♪
♪ whoo-hoo-hoo
♪ got it on 2-inch tape
♪ whoo-hoo-hoo
♪ got it on 2-inch tape down at sound city ♪
♪ got it on 2-inch tape down at sound city ♪
♪ yeah, yeah, yeah
Down at sound city ♪
♪ yeah, yeah, yeah
♪ we got it on 2-inch tape
♪ yeah, yeah, yeah
♪ we got it on 2-inch tape down at sound city ♪
♪ we got it on 2-inch tape down at sound city ♪
[ music fades ]
Down at sound city ♪
[ music fades ]
[ music stops ]
[ music fades ]
[ music stops ]
[ no audio ]
Ladies and gentlemen, here are The Beatles.
The Mets are the world champions.
Jerry Koosman is being mobbed!
Look at this scene.
Check it out, check it out, the Mets have won it.
And it's hit deep to left center.
This one has a chance. Home run!
Shea Stadium has something to smile about.
Baseball fans are crying in their peanuts and saying,
"Shea it ain't so. "
It's out with the old and in with the new.
The Mets are getting a brand-new stadium.
The ballgame is over and Shea Stadium will close its doors for the final time.
Tonight, Billy Joel will head an all-star show of music heavyweights to end the ballpark's place in rock and roll history.
Ladies and gentlemen, please rise for the singing of our national anthem.
Being the last act to play at Shea is mind-boggling to me.
I mean, I'm a Long Island...
I'm a kid from Levittown.
I don't even look like a rock star. Look at me.
We're playing as fans.
We're in the moment right there.
You're not just that moment and that age.
You're every age you've been.
Behind the bag! It gets through Buckner!
And the Mets win it.
Everything you've ever learned, everything you've ever experienced goes into that show.
To sum it all up, holy shit.
I don't believe this.
I don't believe this is going on.
This is incredible.
It was such a thrill to be there doing that.
Every time you'd look up, you'd see this stadium full of people, knowing this was going to be the last show that was ever played in this place, and it was gonna be knocked down, it wouldn't be there anymore.
There was an exhilaration going on.
Like I said, it was a mutual "holy shit."
There have been magical things that have happened in this ballpark.
All ball players, if they're one thing, they're superstitious.
There's something about Shea Stadium.
There definitely is some sort of spiritual thing going on there.
There's no question in my mind.
It was electric. It was a buzz that I've never experienced before.
I can't describe it.
It's kind of, like, completely unique.
Thank you. Good evening, Shea Stadium!
Is this cool or what?
You know, this stadium opened up to play baseball in the year 1964.
And that was the first year
I joined up with a band and started playing rock and roll in a band, 1964.
Can I start at the beginning? I'm English.
I know nothing about baseball.
So Shea Stadium was never this baseball, you know, legend at all.
It was where The Beatles played.
Oh, baby!
Welcome to what will be probably the biggest concert ever in the history of pop music.
The Beatles are here right now.
Here they come.
Nobody had ever played a big stadium.
We were just at the right time, The Beatles, particularly for America.
Hello, hello, hello.
Hello!
I called the man who I was negotiating with,
John Goldman.
"John, forget Madison Square Garden.
"I think I'm gonna take them to Shea Stadium."
We couldn't really kind of hear ourselves.
'Cause, you know, the audience was much louder than us.
And when we started singing, it got louder.
So we were, like, just drowned out.
Luckily, we had a real good sense of humor about it.
We just got hysterical.
During the song I'm Down,
John had a piano solo, and now he just ended up...
With his elbow up and down the keyboard, laughing hysterically.
We just ended up just laughing a lot.
It was just a thrill. It's that feeling of just...
I'm a part of this.
I'm one of those people that's cheering.
It really was not about what you could hear.
It was an experience.
They were in the same room as The Beatles.
Didn't matter how big a room it was, they were in the same room.
I've worked with Presley,
I worked with Judy Garland,
I've worked with Sinatra. But I was there.
That topped them all.
The reason that there's an aura around music at Shea Stadium is because of that Beatles show.
There's nothing that competes with the meaning of that show.
That is what is forever associated with that space.
And anybody that's making music in that space, that's what they're thinking about.
I want to thank The Beatles for letting us use their room.
Best band that ever was, best band that ever will be.
One, two, one, two...
I remember seeing The Beatles on Ed Sullivan.
There was something very, very different about these guys.
They didn't look like
Hollywood-fabricated movie stars.
They looked like regular, working class kids.
And there they were, playing their own instruments, singing their own songs.
Girls were screaming.
And at that instant I said,
"That's what I want to do." I was 14.
So when we first knew that we were gonna actually play Shea Stadium, the first thought was, "Wouldn't it be great to get Paul McCartney?"
Billy had always wanted to have Paul play at this show, and had asked him.
I wanted to do it for Billy, you know.
He'd rung me and said, "Can you do it?"
And I said, "No, I can't."
The schedule just won't work.
He is gonna be in England.
I was just glad that he, you know, actually had thought about doing it.
If it wasn't for The Beatles,
I wouldn't be doing what I do.
I owe my career and much of my life to The Beatles.
Thank you.
This is where New York meets Long Island.
We're in Queens.
Politically, that's New York City, but geographically, we are on Long Island.
I think that Shea is kind of a flawed building.
I think everybody would say that.
My reactions when I first got there was the enormity of it.
It engulfed you and it felt like you were a little ant, you know, surrounded.
It looks like a nice stadium.
There are 55,000 seats in this ballpark and probably about 3,000 or 4,000 good ones.
It's a dump.
Shea Stadium was considered as a dump.
Yeah, it was, but it was our dump.
We loved it.
This ballgame is over.
We loved what it meant to us.
That was my home.
The phrase, "It's a dump, but it's our dump, " is a familiar phrase to Mets fans.
The irony is that Shea is literally built on top of a dump.
The borough of Queens was once an ash heap so big that F. Scott Fitzgerald described it in The Great Gatsby as...
That it became home to the Mets and thousands of hard-working, middle class families is directly due to a man called Moses.
In 1924, Robert Moses began changing the landscape of New York as Parks Commissioner.
He was like the Wizard of Oz.
If it weren't for him, we wouldn't have Jones Beach.
We wouldn't have Fire Island.
We wouldn't have these great parkways.
Kind of beautiful stretches going east out toward Suffolk County.
We're in a park Moses built surrounded by highways Moses built in a building Moses built.
I'm standing on a model Moses built, which is our main attraction at this museum.
And we're sitting right next to a stadium that Moses had a lot to do with building, which brings millions of people to central Queens every year.
The most prolific builder of public works in American history envisioned a renaissance for the Empire State based on Ancient Rome.
But in Rome, wealthy people lived within the city walls on top of one of the seven Roman hills, while the lower classes lived outside of the walls at the foot of the hills.
The Latin roots "sub, " meaning under, and "urb, " meaning city, eventually were combined to describe a group of people who lived beneath the upper classes of the city.
Robert Moses attempted to change what it meant to be from the suburbs.
In New York, instead of the upper classes living within the city, he wanted them to live outside the walls.
To make this happen,
Moses had to build a bridge.
He had to build roads, lots of roads.
But he also had to convince wealthy people that their lives would be better if they worked in the city but lived in the vast, open spaces on Long Island.
And that's where his plan fell apart.
The people who ended up moving were the blue collar workers and their families who were struggling to survive in the city.
Families like the Joels.
My father was a very, very good pianist, but he was not encouraged to be a musician.
He was encouraged to go and get a job as an engineer, which he ended up doing.
Which I think ended up frustrating him.
He should've been a musician.
Howard Joel was forced to move his family out of the Bronx because Robert Moses built a six-lane expressway straight through their neighborhood.
The cost of living in the city was out of his reach, so he drove his family across the Triborough Bridge to Hicksville, Long Island, as did thousands of other families in search of a better life.
We lived in a suburban housing development called Levittown.
It was a very famous development.
Every house looked the same.
We were bored out of our skulls.
We just wanted to go back to the city.
Robert Moses wanted to bring the city to Long Island.
He built a park in Queens larger than Central Park.
He built museums big enough to rival those in Manhattan.
And he wanted to build a stadium based on the design of the Colosseum in Rome.
In 1957, the world champion
Brooklyn Dodgers announce they need a new place to play ball.
Moses quickly offers to build them a new stadium in Queens.
The Dodgers refuse, scoffing at the very idea of moving to the suburbs.
But Moses insists, and the Dodgers do the unthinkable.
They abandon New York in October of '57 for a new home in Los Angeles.
And at precisely this same month,
Howard Joel abandons his family to return to his birthplace in Europe.
My parents split up,
I was not quite 10 years old.
So it was a struggle.
I now have a half-brother who is a classical music conductor who was born in Vienna.
My father always admired Bill as a musician.
I know Dad loves Bill above everything.
He's very, very proud of him.
But he always has trouble expressing that.
My mother actually was the one who encouraged me to play piano.
We ended up being the only family of a divorce in our neighborhood.
And there was sort of a stigma to that at the time.
As the Joels were adjusting to life in the suburbs, the man who made Queens a place to call home was desperate to find a tenant for his new Colosseum.
Robert Moses turned to a lawyer named William Shea to find a baseball team to replace the Dodgers.
Shea's result?
The worst team in Major League history.
Well, the Mets, of course, got off to a horrible start.
They lost their first nine games.
The next year, they improved tremendously.
They only lost their first eight games.
Played 160 games and lost 120 of them.
You don't get any worse than that.
But the stadium was packed and we were more popular than the Yankees.
Because all the old fans of the Dodgers came to become Mets fans.
The Mets were always kind of the poor relatives in New York.
The Yankees get all the headlines.
So the Manhattan point of view is,
"Well, Queens, you have to go to Queens to see the Mets."
The Mets were kind of working class.
And for the first six years of the franchise, the Mets were almost comically bad. really not winning, really not mattering.
'69 comes and the Mets come out of nowhere.
Imagine going from being the worst team in baseball to being the best overnight.
Imagine getting really good in the middle of the summer and then going into a terrible slump, slipping down, looking like you weren't gonna make it, and then suddenly...
The Cubs tie it in the sixth.
But who's that crossing in front of their dugout?
It's not lady luck.
This has been the scene of the unexpected.
And at a key moment in the game, out of nowhere, a black cat walks the length of the Cubs' dugout.
There was so much noise and so much energy, and that cat, it ran over here, it ran over there.
Then finally it fled away, you know.
55,000 people gave the cat a standing ovation.
And the hex was on, and that was the start of the Mets' comeback.
And the Mets go on and win the game.
And blow by the Cubs and win the pennant.
We've got a roller.
Yes. The Mets are the National League Champions.
The New York Mets.
I don't think they believed us.
They didn't believe how good we were, but we believed we were good.
It was so spectacular.
It was like being on a high.
Everything good that could happen happened.
The two-one pitch.
There's a fly ball out to the left.
Waiting is Jones.
The Mets are the world champions.
Jerry Koosman is being mobbed!
Look at this scene.
Just a moment of a lifetime that you dream about, that happens to other people.
And all of a sudden it's happening to you.
Nothing in life is ever like that.
How many Mets fans are here?
When they won the '69 World Series, my friend Bill Zampino lost his mind.
He stuck with them.
He was a very devoted guy.
It's why we're friends to this day. He's loyal.
Billy and me, we met in the first grade.
We were about five or six years old.
You know, before long, when we were teenagers, we had our band.
We started a band together when we were 15.
It was called The Echoes.
And we played whatever was on the radio.
At that time, I said,
"Yeah, I want to be a rock and roll star."
If you couldn't be a baseball star or a football star, or a movie star, let's be a rock and roll star.
The first time I ever met Billy,
I was maybe 16 years old, and The Hassles, they were just fantastic.
In my eyes, at that time,
I was, like, blown away.
This was, like, so cool.
We instantly became friends.
We were just like two peas in a pod.
All the other band members in my band didn't like him.
My wife didn't like him.
But I loved him.
I thought he was just unbelievable.
Billy and Jon formed this band called Attila.
These guys were playing...
It was like a hard rock, organ and drum thing, you know...
You know, it was just incredible, man.
Ladies and gentlemen, the rock house.
This is the house that me and Billy and my wife, Elizabeth, lived in together.
I guess it was a potion for disaster.
We ate together. We drove together.
We did everything together.
I remember my friend just telling me,
"I'm in love with your wife."
You know? And I think I threw a punch and broke Billy's nose and knocked him out, and...
Just one punch in the nose.
That'll do it sometimes.
It was a turning point in all our lives.
With Elizabeth by his side,
Billy would sign his first record deal with a fast-talking, flamboyant producer named Artie Ripp.
I said, "Where is Billy now?"
He says, "Billy's sleeping on the floor of a Laundromat
"in Long Island right now."
Billy's broke, I'm broke.
And I said, "I'm glad you finally wound up at the bottom with me.
"We'll go to the top together."
This is Cold Spring Harbor, the first album Artie Ripp produced for Billy Joel.
You won't find it in most record stores.
It was recorded at the wrong speed.
It sort of speeded up in the mastering.
The chipmunk record, we call it.
Billy, when he got, you know, his copy, his acetate, he threw it out the window, he was so furious, you know, that he'd been screwed over.
On top of that, the deal I signed was so onerous, it was so terrible, it was so bad, the only way I could get out of it was to hide.
So I moved away from New York.
I said, "I want to get out of here.
I'm moving out."
Billy and Elizabeth decided that they had to get free of this deal.
So they packed their bags and drove out to the West Coast.
And basically they were gonna wait it out.
They were just gonna wait him out.
They weren't gonna deliver any more music.
I got a job working in a piano bar.
It was in the Wilshire district in Los Angeles.
This place was...
For me, it was a little universe unto itself.
Billy and Elizabeth hid out there.
Billy played at the piano bar.
And I think Elizabeth actually was a waitress in that bar.
That kind of became my handle, Piano Man.
I only did this for six months.
I mean, some people think I was a lounge piano player for years.
But it was an interesting education.
I was going to UCLA at the time, and I used to come after there and meet him at the bar and watch him play, and then I'd drive him home 'cause he didn't have a car.
Hey, do another one!
But at the time, he was always...
He was writing these new songs.
There was a version of Captain Jack they recorded live on the radio in the days when, you know, artists would come in and they would play live and it would be a radio show.
I'm Ed Shocky.
I'd like to welcome you here, Bill, on a Yamaha upright piano.
Make an interesting effect if it were television, wouldn't it?
I still remember sitting in my house and Billy was going to be live on the radio.
I sat and I listened, and basically just sat there and cried.
Listened to my best friend playing that I thought I should be right next to him playing like I always did, and, you know, just always broke my heart that I wasn't with him anymore.
I was driving down the freeway in Hollywood when I heard him on the radio for the first time.
I went, "That's my bud.
That's him on the radio."
And it was the first time
I ever heard him on the radio, so...
Have you found anyone that is very exciting for you perhaps to get involved with?
Probably the last artist that I signed to Columbia was an artist that I think is gonna happen in a very, very big way.
About a year and a half before, he was on another label, the Family Records label.
I'm talking Billy Joel, whom I really think is a very strong, major artist.
Billy then, he did Piano Man, and Columbia Records took over the whole situation.
We started touring and putting things together in clubs.
I was the man that did everything.
I was the tour manager/sound man,
Iighting guy/accountant.
Then it started to go a little, started to move.
And then we decided to hire a lighting guy.
Thirty years ago, I did my first show.
I go up in the backseat of the rent-a-car with Billy and Brian.
I remember we played a show in New Jersey or Pennsylvania, and we got in the car after the show.
I passed out in the backseat and we went through the Lincoln Tunnel and we came out in New York and it was my first time there.
Leave me in here.
I wanted to write a song for New York, see.
Change the lights.
Make it real sleazy, greasy, dirty New York.
Yeah, come on, get down with the lights.
Yeah, there we go, okay.
By 1976, the city Billy had dreamt about while growing up on Long Island seemed to be in freefall.
This city was crime-ridden.
The infrastructure had no investment for decades.
And we were broke.
It's not that we didn't have a little bit of money here and a little bit there, that we had to cut back.
No. We were broke.
The common perception was that New York is over.
I was living in LA at the time, and there was this kind of a mean-spirited attitude in LA from ex-New Yorkers who had moved to Los Angeles.
"New York's going down the drain.
"I can't wait to see New York fall flat on its face. Screw New York. We hate New York. "
And these were ex-New Yorkers.
They were exiles.
And I went the other way.
I got very defensive.
"Damn it, I'm from New York, and if the city's going down the tubes,
"I'm going with it. I'm gonna move back."
Ladies and gentlemen, Tony Bennett.
Yes.
During the Summer of Sam, even the crown jewel of the Robert Moses renaissance in Queens became a ghost house.
Back in those days, there weren't even 25,000 there.
There were probably 10,000.
And, you know, being able to get a foul ball
'cause nobody was within 20 yards of you.
The entire upper deck of Shea Stadium, they didn't even try to sell the tickets.
It was off-limits. It was just cordoned off.
The Mets were not that relevant.
-They were not good.
-The Mets were terrible.
Tony.
New York.
Tony Bennett, from Astoria.
New York!
It was time to go, and that's when we all moved back to New York.
The company I'm with now is New York-based.
It's called Home Run.
Nothing to do with baseball.
It's a home-run agency.
Let me introduce the different people in the company.
It's a funny thing, because I actually literally went back to work for Billy and Elizabeth.
That's how crazy this whole scenario really comes to.
Jon. Jon is our tour coordinator.
He also does artist relations.
Elizabeth.
Elizabeth manages the entire show.
Dennis. Dennis is our booking agent.
So Elizabeth and I were the new administration.
That was the day it all started.
Billy decided one day, he said, "Well, why doesn't she just be my manager?"
"Why don't you take over?
You have my best interests at heart.
"You're pragmatic.
You've got good business sense.
"You manage me."
And she started immediately.
I met with Elizabeth.
I don't know what impressed her, because I had no experience, no suitcase, no nothing.
But she was in need of a tour manager and I said I could do the job.
And off I went as Billy Joel's tour manager.
I suddenly found myself with a new suitcase and about 21 guys in rent-a-cars and trucks, you know, driving from place to place, state to state.
And it was all new to me.
I was always getting lost.
That first Christmas, I was given a compass, you know, as a little indication...
You actually took us to the wrong state once.
Yeah.
Most people would say this guy is crazy.
Why would he ever go back and work with his ex-wife and his friend?
We were always good friends.
We had this good simpatico between us.
It would probably have taken a lot more than that to have destroyed the friendship.
So all we had to do was just get over the mental part of it.
Then we were fine.
They're really lucky.
I mean, how many people get to work with their best friends and have worked together for so long?
I genuinely believe that they love each other.
I think it transcends friendship.
I think it's loyalty.
It's very close-knit.
We've all shared the same experiences over a long period of time.
We are protective of each other.
I do feel like it's like a family.
Thank you, Shea!
The record of the year is...
Billy Joel, Just the Way You Are.
Phil Ramone, producer.
Just the Way You Are, Billy Joel, songwriter.
52nd Street, Billy Joel.
Billy Joel, Glass Houses.
Thank you. Hey.
It always surprises me.
Whenever I have a hit, I'm shocked.
That's a hit?
Okay, Mom, I'm here, all right?
My mother wanted me to come.
I'd like to thank my mother for paying for the piano lessons for all those years.
I write the way I speak.
I write the way I talk and the way I think.
I don't try to sit down and write a hit record.
I write songs for me. But there's no guarantee you're gonna make any money.
When you're a musician, you're really kind of out there.
And my wife Elizabeth, and thank you.
His own writing he didn't own.
A guy named Artie Ripp in California owned a large part of it.
Artie Ripp, you know, that contract had to be dealt with.
I went to Walter Yetnikoff, who was the president of Columbia Records at the time, and explained, you know, what had happened.
As I remember, I went to see Artie Ripp and I said, "Listen. I want to buy back
Billy Joel's copyrights from you."
He says, "Well, how much you gonna give me?"
I said, "I'll give you $400,000."
Not my own money.
CBS or Columbia's money.
And he said, "I don't want to sell them.
"They're worth far more than that."
And I said, "If you don't fucking sell me this thing,
"you're gonna have to face me in the record business
"and you're not gonna do well,
'cause whoever talks to you
"can no longer talk to me, and you're through.
"You have no compassion.
And then I'm gonna take your head
"and I'll put it through the fucking wall.
Give me the fucking copyrights."
"All right, all right, all right, all right."
I actually took the copyrights and gave them to Billy as a birthday present.
The music business is known for having a lot of nasty people in it.
Unpleasant people, and unscrupulous shysters.
Walter Yetnikoff was a mensch.
A mensch means an upstanding man.
A good human being.
And without any question, he gave me my publishing back.
And I will forever be grateful to Walter Yetnikoff for doing that, because those were my children.
Pete Flynn started tending to the grounds at Shea Stadium the first day it opened.
He's worked here every day since.
Well, I've been with the Mets since '62.
Pete was born in Ireland, you know.
He was one of those people that just kind of lit up your life. You know?
Pete was one of the greatest guys around there.
Everybody knew him, you know, you loved him to death.
Love the guy. Absolutely love him.
After some day games, they'd have the kids go out there, run the bases.
And you could just see him there starting to boil, like,
"Keep off me grass."
Everything about this place affected everything that he did.
And he loves the New York Mets.
That's like family to him.
He loves this place.
This place, in a way, gave Pete Flynn a family of his own.
His first year, he married the sister of another groundskeeper.
They were together for 40 years.
It's a Shea romance.
When she was sick and when she passed away, we saw how much they meant to each other.
He's stoic. It's hard to know. You know?
He talks about her more now than he ever did.
-So you were here for The Beatles.
-Yeah, I drove them.
You drove them? That's great.
Yeah, I was here when everybody played.
Pete Flynn has seen them all come and go.
From Stevie Wonder to The Rolling Stones,
Grand Funk Railroad to The Who.
I've got good memories of Shea when we played here back in the '80s.
It's always an honor to play with Billy.
The man knows his trade and he does it well.
When I knew I was gonna do Shea,
I thought, this is such a large moment,
I wanted to share it with other artists.
Maybe it's an aspect of insecurity on my own part, where I didn't think I was quite enough to pull this off.
So we asked Roger Daltrey,
John Mellencamp,
Don Henley, Tony Bennett,
John Mayer, Steven Tyler, Garth Brooks.
They're the ends of the spectrum of music.
Totally away from each other.
I think that speaks volumes for Billy Joel.
I heard about him doing this concert and, you know, I thought to myself, there's gonna be a massive, unbridled enthusiasm.
Because he's from Long Island.
And Shea Stadium's here.
And it's the last gig here.
And I saw The Beatles here.
Too good to say no.
Roger Daltrey. Steven Tyler.
John Mellencamp. Garth Brooks.
Since The Beatles, the biggest acts of the day have sought out Shea.
That was really the point where I thought, you know, you can't get better than this.
You can't climb a higher mountain than this.
This is Everest.
I made a decision on the stage.
Said, "Okay, this is it.
"This is where this thing stops, right now."
-At Shea?
-On stage.
The greatest thing was when the Pope came here in '79.
It rained all day, and when the Pope entered center field, the sun came out.
Elizabeth was the businessperson and I was the artiste.
And the relationship suffered because of that.
It stopped being about a man and a woman and it started becoming more of an industry unto itself.
Emotionally, Elizabeth took advantage of him.
She said to me,
"I'm gonna leave, and I'm getting 50%.
"I just wanted you to know."
A little cold.
I was newly divorced on a Caribbean island, first vacation I ever took.
I went to this little club and there was a piano and I just looked and I started playing the piano.
I looked up and there's
Christie Brinkley and Elle Macpherson.
At the same moment, leaning over the piano.
And I just looked back down at the piano and I said, "Thank you, man. Thank you."
When Christie came into the picture, a new sort of aura was introduced.
He became, perhaps with the videos that were made, he became a celebrity.
Christie was hard to look at.
I mean, really hard...
I mean, literally hard to look at.
I would look her in the face and it was like,
"You're not supposed to be that beautiful."
It was fun on so many levels, because I had no idea that this guy that I really thought was so much fun to be with was really beloved.
I mean, everywhere we went, people were like, "Go, Billy!"
I remember the first time I met Billy.
They were sitting in that front row and there's Christie Brinkley.
I don't care if you're right before playing a game.
You're gonna take a glance.
Let's go, Mets! Let's go, Mets!
Queens baseball was back.
Everybody was talking about the Mets.
It wasn't about the Yankees in those days.
They owned this town in the '80s.
What a play by Hernandez.
The ball came up, they got him.
Oh, boy, Keith Hernandez.
Hernandez had arrived in a trade.
Strawberry'd come up in '83.
Darling came up the end of '83.
1984, Dwight Gooden arrives on the scene and is the most spectacular thing that anybody had ever seen.
Ground ball to Gooden.
To home, to first.
Dwight Gooden with a 1-2-3 double play to end the ballgame.
By the time '86 began, it was pretty obvious that they were the class of the league, and got to the World Series that year.
Game six in the '86 World Series against Boston is probably the greatest comeback in World Series history.
Here's Keith Hernandez.
Flied to center, fouled out, singled to center, walked intentionally.
One for three.
Keith Hernandez, after making out in the bottom of the 10th in game six...
And the Mets are down to their last out.
... went back to the clubhouse, grabbed himself a beer, put his feet up on the desk in the manager's office to watch the last out.
And Roger Clemens hoping for that last out.
Lined into left field, base hit for Carter, and the Mets are still alive.
Remember, we're one out from elimination.
We're done.
Curveball, and that's gonna be hit to center.
Base hit.
And now, suddenly, with two out in the 10th inning, the tying runs are aboard and Ray Knight will be the batter.
All this stuff started transpiring.
Consecutive base hits.
Gary Carter at second. Two out.
And that's gonna be hit into centerfield. Base hit.
Here comes Carter to score.
And the tying run is at third in Kevin Mitchell.
I've sat down here and we've got three straight hits.
I'm not leaving this chair.
And it's gonna go to the backstop.
Here comes Mitchell to score the tying run.
And Ray Knight is at second base.
I was inside. It was just like an earthquake.
But we were underneath. So I hope this old ballpark can withstand this.
So the winning run is at second base.
Three and two to Mookie Wilson.
Little roller up along first.
Behind the bag! It gets through Buckner!
Here comes Knight, and the Mets win it!
-Can you believe this ballgame at Shea?
-Oh, brother.
In the seventh game with Boston, they won the game after being behind and won that game and were the World Champions.
Got him.
No visiting player ever wanted to come to Shea.
It just was a creaking, old haunted house, and that's what made us love Shea even more.
It's like, no one wanted to be there except us.
There was a championship in New York.
Any time you win the championship here, you're remembered forever.
Billy's career was becoming meteoric at that point.
I thought he was so cute, and of course I did a little work.
I had to mess up the hair,
'cause he did have kind of, like, this kind of Long Island hairdo.
It was a little too smooth.
And I got it, like, a little spiky.
And put a little stuff in it and broke it up.
And I, you know, I thought he looked great.
They became an item on Page Six.
Billy really didn't like having his picture taken.
I am not a matinee idol type of guy.
I'm not a movie star. I'm a piano player.
Being Billy and Christie, Christie and Billy, the couple, the item, the marriage, the life, all of that stuff meant cameras.
And I was aware that this woman was impossibly beautiful and I was impossibly not good-looking.
I think he was very much in love with Christie.
And above all, he has Alexa.
You know, his daughter, who he loves above everything else.
And Alexa meant everything in the world to him.
It was a unique upbringing.
And in certain ways it was very healthy and very normal.
In certain ways, it was very alternative.
Because as normal as they tried to make it, they're not normal people.
And what they do is not normal.
It's a recurring theme in a lot of my songs.
I'm expecting something dark to happen after something good happens.
I don't know why that is.
It's been a hell of a year. So long.
Ten, nine...
The most important question
I think an artist has to answer is who do they listen to, business-wise?
And if they get the right person to listen to, then they'll end up in good shape.
Billy's manager was his ex-wife's brother.
He kept him in his life because he felt like he could trust him.
And when you look at it on paper, you'd say how could Billy wind up with Frank Weber, who's Elizabeth's brother, who's his ex-wife, but Frank ran his life.
I kept seeing little things, like we always fly commercial and he's always on a private jet.
I don't get that.
Why does he have, like, a million racehorses?
Fancy cars, all of this?
You've had a successful career.
Where's your money?
My dad really, really trusted this man.
And I remember my mom saying she used to try and warn him about it.
And Billy's first reaction was,
"Hey, I've known him a lot longer than I've known you.
"You don't talk bad about him.
"He's a loyal friend."
I don't know where all the money went, but it went away.
The discovery I think was eventually through Christie, when they wanted to buy a piece of property and they found out they had no money.
I came back again with more evidence.
And then he was, like, devastated.
He was really devastated.
That's a betrayal.
And when that happens, everything's changed.
All bets are off.
You're not even in the family anymore.
It was a dark time.
I mean, the people that he trusted had really, you know, sold him down the river.
And it was more... As much emotional as it was, you know, financial.
He was broke and everything was being done on credit because he was in the middle of this financial disaster with his ex-manager.
The result, ultimately?
It made Billy a road warrior.
Because now Billy went out on the road and started to make back his money.
That's when it starts to change.
When your child has a life at home and isn't as portable and packable and, you know, easy to just drop it all and follow Billy.
I think he knew that it was better for me, but I think that it was harder for him, being away from me and my mom more.
When he was back, it was quality time, but he was huge at that point.
He was touring all the time.
He was in demand.
That's when the marriage started to fall apart a little bit.
She didn't like that we were out at night.
She didn't like that you went back and had a drink after a show.
You can't just turn it off, you know, and run back to the hotel room and go to bed, it's not that kind of job.
I come from a pub culture.
At the end of the day, in my neighborhood, everybody ended up at the pub.
It was just a drinking culture.
You just drank. That's what you did.
And I suppose if you do that long enough, you're gonna have a problem with it.
There were arguments, and I think it definitely got in the way of that relationship.
It was a hard time for me, too.
And I don't want to think about that.
By the time they got divorced,
I was about eight years old.
And I remember a lot of arguing before that point.
So I was heartbroken, as any child is when their parents get divorced.
But I wasn't shocked.
Billy's one of my oldest friends.
I really just want what's good for him.
And I just want to see him thrive.
I kind of hit the wall.
Maybe a wall of my own mediocrity.
I realized I was not gonna be writing better stuff,
I was not gonna be growing anymore, because I was no longer interested in pop songwriting.
I was interested in another kind of songwriting.
That's why I stopped. I just stopped.
When 9/11 happened,
Shea Stadium had been used as a staging area for supplies for people working on the pile, for taking care of a lot of the rescue workers, and the victims and their families.
When baseball began again, it was not a sign that life was returning to normal.
But it was a sign that life could return to normal.
When baseball returned to New York, it wasn't at historic Yankee Stadium.
The first game was played in Queens, at Shea.
I have to say, that was probably the hardest thing I've ever had to do as an athlete, that night.
Ken Caminiti, he hits a ground ball.
And Chipper Jones is rounding third.
They're sending him.
The throw to the plate...
Off Piazza's glove, and Chipper Jones scores.
So it's one-nothing in favor of the Braves.
And here's the man the Mets want up in this spot.
Down a run late in the game.
The first pitch, I remember that.
I went, "Man, why did I let that go?"
It was right down the middle and I took it.
I just was in this daze.
Emotionally, I was done.
It's weird how you will link a catastrophe with something as unimportant as a ballgame.
And a guy will do something that is extremely difficult but not uncommon in a baseball game and it will take on deep, deep significance.
And it's hit deep to left center.
Andruw Jones on the run.
This one has a chance. Home run!
Mike Piazza, and the Mets lead three to two.
Piazza hits a home run and for a moment it seems as though the home run is some kind of emphatic response.
Shea Stadium has something to smile about.
Thank you. And thank them.
On September 28, 2008,
Pete Flynn prepared
Shea Stadium for a baseball game.
Just as he had every game for 46 years.
-Let's go, Mets!
-Let's go, Mets!
For the second time in as many seasons, the Mets' playoff hopes have come down to the very last game.
We are hoping that this year will be different.
Maybe one more day, one more night.
You'll be in Shea Stadium and thinking, you know, maybe this is the year we win a World Series.
After two straight end-of-season collapses,
New York headed into the bottom of the ninth two runs down.
And now, this grand old ballpark is down to its final strike.
Three and two to Easley.
Ball four, and the Mets are alive.
And Church will come to the plate as the tying run.
The Mets faithful were looking for one more miracle out of the old Colosseum.
The haunted house known as Shea.
First pitch, fastball outside.
1-and-0.
We can see flashbulbs going off.
Knowing that any pitch now might be the last one ever thrown at Shea Stadium.
Lindstrom sets. Easley leads from first.
He's not being held.
The 1-0 ripped in the air, pretty deep to center.
Going back Nathan, but he has a play at the edge of the track.
He makes the catch.
The ballgame is over and Shea Stadium will close its doors for the final time, as the New York Mets' season has come to a disappointing conclusion.
It's a bit surreal right now to look out at this ballpark and realize that we will not see baseball here again.
For the final time, from the Bob Murphy Radio Booth here at Shea Stadium, the final score today the Florida Marlins four, and the New York Mets two.
For the Mets, it seemed that Shea had run out of luck.
The stadium's last magic moment was destined to be much like its first, on a stage in centerfield before a standing-room-only crowd.
This great stadium was sold out in one or two hours.
He should just spend the rest of his life just on a daily basis, on every heartbeat of his life, counting his blessings that that many people love him.
That show just put it all together.
We're New Yorkers.
You know, Billy's a New Yorker and we're New Yorkers, and that's why it means a lot to us.
John Mayer!
Thank you.
You know, I'm amazed that
I'm able to still keep doing this job.
I haven't put out an album of new material in 15 freaking years.
And here we are at Shea Stadium. Man, this is...
To be at that piano, it's part of his life force.
As much as he wanted to turn that off for a period,
I think he realized there was no way that he could.
It is such a part of who he is that it was calling him.
And he had to answer it.
I've had all kinds of jobs, but this is the best job I ever had.
I want to thank you for letting me do this.
My generation of Long Islanders connect with Billy Joel because he speaks to the place.
Do you know what I mean?
Shea Stadium, that was Robert Moses' baby.
This was his thing.
He opened up Long Island to hundreds of thousands of people.
So now, you're gonna tear the thing down.
Well, who do you want to say its eulogy, in a way?
Well, it's Billy Joel.
Because in Shea Stadium, those seats are packed with Brendas and Eddies.
I know people like this.
John at the bar, he wants to be a movie star.
Sergeant O'Leary, Anthony,
Brenda and Eddie, the king and the queen of the prom.
It's easy for me to identify with these people.
I know Brenda and Eddie.
I'm telling you, I know them.
I'm related to them.
Out of high school she gets pregnant, they get an apartment right off the train line.
You're going to a low-level job in Manhattan, maybe.
But you're doing something where there's action.
There's forward movement, you think.
And, of course, within a few years they realize,
Brenda and Eddie, that they're really children still.
And they're not gonna make it.
Everybody fails, everybody falls.
Everybody has something bad happen.
It's how do you recover?
How do you deal with it?
And how do you move on?
Thank you!
In music, there's a lot of magic in what we do.
There's a lot of mystery.
There's stuff you can't just explain.
Get here!
I'm on my way to Shea Stadium and I get a phone call on my cell phone. It's Paul McCartney.
I was on the plane heading there and I said, "I'd love to do this thing, but I can't even get to JFK until 11:00."
It's just logistically impossible for him to get off a plane, go through customs, immigration, get his luggage, drive all the way across the island to get here by the end of the show.
"I don't think there's any way I can do it.
Do you?"
Well, somebody put in a call who knew some flight controllers.
They cleared airspace for his plane to be able to get in earlier.
It's about 10:30.
Someone comes on the headsets and says,
"The eagle has landed."
Got off the airplane faster than anyone's ever got off a plane before.
They just whisked me through.
It was like, "Don't worry about that. You're coming with me."
Like, "I'm with the state,"
"I'm with the thing," you know.
It was like customs, "Just go through."
It's Paul McCartney. Let him in.
There was a police escort set up to meet him.
It was like... It was like the best ride ever.
I said, "I want to travel like this all the time."
From the minute we left the airport,
I think I made it in 11 minutes to Shea.
Waiting for him behind the makeshift stage, out of the spotlight, was a man whom he had met in this very spot once before.
Nice to meet you.
-Hey, good to see you.
-I drove you the first time you were here.
I heard. Was it you? I don't believe it.
I re-met the guy who drove us out there on that night.
So, it was so cool.
He's really there. It's really him.
I don't believe this shit.
When McCartney showed up, that just tore the house down.
Ladies and gentlemen, please welcome
Sir Paul McCartney.
I'm a fan, so here's Paul McCartney playing with my band at our show.
And I'm looking at the band, and everybody's got this big, shit-eating grin.
Like, this is so cool. Can you believe this?
And I'm just gonna sing harmony and just take this in.
Paul McCartney!
The original.
Thanks for letting us use the room.
So that was it, that was really the thing coming full circle.
Paul McCartney, he just got off a plane from London.
The fact that that happened when it happened, how it happened, there's an element of spirituality to it.
It was almost karmic.
How do you follow that?
Usually, when there's that many people, it all blends into this faceless mass, but as the night went on,
I could see individual people making efforts to connect with me in one way or the other.
We were all trying to pull each other together.
We were all there together.
Thank you, New York!
Thank you!
All of my life came into play that night.
It was very emotional.
It lasted for weeks afterwards.
I was intoxicated by it.
We were dizzy from it.
Still to this day I think about it and I get exhilaration from it.
Thank you!
Don't take any shit from anybody.
The audience probably assumed, okay, that's the end of the show.
But I wanted Paul to end the show with a Beatles song because it was...
It's poetic.
We walk off after Piano Man, I grab Paul,
I go, "Let's do another song. "
He goes, "What about Let It Be?"
This is the end of an era for Shea Stadium, you know.
Shea Stadium was built the same time
The Beatles came to America.
It was exactly the same time.
So, for him to do that song, to call that one, it was just perfect for the...
Again, the end of something.
Let it be, New York.
Good night, Shea!
.srt English Subtitles
Dan4Jem, ADMMXI
I love Glee!
My favorite character would be Rachel.
Yeah, the best character is Rachel.
Because she was very
Barbra Streisand-esque.
Well, I'm warming up before the show.
I generally start with a lukewarm cup of hot water with lemon and honey.
It can't be too hot because it will hurt your vocal chords.
My favorite character is Firm.
Blaine. He is so adorable.
I just love him to death.
My favorite character is
Brittany, because she's so dumb.
But she's so pretty and she can dance so well.
I think it has a lot to do with my hair, because look at how long it is and how beautiful it is.
My favorite character is Sam because he's really cute.
Finn!
I think the hottest character is definitely Santana.
I ingest l.3\iSS€.
It's normally supposed to be applied on your lids to make your lashes grow.
I just took it one step further and started drinking it.
Puck! Puck!
Rachel! Rachel!
Meme. maine.
Acrually, maine.
Sam. Sam.
No, Puck. Puck.
He's so funny. He's super, super cocky and just totally into himself
I heard that this haircut might make me go a little faster, have a little edge on the competition.
And, you know, the ladies like something to grab on to, time and time again.
Artie, for me, because he makes looking geeky look so cool.
It's crazy because I can't believe that people actually like us enough that we could make a 3-D movie.
I'd have to go with Blaine.
Definitely Blaine.
We've gone from Lima, Ohio, to Dublin, Ireland.
And we've done four countries.
And it's just been an amazing experience.
That means my face is going to be in 3-D.
And my pimples.
Sam!
Finn.
Everyone is my favorite,
I can't choose just one.
I like Quinn because she's really hot.
I need more...
Could you turn the camera off? I need.,.
Oh, God. 3-D?
Kurt is my favorite character.
I love his sassiness and how he's not afraid to tell it exactly how ii is.
Thank you for loving me.
But I want to thank everybody who has been with me since day one.
All my Glee Club members and Mr. Schue. We made it.
(slNGING) Don? stop
A singer in a smoky room
A smell of wine and cheap perfume
For a smile they can share the night
It goes on and on and on and on
Strangers waiting
Up and down the boulevard
Their shadows
Searching in the night
Streetlight people
Living just to find emotion
Hiding somewhere m me nigh:
Working hard to get my fill
Everybody wants a thrill
Payin' anything
10 roll the dice
Just one more time
Some will win, some will lose
Some were born to sing the blues
Oh, the movie never ends
It goes on and on and on and on
Don? stop belfevfn'
Hold on fo that feelin'
Streetlight people
Don? stop belfevfn'
Hold on fo that feelin'
Streetlight people
Don't stop
What's up, everybody?
How are you doing tonight?
Hi, everybody!
(slNGING) sing if out
Boy, you got to see what tomorrow brings
(slNGING) sing if out
Girl, you got to be what tomorrow needs
For every time
That they want to count you out
And use your voice every single time
You open up your mouth
Sing it for the boys, sing it for the girls
Every time that you lose it
Sing it for the world
Sing it from the heart
Sing it till you're nuts
Sing it out for the ones that'll hate your guts
Sing it for the deaf
Sing it for the blind
Sing about everyone that you left behind
Sing it for the world
Sing it for the world
Cleaned-up corporation progress
Dying in the process
Buy yourself the motivation
Generation nothing
Nothing but a dead scene
Product of a white dream
I am not the singer that you wanted But a dancer
I refuse to answer
Talk about the past, sir
Wrote it for the ones who want to getaway
Keep running
Sing it for the boys
Sing it for the girls
Every time that you lose it
Sing it for the world
Sing it from the heart
Sing it till you're nuts
Sing it out for the ones that'll hate your guts
Sing it for the deaf
Sing it for the blind
Sing about everyone that you left behind
Sing it for the world
Sing it for the world
We got to see what tomorrow brings
Sing it for the world
Sing it for the world
Boy you got to be what tomorrow needs
Sing it for the world
Sing it for the world
MAN ON MEGAPHONEZ Guys, we've got free Glee taltoos_ Free Glee tempos.
I think it's made me accept myself better.
I like performing, but I was never comfortable doing ii.
I have three daughters, two boys, and we all watch
Glee every week.
And it gave us all something in common.
Everybody watches Glee.
It doesn't matter what race, gender, what your sexuality is.
Anybody can be a Glee fan.
It inspires me that you could write your own life story no matter who you are.
Glee has definitely changed the way that I look at certain groups of people.
And short people and tall people and fat people and skinny people, really popular and nerdy people.
The clique that I hang out with is the jock clique.
I guess il could be the popular clique, also.
I would say
I am a real life Cheerio, but I'm not a stuck-up Cheerio.
But I am a Cheerio because I am a cheerleader.
COACH PAGE: Here we go. Ready?
Five, six, seven, eight.
One, two, three, four, five, six, seven, eight.
JANAE: Coach Page, she is Sue Sylvester.
Let's do it for Sue.
Janae is our secret weapon, and when we went to Nationals, people underestimated our squad because we had her.
And she was the one who actually saved our routine.
She can go pretty high.
She's small, but she's like a little ball.
JANAE: I would say I'm popular because I am different.
Everyone does know me.
I stand out.
Go, team Gleei
I know you know this one.
Rocks in the sky!
Get them up. Let's go!
Bounce With me.
BOUNCE With me!
Hey! Hey!
Up top. Let's go!
(RAPPING) Yeah, yeah, I'm out that
Brooklyn Now I'm down in TriBeCa
Right next to De Niro
But VH be hood forever
I'm the new Sinatra
And since I made it here
I can make it anywhere
Yeah, they love me everywhere
(RAPPING) I used to cop in
Harlem All of my Dominicanos
Right there up on Broadway
Pull me back to that McDonalds
Took it to my stashbox,
560 State Street
Catch me in the kitchen Like a Simmons with them Fastrys
(RAPPING) Eight million stories out there in it Naked City, it's a pity
Half Of y'all won't make it
Me, I got to plug Special Ed I Got
It Made If Jeezy's payin' LeBron
I'm payin' Dwyane Wade
Three-dice Cee-lo
Three-card Monte
Labor Day Parade
Rest in peace, Bob Marley
Jigga, lbe Spiked out
I could trip a referee
Tell by my attitude that I'm most dehnitely
(SINGING) From New York
Concrete jungle where dreams are made of
There 's nothin' you can? do
Now you're in New York
These streets will make you feel brand new
Big /ignrs win inspire you
Let's hear it for New York
New York, New York
One hand in the air for the big city
Street lights, big dreams, all lookin' pretty
No place in the world that could compare
Put your hands in the air
Everybody say yeah
Yeah, yeah, yeah
New York
Concrete jungle where dreams are made of
There 's nothin' you can? do
Now you're in New York
These streets will make you feel brand new
Big /ignrs win inspire you
Let's hear it for New York
New York, New York
ARTIE: it's your boy!
My favorite character would have to be Brittany.
Brittany,
Brittany.
I hope they have an overwhelming sensation about my boobs in Slave because they are 3-D and they look really good.
My favorite character is Brittany S. Pierce.
I'm the biggest
Glee fan in the world.
I'm getting a Glee tattoo.
My cat's name is Santana, my dog's name is Brittany,
I'm wearing Glee shoes,
I have a Cheerios jacket, my entire house is Glee, and my car was named Quinn until I crashed it.
This is Brittany's hat from
Blame It (On the Alcohol).
I have definitely made friends because of Glee.
It's changed my whole social life.
And it'S Off.
Lt'S Still On.
GIRL 1: Am I a girl?
GIRL 2: Yes.
Am I 3 student?
No.
Am I Gwyneth Paltrow?
No, not in this.
Am I a guy?
No.
A gm?
Yes!
Ready, Jackie?
Go.
Am I blonde?
Yeah.
Am I Quinn?
NO.
Am l Brittany?
Yeah!
I got the Brittany card?
Yes.
Okay, Ican't believe
I just got the Brittany card!
Okay. What did she do?
I don't care.
I got the Brittany card!
I've never got it on my own without cheating.
JOSEY: Itls a huge thing for me, honestly, to have people over and in my house because / HSVSf' had that before.
It makes me feel normaf.
I was 15 years old when I was diagnosed with Asperger's.
It's common to have anxiety, panic, any kind of just "meltdowns," is what we usually call them.
The more you get to know me, the more obvious it is.
It's just like this crazy madness in my mind.
But I do have one thing that is my pick-me-up and gets me through it, and that's
Brittany S. Pierce.
Brittany has, what we like to call,
"The Brittany Effect" on me.
When I see a Brittany video, it's like something switches in me, and I'm happy.
I am the biggest Brittany fan.
I will fight for that.
There 's no doubt about ft!
My dog is named Brittany.
Come on!
I know I may be young
But I've got feelings, too
And I need to do what I feel like doing
So let me go, and just listen
All you people look at me like I'm a little girl
Well, did you ever think it'd be okay
For me to step into this worfd?
Always saying, Little girl don't step into the club
Well, I'm just tryin' to find out wh y
Because dancing's what I love, yeah
Get it, get it
Get it, get it
Get it, get it
Get it, get it
Get it, get it
Get it, get it
/'m E slave fol', VON
I Cannot hold il
I C3!?f? Of COf?f!'Of ff
/'m E slave fol', VON
I won't deny it
Pm not trying to hide it
I know I may come off quiet
I may come off shy
But I feel like talking
Feel like dancing
When I see this guy
W/'lBf'S PFHCUCE/ [S logical
What the hell, who Cares?
All I know is I'm so happy when you're dancing there
Baby
Don't you wanna dance upon me
To another time and place
Baby
Don't you wanna dance upon me
Leaving behind my name and age
Get it, get it
Get it, get it
Get it, get it
Get it, get it
Get it, get it
Get it, get it
/'m E slave fol', VON
Here we go now
I cannot hold it,
/ C&f7I1OfC0f1ff0/if
Do you like the way I move?
/'m E slave fol', VON
Here we go
I won't deny it,
I'm not trying to hide it
Like thai?
Like thai?
PUCK: I'm working on a new technique to where more women have the ability to get into the Puckerman Zone here.
Pretty popular with the moms, so, you know.
I clean their pool, give them a discount, help them out.
We're working hard.
(slNGING) Hey!
I was just a skinny lad
Never knew no good from bad
But I knew love before I left my nursery
Left alone with big fat Fanny
She was such a naughty nanny
Hey, big woman you made a bad boy out of me
I've been singing with my band
Across fhe wafer,
BCFOSS fhe.fand
I've seen ev'ry blue-eyed floozy on the way, hey
But their beauty and their style
Weflf Kind Of smooth after a While
Take me to them
Iardy ladies every time
Come on!
Oh, won't you take me home tonight?
Oh, down beside your red firelight
Oh, and you give it all you got
Fat bottomed girls You make the rockin' world go round
Get on your bikes and ride!
Finn HUdSOI'l
OFI the CIFUITIS!
INTERVIEWER: Barbra Streisand is going to be here tonight to hear you sing.
How do you feel about that?
(WHISPERING) Did they tell you anything about this?
INTERVIEWERZ
YOU Seém 0VEFWh€ll'fl€d.
Which song...
I knew she would come.
I did.
INTERVIEWERZ
\Nl'1iCl'1 SODQ on the tour is the most demanding for your voice?
I mean, I've been singing
Don't Rain On My Parade since I was about two years old.
My dad's played it for me when I was in my birth mother's womb.
And I'm still singing it to this day.
And I knew
Barbra would show up.
(SINGING) Don't tell me not to live Just sit and putter
Life's candy
And fhe Sun'S a ball Of buffer
Don? bring around a cfoud
To rain on my parade!
Don't tell me not to fly
I've simply got to
If someone takes a spill
It's me and not you!
Who told you you're allowed to rain on my parade?
VH march my band out
/'// bear my drum
And if Pm farmed out
Your turn at bat, sir
At least I didn't fake it
Hat, sir
I guess I didn't make it
But whether I'm the rose of sheer perfection
A freckle on the nose of life 's complexion
The Cinder
Or the shiny apple of its eye
I gotta fly once
I gotta try once
Only can die once, right, sir?
Life is juicy
Juicy, and you see
I've gotta have my bite, sir
Get ready for me, love
'Cause I'm a comer
I simply gotta march
My heart's a drummer!
Don? bring around a cfoud
To rain on my parade!
I'm gonna live
And live now
Get what I want
I know how
One throw for the whole shebang
One throw
That bell will go clang
Eye on the target and wham
One shot, one gunshot and bam
Hey, everybody!
Here I am
VH march my band out
/'// bear my drum
And if Pm farmed out
Your turn at bat, sir
At least I didn't fake it
Hat, sir
I guess I didn't make it
Get ready for me, love
Because I'm a comer!
I simply got to march
My heart's a drummer
Nobody
No, nobody ls gonna
Rain on my
PBFSUS
This is Mike Chang
HS H Foboi.
ARTIEI Lef'S be real.
Between Mike and me, we run this whole ship.
L.€l'S be F€BI.
(SINGING) Where did you come from, baby?
And ooh, won't you take me there?
Right away
Won't you, baby?
Tenderoni, you've got to be
Spark my nature
Sugar, fly with me
Don't you know now is the perfect time
We can make it right
Hit the city lights
Then tonight
Ease the lovin' pain
Let me take you to the max
I want to love you
PYT
Pretty young thing
You need some loving
TLC
Tender lovin' care
And I'll take yOu there
Yes, I will, Yes I...
I want to love you
PYT
Pretty young thing
You need some loving
TLC
Tender loving care
And I'll take yOu there
Pretty young thing
You make me sing
Pretty young thing
You make me sing
Come on, sing it wiih me!
Pretty young things
Repeat after me
Say na na na
CROWD: Na na na
NB HB D3 H3
CROWD! N8 HB H8116
Sing it
Say na na na
CROWD: Na na na
NB HB D3 H3
CROWD! N8 HB H8116
Let me hear you
Say na na na
CROWD: Na na na
NB HB HB H3 H3
CROWDI N8 Ha HB H8 F16
Oh, VH rake you there
VH fake you there
I want to love you
P YT
Pretty young thing
YOU Heed SOME /OWU'
TL C
Tender lovin' care
And I'll take yOu there
I'll take you there
I'll take you there
I want to love you
P YT
Pretty young thing
YOU Heed SOME /OWU'
TLC
Tender lovin' care
And I'll take yOu there
PYT
Oh, baby
TL C
Oh, baby
Oh, baby
Hey!
Pretty young thing
Thank you, Mike!
GIRL: I'm a very judgmental person, and at first glance I could dehnitely write somebody off
And Glee has taught me that everybody has a story.
GIRL 22 /think that we're the majority.
We 're the quirky, weird kids.
We don? all look the same way.
I've been the shy kid always.
And especially Kurt being so out and being able to just be him, and be trendy and fashionable, it really helped me kind of want to just be me a little bit more.
TRENTON: I can connect with
Kurt on a very personal level.
I came out when
I was in eighth grade.
And I'm like, "I can go through the same thing as he does."
So it's like real life.
Well, in the first semester of eighth grade, my whole life changed dramatically.
I did not come out by choice at all.
I had a journal.
My journal was someone that wasn't going to judge me, no matter what I told it.
I! Wouldjusf listen.
I had this crush on this guy named Brian.
He had the most gorgeous eyes ever.
I wrote many letters to him that I would never give him.
It would start off with,
"Brian, hi.
"I know we don't talk very often,
"but I've liked you since the seventh grade."
Bfiafl foUI"ld OUT that l had 3 crush on l'1il'T'l because my best friend at the time took my journal, and set it on his desk during class.
And he just opened it and just started reading everything.
Everymmg_
And IW3S So €IT1b3ff3SS€d.
(SINGING) Ain? no way
For me to love you
If you won't let me
No
I know that a woman's duty is to help and love a man
And that's the way it was planned
I said stop trying to be
Someone you're not
And if you need me to love you
Say, say you do
Oh then, baby, baby
Baby, don't you know that
I need you?
It ain't no way
How y'all doing over here?
It ain't no way
What about back here?
Itjust ain't no way, baby
Over here?
It ain't no way, baby
It ain't no way
For me to love you
If you won't
LSI me
Thank you for letting me sing for you tonight! Have fun!
Jessie is 8 fffeUd
Yeah, I know he's been a good friend of mine
But lately something's changed
That ain't hard to dehne
Jessie's got hfmseff a gin' and I want to make her mme
And she's watching him with those eyes
And she's lovin' him with that body I just know it
And he's holding her in his arms Late, late at night
You know I wish that
I had Jessie's girl
I wish that
I had Jessie's girl
Where Can I find
6 Woman ffke fhaf?
Like Jessfe's gin*
I wish that
I had Jessie's girl
Where can I find a woman
Where Can I find
6 Woman ffke fhaf?
And I'm lookin' in the mirror aff fhe time
Wondering what she don? see in me
I've been funny
I've been cool with the lines
Ain't that the way love supposed to be?
Tell me Where can I Hnd a woman like that?
Like Jessfe's gin*
I wish that
I had Jessie's girl
I want Jessfeis gin*
Where Can I find
6 Woman ffke fhaf?
Like Jessfe's gin*
I wish that
I had Jessie's girl
I want,
I want Jessiels girl
(SINGING) Well, sometimes lgo out by myself
And / /00k BCFOSS me WBYSI'
And I think of all the things What you're doing
And in my head
I paint a picture
'Cause since I've come on home
Well, my body's been a mess
And I've missed your ginger hair
And the way you like to dress
VI/on? you come on over
Stop makin' a fool out of me
Why don't you come on over, Valerie?
Valerie
Valerie
Valerie
Well, sometimes l go out by myself
And I look
GCVOSS me Waféf
And I think of all the things What you're doing
And in my head
I paint a picture
'Cause since I've come on home
Well, my body's been a mess
And I've missed your ginger hair
And the way you like to dress
VI/on? you come on over
Stop makin' a fool out of me
Why don't you come on over, Valerie?
Valerie
V6/Erie, Valerie
Valerie
Why don't you come on oven Valerie?
Janie!
Coach!
How we doing today?
Good. How are you?
I'm doing fine.
I wanted to bring these for you.
Thank you.
Because you were nominated for Kind of a big deal.
Prom is tonight, and I'm nominated in the top five for Prom Princess.
And I really hope
I make it and I win.
Are you nervous?
Yeah, I'm the only cheerleader in top five. isn't that crazy?
I'm so excited.
GIRL: You haven't showed me a picture of him yet.
I was like, "What'?"
H€'S CUTS.
JANAE: This yean I'm going to prom with Reed Cook.
He's known for just being fun.
And he's a football player.
He's of average stature.
Yeah, he's handsome.
I don't usually go to dances with average-sized guys.
I usually go with a little person.
I was looking for a date to prom and I olidn't know who to ask.
And Janae has been telling me, "Coach,
"I don't have anybody to goto prom."
Because I was like, "It would be fun to go with him."
I was just throwing it out there as, like,
"Wouldn't that be COOI?"
Thinking it would never, ever happen.
REED: Artie, he's in a wheelchain he's got two girls.
Finn and Rachel, she's a nerd, he's a jock, it worked out.
Puckerman and Zizes, she's big, he doesn't care. He likes hen
And Janée, she's small, but I don? Care.
I don't think that Should matter.
She's just a fun person to be around.
I was kind Of afraid to 63.3 hef.
I was nervous.
I didn't know if she'd say yes or no.
Just one day during the break,
I decided, "if I'm going to do it,
I've got to do it right now."
JANAE:
And Reed came walking up.
I was just like,
"I think it might happen."
And he got down on one knee, and he just asked me to prom right then and there.
REED: She was... I don't know.
She was surprised, definitely surprised.
She didn? know if
I was serious or not.
Until I was like, "Yeah, will you goto prom with me?"
Said ii a couple of more times, but...
I was just like, "Yeah.
"Because I was so nervous, also.
I never thought
I had any chance in the world to have him ask me to prom.
(SINGING) Do you ever feel like a plastic bag
Drifting through the wind
Wanting to start again?
Do you ever feel
Feel so paper thin
Like a house of cards
One blow from caving in?
Do you ever feel already buried deep
Six feet under screams But no one seems to hear a thing?
Do you know That there's still a chance for you?
'Cause there 's a spark in you
You just gotta ignite the light
And lei it Shine
Just own the night
Like the Fourth of July
Cause, baby, you're a firework
Come on, show 'em what you're worth
Make 'em go
Oh, oh, oh
As you shoot across the sky
Baby, you're a firework
Come on, show 'em what you're worth
Make 'em go
Oh, oh, oh
As you shoot across the sky
Boom, boom, boom
Even brighter than the moon, moon, moon
It's always been inside of you, you, you
And now it's time to let it through
Baby, you're a firework
Come on, show 'em what you're worth
Make 'em go
Oh, oh, oh
As you shoot across the sky
Cause, baby, you're a firework
Come on, show 'em what you're worth
Make 'em go
Oh, oh, oh
You're gonna leave 'em goin'
Oh, oh, oh
Even brighter than the moon, moon, moon
Boom, boom, boom
Even brighter than the moon, moon, moon
Say thank you
Thank you!
Say thank you
Thank you
Thank you
Thank you to all our fans
We love you
Even though this was not planned
I want to be a Warbler really bad.
And I would potentially shave my hair off so I could be a Warbler,
I love all of them so much, bul my favorite is definitely Blaine.
I would have to say Blaine.
I love Blaine.
INTERVIEWER: Why?
He's the man!
Blaine Anderson.
My favorite character is Blaine, period.
I feel kind of discouraged that I've auditioned for solos against him six times now.
Blaine, definitely.
Kurt. Kurt.
Blaine. Sorry.
Kurt.
Hey, man, when your front man's that guy, you've got to roll with the punches.
We're comfortable with ourselves, so it's okay.
I'm confident in myself.
It's definitely Kurt.
It's Blaine.
Go, Blaine!
My four-year-old daughter loves Kurt and Blaine so much
[hai She WEHIS them to D6 HSI' two dads.
My favorite character is Blaine.
Hi, Blaine.
I'm the Mini Warbler.
(SINGING) Before you met me
I was all right
But things were kinda heavy
You brought me to life
Now every February
YOU'// be my VB/Snfifle
VB/GHHI79
Let's go all the way tonight
No regrets
Just love
We Can UEHCS Uflfi/ We die
You and/
We'll be young forever
(SINGING) You make me
Feel like I'm living a teenage dream
The way you turn me on
I can't sleep
Let's run away and don't ever look back Don't ever look back
Let's go all the way tonight
No regrets
Just love
We Can UEHCS Uflfi/ We die
You and I
We'll be young forever
YOU make me
Feel like I'm living a teenage dream
The way you turn me on
I can't sleep
Let's run away and don't ever look back Don't ever look back
I might get your heart racing in my skin-tight jeans
Be your teenage dream tonight
How are we all feeling this evening?
Let's hear you.
Sing along if you know it.
Let's go!
YOU make me feef
Like I'm living a
Teenage dream
The way you turn me on
I can't sleep
Let's run away and don't ever look back Don't ever look back
NO, HO, look af me
Just one touch
Now, baby, I believe
This is rea! so
DONT everlook back
DOD? ei/Sl' /OOK DSCK
I might get your heart racing in my skin-tight jeans
Be your teenage dream tonight
Let you put your hands on me in my skin-tight jeans
Be your teenage dream tonight
Thank you so very much.
Let's hear it forthe
Dalton Academy Warblers!
This next song is for all the lovers in the house tonight.
Enjoy.
(SINGING) You'd think that people would have had enough of silly love songs
BUT f look around me
ANU I See if f$!?'f SO
Oh no
Some people wanna fill the world with silly love songs
And whafs Wrong with that
I'd like IO know
'Cause here I go
Again
I love you
I love you
I can't expfain
The feeling's plain to me
Say can't you see?
Ah, she gave me more
She gave it all to me
Say can't you see?
Love dOSSH'f
C0019 in 6 ITIIHLIYS
Sometimes it doesn't come at all
I only know that when I'm in it
It isn't Silly
Love isn't Silly
Love iSn'i Silly Ei all
Not af all
All right, I want you to sing along with me.
It's three words, very easy.
It goes like this.
I love you
Let's hear it. Your turn.
CROWD: Hove you
Keep it going, let's sing together.
This is beautiful.
I can't explain
The feeling's plain to me
Say can't you see?
Ah, she gave me more
She gave it all to me
Say can? you see
(SINGING) Right, right, tum off the fights
We're gonna lose our minds tonight
What's the dealio?
I love when it's all too much 5:00 a. m. turn the radio up
Where 's the rock and rofl?
Party crasher
Penny snatcher
Call me up if you a gangsta
Don't be fancy
Just get dancey
Why So serious?
So raise your glass if you are wrong In all the right ways
All my underdogs
We wil/ never be, never be
Anything but loud
And nitty gritty
Dirty little freaks
Won't you come on and come on And raise your glass
Just come on and come on
And raise your glass
Oh, my Q/GSS /S empty
That Sucks
So if you're too school for cool
And you're treated
Hke a foo!
You can choose to fer it go
We can always
We can always
Party on our own
So raise your
So raise your glass if you are wrong In all the right ways
All my underdogs
We wil/ never be, never be
Anything but loud and nifty gritty
Dirty little freaks
So raise your glass if you are wrong m an me right ways
All my underdogs
Oh we will
Anything but loud
And nifty gritty
Dirty little freaks
Won't you come on and come on and raise your glass for me
Raise your glass
For me
After class, he rushed out of class.
He was the first one out.
And he took the notebook with him, actually.
He shared my journal with everyone.
I felt like everyone was looking at me differently already.
They all knew.
It spread like wildfire.
And when I heard that, I never wanted to come back to the school.
And that was on a Monday.
At the end of the day, I got my journal back, and I wanted to rip it up because I didn't want my family to Hnd out about me.
But l just thought they would still Hnd it,
So I decided to burn if insfead.
That's when lbecame very bottled in, even when people teased me and made fun of me throughout the year.
And, it'S just hard because WS hafd
I0 deal with it. lt'S hard.
Kurt taught me a lot because he was the only out kid at his school,
And he was proud.
And just like in the prom episode, he did go off running, but he came back, and he held his head up and smiled.
The SUI? is shining
Come on get happy
(SINGING) Shout it now, there's no one The lord is waiting
Who can doubt it now
To take your hand
Shout hallelujah
So let's tell the world
And just get happy
About it now
We're going to the promised land Happy days are here again
We 're heading across the river
Soon your cares will all be gone
There 'H be no more
From now on
Forget your troubles
Happy days
And just get happy
Are here again
YOU beffef chase
The Skies
All your blues away
Above are clear again
Shout hallelujah
So /et's sing a song
And just get happy
Of cheer again
Happy times
Happy nights
Happy days
Are
Here
Again
INTERVIEWER: Is it true that you told
Mercedes that you sing better than her?
Yes, because l UO.
But that's okay.
Mercedes, what do you think about this?
She doesn't have to answer that if she doesn't want to.
Well, I'm going to lock her in a closet.
I mean, who even would try?
Do you see her?
INTERVIEWER:
Is it war, Rachel?
No.
She might act like she's all nice and fu n-spirited and whatnot.
I can't even say these words because my ears are too innocent.
I was minding my own business.
I just decided to go for a stroll on stage, sing a song.
When, out Of nowhere a woman that looked like she should have been caged in the zoo had somehow escaped and grabbed me with her giant bear hands.
You wanna make out?
Brittany, are you flirting with my man?
Tina.
I just want to push her.
She doesn't want to get a smackdown.
She's afraid of the wrath.
She knows what I've done to people.
I've beaten you up.
I've beat her up.
It's kind of crazy.
I thought I would be super famous.
And it happened.
I'm just really thankful because somebody has to compete with Kurt.
Everybody's got a dream.
And this is mine.
(slNGING) s
A
F
E
T
Y
Safety
DEVICE
YOU CBN UEHCS if We WEN! YO
You can leave your friends behind
'Cause your friends don't dance And if they don't dance wen they're
DO friends of FTHHS
I say we can go where we want to
A place where they will never find
And we CHI] &Cf / [ke We COME
From Out Off his World
Leave fhe ISE/ OHS far behind
ANU we Can O'af? Ce
Come on!
We can go when we want to
The night is young and so am I
And we C80 0'!°6SS feaf Heaf
From OUT hats to OUF feet
And surprise 'em with the victory cry
I say we can act if want to
If we don't, nobody will
We can act real rude
And totally removed
And / CSN ECI like an imbecile
I say we can dance
We can dance
Everything's out of control
We CBN dance
W6 CSN UBHCS
We 're doing it from Wall I0 wall
We CBN dance
W6 CSN UBHCS
Everybody look at your hands
We CBN dance
W6 CSN UBHCS
Everybody's takin' the chance
Upiopg
/f'S Safe YO UBHCS
WSI/ WS Safe f0 UEHCS
/f'S Safe YO UBHCS
Come on!
We can dance if we want to We've got all your life and mine
As long as we abuse it
Never ganna lose it
Everythfngw work out right
I say we can dance
We can dance
Everything's out of control
We CBN dance
W6 CSN UBHCS
We 're doing it from Wall I0 wall
We CBN dance
W6 CSN UBHCS
Everybody look at your hands
We CBN dance
W6 CSN UBHCS
Everybody's takin' the chance
Come on!
/f'S Safe YO UBHCS
W6//, f ['S safe fO dance
/f'S Safe YO UBHCS
'Cause it's safe to dance
/f'S Safe YO UBHCS
Sing it!
/f'S Safe YO UBHCS
/f'S Safe YO UBHCS
JANAE: High school guys, they're kind of self-conscious.
And I'm very short.
And so it's like, why take me when you can take this beautiful
5'4" tall, blonde girl?
You know?
Come on, two steps to your left.
All right, guys.
Okay, all the girls in?
All right, we're set.
JANAE: I'm excited because Reed had enough courage to ask me.
And he'S »"? Of
Seff-CoflSCfOU$ about ff.
And he's like, "Yeah, I'm taking a dwarf.
We're going to have fun."
We honestly danced the night away.
It was just fun because
I dance like a maniac.
And so does Reed, actually.
It's 10:30, so half-an-hour until they announce Prom Princess.
Oh, no. Okay, now you have me nervous. (LAUGHS)
They lined us up, and we were standing backstage.
And my stomach, like, kind of
IIJITISU il'1fO Kl'10\S and I just got butterflies.
WOMAN: And, last but not least, we have Anthony Banas and Janae Meraz.
And your Prince and Princess are...
Haden BSFFOW and Janie IVI€F3Z.
I was really shocked.
And so, I was just like, "Did they mess up, or is that actually me?"
And then they came and they put in on my head.
And I was like,
"Oh! It'S me!"
WOMAN: Congratulations, guys.
COACH PAGES She has tons of friends.
And I have absolutely no idea why nobody who is an average-sized person
HBS HSVEI' taken hef tO B UBHCS.
But Reed didn 'I think twice.
He absolutely didn't think twice.
I think, for the Hrs! time, he proved to her that people see her as just her, not as a fittfe person.
JANAE: I guess you could say
Glee has changed my life, because it's opened my eyes that people are different.
And l'rTl like,
"l have to l'el°f18l'T1D&l' 'll'l31I."
Because it's like,
I know I'm different, but I'm not realizing that everyone else is different around me, also.
(BOTH SINGING) I'm lucky I'm in love With my best friend
Lucky to have been where I have been
Lucky to be coming home again
Oooh
They don't know how long it takes
Waiting for a love like this
Every time we say goodbye f WfSh we had One!T?O!'e kfSS
VH wait for you
I promise you
I will
I'm lucky I'm in love with my best friend
Lucky to have been where I have been
Lucky to be coming home again
Lucky we're in love in every way
Lucky to have stayed
Where we have stayed
Lucky to be coming home someday
Oooh
(SINGING) When l was a little girl l had a rag doll
Only doll I've ever owned
(SINGING) Now I love you just the way I loved that rag doh'
But only now my love has grown
And it gets stronger
In every way
And it gets higher
Day by day
Do Hove you
My, oh my
River deep
Mountain high
Yeah, yeah, yeah
If I lost you
Would I cry
Oh, how I love you, baby
Baby, baby, baby llove you, baby
Like a flower loves the spring
And I love you, baby
Like the robin loves to sing
And I love you, baby Like a schoolboy loves to play
And I love you, baby
River deep, mountain high
Oh, baby
Do Hove you
My, oh my
River deep
Mountain high
Yeah, yeah, yeah
If I lost you
Would I cry
Oh how I love you, baby
Baby, baby, baby lVleFC€d€S.
Do you hear the sweet sound of all of that applause for me?
You know, that's really been my favorite part about this tour, because the fans have spoken.
And I am now officially the sexiest member of the Glee Club,
NOI So f8St, l'10ICl16€KS.
Give it up for
Holly Holliday!
Hey, is anybody here in the mood for a little Cee Lo?
Because I know I am.
Hit it!
(SINGING) I see you driving
'round town with the guy I love
And I'm like
Forget you
I guess the change in my pocket wasn't enough
I'm like
Forget you
Yeah I'm sorry
I can't afford a Ferrari
But that don't mean
I can't get you there
I guess she's an Xbox and Fm more an Atari
But the way you play your game ain't fair
I pity the fool that falls in love with you
Oh, she's a gold digger
Just thought you should know it
I've got some news for you
Yeah, go run and tell your little girlfriend
I see you driving 'round town with the guy I love
And I'm like
Forget you
I guess the change in my pocket wasn't enough
I'm like forget you
And forget hen too
I said ff! was richer
Pd stiff be with ya
Ha, NOW BMT fhaf SOIHG Shh
Ain? that some Shh
And although there's pain in my chest I still wish you the best
With a forget you
Now, baby, baby, baby Why d'you wanna, wanna hurt me so bad
So bad, so bad, so bad
I tried to tell my mamma but she told me This is one for your dad
Your dad, your dad, your dad
Yes, she did
Yes, She did
Why
Why, baby
I love you
I stiff love you
I see you driving 'round town with the guy I love
And I'm like
Forget you
Forget you
I guess the change in my pocket wasn't enough
I'm like forget you
And forget hen too
I said ff! was richer
Pd stiff be with ya
NOW &fl7' [fh3fSOfl1€ Shh
Ain? that some Shh
And although there's pain in my chest I still wish you the best
With a forget you
Let's go get some tacos.
At the time in my life when I got into Glee, it was just hard.
It was dealing with losing my father.
It was dealing with the being different.
Andjust so many things were happening.
And she kind of just popped into my life when I needed someone, when I just felt so negative and down on myself
When I met her in person, she fully embraced me and my quirks.
And she Sat lhefe, and she held my hands and listened to me talk to her.
I never felt more understood than in that moment when I looked her in the eye and had this conversation with her.
And it was that moment I really wanted to change and be a better person, and be a positive, happy person because I looked at this girl and looked at what she had done for me in such a short time, and knew I want to be like her, and I want to be a positive light in peoples' lives.
I think I have to Cry.
(SINGING) Oh please
Say to me
You'f.~' fer me be your man
And please
Say to me
You'll let me hold your hand
Hi.
I wanna hold your hand
I wanna hold your hand
And when I touch you
I feel happy inside
J't's such a feeling
That my love
I Can? hide
Yeah, you
You got that something
I think yOU'h' understand
H i, sweetie.
When I
Say that something
I wanna hold
Your hand
I wanna hold your hand
I wanna hold your hand
I wanna hold your hand
TRENTON: I transferred to a new school when I was a junior in high school, and I got into the theater department, and I started doing musicals.
The theater department here is like Glee Club because we're a family just like Glee Club is a family.
And all of us are different in some sort of way.
And we all just come together as one.
I actually did wish that l had someone to look up to like Kurt.
I feel like if he were there, like, out, when I was in eighth grade,
I could be like,
"Look at him being gay,
"and he stiff gets to five his dream."
Butnowl'm 19-years-old and I'm all grown up, and I completely accept myself
And I'm a person with no secrets now.
I am open to the world, everyone.
If you ask me if I'm gay,
I am proud to stand up and say that,
"Yes, Trenton Thompson. I am gay!"
And I couldn't do that before.
And now it's like I have no secrets.
So if I write something down and someone finds it, it's like, "You could have just asked."
I'm really not a big fan of my nose, ever since I was really young.
For me it was either this or "Little
One," because I'm really short.
I can't sing, but I can dance.
I was kind of, you know, the weirdo with red hair.
For me it was either this or "Perfectionist,"
Mine says
"Brace Face,"
We're Lebanese and proud.
And proud.
Out and proud to be Lebanese.
And love softball.
I wanted to be like
Rachel in high school.
But instead I joined the Navy, so I'm not on stage.
I am obviously Brittany.
Santana.
We're waiting here for this girl.
She just got into a car accident on the way here.
And she HBS
OUI' UCKEYS.
(SINGING) It doesn't matter if you love him
Or capital H-I-M
(SINGING) My mama told me when I was young
We are ah' born superstars
She rolled my hair
Put my lipstick on
In the glass of her boudofr
(SINGING) There's nothing wrong with loving who you are
She said 'Cause he made you perfect, babe
So hold your head up, girl
And you'll go far
Listen to me when I say
I'm beautiful in my way
'Cause God makes no mistakes
I'm on the right track, baby
I was born this way
Don't hide yourself in regret
Just love yourself and you're set
I'm on the right track, baby
I was born this way
Don't be a drag, just be a queen
Whether you're broke or evergreen
You're black, white, beige, chola descent You're Lebanese, you're Orient
Whether life's disabilities left you outcast, bullied, or teased
Rejoice and love yourself today
'Cause, baby, you were born this way
No matter black, white or beige Chola or Orient-made
I'm on the right track, baby
I was born to be brave
I'm beautiful in my way
'Cause God makes no mistakes
I'm on the right track, baby
I was born this way
Don't hide yourself in regret
Just love yourself and you're set
I'm on the right track, baby
I was born this way
There ain't no other way
Baby, I was born this way
Baby, I was born this way
There ain't no other way
Baby, I was born this way
Right track, baby
I was born this way
I was born this way hey
I was born this way, hey
I'm on the right track, baby
I was born this way, hey
I was born this way hey
I was born this way, hey
I'm on the right track, baby
I was born this way, hey
(slNGING> G/ee
(SINGING) Glee, Glee
Did they really make US do that?
Did we really do that?
That was too easy.
I think that everyone can see themselves in the cast of Glee.
I think it's really cool that people are able to peel back the layers to find something that was already there inside of them.
Glee is like my medicine.
It makes me happy.
It puts me in a good place.
It can be VSU/ difficult with Asperger's because we have major social anxiety.
I wouldn't even really go to concerts or anything.
I was very much a homebody.
I didn? even go to schoof.
Glee is the reason Igor out the door that first day, and went to my first crass.
TRENTON: One thing I did learn is to be proud of yourself
Don't be afraid.
Stand up for what you believe in.
For me, I'm small, so that's my challenge.
Glee helps you realize that everyone goes through their own struggles.
You've got to notice the little people in life.
(SINGING) You may think that I'm a zero
But, hey, everyone you wanna be probably started off like me
You may think that I'm a freakshow
/dOI7' [Cafe
But, hey, give it just a little time
I bet you're gonna change your mind
All of the dirt
You've been throwin' my way ff 6ff?'f SO hafd to fake
Thats r/gm
'Cause I know one day
You'll be SCl'63mfl1' my HEITIS
And /'u jus: /ook awe y
Thats r/gm
Just go ahead and hate on me
And run your mouth
So everyone can hear
Hit me with the words you got and knock me down
Baby, I don't care
Keep it up And soon enough you'll figure out
You wanna be
You wanna be
A loser like me
A loser like me
(SINGING) Push me up against the locker
And, hey, an 1 do is snake fr off
I'll get you back when I'm your boss
I'm not thinkin'
'bout you haters
'Cause, hey,
I could be a superstar
I'll see you when you wash my car
All of the dirt
You've been throwin' my way ff 6ff?'f SO hafd to fake
Thats r/gm
'Cause I know one day
You'll be SCl'63mfl1' my HEITIS
And /'u jus: /ook awe y
Thats r/gm
Just go ahead and hate on me
And run your mouth
So everyone can hear
Hit me with the worst you got and knock me down
Baby, I don't care
Keep it up And soon enough you'll figure out
You wanna be
You wanna be
A loser like me
Just go ahead and hate on me and run your mouth
So everyone can hear
Hit me with the worst you got and knock me down
Baby, I don't care
Keep it up And soon enough you'll figure out
You wanna be
You wanna be
A loser like me
A loser like me
Like they say on the show, they are all losers, well, we're all losers, too.
All these different lifestyles can actually come together.
A loser like me
A loser like me
It gives a story to the people who don't have voice.
And everyone always underestimates the nerds.
But the nerds have the power, right?
Nerds!
FINN: Thank you so much for coming out.
RACHEL: Thank you, guys, so much.
I mean, everything that the characters go through, il's really nice to see that and have it be related lo a song.
And so, it's like a playlist of my life.
Just S small town gif/
Livin' in a lonely World
She took the midnight train goin' anywhere
Just a city boy
BON] and raised in south Detroit
He took the midnight train goin' anywhere
A singer in a smoky room
A smell of wine and cheap perfume
For a smile they can share the night
It goes on and on and on and on
Strangers waiting
Up and down the boulevard
Their shadows
Searching in the night
Streetlight people
Living just to find emotion
Hiding somewhere m me nigh:
Don't stop
(slNGING) can
Anybody
Find me
Somebody to
Love
(SINGING) Each morning
I get up I die a little
Can barely stand on my feet
Take 3.YOOK
Take a look in the mirror and cry At yourself in the mirror
Lord, what you're doing to me
I have spent all my years believing you
But I just can't get no relief Lord
Somebody, oh, somebody
Somebody, somebody
Can anybody find me
Somebody to love
Got no feel
I got no rhythm
I just keep losing my beat
I'm okay
I'm all right
I am? gonna face no defeat
I just gotta get out of this prison cell
Someday I'm gonna be free, Lord
Find me somebody to love
Somebody, somebody
Somebody, somebody
Oh find me, find me
Find me somebody to love
Can anybody find me
Somebody to
Love
Somebody find me
Somebody to love
Somebody find me
Oh, somebody find me
Somebody love
Somebody, somebody
Find me
Somebody, somebody
To.fo ve
To lo ve
(SINGING) Turn off the lights We're gonna lose our minds tonight
What's the dealio?
I love when it's all too much
5:00 a_m_ turn the radio up
Where 's the rock and rofl?
Party crasher
Penny snatcher
Ca! me up if you a gangsta
Don't be fancy
Just get dancey
Why So serious?
So raise your glass if you are wrong In all the right ways
All my underdogs
We wil/ never be, never be
Anything but loud
And nitty gritty
Dirty little freaks
Won't you come on and come on And raise your glass
Just come on and come on
And raise your glass
So if you're too school for cool
And you're treated
Hke a foo!
You can choose to fer it go
We can always
We can always
Party on our own
So raise your
So raise your glass if you are wrong In all the right ways
All my underdogs
We wil/ never be, never be
Anything but loud and nitty gritty
Dirty little freaks
Won't you come on and come on and raise your glass
Just come on and come on and raise your glass
For me
English- US - PSDH
Wow Dimple!
What wow? Can't see any cleavage!
There has to be some to see some.
Look after your lemons, you might just lose them.
Look Preeti's is here, wear your blouse at least.
Bossing, me in my own house. put it on l am ready guys
You delay, us always.
Move aside my phone is ringing
Sunny!
You will say ' l love you' a hundred times if you see me today. l am looking Red hot.
Puchki delayed us.
Have you arrived? We are just leaving.
Let's go.
Sunny has been waiting for so long to see me.
Lets go.
Bye mummy
Have you taken your cellphone l phone mummy...
Fine then, l phone me.
And listen, go to the ladies' night and come straight back by 12 o' clock or else your dad won't open the door.
Bye!
- Bye!
Bye aunty, bye aunty
- Bye girls
Help me guys come on hurry up
Hi, Sunny!
- hurry
Nice bike Sunny.
Hang on to this.
- lf you are ever free from Dimple...
...then we'd like a ride too. ls it a cab that he gives everyone a ride?
Find your own biker. lf mom calls tell her l am with Preeti, not like last time when you said l was unwell and dad arrived with an ambulance.
Yes ma'am
Wait for me at the banquet hall.
Don't stress.
- Ok bye.
Ok bye.
Bye.
Take your helmet off.
- Come on we are late.
Bye Sunny!
What's in discos and clubs,
Nothing in bars and pubs
What's in discos and clubs,
Nothing in bars and pubs l want to go where.
My bundle ofjoy's there.
My bundle ofjoy
You are my pretty little face
My bundle ofjoy
Café's and Starbucks, are dull
Limos and trucks are no fun
Café's and Starbucks, are dull
Limos and trucks are no fun l want to go where,
You will be there
My bundle ofjoy
My bundle ofjoy
You are my pretty little face
My bundle ofjoy l miss you every day,
You ditch me every way, lt's always a bitch, l miss you every day,
You ditch me every way, l miss you every day, make a plan, then you ditch.
Not fair, not fair, it's just not fair
Oh look at you, so cute
Especially when you brood
My bundle ofjoy
My bundle ofjoy
You are my pretty little face
My bundle ofjoy
On your sweet sexy Punjabi face. lt's so cute to ogle at your Gucci goggle
On your sweet sexy Punjabi face. lt's so cute to ogle at your Gucci goggle
Like in a large lassi pot fell very small vodka shot, shot, shot.
Hearing all your praises
My ego races and races.
My bundle ofjoy
My bundle ofjoy
You are my pretty little face
My bundle ofjoy
Hello uncle
- l have told her so many times.
Uncle, there's a lot of weight here,
Let me put her down first then, you can scold me. l think she can answer your questions only in the morning.
Who are you?
Sunny. Boyfriend. l am a trainer at the
Power house gym. GK branch.
Dimple and l met there.
Upstairs would be better?
Aunty
You are a body builder, right?
So body builder, now tell me, what did you do to my daughter?
Had l done something l wouldn't have brought her back in one piece.
Out here they are killed and stuffed into an oven. l respect you a lot Sir,
Dimple has told me everything about you, self-made man...
To start from a garage...
...and establish such a huge property empire is no joke. l wanted to meet you myself, but not like this.
With a presentation of a plan for a chain of All-lndia Gymnasiums... anyway not now, you must be tired. l'll make an appointment and meet you later. l am your daughter's boyfriend. l won't do anything wrong.
Trust me.
Should l park the car inside?
How will you go home?
Bus, auto, l'll take anything, l left my bike at the gym.
Take the car and bring it back in the morning, but don't get even a scratch on it. l won't get a scratch on it,
Not on the car nor on your daughter.
Good night Sir, aunty...
Good night, son l had to brush four times to get rid of the Vodka smell.
What if papa had caught me? And you?
Walked out making a good impression, and making me look like a fool.
Couldn't you stop me when l was chugging the shot?
What happened? Why did we stop?
Should l get off?
What're you doing Sunny?
What're you doing Sunny?
Where you going Sunny?
Bloody murderers, finished off my mother and father, you will rot in this house.
Why are you throwing stones?
Broken all the panes, you die...
Shut up, you bitch,
Netarpal! Netarpal! Oye, Rawat!
Catch him, don't let him go.
Run Sunny Run
Start the bike, go go go...
Where are you running? Stop.
Sorry.
Sunny, tell me the full story.
You've lost 3 kilos, you deserve a chocolate. l am leaving.
- Listen...
You have enough problems of your own, why do you want to hear mine? you call me your girlfriend, can't even share your problems with your girlfriend?
That house is mine
Yours?
My grandfather built it, papa was born there... when my grandfather got transferred, he put the house up for rent.
And when he came back those Mother... those MFs did not leave the house.
My grandfather filed a case.
Fighting the case, he died first then my father and then mother, along went the entire bank balance.
After three deaths the court ruled in favour of the tenants under the Rent Control Act of 1947.
Now, they pay only 1,500 rupees rent for such a big house and l pay a property tax of 60 thousand every year and if l don't pay up then l get an arrest warrant. l am sorry, l didn't mean to grumble.
Your pain, my pain
No, you look best laughing.
Don't get involved in my tears.
We will all laugh together, and make those MFs cry.
How?
Good evening Dimple ma'am
Papa help, there is big crisis.
Dimple? Mr. Kamal is here.
Uncleji, can you step out please?
Mr. Chaddha, what's this nonsense?
2 minutes please
Not nonsense! l am Dimple Chaddha.
This shop is named after me. l am telling you politely to wait outside, once our meeting is done then, you can have your's.
OK? Happy? Out!
Papa, help us.
Us? Means?
- Me and Sunny. Ours.
Get Sunny back his bungalow.
Sunny has a bungalow?
Yes, on Barakhamba Road.
Sunny owns a bungalow on Barakhamba Road?
Where do you think you are entering?
Throw this out
Throw this out as well
Take this, break this, come on.
Uncle can l have a look inside?
Of course, it's your bungalow, you are the landlord.
You are the king.
Dimple!
- Yes mom?
No issues, have a good look. lt's a proper bungalow.
Nice, isn't it? lt's cute. lt has an old world charm.
Come up stairs, there's more.
Ya lets go
From where?
- Come from here.
We are going upstairs.
Papa made this map himself.
He was born in this room.
Papa Sunny's father was born here, it's so exciting isn't it?
But the condition of the house is not very exciting.
That's not the point uncle. l am sure, Papa and Papa's papa are both thanking you from there you made it possible for his son and his grandson to stand here.
Son's son.
You won't be standing for long. lt's best you sell this while the market is still piping hot,
No uncle this house has an emotional value.
Two crores, it will fetch, just like that.
With a constantly leaking roof, these seeping walls, you will always need security here.
How will you manage on your salary?
Sell it.
Buy a 4 BHK flat for
1 crore in a suburb
Either in Gurgaon or Greater Noida. and with the rest start a gym.
You can't be a trainer all your life, can you? lsn't it a plan?
Pamme, get the bag...
Now where will you run around selling-buying?
Fine this will be on my own head.
No l can't trouble you.
Dimple's problem, my problem.
20 Lakhs advance, rest 180, after the deal is done.
Done?
Done?
Done.
Superb!!
Will you keep staring at the cash or will you hug me?
Not her, me!
Bye, Sunny
You don't care if it's a friend or an enemy.
You've taken his 8 crore house forjust 2 crores!
He is our Dimple's boyfriend!
So he's not going to be a boyfriend forever...
Papa! l mean, soon he will become the son-in-law... and everything will be his... right Dimple?
What is this nonsense, Sharma? lt's not nonsense, it's a warrant.
You entered my house and beat up my people.
Arrest him.
You say it's yours and l should believe you?
Mr. Sharma l've bought it, legally, from Sunny Singh.
An advance has been paid, the entire paper work is ready, l even have the original map made by poor Sunny's dad.
Only the registration is left.
- Registration is not possible.
Why is not possible? - Not possible because, a family feud...
...has been going on since my father's death.
A stay order has been imposed on that house. lf you have a map l have the original documents for this property. l don't see any Sunny Singh in these. l think he's tucked you up.
Listen carefully.
- Yes sir.
Call Surti...
Tell him before sunset my bail should be done before sunset. lf l have to spend even one night in jail, believe me l'll have everyone buried in this market itself.
Papa, where are you going?
Papa what happened ? Sharma Uncle?
The Urban Ministry's secretary happens top be my brother-in-law.
He'll usurp my bungalow.
- Put him in there...
Papa, don't be scared, l'll be there with Mummy and Sunny lf you meet Sunny again l'll break your legs. No meeting Sunny.
Let's go Sharma.
Why Papa?
No he was Anup's substitute.
He was to leave on Friday, but he left three days early.
But Anup will be back on Friday.
But it looks like
Sunny really suited you.
You're looking fit.
What're you scared of?
Why don't you give your papa, that picture of Sunny, you took?
Dad will kill me if l even step in front of him.
Thank God he got out on bail today, or else it would be my neck. l am sure even your dad wants his 20 Lakhs back right?
Give it. Your dad will find him.
He's not going to get us married even if he finds Sunny.
Papa is going to kill him in the centre of the market.
Now a Sunny-Dimple match is impossible.
You're impossible.
Still dreaming of Sunny. lt's Papa's fault as well.
Sunny hatched a clever plan...
...but Papa should have been a bit smart too.
Why was he duped? l love him Gurmi.
You are crazy Dimple...
At times, one has to lose to win, and that player is
'The Ultimate Winner'
Beware oh ladies l am wicked.
Oh ladies l do my misdeeds...
Oh ladies.
You like it or not
Here l come. l steal your hearts
What can be done?
Can't help my self ladies?
Can't help my self ladies?
That's just my way!
Can't help my self ladies?
That's just my way! l can't help myself!
My bio-data is twisted
Penned with lipstick. l want to be debited in every ladies bank account.
Oh Yes oh yes oh yes l bow thee my head.
Then l steal your heart
That's my bet.
Can't help my self ladies.
Can't help my self ladies
That's just my way!
Can't help my self ladies.
That's just my way! l can't help myself! l steal the shadow from your eye
So smooth am l. l enter like a breeze
And exit like a storm
Hey guys, that's just my form. l can open every vault. l am very well known.
Then l steal your heart.
Ladies that's not my fault.
Can't help my self ladies.
Can't help my self ladies
That's just my way!
Can't help my self ladies
That's just my way! l can't help myself!
Fifty printers for seventy five lakhs!
We had orders to get the best.
Of course you had to get the best.
Best at the right price!
Did someone put a gun to your head to get it at the seller's price?
You are the buyer, you fix the price. Buyer is king. l am sorry Raina. - l can't take the blame for every mistake.
The bosses will punish the culprit.
So be ready to be fired. lf you speak to him, he won't fire us
Please cry in your cubicle not here. OK?
Listen everyone market is tough,
'Smart ones stay, ldiots sent away'
Smart or idiot you choose.
The rest is all good...thanks.
Sir, yes Sir, coming Sir.
Fire the interior designer.
Sir.
- He has left such a huge blank space. l want Hussain's horses on this wall.
At any cost.
You have an impressive reputation,
Raina Parulekar.
You can make the impossible, possible...
So will there be a Hussain on the wall on the inauguration day?
Yes Sir.
Yes, Nikhil Sir.
- What about the Hussain?
Oh, they are quoting 5 crores
That's too expensive. l know, l am trying other art galleries as well.
OK.
Yes? - Ma'am the painting you asked for will be available next month.
No, no, no, l need it in 72 hours.
- But Ma'am...
What will l do with it after a month?
Put it in my bedroom?
Will an Anjolie Raman do?
No, Anjolie Raman won't do. l need a Hussain. Only a Hussain.
Moron.
Move it, what's going on?
Lady, lady... relax... please... l am honking at the truck, not you, so mind your own business.
The truck is mine and so is the business.
You look like the transport type guy!
Now move it, l am getting late. lt won't move till everything is off-loaded.
Keep honking
Careful! Careful! Careful! lt's not a painting, it's a Hussain.
M. F. Hussain. lt's a masterpiece.
Do you know how much it's worth? lf something happens to it then...
Carefully
- Yes Sir.
Just be careful! Easy does it!
One second. How much is it?
Five bucks for 100 grams.
Eat in or take away?
Okay, l know it's not peanuts. lt's art, creative and all that, but how much are you selling it for? lt's an exhibition for art lovers.
Over here?
My gallery, lndigo. The opening is this evening. lnvitation. Come over if you are interested in art... lf you want to buy spicy peanuts then the Mithibai
College has the best chutney. ldiot! lndigo... lndigo... lndigo...
Deven ldiot Shah...
Market value Rs. 80 lakhs.
Not for sale!
Why not for sale Mr. Shah?
Why not?
Looking for the price tag?
5 bucks for 100 grams, freshly baked.
Ninety lakhs... Deal?
And l thought you were genuinely interested in art. lt's to decorate the office.
What? l like honest... l hate fake. lt's impossible to buy.
Nothing is impossible.
Honestly. The painting isn't mine to sell. lt's borrowed from the Suri brothers for the exhibition.
Mr. Suri Steel and Power Suri?
- Yes.
Manoj and Maneesh Suri. Joint owners.
Couldn't you have said that earlier?
You wouldn't have been here then.
You would've found someone else to flirt with. l can set up your meeting with the Suris. lf you can convince them, you can have your painting.
And you your commission. lt's a hard-earned commission, no cheating.
Raina Parulekar
Deven Shah...
Call me Dev.
Deven, if possible it would be better to have a meeting with the older brother.
His position is weaker, he will surrender faster.
Surrender! To Raina the tigress...
The meeting should happen tomorrow.
The day after the painting has to be up in office for the opening.
At such short notice, only a phone conversation will be possible.
Phone is good... Bye then...
Sir, l need the financial stats of Suri Power and Steel...
Buying-selling ratios... last quarter...
Forget about the Suri's,
Raina, we are two days away.
Concentrate on the Hussain. l am focused on that sir.
Hello?
- ls this Raina Parulekar?
Yeah. - l am calling from Mr. Manoj
Suri's office, to inform you that
Mr. Suri is not interested in selling his Hussain painting.
Oh, but we are offering more than its market value. l don't know ma'am, it's Mr. Suri's decision. l am just conveying the message. Thank you.
Wait, wait, wait... can you let me talk to him please?
My boss's orders, l have to get that painting.
Please
Okay... only an employee can understand another. l will try...
Hello. Manoj Suri here.
We will not sell that painting.
Hussian is the pride and glory of Suri Steel and Powers.
Hussain is the life of our company.
Mr. Suri, the market value of the painting is Rs.80,00,000.
We are ready to pay 90.
You are ready, l am not.
One crore lt's an insult to Mr. Hussain.
One crore twenty final.
You are insulting me... lt's your younger brother who is going to insult you.
What do you mean by that?
You and me both know that your brother wants to take 51 percent of the shares so he can sideline and eventually oust you.
There's bound to be a spilt in the company and its assets.
Will the Hussain be yours or his?
Who would've thought that one's own brother would deceive them? lf we pay you half in cash, the rest 60 Lakhs by cheque... with receipt, which will officially make the price 60 Lakhs.
Half of which will be your cheating brother's part, making his total 30 lakhs, and your share 90 lakhs. l hope causing him a loss of 90 lakhs will be give you some sort of... how do say it?
Peace... yes it will give some peace.
So, deal?
Yes, but give the lndigo broker, his commission on the full price.
Why should he incur losses in my fight with my brother?
Mr. Manoj Suri... you are a very nice man. l know l know... anyway, take the painting from the gallery, give the boy his commission and also hand him my suitcase with cash in it.
Get the cheque sent to my office by speed post.
Are you sure?
Hand over 60 lakhs in cash to that Dev guy?
He is a sweet simple chap, he won't even open the bag.
Okay, bye.
Yes! Yes! Yes!
Careful, guys please.
Tigress Parulekar, so you made Suri surrender.
Worked that magic. Very nicely done.
There is no such thing as magic.
Honest, hard work.
A cheque for your commission,
-Thank you. and this briefcase for Mr. Suri lt will reach him.
All clear between us?
All clear.
Cheers to Raina!
To Hussain!
Since his death it's become more precious.
Sir Mr. Suri...
Manoj Suri?
- Yes sir.
Please tell me, when are you getting here?
Forget that, first tell me how did you set claims on my Hussain painting?
We never had any deal,
What rumors are you spreading?
Hello...
Call Raina... Now!
Yes sir.
- The painting is not a fake, Sir...
Mr. Suri is confused.
Mr. Suri is the owner of Suri Power and Steel, not a desperate manager level employee who will use cheap tricks to get ahead.
Not a cheap trick, Sir. l only followed your orders.
The orders were to get a genuine painting, not a fake.
How will l justify such a big scam?
Not a scam, Sir... mistake
Really?
And who will prove it's a mistake or a scam? l'll prove it, Sir.
You'd better Raina Parulekar.
You'd better
At times, one has to lose to win, and that player is
'The Ultimate Winner'
Raina Parulekar, someone has conned your company and sold a fake
Hussain painting to you.
How are you feeling?
There is speculation that it's not a con but a scam, and you are involved in it too.
Do l look like a scamster?
Am l a thief? l have a B Tech degree from llT, and an MBA from llM.
Raina don't, let the lawyers handle it.
No, Sir, let me speak. l am an honest employee of
Synergy Communications... l love my job, this company. l will never con my bosses, l've been conned.
A man called Deven
Shah has conned me...
Surely this is not his real name or his first con
For him it was just a way to make a quick buck but for me my honesty, my identity, my commitment, my job, my future all is at stake. l am going to track him down, recover the company's money, get him arrested and prove he is the criminal and l am innocent.
Yeah?
Raina from Mumbai?
Who is this?
Dimple from Delhi.
You have the wrong Raina, l don't know any Dimple...
Parulkar na... Raina Parulkar.
Paru... lekar.
Saw you on the news, got your number from the channel. l have strong feeling the guy who conned you
Conned me too.
Yes Raina
Yes, Deven Shah is Sunny Singh...
Did he also make you his girlfriend and dump you? l am stupid but not that much.
You mean l am stupid? l didn't let it get to that.
But he conned me for 60 lakhs.
Lol! 60! He could only get 20 from me.
You are more stupid than l am.
OK, l am more stupid than you.
OK, listen l am getting another call, l'll call you back.
Hello?
Hello? ls that Raina?
Yes?
Can we talk? l hope you're not in the office?
No l am at home.
Have those horrible people fired you?
Who are you? Questions upon questions,
Where are you calling from?
Lucknow. My name is Saira...
Saira Rashid.
Six months ago a man named lqbal Khan cheated me of 10 lakh rupees. and he disappeared thereafter l'm not sure if lqbal and your painting guy are the same but if you could tell me more...
Saira l am going to send you a photo.
Have a look and then we'll talk. okay?
Hello Raina...
- And Dimple Chadda...
Saira l am Raina, and on the other line is Dimple from Delhi.
Dimple, did lqbal con you as well?
Yes, as Sunny Singh.
Did you get the photo?
Yes, it is lqbal. l took it. lt's useful isn't it?
You are really smart Dimple.
Raina? Did you hear that?
Saira, tell me the truth, did he make you his girlfriend as well? lf you give Saira a chance to speak then she can actually tell us. Tell us, Saira... lmmediately after my graduation l was married off to Adil.
You're married... love marriage?
Arranged.
After three years Adil died in an accident.
His parents are just as nice as he was. l've been with them for the last two years.
So when did you meet Sunny?
While going to my shop in the morning.
Stop stop.
No hell would break lose if you stop.
Hey, don't touch them. l picked them. l missed my bus, You can't enjoy them.
No way.
They look so sweet, but taste like poison.
Ticket!
Pass!
Pass... don't say it, show it.
What happened? Has the pass failed? l left my purse at home.
Show your pass, or buy a ticket. l don't have money, l'll give it you tomorrow. l always take this route.
Madam get a ticket or else get off...
Should l buy one? Ticket? l am already insulted, l don't want to be a beggar now.
Return it tomorrow, l will also take this route.
Hazrat Ganj.
Two for Hazrat Ganj.
Even my business is that side.
Thank you...
Mention not...
One for Hazrat Ganj.
Give it to him please.
And yours?
Take it
She bought it
Thank you!
Mention not!
He had done his research.
From which bus stop, and at what time l take the bus.
Which area the shop is in, what time it opens, everything.
By buying of the ticket, and the thank you the mention not he got familiar with me, and soon reached our lane.
Hey listen,
Shambhu take the payments.
Hey Mr. Suitcase?
Blue shirt?
My mind had glazed over, l smiled and led him right into the shop.
Royal Cloth Merchant. Our shop's name.
My name is lqbal l am Saira.
What's the rate?
Rupees 450 a meter.
He even chose the right time to enter the shop,
Greetings.
- Greetings. he knew my father-in-law brings lunch at that time. - Greetings.
Just as father entered, he began showing off his knowledge about fabrics.
Khan, lqbal Khan. lt took him hardly ten minutes to have my father wrapped around his finger.
Tie-dye is popular here?
Yes. There's an entire colony for the tie-dye.
Which way would that colony be?
Which way would that colony be? lt's through the by lanes, you'll get lost if go on your own. l would've shown you had the property tax guy not been coming.
Saira why don't you show him?
Me?
Ya go ahead. l'll manage here.
OK.
While he was showing his fake sympathy and kindness, l was melting like an idiot.
Cold drink? lce cream?
Shall l show you something?
Allah... the Pandora's box is opening today.
What is this?
Real intricate threadwork Zardozi. l've never seen such intricate work before.
We have our own workshop in Bareli, traditional weavers.
As there are no sales in smaller towns, my friends said that
Lucknow would be the right place.
Now the dealers here show interest but not cash. l am almost through with the money l had.
Back home my mother and both my sisters are worried. l'd better head back home. lsn't it exquisite?
What are you quoting for this?
400 rupees a meter
No one is ready to pay even 400. Such swindlers!
And they will sell it for a 1,000.
Your losses won't be a profit to us!
But 400 is too low my friend. l'll give you 500 rupees a meter
And l'll place an order for 5,000 meters.
10 lakhs advance... and the balance of 15 lakhs on delivery.
Agreed?
Poor father, he struck the deal blindly for me.
Hoping that this friendship would turn into a relationship, and end my loneliness.
Have some sweets to celebrate.
Wow
The following day father gave him 10 lakhs, cash.
He promised to return in two weeks time.
Wring the Zardozi
Saree around his neck and hang him in the city centre.
That's provided we find him.
You guys have his photo why don't you inform the police? lf he gets to know the police are looking for him he will go underground, and we will never get our money.
No police.
Look, l have a plan.
Everything will be possible if we join forces.
Why don't both of you come down? lt's impossible for me.
Papa has imposed various bans on me.
Fine then sit in your homes, and let more Sunnys and lqbals make fools out of you.
Bye.
Go lt has been bothering me too.
But then l didn't say anything thinking about Adil. l was wrong...
But even if Adil is not here anymore... you are.
No, you are not going on any trip.
Gurmi, Puchki, Choti are all going.
Well no bodybuilder in their house has swindled them of 20 lakhs. lf l have done something wrong once it doesn't mean l'll be doing it all my life.
Even you have made many mistakes.
Weren't you conned in the
Bhatia shop deal, for 12 Lakhs?
The Pancholi Bunglaow, the Preet Vihar flats, but did you shut down your property...
...business because of your mistakes?
You've grounded me! l never thought you'd play such a double standard game with me Papa.
Let her go.
Dimpy, will you travel business class or economy?
Raina!
Dimple?
Come on, l've been waiting for so long.
But l was right here.
But you didn't come in front of me...
Okay, sorry.
Nice glares...
Aren't they?
Are you still in mourning for Sunny?
No.
So why black-black? l like black. l like colour...
Suits you.
Saira's flight arrived before yours.
She hasn't even switched on her phone yet. l am Saira
You run a shop?
Yes Dimple.
Hello Raina
Hello
Let's go.
How did you guess l was Dimple?
You're very special, people know you instantly.
Okay so how will we get our money from Sunny?
From lqbal
Dev, lqbal, Sunny whatever from that Bloody Scoundrel... ldea. His name will be Bloody Scoundrel to avoid any confusion.
To extract money from the Bloody Scoundrel we will con that con.
Con what con?
Con means to cheat.
He cheated us, now we will cheat him.
We will plant a bait in front of him.
Our bait will pretend that she has a great investment proposal to multiply money.
Bloody Scoundrel will invest his money in that, and through our bait we will get our money back.
Simple.
Simple? Who will be 'The Bait'?
There is one. l have someone in mind.
Through the thorns, pluck the roses snip the dreams, from the tree of snoozes.
Through the thorns, pluck the roses snip the dreams, from the tree of snoozes.
Many a tales, of hopes to look. pick any story, and leave the book.
Faded are the colors of life, follow your heart all the way through, till it changes your point of view.
Let out your passion
Let out your passion
Let out your passion
Pat a little... awaken your lazy dreams. lt's your play...
Fight through the difficult way.
What will be, will be
Don't worry you will see.
Restrain, not your dreams ride the waves of destiny
Just sail out your boat and go,
Even your stars will shine and glow.
Let out your passion
Let out your passion
Let out your passion
Cabinets up, cabinets down.
Cabinets down, cabinets up.
Lots and lots of cabinets.
Everything in its cabinet, in its place.
After chasing targets in the office all day, you don't want to chase the boxes of rice and curry at home?
Perfect modular kitchen for a perfect professional couple.
Sir, you just need to choose the color, our engineers will fit every piece.
They can even cook if you want them to...
...but l can't guarantee the taste.
Like l said,
HomeTown makes life easier.
When you get promoted please invite me to dinner.
Sudesh will help you...
Please pay at the counter,
Thank you.
Hello...
Raina Ma'am...
- Hey... wow, you are glowing... l know, l know... the sensex must have gone up like a rocket.
How much profit have you booked for?
Celebrating again?
We've just received exquisite wine glasses from Venice.
Hand blown glass... what a finish... even lndian wine tastes like French in it.
No, lshika, l don't need...
No no, you can't repeat glasses from the last party.
What will your guests think?
Raina is such a miser!
Ohh, l'm so sorry, Your friends?
Hi, l am lshika and you are...?
Saira...
Dimple Chaddha...
Dimple Dude l have just the right thing for you...
Ma'am l will just attend to her, and then the glasses
Peeler, slicer, chopper, masher
- all in one. Cool, isn't it?
Very cool, but what are you going to do with it?
Me?
Me?
You were right, she is awesome.
Bloody chameleon.
Return seven rupees.
No change, if you guys get so petty then...
You guys means?
My money hangs off tress?
Hey, lshika!
Raina Ma'am, get out.
Will you keep eating... say something
Coffee please.
Yes Ma'am.
Frankly l am not surprised. lt's so easy to con you guys, check out the bills from yesterday.
We bought it only to check you out.
Fine agreed about yesterday, l con Raina every week, and you get conned.
Till yesterday we were Ma'am and today we are first names? lf we work together we will be equals right, then why ma'am?
So are you doing it? lf l do it... how much time will it take?
A month or two.
No way, l've finished my paid leave.
To do this l'll have to take time off. l get paid 30 thousand a month.
Five lakhs... your fee, and all expenses paid.
What if he is a psycho-rapist?
He is not a rapist... actually he is very nice.
He is only interested in money.
Cold calculated unemotional...
What pain his con causes is no concern to him. l am doing my job well... getting paid well, no one to check on me... con a con?
Let it be... Excuse me.
- Fine... l will do it...
Yes let's show that scoundrel what pain means.
But how will we find the scoundrel?
That you leave to Raina!
This number is issued to
Anjum Rizwi not Sunny Singh.
Delhi, prepaid, March last year...
Check this... Lucknow... October...
Parampal Yadav... not lqbal Khan... prepaid.
And this one.
Prepaid. Mumbai.
October.
Rahul Khanna.
Hopeless, they are all different names, how can we find him like this?
Patience my sweety.
You're Bournvita...
Okay, now the three numbers have the same caller tune...
At times, one has to lose to win, and that player is
'The Ultimate Winner' so what?
Most people choose songs... very few ring tones have dialogues.
Now you get a list of all prepaid numbers with this caller tune.
Let's see how ultimate a winner you are.
Raina Ma'am you are wicked!
Ladies, wake up.
Here is your list, it has seven names.
All the best, l hope in the
Ladies vs. Bloody Scoundrel, the Scoundrel loses and the ladies win.
Thank you bye-bye.
Ready?
Bismillah.
Amandeep Chandigarh. 9915682870 lt's ringing...
Hello?
Amandeep you're a guy or a girl?
You're an aunty or an uncle?
Your dad's the uncle!
- Dimple
No speaking. Just listen.
Takes all sorts
Next.
Hello? Who is it? (in Gujarati)
Shailen Sharma Bilaspur
Has the consignment arrived?
Diego Vaz. Goa. l'll do it, she can't even dial.
Never gets through.
So what? You didn't get through the first time either.
Next
Where are you hiding Scoundrel?
The fourth guy Dimple called is calling back.
Diego Vaz.
Hello?
Hello?
Hello?
The Bloody Scoundrel is in Goa!
This is your planning?
Had we told Papa, he would've booked us into a five-star hotel.
Miss Dimple, l wish your papa had financed this entire operation.
We would've stayed in a five-star hotel, hired a Mercedes, thank you.
But l'm very sorry, this is all l could manage with my small savings. lshika's fee, food, transport, everyone's tickets, chips, cold drinks.
But it's not an obligation, right, once we get money from that
Bloody Scoundrel? - Volume!
When we get the money from Bloody Scoundrel, you will take your cut first and then give us ours, right? lf we get and when we get... and what if we don't?
Don't be negative. lt's going to be fine.
God willing.
Wow... what a great bed.
The two of us can fit in easily.
That room.
Why? Aren't we roomies?
Sweetie, first you stop snoring then you and l can be roomies.
Till then, Saira and l are here.
Okay, rules:
This is my friend
Sasha's house, not a hotel.
We have to leave it in a better condition than it is now.
The maid comes in the morning to clean, but no one says anything in front of her.
The rest of the work will be divided equally between us.
Why didn't you specify earlier that we'd have to be maids as well?
Change the SlM card.
Don't even know how to change a card.
That's why you're still a Manager and not General Manager.
At times, one has to lose to win, and that player is
'The Ultimate Winner'
Ya?
Hello, l have a problem with my laptop and l was wondering when l could come by to get it fixed.
Wrong number.
Hello, hello Ashley...
Ashley Rodriguez? l am not Ashley Rodriguez ... l am Diego Vaz.
But my friend gave me this number and told me you're very good with computers.
You live in Cavelossim, right? l don't fix computers, ma'am... l work at the water sports shack at The Pallazzo. lf you'd like to...
Let's go...
What a body.
Oh, excuse me.
Yes, ma'am? - Can you give me a dry towel, Mr. Shankar?
Sure, ma'am.
- Thank you.
Come on, come on, come on. Keys! The keys.
Let's go, let's go...
Dimple you can drive, right?
Drive? l'll fly.
- open it.
He seems lonely, not even a soul to share a meal with him.
How do we know there is no one?
No!
He's never getting into that trap.
So then what is he is doing here alone with all our money?
Looking for another victim l guess... had he found one he wouldn't have been in Goa.
Hello lshika.
We found the Scoundrel.
Take the first flight out!
OK.
So the Bloody Scoundrel, operates from The Grand Pallazzo
You will be staying there as well.
The story is, you're the daughter of Himesh Bhai,
...the owner of King
Motels and Resorts, USA. - Me? lshika Patel...
American citizen...
Fake one... we aren't really taking you to America.
This is their website.
Real website?
- No, we've made it.
Himesh Bhai fake, lshika fake,
Kings Motel and Resorts fake...
But if you Google it, a genuine-looking website will come up. lmpressive homework!
So Himesh Bhai... and family... billionaire American citizens...
Your father Himesh
Bhai is the US Motel King.
Owner of 240 motels and 60 resorts,
You have three brothers, all older, you're the only and the youngest daughter.
You're in Goa to set up your own business.
Welcome Ma'am.
- Thank you.
Have a pleasant stay.
Thank you.
- Welcome Ma'am.
Thank you Ma'am.
A man named Shankar works here ... at the bell desk.
Yes, Ma'am...
A friend of mine stayed here last month and Shankar helped her a lot, can you send Shankar please? l can help, Ma'am... he is Shankar, l am Bhola... what do you want Ma'am? lce, hash, sugar, grass?
Shankar!
OK, Ma'am.
Thank you.
This is like a 2BHK flat.
My feet hurt.
The Alps... and complimentary!!! lshika Patel, Patel... l feel good...
52 inch...
Yes?
- Hello, Ma'am , l'm Shankar... you asked for me?
Right.
Shankar
- Thank you Ma'am. l need a list of all the property dealers in Goa, the best and most reliable.
- Yes Ma'am.
The ones who deal for less than a crore rupees, don't bother including them. lt will be a waste of time.
Will get it done... the list will be better if l know what kind of property you are looking for... flat, bungalow, office, show room?
For a restaurant. My restaurant. l need land for that.
My card,
- Thank you Ma'am. sorry my dad's card.
Here this is mine.
- Thank you Ma'am.
Call me on my lndian number once the list is ready.
OK, Ma'am
- OK?
Now get to work.
Thank you very much, ma'am, thank you very much, have a nice day, ma'am.
You too...
Boss... l found a huge fish. lshika Patel.
Excuse me one minute.
What're you doing? l'm going to use this.
One minute, l will not take long, l will not take long.
- OK... where's the manager?
He was checking lshika's dad's website.
He's hooked. lshika...
Wohoo...
- Hello, Ma'am, this is the property dealer's list you asked for.
Oh, you got them?
- Yes, Ma'am.
Superb...
- Ya, thank you. - Thank you, Shankar,
My pleasure, Ma'am, and this is your ride, Ma'am. l like it.
- Ya - l love the colour. - Ya...
Please Ma'am.
- Thank you.
Have a nice day, Ma'am.
- Thank you.
He's still not here... where is he?
He's just been watching for three days.
Why isn't he attacking?
Do you think he has suspected something?
When will he stop looking so handsome?
All his luxury is thanks to all our money.
Don't worry, won't last too long.
Single malt... double.
Sure Sir.
Yes
- Bill our drinks to this.
OK.
Jerks
Settle my tab please.
Sure Ma'am.
- Thank you.
Ma'am, your card is blocked.
- What?
How can it be blocked?
Hello... yeah my card number is 4541 9823 3318 0680.
How can it be blocked you block-head?! unblock it unblock it now!
Twenty four hours!
What will l do without my card for 24 hours?
You know l will sue you for this... Raina!
He is not even looking at me.
Drunkard's just chugging it down. l am paying cash and leaving.
Okay Bye.
Hi, so l'm just going to pay you by cash, how much was it? lt's ok ma'am your bill has been settled by your friend
Which friend?
Excuse me! since when have you become my friend?
Since the white shirt and blue jeans became your enemy.
Listen l don't have time for this...
So just tell me how much you paid for my bill
Blue and white paid, not me.
Bartender said you... l pointed to the blue and white's card, the bartender was so hassled he didn't notice whose card had l pointed to.
He presumed it was mine. Simple.
Very classy thief!
Classy! Thank you.
Thief?
He misbehaved with you, l punished him.
That's no theft
That is theft.
Feeling guilty? Then apologise to him.
But if you want to thank me for punishing
Him, then there's a better bar in Colva.
Now l get it. l've known guys to pay the bill and flirt, but dude without paying!
Excellent.
But l am not in Goa to party or see cheap tricks from hunks like you.
Try it on someone else.
Excuse me
- Ya?
Sorry but there's been some confusion, can you pay the guy whose card was used, l think they're over there... ls he is a ghost that he just vanished? lf she gives so much attitude, he will vanish. lt was a perfect plan lshika, you ruined it.
He was convinced that you are a damsel in distress.
Damsel in distress!
No one gives a second glance to damsels these days. l can't play a damsel.
We've hired you! You have to play according to our rules.
Miss director, l am the one who has to deal with him face to face.
You can't press a remote and have fun. l am not an actress, l have to play it my way.
What if he were to catch me acting, then?
The partnership idea has to be sold to him, l'll sell it. l've never let you go empty handed from the mall, have l?
Ok but now we have to think of a new move.
Don't worry the next move will be made by him.
With hearty compliments from Mr. Vikram Thapar.
Vikram who?
- Mr. Thapar, Goa's beach king.
Out of all the water sporting between Varca to Anjuna at least a dozen are owned by him. lncluding the one at our hotel.
You met him last night at the bar.
That's Vikram Thapar?
Yes ma'am. lnteresting name.
- lnteresting man. lf you want to thank him, then you can find him at the beach.
Have a nice day ma'am.
- Thank you.
This is finished.
How will we run the business if he does this?
Tell him.
Grease.
Mr. Beach King, credit card trick didn't work so you sent flowers?
They always work... here you are
So l was right.
Last night's drama was to attract me.
You are so attractive what could l do?
Thank you... for the flowers. ls it from your own money or stolen cash?
Did they smell nice?
So how does it matter then? l want to go for a ride.
Come, l will take you
- l will drive. lf you are not here to party then what're you doing here?
To prove that l can also set up a business.
Prove to whom?
- To my Father. l told him l wanted to set up a chain of restaurants in lndia, he thought it was stupid.
Do anything in the U.S. but not in lndia.
After numerous fights he has conceded that l first set up the project like land, licences, clearances, staff everything, and then he'll invest five million.
Five million dollars is...
- Twenty five crores
Right.
But do you know how much he's given me for my trip?
Five lakhs including transport, hotel food.
But l'll prove it. l won't leave here till my restaurant is set up, even if it means sleeping on the beaches. l can help you set up your restaurant.
Really?
But why?
Oh lone girl, millionaire dad, trap her, take her money. ls this the plan?
Right! This was my plan.
But you're so clever, you don't need any help.
Goa is waiting for you.
All the honest officers, land owners, cops, collector, ministers.
They will help you honestly.
You have a good evening
Hey... Mr. Beach King!
Want to have a beer? l don't want any favours.
Do you want an equal partnership of sharing,
But profit sharing will be 60-40
You said equal partnership?
My idea, so 60 mine. Agreed?
Okay agreed.
You will also have to invest in the partnership.
Oh.
Obviously.
Why do you think l am letting you be my partner? l'm not going to run away with your money, all the expenses will be transparent and for the yacht party.
Yacht party?
See whenever l go to meet somebody... they don't take me seriously. lf we organise a yacht party, good food, music, wine, invite all the important people in Goa, put photos in the press.
Just see, the phone won't stop ringing.
Entire Goa will help our restaurant.
That's how we promote in the states.
Had l the money, l would've had the party, and started the restaurant by now.
How much will we need for the party?
A crore perhaps.
As soon as dad sanctions his 25 crores, your money will be returned.
So partner or no partner?
Partner.
How much for this?
One can get shoes for 500 rupees here.
And that one?
Which brand?
Mango, Diesel ,
Dolce & Gabbana, Gucci,
What time is it?
Tripping on these Jalapenos
We have to leave now, come on, come on, come on... l'm not done eating...
- We have to leave, he is not going to
Wait for us all day.
What's the rush, is it an American thing?
What happened?
- You have got to be kidding me man...
What're you doing?
Watch out, watch out. What the hell?
No price tag?
We'll put it when we get there.
Ya Gaurav? On our way.
Hey Gaurav what's up?
- You are looking nice.
Come, come, come.
Ok... that's Saira
- Hello
This is Dimple.
- Hi - Hello
Ladies on a mission huh? Come...
Like a fool l rushed here, didn't even pack properly.
All the money is going to the hotel bill. l think l should shift from
Pallazzo to a cheaper one star hotel.
From the money l save, l can buy a dress at least.
You won't be able to handle a one star
So what to do? l don't have a dress for the party.
Let's go shopping!
How sweet...
This is what they are wearing in New York now, like now. lt's lovely.
- Prada!
Beautiful.
Ninety thousand only.
Only!
One dress is not good enough, l mean atleast... l need at least eight, matching foot wear, jewellery, accessories.
Take everything. lt's an investment for our future. l mean business future.
And its backless. lts good.
Now thats nice. lts nice.
Nice couple.
But the boy is short.
Why don't you get heels? l can't believe we have shopped so much.
Sixteen lakhs fifty thousand.
Yes! Yes! Yes!
Mind blowing.
Thank you.
Ohh my God...
Okay okay enough hugging kissing...
Let's get to work.
Phase two!
Can you talk lshika?
Listen yachts are parked at the Madovi Jetty.
One of them is my friend Fardeen's Yacht.
He has explained everything to the captain.
He is all set.
He will ask you for the entire payment in advance.
Then you take over.
The yacht is Brown in colour and called
Freedom. Freedom it is!
So? lncluding food and beverages, and 6pm to midnight will be 20 lakhs in total.
Too much no?
That's 40,000 dollars. ln the US this party will cost at least a 100,000 dollars.
Actually it's a good deal.
Aye aye captain sail the boat.
Full advance payment in cash, then booking, then sailing.
Done.
How much is this? lnvitation card
Oh. Gorgeous.
Here you go.
Ninety rupees ls this the cheapest?
Only mango juice will be cheaper than this.
Forty bottles please.
How much?
20 and 50 l'll take all
A 200 bucks bottle is now worth 90,000.
Thank you
So far we've earned 45 lakhs.
After lshika's fee and all expenses, we are left with 35. lshika Patel you are a genius.
There are at least 8 investors. ln fact we might not need your dad's money anymore.
No. l don't need anymore partners. l am happy with one, whom l can trust completely.
No really, for any business trust is crucial.
Right, trust is crucial.
Oh my god! Vikram.
Once more, once more.
We never had any in our childhood so l go crazy when l see them now.
Papa got us 1 of each firework and, they would be finished in seconds. l would be angry with the fireworks when they finished so soon, wondering , why have they finished?
But why rationing on the fireworks?
Your father could've bought an entire factory right?
Had my father not rationed in the beginning of his business, then how would he have become the Motel King?
Let's go.
Let's go party
Haven't we just been to a party?
That wasn't a party, it was business. lsn't it late? ls someone waiting for you?
Alright Vikram Thapar let's party.
Let's party.
She isn't answering.
Booking was till 12.
Party must have finished long time ago.
Real romance has happened between the calf and the butcher.
Real romance.
Raina, if what she is saying is true, then?
Then my dear, we are screwed.
All night party!
While we've been rotting in that hell-hole, she is living it up in the 5 star.
Partying with Sunny all night. l had to go with him to build his confidence.
What other debaucheries did you do to build his confidence?
Raina, please tell her to shut up. l am not going to shut up.
You are in Goa for us.
We've hired you.
We are footing the bills.
Not for you to hang out with my ex-boyfriend like shameless bitch.
That's enough Dimple.
You are always taking her side.
Dimple, just shut up.
Do you have any idea how worried we've been all night?
Any idea? l am really sorry.
Champagne, beer, yacht, brain got a bit side tracked. l promise it won't happen again. l am on your side.
Now the focus is to defeat the Bloody Scoundrel.
Down with the Bloody Scoundrel.
We haven't even recovered half the amount yet.
We've a long way to go.
Don't ditch lshika. l won't.
Dimple, come on.
Hi, you haven't slept? l want to show you something mind blowing.
OK, let's go l know, even my mind is completely blown.
Wow!!
This land is perfect for the restaurant.
Very nice.
Actually it's perfect.
Let's make it here.
Let's talk to the owner.
Wait, wait, wait partner.
Before we go ahead l want to share a few secrets, after knowing them you might want to break the partnership.
What secret can that be? l'm not breaking the partnership.
You will also have to tell me your secrets. l don't have any secrets.
You can tell me yours.
- l am a conman. l am a thief.
For the last 15 years, l've conned 30 ladies.
You are the 31st.
Friendship, partnership...
...investment in your project has all been for this.
My plan was to run away after fleecing you, but l fell in love with you lshika. l am not lying. l have lied a lot. l've spent my entire life alone, even if l wanted to be friends with someone, l would scold myself and restrain, but since l met my heart won't listen to me.
Do you... love me?
Will you marry me lshika?
He proposed to you?
Liar. Look at her face.
He never proposed to me, why would he propose to her? lt's not a proposal, it's a con silly.
The biggest con of his life.
After marrying her he will have her, her father's, the land's, the restaurant's money in his pocket.
With an investment of 40 lakhs, he plans to hit the billion dollarjackpot.
That's why l was wondering why is he buying her all these dresses and shoes for?
He will marry for money.
Marry him.
No way. Are you crazy?
This is the best way to get the rest of our money.
How?
Her father won't marry her...
...off to a thief like Vikram
Thapar without any security right?
And for that security lshika's father will ask him to buy that land in her name.
Before the wedding.
So will she get married to Sunny?
No, the plot will be bought before the wedding.
We'll sell it immediately after its registration.
Take our money, and get on the first flight home.
Not bad Saira.
Can you clear one matter first, will she or wont she be married to Sunny?
No. lshika will only accept his proposal.
Make him speak to her father.
Right we have to find a papa for her.
Let me figure this out. l'll make tea. l'll leave.
No, let Raina finish her call.
Did he give you flowers?
What?
When he proposed. Ring?
No
Plain?
Kiss?
You guys must have definitely kissed. l am conning him, and he is conning me.
Where did the kiss come from?
Kiss is a bitch. lt creeps up anywhere.
Ok papa sorted. lshika tell him l do, l do, l do.
Before that, let's find out the value of the land. lt's a fair deal ma'am, don't worry.
Owner is settled in Dubai, l have the Power of Attorney. l'll do the formalities.
Final price 90 Lakhs.
No bargaining. Sorry.
Ninety Lakhs.
My gosh!
- Yes, yes.
Really?
Mind-blowing!
Papa call time!
Papa.
Hello Mr. Patel.
Vikram Thapar?
Yes sir, Vikram Thapar.
Let's come straight to the point...
What's the turnover of your water sports business?
Not even 50 Lakhs annually. lshika's shoes almost cost that much!
Sir, honestly l don't have your kind of money, but lshika's happiness is most important to me. l promise to always keep her happy.
My dear a promise has no value.
My dear a promise has no value... bills cannot be paid by promises.
Moreover, how do l know you are not marrying my daughter for her money?
Tell me.
Sir, l love lshika not her money. l can't just believe what you say.
Trust needs proof. lf you want to marry lshika, then buy a land of her choice registered in her name for her restaurant. l'll make the rest of the investment in the restaurant, but if you buy the land then l'll be rest assured that she has some security.
That's my condition.
What happened? Can't give the security? l'll give sir, off course l will.
For lshika l'll do anything...
The butcher becomes the calf. l am telling you, the scoundrel is in love.
He can't love anyone.
He is laying his trap slowly and steadily.
He is getting caught up in it. l am trapped. l've made a promise but l don't have 90 Lakhs. l have only 45 left after the yacht party.
So now?
Had l not met you, l could have conned someone for it easily.
But now l can't do it. l love you... but how will l give your father security? l don't know!
We will have to give the rest of the 45 Lakhs.
Crazy? We've got it with so much difficulty.
With our 45 and his 45, he will buy the plot.
Hopefully when we sell it we will get more than 90, and we'll recover all our money.
Okay lshika, tell him you raised 45 by selling yourjewellery.
Okay?
But Raina, what if he has genuinely fallen in love with me, then? what's going on here?
Love what else? l told you she's a traitor.
He is leading you on.
He can't love anyone.
He loves me... perhaps. lshika waved the magic wand and the scoundrel became a caring, honest lover.
Believe me he has changed. lf you look into his eyes, you will see an honest man.
Enough lshika.
Even l've seen his eyes, when he spoke to my father-in-law about his poor mother...
...and sister and stole our 10 Lakhs. lf you don't want to carry on, it's ok.
But don't mock us. We're stupid and you're clever.
When he vanishes after breaking your heart, that's when you will realise her pain and know that we are your well-wishers, not that rogue.
Raina... the money for Vikram.
Are we crazy to hand over so much money to a thief's girlfriend?
You will run away with it.
Aren't you in love with him? l am. l am in love with him.
But l'm an honest sales girl, not a thief.
Less salary, tough life, but l feel proud when my bosses praise me for my honesty. l wouldn't sell that feeling even for a crore. l won't cheat you.
Trust me. l'll return all your money.
Promise me, no more lies. l love you. l love you.
Owner?
Mr. Abhay Salaskar.
He is settled in Dubai.
Power of Attorney is with me D'Silva.
Buyer? lshika Patel.
Sign please.
Ma'am sign here please.
Hundred percent genuine! lshika
Sorry, and Thank you. lt's okay.
Sorry. Thank you. l can't wait to see his face when he sees us and realises that he has been duped.
But where is the scoundrel?
This is fine. - Hello, hello excuse me, what are you doing here?
Flood control.
Where's the flood? lt's not here now, but it will come after the monsoons.
Who gave you permission?
We are the new owners of this land.
Take our permission.
You? lsn't the owner Abhay Salaskar?
Was. He is in Dubai now. We bought it.
For 90 lakhs.
90! Lakhs!
- Cheap deal isn't it?
What would be its market value now?
3 Lakhs with great difficulty.
This is a swamp. lt's under water for 5 months. What value?
Check the deed, may be there is an extra zero by mistake.
Even 9 Lakhs is too much.
David, Abhay
Salaskar has cheated them.
Ninety Lakhs.
What's your cut?
What?
How much will that scoundrel give you out of the 90? ls it a 50-50 or a 60-40 partnership?
Was it his idea because an idea is worth more, or was it yours?
Shut up Raina.
- You double crossing bitch.
Shut up Raina.
- Liar, thief, bloody scoundrel.
Raina, shut up! lshika...
- Shut up all of you... l did it for you and you are accusing me?
Calling me a thief?
To hell with you.
Raina!
Had lshika cheated us, then why would she come here?
Don't abuse her for your defeat.
The scoundrel has cheated her as well.
First, he bought the land himself, for 3 Lakhs as Abhay Salaskar from Dubai.
Then he gave the Power of Attorney to D'Silva. lshika met D'Silva who quoted 90 lakhs.
Out of which we gave 45 Lakhs.
After signing the deed
D'Silva gave the entire money to Bloody Scoundrel.
Aren't l too good? l had boarded the plane after the security check, but could not take off.
For the first time, it was no fun. l conned girls because l thought it was a game, which l would win. l never stopped to think, that along with cash, what else the girls lost.
Now that l know, the game is no fun. l thought l was superstar Shahrukh Khan, but this time, even though l won, l have lost.
Your money. lts 1 crore
You have straightened this Bloody Scoundrel out. l can't do con jobs anymore, and l know nothing else.
Thanks to you all, l will have to learn honest work. l am not good at saying sorry, so
Hats off boss!
Hats off lf you ever meet lshika, tell her my proposal was real. l really fell in love with her.
But she turned out to be a real player, hats off to her as well.
Abhay Salaskar!
How does he come up with these names?
Sunny and l were dating seriously... and l wondered why isn't he going first base?
First what?
Kissing!
So l thought, l'd take him there. l came on to him in the night club, but he didn't kiss me.
He could have taken advantage, l was ready, but he didn't exploit me.
But he doesn't know how much lshika loves him right?
No, only we know.
No, no, don't do that.
Give this pamphlet to your mother.
HomeTown is offering 25% discount on all sections please do check it out
HomeTown is offering 25% discount on all sections please do check it out
HomeTown is offering 25% discount on all sections please do check it out lshika Patel...
Sorry sir, l think you are looking for another lshika, l am lshika Desai, a small time sales girl, my salary is 25,000 rupees. l am sure l am no good to you.
By the way we have a 25% discount in all the sections please do check it out,
Won't you ask me why l came back?
Not really, l am 22 years old, l have a lot to achieve, a lot to earn. l went off track once and lost out but now l won't make a mistake, l want to mint money.
Not a good plan! l've been there done that. lt's no fun making money on your own.
Let's be partners, same deal 60 yours, 40 mine.
No lies, no cheating.
Your brains, my courage, world's best partnership.
You've conned 31 girls right? l don't want to be 32nd. l will constantly be seeking the truth in your lies. l was telling the truth then, l am telling the truth now.
You were lying then, you are lying now.
You might feign anger but your eyes are saying, clearly, that you are happy to see me here.
That's why we are made for each other, we won't be able to lie to each other, because we will be caught out.
A 100 % true partnership of two liars. lf you are so in love with my lies, then why did you leave me and go? lt was my last con, how could l have lost? lshika Desai, l love you...
Marry me
Straight to marriage, don't you want to test me as a girlfriend or something? l am the No.1 conman, l have checked everything before attacking. wait wait, first tell me your real name.
Bahl,
Ricky Bahl
Ricky!
What kind of name is that? l don't want to marry a Ricky... l want to...
Dimple, don't worry... we'll look for a much better groom for you than Ricky. l don't want him anymore, l just want to go home... to mummy papa.
If there's no drummer, there's no timing.
Can you hear that drummer?
Can you hear the drummer?
Can you hear me?
Yeah.
You can do the right thing, you can do the right thing, but if you do the right thing, even with the right person, for the right reason, but if it's at the wrong time... everything gets jacked up and twisted.
Somebody say timing.
Timing.
Prof had such great timing.
While the hood was going through changes, while America was going through mutations,
Paul Chevalier can tell ya, you could depend on Prof's solid timing.
Conrad Johnson and the Kashmere Stage Band.
We were called
Thunder Soul.
We called him Prof at
Kashmere Senior High School because Prof stands short for Professor.
A Houston-based music teacher turned his high school band into a national sensation.
I got the idea to start a band and build a band out of young people that was equivalent in sound and in appearance to that of the professionals.
He reached into our soul.
He could see the future inside of us.
The Kashmere Stage Band gave the community part of its identity.
It made everybody proud because we were kicking.
Kashmere was just tight.
- We was the bomb.
- It was the lick.
It was the baddest band in the nation.
They made their statement, man.
When the Kashmere Stage band were at their peak, they were as good or better than any funk band in the nation, professional or otherwise.
This is great funk music, and they're high school kids.
Attention, all Kashmere High School students, this is...
Where your uniform?
Uh-huh, I'm not playing.
High school stage band performances often proved to be nothing more than memories, but right here at Kashmere High School in Northeast Houston, a legend was spawned.
He first attended the Houston College for Negros and he later graduated from Wiley College in Marshall, Texas.
37 years of teaching.
He was highlighted as a distinguished band director right here in these very four walls.
You see all these trophies over there?
He put this place on the map.
Mr. Conrad O. Johnson.
Prof, what was the most favorite tune that you arranged?
Favorite tune?
Now you ask me a question.
L-I wrote over 50 tunes and arrangements.
Ended up selling 'em to the other bands that were playing in the contests.
Yes, he did.
They played my tunes against me.
That was something.
I think the most exciting thing about being a band director is introducing to people what a band can do and how well they can do it.
I really enjoyed it, and some of 'em did a bang-up job on it, too man.
- Yeah.
- Yeah.
Where does the feel to play come in?
Well, I would say that the feeling comes... uh, many times from my demanding it.
You have to develop first in his mind that he can do it.
Once he realize that he can play with the same quality of sound that a professional has, then he'll stick with it and he'll strive for that.
But this has to be developed in his mind, and that's the first thing I work for.
I was kind of shy.
I would basically kind of hide behind my instrument.
That's... That's where... where my power was.
I didn't have that thing that would get out and say,
"Okay, I'm here."
I didn't possess that.
So my vehicle for that was the band.
I was zoned to another high school.
It was a predominantly white school where they didn't really have a good stage band, but I just... I couldn't take it anymore.
I just took it upon myself that I was just gonna go to Kashmere.
Everything was going fine, according to plan, until one day the attendance clerk sent for me in the office and said you're not in the zone.
You're not supposed to be going to school here.
I was afraid of being put out of Kashmere and not being able to stay and be in the band, and that's when my dad looked into renting an apartment in the zone.
I kinda got in it for the girls.
But I started liking it and, uh, I actually, you know, started learning how to play.
Bruce was very popular.
At that time, oh, he had all the young ladies.
They were all after him, you know, his talent.
He was the saxophonist, the flutist.
He played everything in the band.
L-I was a little egocentric, I guess, a little arrogant.
I mean, I was
Mr. Baritone Saxophone.
It was just a good time, a good situation.
My senior year, it was... it was fabulous.
I was the joker of the band.
Prof would tell us, "Hey, fellas, don't get the big head.
Whatever you do, don't get the big head."
See, you couldn't help but get the big head.
You was in the Kashmere Stage Band, you got the big head already.
I was this timid, shy girl thatjust wanted to play and make good grades and really not be seen.
I had to stand in front of the saxophone section at the tryouts, and they would say, "Here she is.
"Yeah, turn around, baby.
Oh, she is so pretty. Ooh, Gaila."
You know, I heard all these noises behind me as I'm playing the solo, but I nailed it.
I was in. I was in.
People would make remarks like,
"A girl on a trombone?
A girl playing trombone?
Trombones are for boys."
You know, girls didn't play trombones.
They'd make me wanna play it even more so.
A girl can play it and do the movements and, you know, get down like Prof wanted me to.
I grew up with straight-up thug, you name it.
L-I did some bad stuff.
I used to bum rush everybody.
I didn't care what they had to say.
'Cause I'm... I'm the mo-fo here to get under that man's direction.
That man kept me alive.
He molded me into a whole different expression.
I went over and got all this this stuff here.
I even stole this from Prof.
Back in June of last year, a partner of mine, name of Reginald Rollins, who was also in the Kashmere Stage Band, he and I were talking one day about putting together the original Stage Band members.
We're trying to reunite the Kashmere Stage Band for the first time in over 30 years.
How you gonna be like that?
This is where it all started for us.
Right here in Kashmere.
- Oh, wow.
- Look.
Check it out.
Okay, this is all wrong, we gotta redo this.
Man, I can't believe this.
This room looks smaller for some reason.
- How y'all doing?
- Hey.
- How ya doing?
- Band director?
Adrian Tyler, new band director at Kashmere.
- Tyler, right.
- How you doing?
I spoke with you earlier.
I'm Rollo.
Okay, yeah.
Nice to meet ya.
I'm Craig Baldwin.
I'm gonna start off with four chairs for the trumpets, four for the trombones, four for the saxes.
We got on the phones.
We started making calls and we told 'em what the event was for and that it was for Prof, and immediately, they started pulling out horns, knocking the dust off of 'em.
Blowing out the cobwebs.
Give me a moment.
Let me figure out how to get you here
'cause I definitely need to have you here.
We're gonna do whatever it takes to get back in the shape to pull this event off.
I mean, we got guys coming from all over the United States, uh, California, from the East Coast.
We have guys coming in, actually, from different parts of the world.
Starting to look like something now.
I'm really curious to see:
How are we gonna sound?
The trumpets were standing, so...
I'm putting some chairs back there for 'em but they will be standing.
You know these guys got a little age on 'em now.
You know, they not as spry as they were.
You came into this room with your focus, ready to play.
Do not come in this room late.
Do not talk, do not interrupt.
Do not this, that...
I don't care if it's chewing gum.
You cannot.
And when that man said, "Stand up," everybody stood up in sync.
It was like a military sergeant, but it...
Hey. I'm 50 years old, man.
And I think that that's one of the reasons why I made 50 years old.
It has to be done while Prof is here with us to let him know that what he did wasn't in vain and... and what he did meant a lot to a lot of different people.
We doin' it for the man.
We're doing it for Conrad Johnson.
My whole desire is to train and shape the mind of each individual that I come in contact with from the standpoint of teaching him.
When they first come to me, regardless as to what kind of tone that they have,
I work to develop that tone.
And that's the first step:
Learn to play the instrument... then the music.
Most schools started stage bands in the late '60s and early '70s.
Some got there sooner than others.
Stage band music was very definitely evolved from the big bands of the '40s.
That's the kind of music you played.
You played the popular music and the standards.
For the longest, there was a feeling among school people that this music was not worthwhile, that this music was almost, uh... vulgar.
Jazz always intimated that it was a type of situation where there was drinking allowed, nightclubs and so forth.
And a lot of administrators and curriculum people didn't want that in the high... in their school programs, so we had to refine it.
So that's where the stage band moniker came from.
A lot of these high school band directors came out of the jazz era, so they would fashion these performance bands, stage bands, that would record and perform music that was inspired by jazz but was done in a much more pop music sort of way.
A lot of it came out being super-square.
Every 150 stage band records that you can find from the late '60s and early '70s, maybe one of 'em will be by a black band, you know.
Maybe two or three of 'em would be from a mixed band.
You know what I'm saying?
Like, it was... a white phenomenon.
When Prof put this band together, it was really not a standard to have an all-black band led by a black, you know, band director.
Competition back then, man, was predominant white.
And I mean predominant white.
And we was out there.
A all-black band.
Conrad believed that there was no limit to a child's ability to play music.
He'd set incredibly high goals for these kids, and Conrad inspired them to put everything into it.
This is what they used to look like back in the day.
I used to roam this neighborhood terrorizing with my brother and my cousin... my brother Darrell and my cousin Delton.
And this house right here on the left is my uncle's house.
Well, he gave me my first keyboard, which was stolen.
One of my cousins broke into a club one night and stole it, and he came to me, trying to sell it to me for $300.
I was born and raised in Fifth Ward, but what I got over there with Prof, he was the first dominant male figure that I had to teach me how to be a man.
L-I can recall walking up to him and, you know, it was all about the thug attitude, the thug language, you know?
You know, you don't talk to me like that.
I don't care if I understand what you're saying.
You don't talk to me like that.
'Cause you never know who you gonna be talking to out in the field and you're representing me.
You're representing the Kashmere Stage Band.
You're representing
Kashmere High School.
You're representing your community.
Don't come in here with your thug personality.
My father died, you know, when I was like 7 or 8 years old.
And my Aunt Bert, you know, she decided to take me in.
I love this house.
She got me started.
She raised six children and she's lost three of them, and this house is kind of like a university.
One of the things that she's really good at, she's... she's really good at getting you to see the point.
Hey.
About time I got that kiss.
You know I gotta give you kisses and hugs and...
Ohh!
How you doing?
Well, you know, my life is always in roller coasters.
One moment it's fantastic, and another moment it's crazy, but I got...
So you broke my rules.
I didn't try to.
You done broke my rules.
I wanna show you something.
I'm gonna get those shoes out to illustrate something to you.
Would you wear the right shoe on the left foot?
No.
And the left shoe on the right foot?
No.
You wouldn't do that?
No.
That means that you, as a man, would know right from wrong.
Right.
I raised four boys.
Mm-hmm. Four bad boys.
No, you... you didn't give me no...
Oh, come on, you know it was terrible.
You didn't give me no problem.
I know where you were, but the other two,
I didn't know where they was.
But I always know where you was at.
Over there in that room.
In that room practicing.
That's right. You know,
'cause one of the things you told me is that I cannot make a mistake, and I'd be out that band.
I have to be in that band.
That band's gonna take me somewhere one day.
- Right.
- And you were right.
- He did carry ya.
- Mm-hmm.
Well, did I tell you that we are...
I'm going to be directing somewhere close to 25 to 30 guys at one time?
I'm gonna be playing the role of Prof in front of the big band.
Prof did his part as being a leader and instructing y'all young men to be a great musician.
Yeah, he did his part.
He did that.
And I can't complain about it.
He really did his part, and I thought it was great for young men to come out of Fifth Ward to prove, let the world see it was something good, young men raised up in Fifth Ward.
I know where you was at all times.
I love you.
- Yeah.
- Very much.
You break my rules.
We kind of depended on Conrad, probably more than we should have, and... and our band, you know, over half were...
You know, fathers weren't at home or there weren't father figures in their life, so we all kind of gravitated to him.
So he didn'tjust teach us the music, he taught us how to be men.
My father took me to see everything that was musical.
Well, Duke Ellington is about one of the highest examples of that.
It was just...
It meant so much to me.
When I was 17,
I could have gone professional.
I played dates at clubs for at least 10 years.
I could've worked anywhere, but I took a job to make sure I stayed at home.
I was about 25, and I met Birdie.
I knew then I wanted her for my wife.
So I ask her if she could take me out... poor man, I don't have any money, but I'll work... and she-she said,
"Yeah, I'll take ya."
And so that's what I did, and I started teaching school.
Man, he loved Birdie.
Man, he loved Birdie.
Man, we'd be out late at night.
Mama Birdie would be right there with us.
Right there with us.
"All right, fellas.
"Y'all know Conrad gonna get on y'all.
Y'all better act right tonight."
Man, Prof loved that woman.
Mama Birdie.
Ah, she was... she was his backbone.
She was his everything.
Everything.
Mama Birdie was a mama to all of us.
We could tell when Mama Birdie was coming in the door
'cause he would literally just stop and just gaze at her.
There was an ongoing love that everybody wanted, say, "Gosh, look at the two of them."
They fit together.
Like a glove.
I was married 52 years.
About 10 years ago, my wife died.
Hey, Prof, happy birthday.
Hey, baby.
So we waitin' for you to come on, Prof, so we could eat.
All right.
- Waiting on you.
- Good to be here, man.
- Truth be known.
- Good to see you.
We have chicken, we have ribs, we have brisket, we have sausage, boudin and regular.
We have beans, we have potato salad, corn on the cob, pasta salad, and dirty rice.
You know, blessed are to have our patriarch here celebrating his 92nd birthday.
We're getting ready to sing happy birthday to you.
This is your birthday cake.
It's one candle.
Can you blow it out?
I'm holding your hat.
Come say hi to Prof, Cameron.
That's your great-granddaddy.
Happy birthday.
Yeah, she said it.
Yeah, thank you.
That's Charles Junior's son.
Here's a guy that... that knows everybody in the industry and he could have been a professional musician, but he opted to raise his family and to stay here and to be available to us to educate us.
You have so much full of life being a musician.
When l... when I'm teaching young people,
I feel that I'm giving them something that they can lean on all the rest of their lives.
We have a camaraderie.
Just to receive the invitation was... was just overwhelming.
This... this has been a long time coming.
This should have happened
20 years ago.
It's for Conrad, you know.
It's just, you know, what he instilled in us.
You know, give back.
Don'tjust take, take, take, take.
Give back.
I get an opportunity to see people who I knew 30-plus years ago and we get a chance to play the music that we played when we were in high school.
We don't take that lightly.
I think we've all heard a lot in the news about Kashmere and things that have transpired over the years since we left.
It's a way for us to give something back, to show that at one time, this band program at Kashmere was a source of pride for this school.
This is a must.
We have to come together to do this for our teacher, for our father.
Whatever we have to do, we'll do it.
I would've come from...
I don't know.
If I had been at the South Pole,
I'd find a way to get back here for this.
Someone,
I don't remember who, wrote an article about us and they said that students entering the Kashmere band room enter it like they're coming into a cathedral or a temple.
Oh, hey, everybody.
What's going on?
What's going on?
Walking in that band room with my saxophone was like, you know, going to your grandma's house... and there's some food cooking.
And the stove and the red beans and rice and cornbread.
Oh, hey, honey bunny.
Good to see you.
Oh we growed up together, didn't we, girl?
Yes. Yes, we did.
We started...
When I entered that room for the first time after all these years, it's very moving.
Mr. Middleton!
It's very moving.
Whoa, oh!
No!
Oh! Hey, man!
What's up, W.L. D?
L-I could feel my heart flutter, you know.
What's up, man?
And here, again, l-I had this opportunity to... to return, you know, and...
Look on the top right there.
That's me right there.
- On the top?
- Look, one, two...
- on the top.
- Oh yeah, yeah.
That's me, and look at Reggie.
- Oh, you look the same.
- Oh yeah. Yeah, sure.
You walk in the band room and you start feeling like you're still at school.
You just left your classroom and you're on your way to the band room.
You're...
It's time for band.
What's up, man?
Good to see ya, man.
Walking in that band room just brings back a flood of memories.
Looking around the room and... and imagining Prof being in a certain spot where you knew him to be.
Imagining the band being set up.
You're scanning all of the faces and the people that you were in the band with, where they would be sitting and just that time.
What's up?
It's just, um, you know, it's...
It was a reunion of a different kind.
Since our drummer decided to show up...
Ladies and gentlemen,
Mr. Craig Green is in the house.
It almost felt like what I get a sense that army buddies feel, you know?
We went through a lot together.
Everybody come in there.
It's like their spirit, you know, is there.
And it's always gonna be there.
Good to see you.
You're looking wealthy and healthy, man.
- Yeah, you too, bro.
- All right.
I was overwhelmed and excited because those faces were back.
There were the guys that used to give me a hard time.
They were men now.
And we're grown women.
People are grandparents now, you know, with gray hair.
You know? 50 pounds larger.
You can't put it into words, but it was the most warm, the greatest feeling.
It was the ultimate feeling.
You knew you were gonna get back together again and get back on that stage.
Some of these guys hadn't played in 30 years.
When I say 30 years,
I mean 30 years.
And you can'tjust pick up a trumpet and blow if you hadn't blown it.
It's... Itjust doesn't happen.
Little bit farther.
I was coming out, really, just to see what was going on, just to... to watch and to reunite with some of the stage band members.
I came in as a spectator.
I should have known better,
'cause anytime I hook up with Gwen,
I end up doing something that I didn't expect.
Everybody greeted me and they're,
"Okay, you're gonna play your instrument?"
No.
I haven't blown that thing in 34 years.
1974, graduation day.
The rest of the guys in the band, they said, "We need our girls back.
We need our girls in the band."
Baba-daba-dop... Boww!
I let them talk me into it saying,
"You can do it. You can do it, Gwen."
I'm like, "No, I can't."
I have not picked up that horn since 1978.
I thought when I took that first blow,
I was gonna pass out.
I was scared stiff.
Everybody, heads up.
Okay. Here's the deal.
Um, we have a lot of Kashmere cats in this room that played from '72 up into the final day of the stage band.
You can witness that, right?
But the first thing I wanna do,
I wanna have Tim Thompson lead us in a prayer.
Reverend Timothy Thompson.
Oh, yeah.
Let's just pray.
Kind Heavenly Father, we thank you for this occasion.
Now we ask that you would endow us with memory that we can remember how it used to be and that the ultimate event will be a blessing to everyone.
1, 2, 3. Take it!
Whoa!
Baba-daba-dop, boww!
Na-na-na Na-na.
One and uh...
Yeah! One, uh!
I'm kinda like a perfectionist, so of course I'm gonna let people know, when it's not right, it's not right.
And I can understand that you hadn't played in 30 years, but I can't take it as an excuse now because you're here.
Hey! More, one!
Ah! Ba, ba-ba, ba!
Pick it up!
Ba-ba-ba-ba-ba-ba-ba-ba.
Ba-da-bomp! It's on you.
When we played, you know, it's like okay, but we got a long way to go.
We're not hittin' right because, you know, we haven't played in a long time.
I'm laughing because...
I thought we were really doing it, but, really, we sounded terrible.
Everything start rushing back.
All those feelings, your mind start racing and you start seeing different scenarios of your high school days in the band room.
You could see it.
You play a certain melody,
I remember I was sitting over there at that time.
Or I remember he had this big afro, and he couldn't see because it would flop over in his face.
Oh, I remember listening to this at home.
I mean, this was the '70s.
We were just coming out of the civil rights movement and so there was a lot of pride.
Um, there were a lot of good things going on.
Our parents had fought long and hard, and it was time for us to shine.
We had more freedom than they did.
We had more opportunities.
They just had to be pushed back to the side with their talents.
But in the '70s, we were able to bring it out.
It was just an incredible time.
There was just so much hope.
For me, everything was open, this open feeling that I had that so much was gonna be possible.
The focus was on moving forward.
Get your education.
There's nothing that you can't do.
You've seen what has happened in the past.
Now, you take what has happened and take it, and you move forward.
But there was also the war in Vietnam, so there was a lot of fear and a lot of trepidation about political issues.
There was a lot of unknowns and we were just the young people growing up just trying to find our way.
- I am...
- I am...
...somebody!
...somebody!
You had people mostly into the Black Power movement during that time.
You know, everybody stuck together.
You know, you at a black school, so when you came to Kashmere, you already knew.
The way you moved, the way you danced, it had to be black.
It was sexy. It was afros.
It was girls, girls, girls.
And they were everywhere.
Every time you looked around, there was a guy walking in with a trench coat... with his hat to the side... sun shades... big afro with blow-out kit.
Super Fly.
The Super Fly movie took over Kashmere.
It was platform shoes... where you were way up in the air.
It was pleated shirts... and the big butterfly bowties. Oh.
Afros, after a while went back.
They started combing the afro back and doing what you call the "duck tail."
Make sure you had your little...
I called it herbs and berries... where your hair would shine.
Girls, we come up there with the miniskirts on.
Yeah, some took it to another level.
It was bell bottoms.
Leisure suits.
Then it was "tight was right."
Man, there was not a cat that drove a car to Kashmere High School that did not have his windows down pumping an eight-track of God-only-knows that pleased him at that moment.
It started with James Brown.
- James Brown.
- James Brown... was totally doin' it for me.
Earth Wind and Fire.
Earth Wind and Fire. They were hot.
- The Bar-kays.
- The Bar-kays.
Parliament Funkadelic.
George Clinton.
Oh, man, don't forget about George Clinton.
Bootsy Collins.
The Commodores.
Kool and the Gang.
Sly and the Family Stone.
The Funk. You know you got to have the funk, man.
With all that funk, man, it was so nasty.
All the music was good to me back then.
'Cause those were real musicians that was playing the music.
But the benefit, the benefit, we got all that.
These kids were hearing sounds that I know I didn't hear as a kid.
At the time that Prof introduced the band to contests... the other bands were all playing similar songs...
...Tommy Dorsey or Duke Ellington or Count Basie,
and they're playing, you know, like, One O'Clock Jump.
When we first got into the music, we was playing tunes like Summertime.
It was a good tune. It's a good tune, but it's... it's... it's a ballad.
Well, we was kinda bored with the music, but we wanted to play.
Hey, man, Prof knew it was a time for change, and he had these kids in the band that had all this high energy.
You know, they wanted to play funk.
Because after rehearsal was over, you know, everybody go... you know, the drummer start putting the beat down, guitar players start playing and then Prof sit there...
He... No, man.
These guys...
Then he started changing his music.
So he started adding this funk into it.
He actually took the jazz,
'cause that was our base, that was our foundation, and he added funk to the jazz, okay?
And he wrote that way.
Man, hey, don't die and go to heaven
until you hear this song called Head Wiggle.
Oh, man, you talk about a good song.
I try to give them a chance to express themselves in the way that they are.
I had to teach them how to play funk.
You could just hear the difference. You...
It wasn'tjust playing.
It was what you put into it.
His music was, uh, soulful... funky, if you want to say that.
And he was the first to get there with it and he did it better than anyone else because his students grew up listening to that, and... and they loved it.
He was like the Pied Piper.
When we did, uh, a song by Sly Stone, he actually took the song and kept some of the foundation so you knew it was the song, but when he put the horns against it... it's kind of like having a Ritz cracker and a saltine cracker.
You put a saltine cracker in your mouth, and you say,
"Yeah, man, that's cool, that's cool."
But somebody turns you on to a Ritz cracker, it's like, "Oh, man!"
All the other bands, they were just, uh,
"Wow! What's them guys playin', man?"
Sometimes it seemed like it would hitjust so hard.
It would just get really, really intense, and that's when, like, it would even scare me.
I was like, oh!
And it would just go like a... like a... a train.
He knew that if he just let them go wild and he let them go off and do their thing, it was going to... kill everybody in the competition because it was so out of left field.
They were extremely expressive.
When the Kashmere came on and all hell broke loose, why, I mean, it, you know, it was, "Yeah, all right!"
Oh... yeah!
You know that's... that's a feeling you get from the audience.
Oh...
Yeah!
I felt like the music wasn't enough.
Because there was people who would listen to the band who were not musicians.
It wasn't enough.
So I put the show into it, and no one had thought to do that.
When we came on the scene and we started dancing, that what drove the judges wild.
Itjust drove the judges wild because they had never seen it before.
Trumpet players started movin'.
You know, they had the trumpets, they would turn this way, one would duck and the other one bring it across his head.
And they did that all the way down the line.
Then the trombone players would put their trombones up like this and, see, it was... it was more of a show then.
It was a show band.
You know, the sax would be doing...
You know they had these movements with the horns and whether they're playing the saxophone or... or what, you know, and it's like, goodness gracious!
How can they do that and play at the same time?
You know?
We danced while we played and we grooved.
The other bands, they were... they were really good.
They was technically good, but they didn't have the feel.
See, they didn't have that soul.
It's easy to understand why they swept the competitions when you listen to the recorded output of their peers.
Conrad's band played music because it was their lives.
Those kids lived it.
And Conrad inspired them to put everything into it.
Did you find the momentum picking up after the band got out where the general public could hear them?
It rolled like a snowball, man.
Winning just gave us a sense that we were invincible when it came to competition.
We were feared.
We were a challenge.
They were just good.
Not good as in mmm-mmm good.
Good as in God created the world to be good.
They were that kind of good.
Okay, in 1972,
I had no idea of the magnitude of what was about to happen.
Uh, we was in Mobile, Alabama.
We went up there for the stage band competition.
You know how kids are.
We're going to Alabama.
You gotta watch out for, you know, the KKK, and it was... it was all freaked out back then.
George Wallace was the... the governor at the time.
And I say segregation now, segregation tomorrow, and segregation forever.
We had heard that statement that George Wallace had made, man, and everybody was a little,
"Hey, man, I don't know about here."
Jazz is alive and well and living in high school.
Dozens of high school jazz bands from across the country auditioned to be part of the American High School
Jazz Festival, but only five were chosen.
And those five were as varied and unique as jazz itself.
The Mobile Jazz Festival had that national reputation.
It was like a national playoff.
And it's probably, to this day, still the most prestigious.
The bands who we would invite would come to Mobile to be selected the best high school stage band in the country.
We're the only black band.
We're going on last, and, you know, this is the big one.
You talk about about 30 guys... black guys... walking in with white shirts and black suits, it's gonna turn some heads.
From Houston, Texas, the Kashmere High School
Stage Band under the direction of
Mr. Conrad Johnson.
They were like on fire.
I think it surprised a lot of people hearing a bunch of teenagers play like that.
To be as young as they were, they were one.
They were a band.
They didn't have something to prove, but they wanted to prove something.
When we're getting down to the finish and, uh, there seemed to be having some problems with the judges...
The Judges went back in the green room and they said, we're just at an impasse.
The two bands that performed in the final concert tonight were equally as good and we would like... to give 'em each a first place trophy.
Prof didn't like this at all.
Just be fair about it.
He said, "I don't care who you give it to.
Just give it to somebody."
And then, you know, then we'll go.
It took so long for them to decide, it actually shook my faith at that time.
It sure did.
And I remember the man's voice, and he said, "The winner is..." and he said...
Kashmere.
Like that.
It wasn't like, Kashmere!
It was like, Kashmere.
And we just...
We went ballistic.
I think Prof cried. Prof cried.
After 20 minutes of that, Prof was,
"Hey, man, let's everybody start packing this stuff.
Let-let's put it on the bus.
We gotta get back home now."
But we hurried up and got out of there.
That basically was the end of competition... in our festival.
When the 1972 band, when they won that national championship, that kind of put Kashmere on the map.
How many high schools have their own theme song that they can play in a jazz competition?
And Prof wrote these songs.
That's-that's what did it for us.
People just wanted to be in that winning atmosphere.
Everybody tried to be the best they could be.
The football team started doing very well.
The debate team, they were winning.
The drama department started doing well.
The track team, they were winning.
And ROTC was top.
Ourjunior and senior year in high school, our basketball team won the state championship.
It's a big thing in the state of Texas.
One year that ROTC, the band, the football team, the basketball team, all going to state and winning.
Even our grades. In 1975, we had more scholarships offered to students of Kashmere than any other high school in the city of Houston.
And in the midst of all of those winners, you had the Kashmere Stage Band.
We was the bomb.
We was the bomb.
The Kashmere Stage Band gave the community part of its identity.
It... it was just a source of pride for the school and the community.
Your ultimate highlight had to be going to Europe to play in the festival over there.
True.
We traveled around the state.
We traveled a few places throughout the country, but to go all the way to Europe just to play, especially for a black school.
Just unheard of.
Only thing we knew about Europe was across the water.
To raise as much as $35,000 or $40,000 was a pretty big task, and I was quite hesitant.
We had to literally get out on the street and ask for donations.
We panhandled.
Everybody in the community came together.
The southwest side, the north side, the east side and the west side.
All the blacks came together.
And in a time when blacks did not come together for anything, they united for the Kashmere Stage Band.
It got to the point where we were about $10,000 short.
Financial crisis faced the All American Kashmere Stage Band.
They were short of money.
Then the governor took the stand.
We believe in each of you.
We're proud of each of you.
I'm very proud, too, that each of you will be an ambassador of goodwill from Texas.
And I know...
It's my privilege to present to you this check for $10,000 to help pay...
At a time where there was still the saying that black kids couldn't learn, black kids were inferior, they were violent, but the Kashmere Stage Band was our representative.
To perform in a European city is a little different from performing here in America.
You are considered an artist rather than just a musician when you perform exceptionally well, and this is the way we were treated.
I mean they made us feel like movie stars.
We was on top of the world and didn't know it.
We was talking to girls, we couldn't even understand what they were saying.
They just wanted to hang out with us.
And then in 1974, when Prof comes in and says, "Look, guys, we've been invited to travel to Japan."
Japan.
These guys got a chance to tour Japan.
And the winning never stopped.
It went on all the way up to 1977.
We were invited to the Reno Jazz Festival where we were competing against all the top bands across the nation.
And won the most outstanding band in the nation again.
We were all on radio.
We were on television.
The Kashmere High School Stage Band.
We were like, uh, Hollywood.
I'm Eothen Alapatt, General Manager of Stones Throw Records here in Los Angeles.
I'm also the founder of Now Again Records, the reissue company that I started to archive music that was recorded between, you know, '67 and '76, kind of, like, the prime of the funk era.
You can see all the pictures of the Kashmere Stage Band in there.
It's one of my favorites right there.
Conrad believed there was no reason why a kid couldn't record and release music as good as professionals.
It was just an abstract goal of committing to record incredible music by 16-year-olds even if it was only for, you know, the people in the immediate community to listen to.
Itjust so happens that it's now spread all over the world.
My name is Josh Davis.
Uh, my DJ name is Shadow.
The first time
I heard Kashmere's music was actually on a tape compilation from a guy who sold funk records in London.
Itjust said Cash Register.
You know, to me it was, like, yeah, this is the type of groove I like.
It was rugged, you know.
I just thought it was a funk band.
Never in a million years would I have assumed that they were just music students.
I had wanted to flip the drum break on the song Kashmere.
I just always liked the syncopation of it.
People who sample records only sample something they think is like a little moment of brilliance.
Something that they feel like is going to speak to a new generation of people.
I've been buying high school band albums whenever I found them, from all over the United States, and 99 out of 100 were just awful.
So the fact that I'd heard funk music this good by a high school band, you know, just blew me away.
Well, I had to know everything about the band and eventually someone told me, like,
"Well, why don't you contact, you know, Conrad?"
So we flew down to Texas and we pulled all of it out and we started going through and everything, and Conrad had told us over and over again,
"The records were just a facsimile.
The magnificence of my band was in the live performance."
They were recorded pretty good, weren't they?
Yeah, the recordings are very nice.
From Houston, Texas, the Kashmere High School Stage Band under the direction of Conrad Johnson.
The live performances of the band were what killed us.
They were just unbelievable.
Talked Conrad into doing a double disc set.
One, the studio recordings; two, the live recordings... all funk, no filler.
We called it Texas Thunder Soul.
Whose idea was it to actually do the funk song?
- Me.
- It was.
I mean, look, it's just what goes around comes around.
We all thought that they were gonna get a couple thousand pieces out there and maybe we'd break even, and it was incredible to see the response.
It was, like, the middle-aged white people all over the country all of a sudden went out and started buying this CD.
Oh, that's a bad one right there.
- You like that?
- Oh, man.
And I called up Conrad and I was like,
"You're not gonna believe this, but we went from being, like, number 3,000-something on Amazon's top sellers list to being number 3."
And we stayed up there for an entire weekend, with this band, you know, that hadn't recorded anything, you know, in over 25 years.
So you were listening to
James Brown and all that stuff?
Yeah, we did.
We got one of those of James Brown on there.
What amazes me is that when you were doing all this stuff you were already 55 years old, you know?
Yeah, I was.
I would see Prof come in the band room that year, in '77, '78, and his head would be down and he was not as happy as he used to be.
As a matter of fact, that year we got a new principal and he didn't understand the traditions of the Kashmere Stage Band.
As a matter of fact, he didn't care about the traditions of the Kashmere Stage Band.
Envy set in from the school board that,
"What is this guy doing?"
You know, uh,
"Why is he doing this?"
"Why is he traveling over to Europe?"
"Where is all the money going?"
Everything is political, even the school district.
It's a political move.
Too many accolades going to a little black man on that side of town.
He had people that loved him, but at the same time they were planning his demise.
We were not getting the funding or the support from the administration that we used to get.
It was more things coming out of our pocket.
The principal and the administration at that time was, they were really laying on him.
They would come down every day to harass him, literally, and say things to him in front of us, which was really disrespectful.
We saw a, uh, just a downward spiral.
As a matter of fact, he didn't even tell us he was retiring.
That next year he just didn't come back.
I think any school administrator that votes for taking music out of the system, he ought to be fired.
School administrator, he ought to be fired.
Don't take it out.
Don't take it out.
Leave it there.
It can help those kids.
Even if it's... even if it's not the most top-rate.
Leave it there. It's an experience that he will not get otherwise in life.
Let's go!
Listen up, listen up.
Hey, listen up.
I need the rhythm section to be...
I need everybody else to be quiet in here so I can work on that.
One.
Hang on a second.
That's a train wreck.
We need to fix that.
I need everybody to hit that accent.
Craig Baldwin, that's a miracle.
'Cause Craig was close to being a felon.
I would see him walking down the street late at night in the Bottom, in the bad neighborhood, and I would say,
"What are you doing over here?"
He said "I'm gonna be a great musician one day.
Don't worry about it."
Here we go.
Everybody quiet up.
This young man was the coldest.
He could be brutal.
He would say what he had to say and he didn't care if you didn't like it.
He would just look at you.
Everybody.
H, rhythm section.
You see Craig Baldwin up there doing that, when I knew that he didn't read music but he could say "Go to letter H."
I was like, "Awesome!"
He knows letter H, he studied this music.
He stood there and said, "All right, guys, this is what we're gonna do."
That's the way Prof would say it.
He had everybody's attention
'cause you had people with perfect pitch sitting there.
You had people that were band directors sitting there.
You had people that were doctors and lawyers sitting there but Craig was saying
"All right, guys, let's do this."
And it was like, chh!
I hear somebody playin'.
That's an intimidating job, getting the band to hit, and to hit like that, you know.
That's, uh, that's a big job.
God. I'm exhausted.
You see how good I had you looking?
- Whatever. Whatever.
- I had you looking good.
See how good I made you look back then?
Baby, you know I compliment you.
Everything must change...
There you go.
Everything will change...
- Nothing stays the same...
- Nothing stays the same...
Good night.
Give me a call. I love you.
I love you too, baby.
I need you to try this jacket.
I found my old jacket from 1974, but I can't wear it, so they said, "Get Gerald to put it on."
I didn't think I was gonna ever see that again.
You kept that in mint condition, huh?
Yeah, man.
Oh, man.
Actually I wore...
It used to be a large but...
It used to be...
I mean, that's 30 years ago, so...
It used to fit me like that.
I had mine until about the '80s.
You know, when I left Kashmere
I didn't even weigh 100 pounds, man.
I got all of the...
Something on the back?
Man, on the back there's the name, man.
Oh, man!
And you were class of '73, right?
Here we go. Cool. Cool.
Right, right.
Let me kiss that forehead.
How ya doing?
I'm doing fine. Craig?
Craig Baldwin, in your room.
Standing right in front of you.
Let me touch ya.
How you doing now?
Well, I'll be doggone. Craig?
Yes, sir.
Yeah, he's-he-he's... he's come to see you, Prof.
Well, that is wonderful.
Yeah. But you need to tell him about what your...
Well, one of the reasons for being here is first I had told, um, my brother here
'cause, you know,
I'm taking brothership here with the son of yours.
You're taking brothership.
Brothership. Yeah.
That tells me something.
You know, we have this program we're putting together for you on the first of February.
We're going to play
Kashmere, Zero Point,
Lost Love, and All Praises.
We have been rehearsing 'em.
That's unbelievable.
Yeah.
But, I mean, but it's believable.
- Yeah, yeah.
- Absolutely.
Prof, I got guys that haven't played their horns in 30 years that came back to do this, uh, this deal.
- What?
- Yeah. 30 years.
Those cats, can they do it?
Prof, you will be amazed.
You mean they were...
Now, listen, I want you to hear what I'm saying.
Okay.
They were taught so well that they can remember what they did then, and do it?
It's almost like you in the room, Prof.
I can't believe this.
It's just like you're standing there.
Wow.
Mm-hmm.
Wow.
- Yeah.
- Gosh.
I just like to see this.
When it is gonna be?
It's gonna be this coming Friday.
We got some surprises but we're gonna put a little bit of a spin on it and then see what you think.
I know about your spin.
But I'm not too sure that I can even be there.
Prof, one way or the other, you're gonna... we gonna make it.
You gonna... we gonna make you make it, okay?
I wanna be there.
That's the plan.
Oh, man, this is wonderful.
Yeah.
All right?
All right.
Okay, man.
I love you.
- Love you too.
- Talk to you soon, man.
Ahhh, man.
If y'all could give me your attention.
This is... This is, uh, very difficult for me.
Prof had a mild heart attack.
Okay?
He's at the Methodist Hospital and, um,
I made a promise to him that we're gonna do this for him.
I told him about all you guys and the... and the commitment, and he's... he was just blown away that all you guys actually, you know, came back together, you know, for this, so we got work to do.
And, um, I'm gonna ask, um, Tim to, uh, stand and say something special for us because we need this right now.
Gracious God, our Father, again we come before your presence.
So we ask now that you would speak your Word concerning the illness of Prof Conrad Johnson.
I was wondering,
Was I ever gonna see him again and did I say everything I needed to say?
Just touch his body...
Was my life, the things that I had done, did it please him?
I was wondering if I was gonna ever get a chance to actually just touch his hand orjust say I love you.
Thank you.
We pray that you would bless us now and continue to bless us throughout all the days of our lives...
We were just saying,
"Hang on, Prof.
"Hang on. We're doing this.
We're doing this for you.
Just hang on."
And we thank you. Amen.
Very top of the song, here we go.
Showtime.
When you heard that... boww!
I mean, it almost knocked me down and I was trying to keep my emotions to myself
'cause I didn't want them to see that it was like, man, you gonna make me cry, man.
You gonna make me cry
'cause, you know, this is power.
This is Conrad Johnson power and we're playing his power.
Talkin' 'bout the zero, unh!
Talkin' 'bout the zero...
Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah...
Zero, unh!
Talkin' 'bout the zero, unh!
I want Prof to feel like we never lost it, that we still have it going on.
We want to show him that we were listening and we were paying attention and we want him to know that we respect his music.
We don't want the students to look and say,
"Oh, that was just a bunch of old people."
We want them, when they hear us, to say,
"Wow, those old people still have it."
I just hope that they will see that there are some guys that came out of this same neighborhood that walked these same halls that sat in these same classrooms that did something tremendous.
My deepest hopes for this reunion concert is that we take another tour to Europe, Japan, and I get a major record deal.
I can't put it in no other words.
We're gonna do this, this thing, and, uh, and like, yes, l-I wanna be a part of it.
I wanna be there.
I wanna, I wanna feel it again, you know.
So, um, yeah it's... it's a big thing for me.
I want him, I want him to know... that we didn't forget, man.
We didn't forget how to do it.
You know. Maybe 30,
40 years from the moment, but we didn't forget how to do it, you know?
- Comp. What's going on?
- Hey, man.
Looking good, boy.
Looking good, boy.
Good to see you, man.
Well, you're looking good, man.
Oh, it's time, fellas, it's time.
Look at you. What's up?
Man. I'm... I'm happy, man.
I'm happy we doing it. We doing it.
You're choking, brother.
No, no, no, don't choke me.
Let me, let me stretch it a little bit more now.
Now, my neck ain't that big, Clifford.
Come on, what you trying to say, man?
I'm trying to say it's all good, man.
Earl Spiller told me, he said,
"Man, when we get old, man, we're gonna do this.
We're gonna do a reunion, man, and we're gonna be all old, man."
But we ain't all that old.
- We ain't all that old.
- We're still looking good.
Bruce here. We use to call him the hoochie coochie man.
When he played, he would kind of move his hips and wiggle.
- Look at this.
- Get that.
Who did that? Who did that?
Get front page.
Look at it, look at you, boy.
Boy, you're stealin' headlines.
Well, we sure remember, right?
Quiet up. He's trying to talk.
We got Class of '59.
- All right.
- Oh, oh!
Old school in the house.
I just wanna say I know
I'm with some bad musicians.
But we... but we brought the first trophy to this school.
- Uh-oh.
- Hey! Hey!
And it was not a jazz trophy, so Conrad is more than justjazz.
Conrad made me fall in love with symphony music.
And when we first went to Prairie View, we all... we were so poor we didn't have uniforms as a school.
All we had was white pants and a white shirt, and people would say,
"Who are those milkmen?
What they... What they...
What they coming here for?"
But when we left, they knew who those milkmen were.
But I came here and...
I came here just to say
Conrad has done wonders for everybody, and so I just wanted you to get it straight.
He's more than just a jazz musician.
He's a true musician, from the mole on his head to the top of his toes.
Any time we doing something,
Mr. Gerald Calhoun come from Portugal.
Speech! Speech!
To be here after all of these years and all of us come together for this moment in... at this time...
Hear, hear! Yes, sir.
Yeah, man.
...can you believe that?
Amen.
It's... It's happened. It's happened.
- It's going down.
- It's here, it's today,
- We're all here.
- Let's get it on.
What a blessing.
Now, Adrian Tyler.
Band Director.
Yes, sir. Yes, sir.
Yes, sir. Yes.
I really thank you from the bottom of my heart for being able to come here and show my current students that it is possible to come from this very band room and make a positive influence.
I thank you and I urge you, don't let this be the last time you come back to Kashmere for another 30 years.
All right?
I hope to see a lot of you all come.
If you wanna help out, give me a call.
Ahh, boy.
Need any help with that?
That way he won't have to walk as far.
All right, let's just swing it on around.
You're gonna swing your legs on around for me?
- I do.
- Come on.
Now don't turn me loose, now.
Oh, I'm not gonna turn you loose.
I'm just getting you ready.
You ready to roll?
Now let me see.
It was pretty crazy to see him wheeled in, in a wheelchair to the high school, you know, looking more frail than I'd imagined and I thought to myself, "My God, like, he's really been hanging on to see this."
Why this program, why today?
Today is February 1st, and we begin Black History Month and our observance of Black History Month around these United States.
And what a fitting opportunity for us to honor and to recognize an icon in the music industry,
Mr. Conrad O. Johnson.
You are an example of what educators all over the world hope to be, and that is an influence on their students.
We thank you, we honor you, we love you.
I wanted to cry because I was so glad to see him.
Even though he looked feeble,
I knew that his heart was there and he was watching his children.
And he was, like, saying,
"Nothing's changed.
I'm just older now.
So are you. Play."
Without any further ado, the legendary Kashmere Stage Band.
Give it up.
These are my brothers and sisters.
The Kashmere Alumni Stage Band, under the direction of Mr. Conrad O. Johnson.
Prof, what you think about this today, man?
It was all right, huh?
Yeah. It was all right.
It was all right.
Oh, yeah, man.
- It sound good?
- It sound good.
Yeah? We enjoyed it, Prof.
I enjoyed it too, man.
It was a wonderful thing, wasn't it?
- It was great, man.
- Fantastic.
I never saw anything like it.
Yeah, me too. Me too.
You gave us the spirit and we gonna pass it on.
- Pass it on.
- We'll pass it on.
That's what we gotta do.
It'll never go away.
We were just some little old snotty-nose kids, you took us under your wing and made real musicians out of us.
We sure appreciate that, Prof.
You gave us our purpose, man.
And we all came back here for it, to honor you, man.
We'll never forget it.
Thank you. Thank you.
Thank you, man.
Well, you did it.
And you can take it from me, baby.
You did it.
Now listen good, baby, and you would.
Yeah.
- You was right.
- Mm-hmm.
He brought 'em back 30 years later...
Yeah.
...and you could still do the same thing.
Yeah.
So I talked to his son. His son said,
"You know, Prof's been sleeping,
"uh, since he got home last night,
"but come on out and, you know, we'll wake him up and we'll talk.
You know, he loves to talk with you about music."
So I said,
"Great. I'll be right out there."
So we go in there and he wakes up Prof and Prof sits up and we start talking.
And I said "Hey, Prof, you know,
I just... I hope you...
I hope you feel that I've, you know, I've done you right."
You know, and he said,
"Yeah, man, you know, you've done me right."
And I said, uh,
I said, "You know, it... your legacy's safe."
And he said,
"Yeah, I know it's safe.
You know, what's next?"
And I said,
"Man, maybe we could do, you know, a compilation of all these ballads."
He's like, "Man, we had some great ballads, man."
And I said,
"Yeah, man, you know,
"you had so much and I'm... so proud to be a part of this."
And I just said,
"Yeah, I love you, man."
He said, "I love you too."
And then he fell asleep.
This is Conrad Johnson's granddaughter.
I'm calling to let you know
Prof passed away, 5:00 p.m. Today.
It is, uh, Sunday.
We wanted you to know.
This is Mingo in Houston just to say
I didn't know if you gotten the information about Prof.
So I was calling you to pass it on.
I don't know if anyone has told you we lost Prof.
He's gone on home.
He be blessed.
Conrad Johnson has just passed.
We all are getting word right now.
When we wear the gloves, when we wear the gloves, a brother has gone from our midst and sailed to golden shores.
When we wear the gloves, a friend has passed the final test and walked through purple doors.
The circle has an empty place.
A voice will raise no more.
The song of fellowship and love uplift forevermore.
Good morning.
Yeah, it's a good day.
For this is a day of celebration.
And you celebrated Prof all the way up to Heaven's door.
God bless you.
You gave him his flowers while he was still here and could appreciate it and Prof had a blast.
We give you the glory...
Today, tomorrow...
And forever...
And ever...
And...
Ever...
I gave them pride.
I gave them honor.
I gave them exceptional performance.
And they knew it.
And they appreciated it.
But we had to work to do it, now.
It didn'tjust come natural.
This is powerful.
It's a wonderful moment.
A man and his horn.
A man and his horn.
Oh, how wonderful.
Oh, man, that looks just like him, man.
For Conrad.
With Mother Love Bone, you had some success, and there was a tragedy there.
And what made you decide not to continue with
Mother Love Bone and to form something totally different?
Because it was old at that time, and we wanted to do something new.
So this is what we're doing now, new and fresh.
And then they saw me in a bra, and that was it.
And they said,
"We've got to have him."
That was before his front tooth got knocked out.
And I have a weather report for you people, and it's not a good one.
KCMU. Seattle's rockin' report.
What is it that drives thousands of young angelic-faced boys in our calm, tree-lined suburbs to spend their allowances on Marshall Amplifiers?
Why is this happening?
Truth be told, there's always been a great scene in Seattle.
If you want some crisp, aggressive, and emotional rock-and-roll, then get on down to The Off Ramp on Friday, July 5th.
Wowwee!
You haven't seen anything yet.
My name is Cameron Crowe, and I was a rock journalist when I first moved to Seattle in the mid-'80s.
I became aware of a whole scene of musicians that really worked together to create their own world of influences and bands and community.
I immediately realized how much this was different from the places I grew up in and the music I listened to in Southern California.
This was music that came from guys that stayed indoors a lot.
They had a lot of time to play and a lot of time to listen.
And they listened to everything, hard rock, hair metal, glam,
R&B, soul, disco, blues, all of it cuisinarted together into this majestic mix of great, melodic, hard rock.
We'd go and see the shows that got put on by The U-Men, and we'd go see these guys, and these guys would come see us.
Sometimes we would open for these guys.
So it was like us, we play.
Two guys who I met early on were Stone Gossard and Jeff Ament.
They'd been in a well-known local band, Green River, and had an obvious bond that drew a lot of people to them.
On any given night in Seattle, it wasn't hard to run into
Stone and Jeff going out to listen to some live music.
Let's do a little more of an intimate thing.
Sit with me. Sit with me, my child.
Those people over there, police officers. Wave at them.
How you doing?
This is not MTV, but it very well could be at any time.
Sarcastic police officers.
Excellent.
We're supposed to get in to see The Cult tonight, but so far, nobody's showed up.
We finally got into the show.
We were outside for a long time and they wouldn't let us in but we got these things, backstage passes.
How come you didn't come out and give me my pass earlier?
I was outside for so long.
We were outside for a long time, and here is my witnesses right here.
Because you never believe me.
You never believe me, Stone.
You never fucking believe me.
I knew when I met Stone,
I couldn't imagine hanging out with the guy.
Mark Arm introduced me to him, and within five to 30 seconds,
I think he wanted to punch me.
I had recently been introduced into the exciting world of sarcasm, and so that, to me, was the greatest joy anyone could ever have.
Out here...
Rock people of all sorts,
Susan Silver, Chris Cornell,
Jeff Ament.
We had a bit of a chip on our shoulder.
We always felt, l think, like, if it came from New York or Chicago or Minneapolis or Athens, it was probably better, but there also was this attitude of somehow we will persevere.
It was very different from Los Angeles' or New York's band scenes.
There were tens of groups in Seattle, but they all knew each other, and everybody was talking about
Jeff and Stone's new band,
Mother Love Bone, and their amazing charismatic front man.
His name was Andy Wood.
I want the world to know that Mother Love Bone is coming to take over the world, a plethora of delights, a fruit salad compote of delights.
He was a fantastic entertainer.
People loved him.
I mean, people loved to see him do his thing.
He was very funny.
He would do something like go to The Central Tavern when there was 25 people there.
He'd play it like it was a coliseum.
"To all you people in the back!"
And there's, like, two...
There's the guy at the door.
He was a rock star. He knew it.
And something about that...
I'll speak for everyone...
Made us believe that we were, too.
I want to get on an arena tour with some band.
Who cares?
Warrant, for that matter.
What the hell?
Go on tour with Warrant.
Just so we can play arenas.
That's the kind of crowd I like.
There's an easy crowd.
You can say anything.
You can say,
"Your mother smells bad, people!"
And they'll just go, "Yeah! Yeah!"
There are certain people you just know that you love, and you'll do anything for them.
You just wanted him to be a rock star.
You just saw it and were like,
"I'm on your team.
"I want to be anywhere near you."
We're going down to L.A.
On Monday to record an album.
Do you think you're the band of the '90s?
Do you think you're gonna be one of the forerunners?
I think so. I hope so.
I mean, I thought I always would be involved in the band of the '90s.
So if we're not the band of the '90s,
I'm gonna fire my band and get a new one, and then they'll be the band of the '90s.
'Cause you know what was weird?
Like, I was listening to the bottom end of all the songs,
'cause I was kind of worried about Stardog, you know, and the bottom end of it...
The first guy that I called to see if he wanted to be my roommate was Stone Gossard.
He was living at home, I think, and he answered the phone, and he's like,
"Yeah, no, I'm good.
I don't really want to...
"I don't really want to change my living situation right now."
And he was at home, so I thought that was a little weird.
But I thought,
"Whatever. That's great."
And he said,
"But Andy just got out of rehab,
"and he might need a place."
And I thought,
"Well, that would be cool."
You know, I didn't really know him, but I thought, that would be interesting.
He seems like an interesting guy.
It would be cool.
I called Andy up, and he's like,
"Sure. I'm coming over."
Chris and Andy had a very deep relationship.
I know that both of them had 4-tracks set up in their bedrooms, and they would each try to record a song a day and play it for the other guy.
He just had a freedom.
He didn't edit anything that he did, anything that he wrote.
He didn't care. He just charged through the creative process without a care in the world, and I was the opposite, over analyzing, and...
It was just a really exciting creative time.
Thank you so much.
As long as I've known the guy, there's always been different times where he wasn't comfortable with himself, and his using drugs was a product of that, too.
If you know any addicts, you know that, you know, just because they quit for three months doesn't mean shit, and he was someone who definitely had a certain tragic flaw.
That's where his greatness came from.
We knew that he was trying to be sober, and we knew that he was really...
That he couldn't just sustain...
You know, you can't just...
You can't...
You can't really be a junkie and be super-productive and, like...
I mean, maybe somebody can, but he wasn't going to be able to do it.
That morning, like, March 19th, 1990, there was, like, five messages from Xana,
Andy's girlfriend at the time, saying... You know, just hysterical.
We all got in a taxi and went up to Harbor view, and he was on life support at that point, and it was a fucking trip.
I mean, it was, like, the worst, most horrible...
It was confusing, you know.
It was, like,
"Andy O.D.'ed and he's not dead,
"but he's not gonna live, but he's not dead,
"and you've got to come now."
Whenever people would start to get into drugs after that,
I'd always...
I always thought, like,
I wish I had a picture of Andy when he was in the hospital, because it was...
It was so horrible.
He was... They kept him alive for a couple of days.
I think mostly just so family and friends could say good-bye or whatever, but...
It was... It was horrible.
It's difficult to articulate it, but, it's...
You know, up to that point,
I think life was really good for us
As a... Just a group of musicians in a scene, making music.
It just... You know, the world was sort of our oyster, and we had support, we supported each other.
And he was kind of like this beam of light sort of above it all, and to see him hooked up to machines, that was the...
I think the death of the innocence of the scene.
It wasn't later when people surmised that...
That Kurt blowing his head off was the end of the innocence.
It didn't... It was that.
It was walking into that room.
So at this point, I think everyone really wants to take a break, for one, and just kind of let things happen naturally to a certain extent to see where we want to go with it, you know.
We're not in any huge rush to be rock stars at this point.
And Andy's attitudes and personality were such an integral part of Mother Love Bone that, you know, there's just...
You wouldn't be able to replace him.
It’s just not, in our minds at least, it just...
Fiddle with it.
What? You just lost all sound?
Check.
Hello. Hello. Hello.
In  some ways, I was just thinking about this in the last couple of days, that I can relate to the Clippers and the Nets because... I've kind of...
I feel like my musical career has kind of been that way, in that every time that it seems like it's starting to take off, somebody goes down with an injury or the coach gets fired or something happens.
I remember Jeff saying,
"Maybe I'm not supposed to be doing this.
"You know, that was my shot, and it's gone."
I think if my dad and I hadn't had such a contentious relationship at that point,
I probably would have left Seattle.
I never felt like giving up.
You know, I think I was writing songs days later probably, you know, playing my guitar and still just going,
"I love playing my guitar."
I ended up playing with a really good friend of mine in town named Mike McCready.
We got together, and we started playing in his parents' attic.
That's when I had the conversation,
"We've got to get Jeff Ament in the band."
Jeff was playing with some other folks and I think having a good time doing that, and my first instinct was like,
"I don't know."
I remember him just saying,
"Fuck Jeff Ament, " or something like that, and I was kind of shocked.
Like, "Dude, that's your guy.
"You've been with this guy forever."
But Mike was like,
"No, you've got to."
And I was like, "Okay."
And then Jeff was there, and I was like, "Yes."
We went in and did a demo pretty quickly after that with Matt Cameron.
And I was like,
"What are you guys gonna do with it?"
And they were like, "We're just trying to get a singer."
I was working a security job in San Diego.
I was just, like, writing music in my living room for the longest time, you know.
This instrumental tape, it migrated to me, then it really started bringing out some emotions that I hadn't touched on in a while.
It just... this natural thing came out, and all I did was record it.
I surfed in P.B.
One morning after work and went and recorded it, like, literally with the sand still on my feet and stuff and just sent it up that day.
This is where Jeff Ament...
His apartment was.
This is the place where I came over after he called me and said, "I got this demo from...
Back from Ed,
"back from Eddie,
"and you should come over and check it out.
"It's good."
It was a voice on a tape that blew my mind.
It was kind of,
"Who is this? Is this real?"
I really remember thinking that, like, "Is this a real guy?"
"Who is this guy?"
Here, in fact, is the Momma Son tape.
This is it, huh?
That is the tape.
Crazy.
I remember listening to music.
I remember thinking about his voice.
I heard a person in there, like a real person.
I didn't hear a person trying to sound like another person.
I heard a guy. I hadn't met him, but he's in there.
And look it. It has...
There's my phone number on it.
I'll call the number later and see if I can find a younger you.
Tell him to be careful.
Hold on. Hold on, my friend.
Hi. I'm Eddie Vedder.
In Seattle, I feel like
I'm kind of the new kid, and...
I'll be a new kid for a while.
We flew Ed up, and we hung out for about a week and worked on these songs in the basement of
Galleria Potato head.
It’s just nice to walk in that room, and you smell raw materials, you smell paint.
There's this whole feeling of, like, creativity.
You hear the pound of your footsteps as you go down this basement, and you just go in and light it up.
I remember right before he got on the plane to come down, he said, "When I get there,
I want you to pick me up,
"and I want to go straight to the practice studio
"and I don't want to fuck around.
"I just want to plug in the instruments and get at it."
The music that sprouted right off the bat was pretty heartfelt and deep, and before we knew it, we all spent five days rehearsing.
The sixth day, we played a fucking show.
We thought it was just insane that we were playing a show after being together for five or six days, yeah. Totally.
Let's talk about the show at The Moore.
The hidden Eddie Vedder.
Where was he?
He was frightened. He was terrified.
It was a bit hard for me at the beginning, coming up and being part of a different place and a different scene, and it wasn't just a neutral zone.
It was their zone.
He was really coming from a different place that I didn't...
I didn't fully understand.
And I felt like he's good, and then once I met him and saw how personable he was and, like, excited and not fucked-up and you know, just like a guy that we sent him music, and literally, like, two weeks later, we had music back.
And that it wasn't Mother Love Bone.
That was big.
You know, we had gotten a few tapes, and they were all, like,
Andy kind of tribute things, and it was all like whoa...
I think it took me years to understand Eddie.
My dad... He passed away before I knew he was my dad, right?
So I grew up with this dad
I thought was my dad, and then I found out later that he wasn't and that the guy who was my dad had already passed, like, a few years earlier, man.
There's only two chords to this song.
It'll probably be really boring on an acoustic.
You know, looking back,
I realize, like, we all got together in that room at that time, and you know,
I was still thinking about stuff with, like, my dad and loss and all that, and then what they were thinking about, having been through the situation with Andy and everything, so...
In  ways we were strangers, but we were coming from a similar place.
And all that kind of came out in the first batch of songs.
Release was kind of a drone jam that we were messing around with in the basement the first week that Ed came up, and it was one of those songs that he just started singing over the top of it, and these words came out of him.
I remember the first time that we played that song, right at the end of it, I remember he sort of ran away and ran around the corner.
I was thinking about my dad, and then afterward, it got me all tore up, and I went in the little hallway, and then Jeff came out and said, you know, "You okay?"
So this one here, this is, I don't know if you've ever seen this.
This is my dad.
I met him a few times, but he was just, like, a friend of the family or something.
Edward Louis Severson lll.
When I was born, that was my name.
So he kind of...
He's up there for me.
Like, he's up in the ether somewhere.
I feel him sometimes.
The camaraderie and the healthy competition part
I found later was unusual, and it was Johnny Ramone that actually pointed that out to me later, talking about, I think, you know, the friendship you saw between Pearl Jam and Soundgarden, for example, and saying,
"I've never seen that before.
"New York wasn't like that.
We hate each other.
"We would screw each other up at every turn.
"If you could, you would mess the other band up."
The best thing about it is,
I think, that...
You learn from each other, you know, and you...
You're inspired by each other.
For me,
Temple of the Dog grew out of that.
After Andy passed,
Chris (Cornell) just wrote these songs.
We were going to record it with, you know, the surviving members of
Mother Love Bone.
It was a fun record that no one had any expectations for, so nobody worried about it, and that made it feel very fresh from beginning to end.
For him to write songs and then have the idea of sharing those songs with Jeff and I was just, like, another generous gesture that said, "I'm not only gonna help you guys with this record,
"but I'm gonna even ask your new singer,
"who he just is kind of a shy, quiet guy,
"because I haven't really heard his voice yet.
"I kind of saw you guys live,
"and you know, maybe he can sing.
I'm not sure."
And then you hear it, and you go,
"Our guy sings really fucking good, too."
Eddie was very shy at the beginning.
He was very kind of self-conscious.
He's wasn't fully comfortable,
I think...
Until him and Cornell went out one night.
He really embraced Eddie when he first moved up here, and sometimes I wonder if that was a void that he felt from Andy's passing, having another equally talented singer that he could sort of bounce ideas off of or just basically relate to.
I know Eddie felt a real mentorship, and I think that gave him a lot of confidence.
It was the first time
I ever heard myself on a real record.
So it could be one of my favorite songs that...
That I've ever been on, or the most meaningful.
Where's Stone Gossard when we need him?
Where is Stone? My God.
We went up to Vancouver to open for Alice in Chains.
Played at this place called
The Town Pump.
During the song Breath, security was taking out some kid, some drunk guy.
They were being overly aggressive.
They were really taking this guy out, and Ed noticed that, was watching it.
And you could just see this change come over him.
This guy that had been shy, that people didn't really know, he didn't know us, all of a sudden his voice changes, his attitude changes.
It just got really intense.
You got a problem.
Here we are in the studio.
They're known as
Mookie Blaylock, but...
Not anymore.
We had some legal problems.
Yeah, the name was taken by this guy named Mookie Blaylock.
Mookie Blaylock and Michael Jordan.
Look at that. They played yesterday.
The Bulls won, victorious.
So the new name is Pearl Jam.
We're not gonna cultivate anything today.
Okay. So Pearl Jam, the new name.
And you guys have a lot of other stuff going on, almost as we speak.
Yeah. We're going in the studio tomorrow to make our first album.
I was selling merchandise at that time, and you know, you can only take so much stuff into Canada.
Everything we brought, you know, I brought based on kind of what we'd been selling up to that point.
That night, before the opening band was even done playing,
I had sold out of everything, stickers, T-shirts.
Anything that we brought across was gone.
I had nothing to do for the rest of the night.
So I grabbed my camera and filmed the whole show.
They were breaking.
Things were taking off.
That's our CD.
See, I hate holding up a CD.
I want to hold up an album.
You can barely see this.
Our band is doing 10 times as well as I ever thought we would.
We're getting to play shows almost every day.
You know, we're happy.
So the band's chemistry seems really good right now.
Yeah. Yeah. Very much a family.
What is, you know, being on the road, being touring, what is the strangest thing that has happened to you?
Right here.
I'd like to thank D'arcy from the Smashing Pumpkins for letting me borrow her wardrobe.
I think she looks a little better in it than you do, though.
We showed up in Zurich, Switzerland, and the venue was almost like a kind of an art house.
The stage is, like, about as big as our drum riser.
We're like, "What are we gonna do?"
We'd been playing enough at that point that we were kind of ready to change something up.
And we asked the local guys,
"Is there a chance
"that you could get us some acoustic instruments?
"Maybe we could just do kind of an acoustic show."
And we'd never done that before.
And then it was the next day, somebody called and asked about "MTV Unplugged."
So we said, "Yeah, we could do that."
Yeah. We just did it. Yeah.
Yeah.
It’s a true story, something that I really felt and I still feel every time I sing it.
A lot of your songs are sort of on the dark side.
Is there any reason for that, or is that just mostly what you see, or...
My emotions.
It seems like I should be even really happy right now.
You know, I get to, like, play shows.
It’s been amazing, but the fact is, it's like my emotions are like a quarter flipped in the air.
It’s just like black and white, you know, good and bad, constantly, and you know, maybe by talking about things that may be a little darker or more, you know, on the negative side of our existence, by dealing with them, maybe that's where
I find my happiness.
The folks at MTV said they thought that was one of the best "Unpluggeds."
Is it nice to get that kind of response, especially when it's a stripped-down...
I don't trust nobody, especially when they say something good.
If I even see you having fun, you will be promptly arrested and led away.
Fuck security.
Yeah!
That was when Ten was completely blowing up.
They played at 3:00 in the afternoon.
They were, like, the second group.
But the frenzy during their set got more and more extreme as the tour went on.
And it was all a whirlwind, because we went from vans to playing little clubs to a little bit bigger clubs, and then we get in "Lollapalooza, " and then you have everything blow up.
I remember not being able to sleep for entire nights after the show because you'd be so buzzed.
I finally figured out years later that if I took a bath, that sometimes put me to sleep.
Is it like you can...
Like you're just walking down the street one day and all of a sudden you feel like you're getting a lot more exposure by a lot more people coming up to you?
Like, I'm just wondering, like, when would you start noticing that all of a sudden, you know, your millions, millions of people are, like...
Yeah, exactly.
That would be weird.
That would be weird.
We try not to think about that as much as we can.
We try not to think about that as much as we can.
Think about that sentence for a while, America.
Think about it.
Back on the "Headbangers Ball" with Eddie and Mike of the band Pearl Jam.
The album is called Ten.
Why is it called Ten?
Actually, that's back to
Mookie Blaylock.
That's his number.
It’s total dedication to Mookie.
Now, we're about to play your video for Alive.
Did you like making the video, or...
That was the thing.
We didn't make a video.
We said we just wanted to play live.
There's no way, with a song like that, which talks about living for the moment, that we're going to, like, lip-synch something that we had recorded a few months ago.
I wonder what they're going to do for another video if we ever have to do one, because all we ever want to do is live.
Really? You can't see yourself ever making some sort of conceptual video or anything like that?
Roll sound. Background.
I personally have no problem with the theory of doing a concept video at all.
To me, it's more of a question of what you have more control over, and we're going to give some control up this time and, you know, see how it works.
That song was part of the second wave of songs that we wrote with Ed.
I still didn't really understand songwriting at that point, and pretty much that whole song is in A.
There's not really, like, a real major chord change in that song.
It sort of goes against the rules of, like, how to write a pop song.
Ed had been reading a newspaper when we were starting to jam on the song and basically wrote the entire lyrics off of a newspaper article.
Visually making that video with Mark Pellington, he did such a great job at making you see kind of how heavy that lyric was.
You seem kind of embarrassed about it.
This seems to me to be quite a valid sort of artistic thing to be doing up there.
It was just... it’s a different...
You know, it's a different kind of focus.
You know, and that's the key to it, is just focusing, you know, but kind of like, with a camera, that's just... You know,
I'm just not into it really.
Yeah!
We've never played for this many people before.
We never thought we'd ever play for this many people.
So you ready for one more?
Yeah, lots of times, especially when our singer starts climbing up on the ceiling, like, 50 feet above the stage, and, like, is on a truss.
You know, it's like, "Don't do that."
Were you worried he'd fall down?
All the time.
I thought, "This guy's gonna fall and kill himself,
"and our career is over."
I was worried every time he did it.
Over the gigs, it got higher and higher.
You'd do one, and then you'd notch it up, because you survived the last one, so...
We're gonna take this to some level that people aren't gonna forget, and if that means risking your life, we're gonna do it.
You know, we'd get to the hotel after the shows or whatever and feel pretty good physically, and then I'd take a shower and realize that I had, like, a thousand deep scratches on my back.
I didn't want him to hurt himself.
But at the same time, it's like there was no talking to him.
He was going to do what he was going to do.
He could have killed himself a couple of times probably for sure, which would have been...
More than I could have taken.
Tell me. You look quite mixed up.
Look at these pictures.
I'll show you these pictures.
I'll show you why
I feel the way I do.
It’s a little bit overwhelming to see this many people.
I mean, I'm sure you've been looking at this all day.
It’s a lot of people.
We're used to playing small clubs, you know, and we want to go back to playing small clubs.
He wanted Pearl Jam to be a band that goes out and tours in the van and pays its dues and plays clubs and makes albums and has a slow, natural life.
He was not the guy that wanted to come out and have overnight success.
I think he was critical about the mixes of Ten.
He felt like maybe they were leaning too commercial.
He was really reluctant.
You are also not going to be doing videos right away at least.
We just don't know.
You know, our mind is on music right now, which is probably a really good thing for everybody.
I think I got that theory to make that part work.
I come in one earlier than I normally do.
So I still do four.
So it almost felt like it didn't...
It almost kind of always felt like
I did one too many or something, but it didn't, like, play itself.
Let's just do it one more time.
A lot of my job is taking what they bring and turning it into something.
Okay, this is a chord change.
This is this. This is a melody.
Okay, but what does that mean?
Where am l?
If I close my eyes, where am I?
What does this music mean?
Let's just figure out where we want to go on that verse.
I was at this, like, small, little coffee shop, and someone came up and stopped me, and the waitress, this older lady, kind of witnessed it and said, "You're..."
I said, "Yeah, yeah, " you know.
She says, "What? You don't like it?"
I said, "it’s just...
"it’s no big deal, you know.
I'm just this guy."
And she says,
"If you don't like it, you know,
"you certainly picked the wrong business to be in."
And she had a really good point.
The fact is, when you sit in your room playing guitar, you don't have to worry about being successful.
It's not gonna happen.
It's just not gonna happen.
The point of doing an encore just doesn't make any sense to me.
When you're playing in front of 30 people...
I had done the movie
"Say Anything..." and was anxious to do the next movie here in Seattle, and it was going to have that mix of music that I love.
The studio looked at the movie and said,
"We don't know how to sell this movie.
"We don't even want to put it out."
But as Nirvana got bigger and Pearl Jam got bigger, they came to me and said,
"Well, you know, there is one way."
When we looked at the schedule, it was like there was one day off that week, and that was the day that he wanted us to play, and we're just going like, "Shit."
Any memories of the "Singles" party in Los Angeles, which we have very vivid footage from.
God. Do you have some footage of that?
We do.
The unaired, of course, footage.
Yeah. I won't watch that.
Fuck MTV! Fuck all TV!
It was pretty bad.
We're all just warming up, you know.
It’s not like one of these fucking movie things.
You've got to warm up, right?
It was a disaster, a total disaster.
Everybody loves us.
Everybody loves our town!
There were some long sound checks that day or something.
So I drank, like, one bottle of wine, and then there was, like, another that I opened to give to friends, and they weren't drinking.
And so we're downstairs, and there's a bottle of tequila sitting down there, which we hardly ever drank before the show, but by that point, we were already, like, fucking wasted.
I actually have more memories than you'd think I would have.
The monitors weren't working that well, or my ears weren't working, one or the other.
I kept looking over and asking them to turn the monitors up.
I can't hear anything.
And it just wouldn't turn up.
At some point after a while,
I just got really upset, and I went over.
They had this pipe and drape thing, and I pulled it off and threw it down or something.
I don't know. Is this documented?
I looked over, and that wasn't our sound woman.
It was the lighting person.
I kept wondering, like,
"Why is it getting brighter in here?"
I began to see studio executives and their families starting to stream for the exits.
Some fights were breaking out.
Don't be violent!
Fuck you! Fuck you! Fuck you!
Because we had waited so long for anyone to ask us to do something that we were saying yes, yes, yes.
That was a moment where it was really evident that there was always gonna be one more thing they were gonna want you to do.
At some point, you had to say no.
That was the birth of no.
Let's keep things rolling here, Tab.
"Grunge rockers Pearl Jam."
We don't have time to explain the puzzle to you, but we'll be back.
Shit got fucking crazy.
- Who are Pearl Jam?
- Right.
This is MTV's "Smells Like Grunge" countdown.
I was just screaming for anything.
I wanted something of Eddie's.
And they gave me the wine bottle.
What did you think of the show?
It was fucking so awesome.
Could you do a Week in Rock open for us?
What is that?
We're just about to launch
MTV in Latin America.
I don't know if you feel comfortable doing a couple of l.D.'s for us...
- Sure.
- Sure.
In  Spanish. So if you could just hang on. Josh.
Pearl Jam.
MTV.
What do you think grunge means?
I don't even say that word.
Really?
All your friends are talking about is Pearl Jam.
Pearl Jam. Pearl Jam.
Pearl Jam. Pearl Jam.
I've always hated their band.
The first Pearl Jam record came out two months before the Nevermind record, so it turned into a Pearl Jam versus Nirvana thing.
Nirvana's Kurt Cobain made some rather disparaging remarks about Pearl Jam's music, which he thought was too commercial to be truly alternative.
I was so naive and fresh when we first came out, singing and opening up, and then everyone just looked at it from a cynical point of view or started copying it.
Eddie Vedder joins
Creed front man Scott Stapp.
Eddie Vedder is attempting to rip out Scott Stapp's larynx with his bare hands.
The group is called Pearl Jam.
I'm talking about Pearl Jam.
Pearl Jam. Pearl Jam. Pearl Jam.
Pearl Jam. Pearl Jam.
Pearl Jam. Pearl Jam.
Pearl Jam...
Hi. I'm Tabitha Soren with "MTV News."
Pearl Jam will become the second
Seattle band within a month to enter the Billboard pop albums chart at number one next week.
Since its release a week ago,
Vs. has sold 950,000 copies.
A million.
You know, what's a million?
I'm having a hard enough time with one right now.
We played "Saturday Night Live" the second time, and I remember talking to Stone the next day, and he said, "What did you think of Daughter?"
And I thought in my mind, we played Daughter?
So I essentially blacked out on TV.
And that's how I dealt with how big we got, kind of checking out and partying a lot.
I bought into the myth, and it was killing me.
The last time I talked to Kurt, we both agreed together that we were not going to participate in the Time Magazine.
Neither band was going to participate in the Time Magazine interview, and we didn't, and then they put me on the fucking cover anyway.
I mean, sure, I could read it, you know, and I read it.
I read it on the airplanes.
But I don't take it seriously.
If I want to find out anything,
I'm not gonna read Time Magazine.
Time Magazine was just, you know, your parents' magazine or the magazine that's in a doctor's office, and I just thought,
"We've been swallowed up by the mainstream,
"and no one's gonna want to listen to us."
I'm not gonna read Newsweek.
I'm not gonna read any of these magazines.
I mean, 'cause they've just got too much to lose by printing the truth.
You know that.
How were you going to survive and not do something wrong, not piss someone off?
You know, now you've sold too many records, but these people are so happy to hear your music, but these people hate you now.
And... And these people love you so much they want to kill you.
So how do you relate to any of these people from where you are?
Yeah, I think the one that
I wanted to get impersonal with was No Code because of stalker problems and built a wall in front of the house because... Because why?
Because I had been open and honest and intimate in lyrics, that seemed really strange.
Now I'm having to build a wall in front of the house.
I mean, that wall...
It saved my life.
Not because of privacy or anything, but literally, because someone drove, trying to drive into the house at 50 miles an hour.
So, you wonder what happened or how did it mutate into this kind of situation?
You'll have to edit this part.
The young musician who made grunge music popular had become an overnight spokesman for many disaffected young Americans, as his fans tried to sort out what it was that caused him to take his life.
I was trying to, like, with my eyes trying to tell them, "Don't hurt me."
And what's all this nonsense about how terrible life is?
A young girl who stood outside his home in Seattle with tears streaming down her face said,
"it’s hard to be a young person nowadays.
"He helped open people's eyes to our struggles."
Please wipe the tears from your eyes, dear.
You're breaking my heart.
I'd love to relieve the pain you're going through by switching my age for yours.
I was trying to call him because I'd read something he said, that he couldn't keep it real, and I just wanted to tell him, "Listen,
"you don't have to do anything
"anybody fucking tells you to do.
"Just stop fucking playing, cancel all your shit,
"and don't do anything."
I had a whole thing
I was going to tell him, but I never got a chance.
Sometimes people elevate you, you know, whether you like it or not.
It's real easy to fall.
I don't think any of us would be in this room here tonight if it weren't for Kurt Cobain, so...
People think that we're whining or crying about success if we're just really trying to tell you that there's some intense pressures and really some things that could be helped.
He resonates in my life in this... It always comes up, like, around a campfire or playing music with a few guys he had known in a garage for no particular reason.
I always just think,
"He would have...
"He would have liked this."
I really like him.
I think he's a nice, really nice person.
I didn't like him a lot then, when I was talking shit about him all the time, but now I can...
I can appreciate him, you know.
I mean, I've realized that, you know, the same people that like our band like their band, so why create some kind of feud over something?
He made us think about everything that we did, you know.
His critique of us early on sure kept us on good behavior.
In  terms of everything that we did, we thought,
"Okay, why are we doing this?"
If we're good now, it's partly because of him.
It's not like you're friends or anything.
I mean, I can consider him a person that I really like.
I mean, we've had a few conversations on the phone, and I really like him.
I think he's a nice, really nice person.
Yeah, I remember the sound of his voice, but I don't remember what we talked about.
Just normal stuff.
It was just real...
Just real normal.
I haven't let myself change, but the way people see you changes, and that's not in my hands, that's not in my control.
And maybe what is in my control is not doing interviews, or not being on the TV, and not anything to kind of glorify your face or position.
I was talking about this band being a bit more faceless, and it can be done, you know.
Pink Floyd and...
I mean, it can be done.
Ed couldn't be anonymous, and it was affecting him.
So I think psychologically, he needed to take control of something.
So then he was like, "Okay.
I can have control over music."
I felt that anything that we put out was highly representative of me, because I was kind of becoming the most recognizable guy.
Vitalogy was the first record where it was like we were making a record in a different way.
I was writing a few songs, but all of a sudden everybody was starting to write, and he was writing more, and I was like,
"Wait a minute, you know.
I'm the guy.
"You know, let me get in there and do this thing.
"I know how to do this thing."
And at the time I thought,
"This isn't our best record."
The dynamics of the band of how they have changed to who was "in power, "
Stone early on,
Ed now.
As much as I'm excited to play,
I'll cop to it, it's a surfing tour.
I plan on having a surfboard with me at all times.
That was a big worldwide tour.
I think it was the first time we went to Australia.
It was a challenging time, to kind of go,
"I don't know if we're the same band right now,
"but we might be a different band right now,
"and maybe they'll like the new band."
Jeff and I have always had this adversarial relationship.
It’s all been muted now because what we thought of as our new band that we might try to control together immediately was taken over by Ed.
But we learned the greatest lesson of all, which is just as you're fighting over the scraps of control, you meet somebody with so much artistic energy that your argument becomes pointless.
We were always kind of going towards something else.
I think we wanted to be more like Zeppelin.
I think we wanted to be more of a chameleon type of band.
We didn't want to be locked into, like, a real specific style.
But the business aspect of the record company, it's all about fucking making money now and fucking wind this thing up, and you know, they could care less if it's gone tomorrow because they've got something coming up the fucking backside that's gonna replace it.
And we were just trying to figure out how we were gonna be a band down the road, you know.
Like, there wasn't anybody to go to at that point, you know, not until we met Neil.
The first time we got asked to play The Bridge School in San Francisco, we just made a connection there.
He said,
"Hey, man, thanks for doing this."
And a few months later, he asked us to go to Europe with him.
Like, it all seems like...
All seems like a dream to me.
Doing a record with him, we did Mirror Ball, it was so educational, listening to him talk about his career.
Playing in stadiums one minute, and then the next time he's playing in clubs, and then he's playing in medium-sized places, but all along, he's doing whatever he wants to do.
His point is to kind of roll with the punches.
I'm happy to finally have an adult in my life that leads by example.
I've had some crazy adults in my life.
So it's about time I got one that inspires me.
I hope Neil’s feeling feisty tonight, and speaking of feisty, some smart-ass who arranged the tables put our table right next to
Ticketmaster's table over here.
So I predict a food fight by the end of the evening, and I would recommend to the classy people over there to scoot away or join in.
Maybe we should all join in while we got them right here.
In  the United States, the hit rock band Pearl Jam has taken battle against what it claims is the greed of the entertainment industry.
It’s tackling the high cost of buying from the country's biggest ticket agency, Ticketmaster.
All the band wants, it says, is a fair deal for the fans.
We don't want to be doing a press conference.
We want to be playing.
The nation's top rock band is accusing the biggest ticket distributor in the business of unfair practices and price-gouging.
If they don't agree to Ticketmaster's terms, they can't perform.
A spokesman insisted
Ticketmaster never told any promoter not to book Pearl Jam.
He dismissed the band members as,
Last month, the band took the extraordinary step of filing a complaint here at the justice department.
When you're on that big of a stage, it's not in your control.
You're sort of playing a part to some larger drama.
We had a very specific problem with Ticketmaster, and they asked us to come and testify about our specific problem in regards to a larger lawsuit that was being brought, but it's always been perceived as, like, we were trying to break up Ticketmaster.
The subcommittee will come to order.
We are honored to have representatives of both Pearl Jam and
Ticketmaster here with us today.
The key question is whether recent contractual agreements between Ticketmaster and most major stadiums and concert promoters have violated federal antitrust laws.
Who would like to go first? Stone?
All the members of Pearl Jam remember what it's like to be young and not have a lot of money.
Many Pearl Jam fans are teenagers who do not have the money to pay $30 or more that is often charged for tickets today.
We have made a conscious decision that we do not want to put the price of our concerts out of the reach of our fans.
Mr. Chairman, this is really about choices.
Fans can go from one music store to another to find the best deal on a CD, but they can't go anywhere but Ticketmaster for concert tickets.
Do you think Ticketmaster is entitled to a profit?
I don't think that question matters, you know.
You do have a contract with your record company, and it is exclusive. Is that correct?
I think this line of questioning is very strange, because it seems like what does that really have to do with anything?
The issue at hand here is whether Ticketmaster is a monopoly, not whether...
Or to have anything to do with our business or what our relationship is with our manager.
Let's just get it on the record.
- Mr. Horn.
- Now I gather...
Do you want these guys to play Long Beach or not?
What I want is a record.
What I want is a record here.
Let's just get it on the record.
A record here.
First of all, I want you to know
I think you're just darling guys.
This is so great.
When we got involved in this issue,
I did not know very much, and still don't, about alternative music.
After some requests, I tried to learn some Pearl Jam songs, but I think it's a little beyond me.
Having been a fan for many, many years,
I don't want to become something that I despised as a kid, you know.
When my staff told me we were going to have this hearing,
I have to tell you,
I knew nothing about grunge, but I know a lot about the importance of fairness and equity, and I think you've raised some very important questions.
Who were the powers-that-be that wanted to be perceived as putting some pressure on Ticketmaster?
It’s like, you know, those are back-room,
David Lynch-ian guys in hotel rooms who need oxygen tanks, darkened L.A.
That's who I always think of.
It’s like, he understands.
Almost a year after picking its fight with Ticketmaster,
Pearl Jam remains alone among major rock bands who could have joined the Seattle group in its boycott but never did.
It’s just a few lonely voices because not many of the other groups joined up.
There's no deal between us and Ticketmaster.
We're not playing
Ticketmaster shows this summer.
Shows where we're going outside of cities and building shows from the ground up, that was a really tough time.
We're trying to find how many counterfeit tickets are out there.
We saw some people selling tickets.
So we bought them.
We were all psyched.
And then we got up to the door, and they said they were counterfeit.
Right now, we're trying to figure out how to help these kids get into the show.
Let me just leave you with this observation.
When art is successful, it unavoidably becomes a business.
The question then is whether artists have an inherent right to control the limits of their business and how it relates to the growth of their art.
The answer, I'm convinced, is that artists do have a right to that control.
I think we've always just fallen into ways of doing things the way we felt they should be done, and whether they were right or whether they were wrong, they were just our ways of doing it.
I've never heard of Pearl Jam,
I must admit.
That makes two of us.
And here we are in your fine place.
And what are the things that you've kept that remind you of the experience the last 20 years with the band?
I'm sure I've kept the least amount of things of anyone in the band.
How I've always justified that is, one, I lose everything all the time.
So it comes naturally to me.
And two, Jeff Ament keeps so much, and really, if all I have to do is just maintain my good relationship with Jeff Ament,
I can always go over to his house and look through all the stuff that he has, and celebrate his keeping of the things.
Pearl Jam in Mexico City memorial... These are some of the Mexico City coffee cups.
So that's a... it’s a little faded now.
Because you use it.
This one clearly needs to go back in the dishwasher.
Here's something.
Mike McCready just sent me this.
It’s the demos from
Temple of the Dog.
I've got a few...
This is a box full of Pearl Jam
"Touring Band" DVDs.
And that's 2000.
I don't know why they're still there.
I haven't... I'm not sure...
And a few Pearl Jam CD’s here, the kind of stuff probably
I had someone bring by because I was trying to remember how to play some songs.
I don't know if there's anything else in here.
Let's see here.
Yep, that might be it.
There might be something in the basement.
Look it. There's a Grammy.
I knew this was gonna come in handy.
You can tell how I feel about the Grammys.
You know, at the Grammys,
I was having kind of a bad day.
I was getting thrown out by security people for trying to sneak a cigarette in the backstage, and you couldn't go out because of all the photographers there.
So that was part of it.
Spin the Black Circle, Pearl Jam.
I hate to start off with a bang.
I'm gonna say something typically me on behalf of all of us.
I don't know what this means.
I don't think it means anything.
That's just how I feel.
I remember arguing with tons of my friends, because my friends were like,
"Man, what the fuck was your boy doing?
"Like, if he doesn't want to be there,
"then he shouldn't be there, " and kind of all this stuff.
And I was kind of like,
"Fuck you, man."
Like, what does it mean, you know?
Like, are you fucking kidding me?
You get an award for art?
Like, that's just ridiculous.
Like, if I would have had the balls,
I would have said the same thing.
I should have started a fight right there.
It would have been much more exciting.
What would all these young people be doing if they had real problems like a depression or Vietnam?
Do they work at all?
Are they contributing anything to the world they're taking so much from?
It was kind of around the Ticketmaster tour.
The four of us, Jack, Stone,
Jeff, and I were traveling in a jet.
Eddie was traveling in a van, doing a radio show, and then driving all night to the next show.
So there was a huge physical disconnect, but also an emotional one.
And nobody was kind of really talking.
He was trying to maintain something that was more a Fugazi or do-it-yourself type mentality.
You know, and we loved them, but we weren't that band.
We needed to sit down with him and go, "Look,
"are you embarrassed by us?
"Do you want to be in the band anymore?"
We thought we were going to break up essentially.
I thought... I thought that was going to happen.
And we all agreed we needed to take some time off and figure it out.
That's highway 200, and we're like right...
We just passed Ovando.
We're headed towards Lincoln.
And then we just keep going to the northeast.
That's the spot right there,
Big Sandy.
That's your hometown?
This is the middle of nowhere, man.
I was sort of pissed off at my parents for making me live in this desolate...
I mean, I was hundreds of miles away from anybody that I could even relate to.
I was ready to leave at about 14.
A couple trips to California, like, really fucked me up.
My mom's brother, my uncle Pat, he had long hair, and he had tapestries up in his room, and he'd put the headphones on me, and he'd play, like,
Abraxas by Santana, and it would just blow my mind.
I remember just getting, like, a huge buzz off of it, like, and getting, like, kind of emotional.
And I would go out and try to look for records.
It was really hard to find. There was no record store in our town.
So I started subscribing to
Circus and Cream magazine, and my uncle got
Rolling Stone magazine.
And I mean, you'd study that stuff.
In  a lot of those punk-rock records, you could really hear bass, you know.
You could fucking hear Dee Dee on those Ramones records.
You know, he was on the right side, and Johnny was on the left side.
So if you were trying to learn the songs, you could just turn the dial over to the right side and learn all of Dee Dee's parts.
I moved to Seattle in 1983, and I think all I wanted to do up to that point was to live in a bigger city where there was more like-minded people and more culture and a punk-rock show, if I wanted to go see a cool movie.
There were all these...
You know, "Eraserhead."
I was hearing about all these movies that I never got a chance to see.
I don't know if it was the first contact, it must have been, was from Jeff, and I do remember there being a...
A real connection made on the phone, and talking about artwork, how he was into artwork, and your responsibilities as a band member or working with people that get that it's not a slacker job, or it's not a rock star thing, or it's not... it’s about music. it’s about art.
It’s about...
We had all these things in common, which is probably why we ended up roommates when we first started touring.
I think that we just connected and became really close.
It’s amazing now to look back.
I remember when
Ed first came to town.
It seemed like it was something that he had been kind of waiting for his whole life, and it was obvious within the first few minutes that it was something that
I'd been waiting for also.
I think it would be a very easy band in some ways for us not to be a band, and nobody can really kind of put a finger on what it is that, you know, kind of keeps us coming back together, but it's a strange marriage.
I met Mike McCready when I was in seventh grade.
He was good.
You know, he played solos and had a whammy bar and, like, could do the...
And all this stuff.
I had lived in Los Angeles, trying to make it in my band
Shadow in 1986 for a year, and I paid to play, paid to play at The Roxy,
$700 on a Sunday night in December.
And there was five people there.
So I struggled and went through that, and I gave up playing music for a little while, moved back to Seattle and said,
"I can't. I'm done."
And then, lo and behold, I get a call out of the blue from Stone.
I got to see him play at a party one night when he was just sitting around and playing lead guitar with somebody and was just, in the way that he does, unconsciously, giving you these jolts.
He's channeling stuff that sounds like it's coming from the fucking heavens, but I think it's coming from inside.
There's something spiritual about the way he plays.
And that's when he's in tune with the good stuff, you know.
As you know, the song Reach Down, which was the second song I wrote for the Temple of the Dog record,
I wanted it to be sort of like a Neil Young,
"Fuck you to the world of people
"who don't want to hear a guitar solo.
"I'm gonna make an 1 1 or 1 2-minute song that's mostly guitar solo,
"and that's gonna be the first song on the album,
"and you can fuck off."
When I heard Cready play guitar,
I was like,
"We're gonna pull it off for real.
"This isn't gonna be a joke.
He can actually fucking play."
Because I couldn't.
He went out of his mind.
This guy's a... he's a fucking rock star.
Like, he's got problems, and we just thought he was a nice little kid.
And he's got something in there, like, he's infected, and that's gonna come out again somewhere. Good luck, guys.
He knows me. That's...
I would say that's 100 accurate.
Eddie said,
"Ask Mike about the drummers."
Ask me about the drummers?
Yeah. He says, "Mike will give you the drummers rap."
Here we go.
We started out with Dave Krusen.
It didn't work out.
Matt Chamberlain, he didn't want to go on the road.
He knew of a drummer named Dave Abbruzzese.
It’s very Spinal Tap of us to have this many drummers.
Jack lrons.
- Good drummer.
- Great look. Good drummer.
Jack was the guy that gave the tape that he got from Stone to Ed.
Ed wanted to repay that favor and say, "Hey, you want to come and try out?"
And we toured with him after we did Yield, and he played on that whole record.
That's when it was starting to get too much for Jack.
He called up and said that he couldn't tour.
We already had a tour booked.
Who can we call that can do that?
Matt Cameron.
Soundgarden had broken up, so Ed called him.
Eddie, what's going on?
And he's like, "Hey, what are you doing this summer?"
Nothing.
We need to leave in three weeks.
- In  10 days, he learned 80 songs.
- They had a list of, like, 60 or 70.
Something crazy like that.
I would just sort of, like, close my eyes, and I'd go like that, and it was like,
"Okay, do I know that song?" it’s like, "No!"
Matt Cameron made us a better band than we've ever been.
When we'd... We'd have to switch, let's say, a drummer or something, you do it out of survival mode.
It’s just like removing an organ.
And when you remove, like, the drummer, you're removing, like, the heart.
So it's like you had a heart transplant.
Binaural is a dark time for me for sure, because I had my Crohn's.
I have Crohn's disease.
I was struggling with that, struggling with addiction.
I was taking pills to take care of that, and then that got out of hand.
For me, it was a struggle, for sure.
In  the early years, we had those transcendent shows where it was just like everybody was drunk, and it was just the "lose your mind" shows.
Everybody lose your mind at once, you know.
It was harder to lose your mind at that point because everyone was more like,
"I'm 32.
"You know, we've got some records out.
"I've got this relationship, or you know..."
We just became more self-conscious and more aware as you do as you're an adult, but it's more difficult to kind of go, "Okay.
"We got to just go out and get crazy."
And around this time,
I think we were...
You know, we were less popular.
I don't think we were doing any press.
We'd have meetings about those things.
It’s like, "How far are we gonna do press on this tour?
"Are we gonna do this?
Are we gonna do that?
"Or are we not going to do any of it?"
And when you don't do any of it and the changing times, you know, you fluctuate, people get over you, you know.
That's probably around that time
Binaural is.
Maybe people were like, "Okay.
We're kind of over these guys.
"What's next?" you know.
But some people stayed with us because we stayed true to whatever our vision was.
How important is commercial success to you?
Does grunge still exist today?
How did the second 10 years happen?
You did survive.
And what are the turning points to you?
Change your position. Moving back.
We still have a problem here.
It’s one of Europe's worst concert tragedies.
The band had stopped playing just before the incident.
Deadly trouble in the shape of a crowd 40,000 to 50,000 strong.
There has been a lot of pushing and pressure up here, and 10 to 15 people have been badly hurt.
We don't know how bad yet.
Tragedy occurred in the rain and mud late Friday night at the annual
"Roskilde Rock Festival" outside the Danish capital,
Copenhagen, when rock fans surged forward during a performance by the American group Pearl Jam.
Fans at the outdoor rock concert packed closer and closer to the stage, ending in a crush that killed nine people and injured three more.
I just wanted to get out of there.
I just didn't want it to be true.
It was happening right in front of us, but I just didn't want it to be true.
And something as horrific and as shocking as people being pulled over the barricade that aren't alive anymore, what the impact of that was on us is, you know, it will never really go away.
From that point on, we rethought everything.
I didn't know what I was feeling, you know.
I think I had such an onslaught of confusion that...
I mean, the last time that I felt like that was when Andy Wood died, and...
I didn't know if I wanted to play music anymore.
You know, I think we kind of quantify everything that's happened to us as pre "Roskilde" and after "Roskilde, " and...
You know, if early on there was the birth or the beginning of "No, " for us Roskilde was the beginning of "What?"
What are we doing?
What do we do to assist the families?
And what have we become?
And what do we...
What do we do to survive?
I think even since Roskilde in 2000,
I think that made everybody get into a real unique perspective on where we were at and how fragile life is, and I think ever since then, every once in a while, we'll just say to one another, like, "Can you believe it?
"Can you believe we're still doing this?"
When I interviewed the band in 1993 for Rolling Stone magazine,
I asked Eddie Vedder if there was an Andy Wood song he would ever be interested in singing.
He said there was one and one day he would sing it.
On the band's 10th anniversary show in Las Vegas, he announced to the group that he wanted to sing Crown of Thorns, one of Mother Love Bone's greatest songs.
And in that moment, the two bands united.
We wouldn't...
We wouldn't mind attempting something that's even older than 10 years.
For Ed to kind of acknowledge the past and sort of say,
"Yeah, this is part of where we came from, " and that he would be generous to Jeff and I and say, "Yeah, of course."
That was another huge, huge gift.
I used to think of Andy all the time, especially when the band got bigger, because I used to think,
"He would have loved to play this place.
"He would have loved to play this place.
"He'd love to play The Garden."
He would have tore this shit up.
And I wrote down on this paper
"Andy and Ed, " just because I think about Andy all the time, and in the creative process,
I always think about how lucky I am to still be able to, like, you know, go in my basement or, like, pick up a guitar and, like, write a song and then manifest it if I want, figure out how to, like, record it or whatever, and that...
That's kind of all he ever hoped for, is just somebody that would just record him and, like, some group of guys that would just, you know, play these songs for him or whatever, and l...
I wish that we could go back in time and be the band for him.
He was playing in those places in his head... for a long time.
So the thing is, is he got to play them.
Andy.
We played a show in Nassau.
I would say three-quarters of the crowd fucking booed us.
It actually really bummed some of the band out.
They were just, like, "I never want to play that song again."
I actually fucking dug it.
It was art.
I remember there was a fireman in the front row, and he was, like, showing me his badge.
Fuck you, asshole!
It was just a bad time in American history in my mind, and we were trying to say what we thought.
When you know the crowd has turned and there are that many people, it just feels like you might not make it out of there alive.
That was Ed really trusting his instincts about a very specific thing that he needed to say, and he wanted to do it in a way that was antagonistic.
I think if you have the opportunity, you have to... You have to take on that responsibility.
You didn't like that one.
It’s great to be in a band where, you know, we're not afraid to do that, not afraid to speak our minds and get booed once in a while.
It's all right.
It was an uncertain time for Pearl Jam, a period when many bands quietly break up and move on.
But from the beginning,
Stone and Jeff had always wanted a band that would last, one that would keep writing and recording music, and that's what Pearl Jam did.
Show by show, they became one of the most dependably unpredictable bands in rock.
Ed has a feeling pretty much everywhere that we play, and it's such a great gauge of, you know, how the crowd's feeling, and that's, a lot of times, why the set list doesn't get done until...
I mean, oftentimes, it's done
10 minutes before we play.
As difficult as it was at different times, where you're like, "We can go out and kill this crowd.
"We can go out and kill them right now.
"Let's just start out with these five songs."
And you know...
"Yeah. No. We're gonna go on,
"we're gonna play this one to start out with."
"We haven't played this one together, but let's...
"We'll work it out backstage.
It'll be fine."
And inevitably, you're so nervous that you go out there and fumble it, and then you're like,
"God! Let me just...
"Let's play a hit, you know."
You know, it would be a lot easier to play a similar set every night.
It would just be so much easier, and yet we can't find it in ourselves to do that.
That's why you see Pearl Jam.
It’s fucking different every night.
Every night it's different.
It’s funny, but lots of those decisions we made, it took 10 years to see why they were good.
In  that regard, you know, mixing our set list up every night, it's the greatest blessing we could have ever done.
The door is so open for us to be who we are every night that we just trust it.
You know, I think that all of us have been totally influenced by the seventies.
We're all, like, products of it, but yet we're not, like, stuck in it.
Our classic guitar heroes, you know, like Hendrix for Mike and, like, Jimmy Page for me, and, like, for Eddie, it's like he totally loved The Who.
The Who was the greatest rock band ever.
It's like all these bands, so in a sense, it's a total tribute to the seventies.
Roger Daltrey wrote me a letter saying would I like to come play, and I told him no way, because that's it.
That's the ultimate.
That's the pinnacle for me, is that band, you know, that arrow on the mod sign, you know.
We have to decide whether or not we're going to remain a circus act.
In  other words, doing what everybody knows we can do and what we know we can do. Right?
Until the band eventually turns into a cabaret act,
- which is inevitable.
- No, that's ridiculous!
Here's me and Johnny Ramone.
I'm wearing a Bob Dole mask.
Uncle Neil.
This is me and Joe Strummer.
And that's the night I met
Jack lrons.
This was hanging in a dressing room.
It was actually the first night
I had met Pete.
I was terrified.
And the first thing he said was,
"I've waited so long to meet you."
Now we're just grateful for our band and who we are and what we've become, and grateful that we finally figured out how to do it.
I think that there was a huge element of our fans that just kind of carried us through a period of time where we were not there all the way.
You see their belief, and even when you don't have it, you go,
"Okay. I've got to figure this out."
Joining the band,
I was super impressed with how in-house everything is.
Like, there's no outside influence going on, you know.
It's like it all comes from the band.
They saved me in a certain way.
You know, we've been doing it for 10 records or 20 years, and I can't think of a show where I ever felt like I was just phoning it in.
It’s always pure stoke, you know, like...
I think that there really is, like, a collective understanding of how lucky and how fortunate we are to still be playing music with the same group of people.
I mean, everybody, you can feel it, and it makes being in a band a joy.
There's a... This communal exchange.
And there's obviously a line drawn between who's on stage and who's in the crowd, but not really.
I fucking loved it.
We were two rows from the front.
It was fucking incredible.
- This was my fifth show.
Pearl Jam are a band for the fans.
"If you love us, stick with us, " and we've stuck with them all the way, because what we get out of them is overwhelming.
These guys flew from Bucharest this morning.
Budapest.
We came from Denver.
- Townsville, Australia.
- London, England.
Took two weeks off from my job, and traveled to nine shows in a row last tour.
There's not another band like them.
Everybody rode the whole crest of a wave with Ten, and it was just the thing to be into, but after that, they've come out a lot stronger, because they didn't play the game.
They took on Ticketmaster.
They were pissed off that people were getting ripped off, and they took on the man, and they could have lost, but they didn't.
I think this band is really only beginning.
There was a rumor that it was sort of gonna be like The Kids Are Alright.
That would be a misconception, because The Kids Are Alright is really super genius, and what we're gonna put out is gonna be really super us.
Hey, Josh. How's it going?
Fuck you, Kevin.
They stay true to fans as well, about them releasing the bootlegs of their albums so that other people can't bootleg them and make a sly penny off it, and that's clever shit.
We're not filming this conversation, are we?
Yes, we are.
Now you're back.
Why do you keep doing it?
I don't know whether they realize exactly how much they have given to us, the fans,
...and how much we really appreciate.
♪ I know I'm a winner,
I know that I'm hot... ♪
Reporter:
This is the Phoenix family.
♪ Straight to the top, gonna make it ♪
- ♪ Gonna make it... ♪
- And with talent like this, these kids are really gonna make it.
♪ Gonna make it, gonna make it, gonna make it ♪
♪ Gonna make it. ♪
- (woman shouts)
- Jay Leno: My first guest...
- Burning up the big screen...
- Academy-award nominated actor...
- "Gladiator"...
- "Gladiator"...
- ...and "Signs."
- All: Here's Joaquin Phoenix.
("I Walk the Line" instrumental playing)
You never played guitar or sang before this?
Interviewer:
Had you ever sung before?
It was completely foreign to me.
When I held the guitar the first time
I didn't know what to make of it.
Joaquin Phoenix,
"Walk the Line."
♪ I keep a close watch on this heart of mine ♪
♪ I keep my eyes wide open all the time ♪
♪ I keep the ends out for the tie that binds ♪
♪ Because you're mine ♪
♪ I walk the line. ♪
Joaquin Phoenix:
I'm just fucking, like, stuck in this ridiculous, like, self-imposed fucking prison of characterization, you know?
It happened to me young.
It's like the chicken or the egg.
I don't know what came first-- whether they said that I was emotional and intense and complicated, or whether I-- or whether I was truly complicated and intense and then they responded to it.
Then, like, once they responded to it, then I responded to what they were saying.
And, yeah, I utilized it in some ways.
And there's-- I--
I am embarrassed about that.
And that's what a lot of this is about.
I mean, I guess that's why
I agreed to do this documentary is because I don't wanna--
I don't want to play the character of Joaquin anymore.
Like, I want to be whatever I am.
And my artistic output thus far, when I am really fucking honest with myself, has been fucking fraudulent.
And now for the first time
I'm doing something that is-- whether you like it or not, it really represents me.
And maybe that's fucking stupid, to want to be represented, to care-- I don't care.
Not that.
But I don't want to be-- you know, think what you think about me.
Hate me or like me, just don't misunderstand me.
That's it.
Hello.
Joaquin: I love those rare pure moments in between action and cut, but everything else was fucking misery to me.
We talk about it being this creative expression, and really you're just a fucking puppet.
You're this dumb fucking doll that wears what someone else tells you to wear, stands where someone else tells you to stand, says what somebody else tells you to say.
That's not expression.
That's not creativity.
And I have more to offer than that.
My purpose on this earth is not to interpret somebody else's words or to try and capture a moment for somebody else.
It's to bring what is inside me out.
Everybody in life has at one point said,
"I don't like my job.
I don't like who I am.
I don't like the people that are around me.
I want something better for myself," that "I have a dream."
I think everyone's about that at some point.
- My dream, my responsibility...
- (growling)
- (barks)
- ...is to mess up-- guys, we're shooting.
- Hey, Antony?
- Yeah?
My man, can you get the dogs out while we do this interview, please?
Antony: I work for Joaquin essentially as a general assistant.
I've known him for 15 years.
He's a friend.
We've made music together.
I've cooked for him. I've cleaned.
- (piano playing)
- ♪ You see, I've been walking backwards ♪
♪ Up steepest of hills ♪
♪ The tears can't wash away ♪
♪ What money could not buy. ♪
This is where I live at the moment.
It is a sober living, um, and I am one of the residents here after having a problem drinking too much.
Not too much-- well, too much.
Drinking too much and getting into trouble.
Hopefully working on this, if it's cool with, you know, you, Case, and just to kind of get somebody to assist and we can throw him some bread now and again and stuff.
I met him when I played a concert.
I used to play in a band and I played a concert at the Whisky A Go Go here in Los Angeles.
We started to become friends when we both got into motorbikes.
And you got one as well, and we all started riding around on motorbikes in New York.
That was, in a way, where we sort of, like, hit it off as friends.
If you can call it that.
Smile, dude.
This is going to be fucking great.
We're going to go to San Francisco.
We definitely need you there.
Carey Perloff:
We were asked to create an evening at Davies Symphony Hall to honor Paul Newman who had just passed away and to raise a lot of money for very chronically ill children.
Casey Affleck: When did you find out you were gonna come here?
It seems like this afternoon, but it couldn't have been.
Last night.
Yeah, last night about 10:20
I got a text from Joaq.
- I'm playing a hit man?
- Yeah.
- Bullshit.
- Yeah.
Are you fucking serious?
I'm not being typecast in my fucking theater debut
- when I'm also retiring.
- (siren wailing)
That's what fucking stup-- that's fucking stupid.
There he is!
How are you?
Joaquin: It's all of us coming together which is exciting.
That's a cool thing, is for-- this is kinda like... it's kinda like the dream team.
I love you.
- Okay, that's all.
- This is the world-- that's-- "The World of Nick Adams" is the piece?
- Yeah.
- Are you playing Nick, Case?
He has it much worse.
He never leaves the stage.
Oh, I see, start there.
I remember I started saying some lines and he kinda stops me, he whispers at me and he goes,
"Hey, man, I didn't know we were supposed to do it in an accent."
"What do you want to eat, Al?"
"I don't know--"
Why are you doing an accent?
I'm not.
"I don't know. What do you want to eat, Al--" oh no.
So I tried to do the scene and about halfway through it he's like, "Dude, you're doing it in an accent now." I'm like, "I'm not!"
"I'll have the roast pork tenderloin with applesauce and mashed potatoes."
Are you doing an accent?
No, I'm not.
Joaquin: I'm fucking stressed because I just feel the fucking-- just the fucking obligation is not on you.
You don't have the pressure of fucking hundreds of kids that are getting this funding for this fucking play.
So that if the performance isn't received well or if I'm not received well, that it comes back-- that it's bigger than me.
All you have to deal with is me.
You don't see me complaining.
It's like fucking Sean said, we're here for the kids.
That's what it's about.
You're not. You're here for me.
Just help-- just do that.
Dude, this is the last thing that I'm doing and you're thinking about yourself as the lead, instead of thinking about what this really is, which is my last moment.
I wasn't thinking about myself.
I never thought-- it never crossed my mind.
You're acting with fucking everybody.
You get to do a scene with fucking Hanks.
You do a scene with fucking-- with Sean.
You do a scene-- you're gonna get to stand there when fucking--
Jack's up there doing his thing.
And, with all due respect,
I'm with fucking
Danny De Vito.
Why did you have him put it on the card for?
That's the dinner. You get that at 6:00.
See, it's 10 to 6:00?
- That clock says 6:00.
- Yeah, it's 10 minutes fast.
- (audience laughs, applauds)
- The clock says 6:00.
Jerry Penacoli:
Joaquin, how are you, my man?
Nice to see you again.
Hey, Casey, how are you?
- What's up? How are you?
- Good to see you.
Listen, I want to take this opportunity also to give you an exclusive and just talk a little bit about the fact that this will be my last performance as an actor. I'm not doing films anymore.
- Are you serious?
- Yeah.
Reporter:
Joaquin Phoenix done with acting?
Listen, I want to take this opportunity also to give you an exclusive and just talk a little bit about the fact that this will be my last performance as an actor.
I'm not doing films anymore.
That's what he told our Jerry Penacoli.
Joaquin, say it ain't so.
The phone has been ringing off the hook.
The emails are out of control.
Sue, "Two Lovers" will be my last press stuff that I'll do.
And I'm not acting anymore and I'm doing this hip-hop record.
♪ And all the world is green ♪
♪ So pretend that you owe... ♪
It's not hard enough to make a transition and I don't need my fucking brother-in-law
- making it more difficult.
- If you wanted this to be handled better then you should have fucking talked to your publicist.
You should have had a press release, but you don't want to talk to anyone like that because you don't want to deal with any of that fucking bullshit.
So then don't deal with that bullshit, but what happens is when you walk down a red carpet, you have to answer the fucking questions on your own.
I didn't know what you wanted me to say, man.
- (both laughing)
- Casey: This is you, dude.
Joaquin:
I love it, man.
That's what motherfucking retirement's about.
- Playing by our own rules.
- I know, I know.
- Are you ready?
- (piano playing)
Fine.
But my shit smells, dude.
Lar, out!
Antony:
What about if they laugh at you?
Joaquin:
I've been laughed at before, man.
I mean, have you seen some of the movies I've done?
Reporter: Joaquin Phoenix announced his retirement today.
Reporter #2: Phoenix announced that he was retiring from acting.
Phoenix has announced he is retiring from Hollywood...
He is a former Oscar nominee who walked away...
...may be calling it quits right in the prime of his career.
...leaving Tinseltown...
We're hearing that he's done.
Patrick Whitesell: If you're telling me
"I cannot act anymore," right,
I think it'd be a shame.
But if you're saying
"I just don't-- don't send me any scripts.
I just want to be shut off to it,"
I think that's a mistake, because I think it is something--
Yeah, of course, but within reason.
Yeah, no. You know.
So there's, um... what?
The one that's--
♪ There goes fame like a train ♪
♪ Speeding faster than bullets, everybody's moving back ♪
♪ Arms flying up on some "no sir," backs is breaking ♪
♪ And times were tinkered, we'll all go drinking ♪
♪ Time to go away when the workers streaking-- ♪
Reference to retiring.
♪ Nobody else had the guts to stand up and not give a fuck ♪
♪ And walk out on all that love... ♪
Woman:
That one's better than the first one.
♪ It's a drug, this whole fame game ♪
♪ Gonna plug your lame shit on sofas with David Letterman ♪
♪ Worse yet, Jaybird get to singing you to welcome death ♪
♪ But you see, the fucking thing is
I'm gonna get up ♪
♪ And dust myself off again ♪
♪ You can do this, Joaquin, with the help of your fans ♪
♪ With the help of your fans. ♪
Joaquin:
So I started with this piano...
This'll be how the bass...
♪ Take it all, kid, don't you wanna get rich? ♪
♪ Your mother got a stage, now get your ass up on there, kid ♪
♪ If you wanna make the crew happier than shit ♪
♪ Then you'll shut her ass up, you little son of a bitch. ♪
Hey, Tom, it's Nic.
Uh, yeah, I'm calling about coming in tonight with J.P.
Yep.
And do you have a mike if he wants to perform?
Emcee: You got the home boy
Joaquin Phoenix about to kick some rap for you all one time.
- Let's go, brother.
- (cheering)
- (rapping)
- (crowd chatting)
- I liked it.
- Thanks, man.
I thought,
"So fuck them," right?
And J.P.-- oh, Joaquin Phoenix or Johnny Cash, whatever the fuck his name is.
I made it to the point in my career where I didn't have to, like, impress or show people.
They just knew and I think
I grew comfortable in that and I thought that
I could just, like, jump into this and have the same impact, but...
Man:
They weren't seeing it, but you have to give people time, you know?
And maybe they were seeing, you know, the movie actor up there rapping and...
But-- but my-- right, but there's nothing about the fuck-- the lyrics, there's truth if they just would have just fucking listened.
♪ Billing be top, kid be rocking the star ♪
♪ Flash cars and bulbs taking over his whole fucking yard ♪
♪ Times is crazy, mothers be packing up their babies ♪
♪ Papa'd be Swayze, lit up on some Johnny Blaze shit ♪
♪ Billy Crudup got the stage shit,
I never try to play this ♪
♪ All I ever needed was a band of people screaming ♪
♪ Calling out from their cars and their windows, what they're staring ♪
♪ And peering in to get a creep at this crazy motherfucker ♪
♪ Tearing up the screen and always paparazzi ducking ♪
- ♪ Stepped away from the light, it wasn't right-- ♪
- Yeah yeah.
♪ Took the bull by the horns,
I ain't gonna give up the fight ♪
♪ Tonight's my night and any motherfucker that wanna be-- ♪
- No no, I changed it.
- That was great.
- That was great.
- No, I don't need you.
- No, I mean, but it was--
- I know, but what I'm saying is if you listen-- that's what I'm saying, your reaction, "It was great," you felt it. They didn't, because they were preconceived.
I feel like this is out of my control now.
Like, who's fucking producing this shit?
I don't know where the-- I need a-- a producer who can fucking explode the fucking eggshell away and let the album start its life.
So, Dre.
Dre?
I mean, he's like one of the best out there.
Dude, I'm saying if Dre fucking--
- Dre's gonna be into it.
- Okay.
But then it's just a Dre album.
I don't know.
D'you know what I mean?
What about-- what about, what about, what about Rick Rubin?
So the bad news is Rick Rubin and Dr. Dre are both booked.
- Are you serious?
- Yeah.
- Um, all right.
- But the good news is
- that it looks like P Diddy might be available.
- Oh, no way.
So I've got a call into his people right now, but I just wanted to touch base before I went any further.
Joaquin: You know, all you can do is do something for yourself, believe in it, love it and then fucking put it out in their world and hope that people like it-- love it.
I just talked to Carline at Bad Boy.
Yep, so he'll meet with him?
Diddy's going to be in New York this weekend, so we can-- and he wants to meet with you.
Well, I'm just gonna let him know that we'll know sometime between Friday and Sunday.
It might just be last minute.
You might get there
Thursday night and Friday I might get a call and you might have to see him Friday.
No, I understand.
We'll just be there.
Hopefully we can get them two together and get them to meet up, but I'm not promising anything.
- So I go to fucking New York--
- And we wait for her to give us a call.
It's like-- we'll make it work whenever Diddy's available.
This is fucking ridiculous.
- Good?
- (groans)
It's good.
♪ New York, New York, it's the captain speaking ♪
♪ Buckle up, sit tight, we about to kick the streets in ♪
♪ Start from scratch, no, it ain't a thing, man ♪
♪ I come with Diddy and I keep on creeping creeping ♪
♪ Creeping. ♪
So is this true?
You're done?
You're just-- you're going straight for the music?
- Yeah.
- Wow.
Yeah, I really want it to be like a hip-hop "Bohemian Rhapsody" kind of thing, you know?
I'm wanting it to be epic.
Epic is good.
Epic is-- it's good.
Epic is-- epic is epic.
TV: Too big to burn up in our atmosphere, these pieces of ice and rocks come hurtling down on an unsuspecting metropolis.
Well, it's Sunday afternoon and I haven't heard nothing.
Can you just call them and find out what's going on?
Do the snow angel, dude.
I can beat you.
Do the snow angel.
Do the fucking snow angel.
Dude, do the fucking snow angel.
Do the snow angel, Lar.
Do the fucking snow angel, dude.
Do the fucking snow angel.
Dude, do it.
Look at mine.
Look at mine.
Look at mine, dude.
- That's bad.
- Huh?
You're fine.
Dude, you only have wings!
His angel doesn't have fucking legs.
Look, you don't have any leg--
- I don't think you have balls.
- That's a funny bit.
You know, the big YouTube video is just a little midget-- a little midget Indian being like--
They think everything is funny.
Have you seen their shows?
And they got-- there's one--
I wish I could remember what the fucking song was.
It's fucking genius.
I can't-- it's so funny.
And the thing is they think they're funny and they don't even hear how they sound.
You know, the accent sounds normal to them.
And the clothes look normal.
They still think it's funny.
It's doubly funny for us.
Whoo!
Whoo.
Freeze-frame.
Ahh-- ow ow!
- You faggot! Busted.
- Ow ow ow!
- You're a fucking--
- Ow, fuck!
Running around like a fucking idiot, dude.
- You got shit on your face.
- Okay-- ow, fuck! Ow!
Nicole: Hey, Diddy can't do it now for a few days, I'm being told.
I don't know, they said maybe we could try for Saturday morning.
I don't know. I don't know if it's going to happen this weekend.
I'm sorry. I wish I had better news for you.
I want to be triumphant, man.
I want to be like--
♪ And I got the blues once again like an old fool ♪
♪ And then I jump down and jump back up ♪
♪ And broke all the rules ♪
♪ I couldn't say yes anymore to their games ♪
♪ I had to say no even if it costs me my sane-ity. ♪
Joaquin: What the fuck is going on?
Who the fuck acts like this?
Nicole: I think he thinks you aren't serious now.
- Why?
- I haven't read it, but I know there's something
"Entertainment Weekly" just printed saying you aren't really quitting and it's a hoax.
They said they had an anonymous source-- someone close to you.
Larry: I don't know too much about all the details, but, man, he got a phone call and that was it.
Casey: It says in quotations,
"He said, 'It's a put on.
I'm going to pretend to have a meltdown and change careers and Casey's going to film it,' says one source who recently worked with Phoenix."
Can you tell me who the sources are for the magazine?
Dude, no.
- You can't tell me?
- No.
- Do you know who they are?
- Yes.
- You do know?
- Yes.
Joaquin: People aren't going to recognize this art because of their own stupid, you know, preconceptions.
I mean, is it that your dream is unattainable or is it that you had the wrong dream?
Joaquin:
This bitch is getting a storm.
She did not even know a fucking storm was coming.
I'm going to fuck her fucking face.
She has no fucking idea.
Hey, honey, my name's Antony.
I was looking for a little bit of company.
Oooh, sit.
I want to smell her butthole.
Dude, if you do nothing else for me, let me smell a girl's butthole, you fucking asshole.
No, you can't call.
You're a fucking idiot, dude.
Why are you hovering over me?
Oh, Brooke--
Brooke, Brooke.
Oh sad.
Look at this.
Oh, Leila, you dirty--
Leila, you dirty fucking little bitch.
Leila, you dirty little fucking bitch.
Oh, Leila, you fucking have no idea.
Yes, I was calling for Tiffany.
So two girls for six?
Okay.
Shut your fucking mouth.
You didn't score it.
I scored it and I stashed it.
You fucking idiot.
You've done nothing for me.
Oh shit, oh shit.
Dude, who was the nigger in charge over here?
- Who was the nigger--
- Just that little bit?
Don't look at it.
No, bitch, I got a whole lot.
You know what?
I already have to shit.
So why don't you go fucking lay down and assume the position, since you're going to be the one that's the receptacle of my doo-doo?
You're going to look back in years on this, when you're old and your kids see this and you're going to be so fucking ashamed of yourself because of the opportunities that were provided with fun literally just to fucking hang out, the fun that we have and you fucked it up because you're-- (sniffs) an idiot.
- (piano playing)
- ♪ When I dream ♪
♪ I dream of you ♪
♪ And if I'm wrong, we'll know it's true ♪
♪ It takes more than sacrifice to keep love-- ♪
♪ It disappears just like the dew... ♪
♪ Dew-www ♪
♪ Well, there's cool water in you ♪
♪ Well, you know that there's ♪
♪ Cool water in you ♪
♪ You know there's ♪
♪ Cool water in you ♪
♪ Well, there's cool water ♪
♪ In you-oo-oo. ♪
You know how many times
I've stood at this fucking window, like, waiting for hookers, just staring?
Imagining what their little buttholes are gonna smell like?
- (blowing nose)
- (phone ringing)
- Answer it.
- It's the girls.
- Yeah.
- Here you go.
Hello? Hello?
Hi hi.
Oh, 11M.
Okay.
Dude, don't film this.
Come on, man.
Ant, come here.
Come here, dude. Show us.
Please come here.
- Show-- show 'em.
- It's a bit shrunken right now.
Girl:
Holy-- oh my God.
Is that like, like not even, like, aroused?
- That's not even aroused.
- Dude, how do you guys know?
Well, look at it.
How do you not know?
- Do you have kids? You should.
- But listen--
Yeah.
- Like this. (snorting)
- Nicole: Hi, J.P. Carline called.
Puff is not even in New York City anymore.
I don't know what to say.
I am so so so so sorry.
But she did say if you wanted to go to Miami right now she promises he'll have time for you.
Joaquin: Yeah, just tell him we're in.
I'm gonna get the fucking CD prepped.
We're getting to the hotel.
I gotta take a shower and shit.
And then we'll be there at 7:00.
It's like 4:30 now. Don't fucking worry.
Man:
We have the nightclub right here, LIV.
- If you guys want we'll get a table.
- Joaquin: How's the pussy?
You obviously haven't seen the club.
It's the sickest club in the world.
- Is it?
- It's right here.
I'm supposed to meet
Diddy tonight.
You're kidding me?
Fantastic, man!
Dude, I'm doing a gig here for sure.
What time is it?
Antony: Where's the other fucking thing over there?
Joaquin:
So I'm gonna go chill at Didd's,
And I don't know what's up.
I don't know if he just wants to chill and have some drinks, listen to music.
I don't know if he's gonna play me some tunes.
I'm gonna just try and be receptive to what goes down.
This is a good night.
I'm fucking feeling it.
Man, I can't fucking believe it.
Um, shit, this is fucking embarrassing.
I literally don't know what to say.
Do I say Diddy?
- Driver: How you doing?
- Good day, man. How's it going?
- Guard: Good.
- Phoenix--
Joaquin Phoenix to see Diddy.
- To see who?
- Diddy.
Mr. Combs.
Sean.
This is it.
Dude, we're late, all right?
Press that thing.
- Did you press it?
- Yeah.
- (beeps)
- (gate creaks)
Hey!
Oh shit.
- Combs residence.
- Hey, this is Joaquin Phoenix.
J.P. And I see a car coming out.
We're a little late.
Yeah, he said he waited here for 30 minutes.
He couldn't wait any longer.
- He just left actually.
- Oh shit, this is him now.
You wanna try him on his cell phone?
- Yeah, I'm gonna-- I'll call him.
- (honks)
Okay, back up.
Fucking back up.
All right, dude, we're gonna back up.
Let-- is this him?
Oh Jesus.
This is so fucking embarrassing.
Back up, back up.
Oh shit, oh fuck.
- (sighs)
- Joaquin: Hi, Carrin-- Carleena?
Hi, this is Joaquin.
Yeah, I was supposed to meet, um-- uh, come over and meet Diddy just now.
And we were late because the hotel...
I just pulled up and there were cars pulling out.
I'm leaving tomorrow morning.
Well, please tell Mr. Combs I'm very sorry and I hope to talk to him soon.
Oh shit.
I just sent Puff a text.
- What was it?
- I just said, "You tell me,
I'll be there wherever you want, sir."
- (rings)
- Oh my God.
"I can meet you in room 1416."
I'm not gonna fucking freestyle, dude.
That's why
I wanted the iPod.
Dude, please, if you can't take this seriously-- just chill.
I think you should knock again.
Shut up!
Knock again.
Hey, man, it's Joa-- Joaquin.
- All right.
- What's up?
What's up, dude?
Hey, man.
You were supposed to meet me at my house like an hour ago.
I'm sorry, dude.
We got-- this is my friend Larry.
- Combs: Who's good, man?
- What's up, man?
- Shit.
- What's the name of that movie you just did?
Casey:
Uh, "Jesse James."
No, not that one.
The hot one.
"Jesse James" was kinda wack.
What was the other one?
- "Gone Baby Gone."
- That was the shit right there.
What's up?
Whatch'all doing?
Joaquin: Obviously you had great success in fucking film and music.
And what I want it is to be something... whew!
Do you have money though?
Do you have money to do this?
Like how much?
I mean, I have a little studio, do you know?
Like in my-- I have a garage.
I got Pro Tools set up.
See, that's the motherfucking problem.
When people try to do things, they don't do it the way they do it for their own industries.
When you go make a movie, you don't go-- you got money to make a movie, right?
See, you can't be-- you can't come into this shit disrespectfully.
Because when I want to make a movie,
I'm gonna come with some money.
Oh right. No, I don't--
I don't-- that's the thing--
- Do you have money to do this?
- I'm coming from a pure--
I'm coming from-- what I want it to be is like a place of true exploration.
Can you do that in acting?
Well, I do.
That's the thing, as an actor you're shielded-- it's a different-- you know--
I mean, you know this.
Christ.
No, that's not how they do the thing-- lights, right?
- Lights, motherfucker, lights.
- Yes, how much?
- Craft services.
- Yeah, that costs a lot.
Trailers.
Makeup, hair, D.P.
- That's a good point. I get it.
- Gaffers.
Same thing-- studio, engineer...
- I got it.
- ...me.
- Well-- yeah, you.
- Me.
- The speakers.
- I get it.
Do you have any money?
Um, well, how much you need?
How much you got?
I'm excited to hear this stuff though.
I want to hear if you're really getting busy or you're playing around.
- You know what I'm saying?
- Yeah. I'm ready.
- We're ready.
- Pleasure to meet you.
You too.
All right, well, look,
I have Carline's numbers, so then
- you'll let me know when you're in L.A.?
- Yeah.
- I'll be there in a couple of days.
- Okay. Larry, get up.
(cheering, dance music playing)
My album is out.
It's called "Intuition."
It's the #3 album in the country right now.
My last name is Foxx, my first name is Jamie.
My middle name is Motherfucking.
When you see me out-- when you see me out, just say,
"There goes
Jamie Motherfucking Foxx."
What?
Jamie Motherfucking Foxx.
- Say it-- Jamie Motherfucking Foxx.
- Jamie Motherfucking Foxx.
- Say it--
- Jamie Motherfucking Foxx.
Here's another one:
Joaquin Motherfucking Phoenix.
Joaquin
Motherfucking Phoenix.
Joaquin Motherfucking
Phoenix.
I'm not getting my dick out for these two.
Joaquin:
It's Joaquin to talk to Patrick.
I need to talk to him now because Ben Stiller's at my house.
Dude, what the fuck?
I mean, I told you that I-- this-- I'm not gonna do the-- dude!
First of all, I retired.
All right, dude, let me clean up the fucking mess.
I'm gonna try not to make us all look like assholes, especially you for putting me in the situation.
Good to see you, dude.
Why would I want to do this?
Um, just 'cause... you know, I--
I don't know.
I just feel like it's-- you know.
I love the relationship in there
- and I just thought the--
- Ours?
- Yeah. Yeah yeah yeah.
- Or our characters?
What is the character?
- Ivan. You-- Ivan.
- Ivan?
So you didn't-- you haven't read it yet?
Well, we--
Larry was telling me about it.
But I-- didn't you say
I was Greenberg?
- Who's Greenberg?
- I am Greenberg.
- (laughing)
- Oh great!
Thanks, Lar.
You're Greenberg.
Okay, my bad.
Oh, I see.
Oh shit.
And I was complaining about that character.
I was like-- okay.
No, so I'm Ivan-- er, I mean not--
I'm not gonna do--
I don't want it to be--
I don't want this to be weird at all or anything 'cause, you know.
Ben, I've been with you in fucking meetings before.
- This is not how you talk and you're acting all--
- No.
These guys have seen the worst of me, they've seen the best.
- They've seen the honest me.
- I'm not trying to act any way.
- I'm honestly not trying to act any way.
- You were doing Ben Stiller.
- No, I'm not! Dude, this is who I am.
- You are.
- That's who you are?
- Yeah.
I'm-- what do I have to do, put like a shirt on my head and act weird?
I'm not try--
I'm trying to act weird?
Dude, all the time-- you're doing a movie where it's like a fucking cat will be in a full-body cast.
That kind of humor.
Who gives a shit?
Like how is that fucking funny?
That a fucking cat breaks all of its goddamned bones and has to be put in a cast?
That's funny?
- Do you have a tissue?
- It is pretty funny.
- Um, honestly--
- I have a tissue somewhere.
Sorry.
Just-- it's a dog.
It's the dog?
Yeah. Um...
No no, the dog-- he's talking about
"Something About Mary."
Joaquin: I just found out it was-- this-- this house cost more than I have.
That means if I don't make any bread, six months
I lose this joint.
Larry: Puff said he was going to call in a couple of days.
It's been almost three weeks now and they won't return my calls.
It'll sound desperate if I keep calling, so... we're gonna spin this and make it look like it was my fault and then they can have another chance.
I'm just stuck in the middle here.
Joaquin: At some point you have to take it from your little nest and put it in the world, you know?
You gotta make it real.
That means going through whatever fucking door you can open.
I'm actually trying to figure out what realistically you'd actually do as the next step.
So you do Vegas, then you do like Chicago
- or whatever.
- Norm: Do Miami or something.
- And then?
- And then Russia.
How fucking dope.
"The Hollywood Reporter" says
Joaquin Phoenix's musical career kicks off with an appearance here in Las Vegas tonight.
Phoenix is trying his hand at being a rapper with a CD to be produced by Sean
"Don't call me Diddy" Combs.
After announcing his retirement, actor Joaquin Phoenix-- former actor that is-- is making a comeback as a rapper.
Keeping you in the loop,
Las Vegas, the Oscar nominee picks Vegas for his big rap debut.
He can spend time up on the back ledge here, working that entire "T."
Right now we're just waiting for him to come down do the sound check, make sure that everything's okay on their end and we're good to go.
Sound check?
Fuck these bitches.
Piece-of-shit catwalk for a stage?
And then these cocksuckers want a fucking free show so they can just sit in there and watch sound check? They can suck my dick.
If I forget a lyric or if I hit a bad note or my rhythm gets off, that's on me.
And that's fair.
But why do I have so much pressure in my fucking life and everyone else seems to be having fun and on a free fucking ride?
Can y'all hear me down there?
A.J.!
It's a crazy time and it's real exciting and shit.
I'm nervous, but I'm glad to share it with you.
This is our night.
It's not my night, this is our night.
J.P. is all of us.
- Peace!
- (cheering)
Emcee:
Joaquin Phoenix!
♪ Left up, right up, spin yourself around ♪
♪ Knees down, chest down, fucking on the ground ♪
♪ Get up, tits out, shake 'em all around ♪
♪ Get your ass in the game ♪
♪ Left up, right up, spin yourself around ♪
♪ Knees down, chest down, fucking on the ground ♪
♪ Get up, tits out, shake 'em all around. ♪
- ♪ Can I get a refund? ♪
- ♪ What? ♪
♪ For this life of sin, let me try it again, lemme hit it, man ♪
♪ I want my money back, you know I can do better ♪
♪ If the devil let me off,
I swear to God I'm ready. ♪
♪ Pedal to the metal, heading for the bay ♪
♪ Checking my lines and shit, just prepping for this play. ♪
Matt: "400 gawking tourists held 400 camera phones in the air to document the moment.
Joaquin Phoenix dressed in literal tatters looked out at this and must have recognized it for what it was: the end.
This is the only explanation for his amateur pratfall offstage.
We mock our own failures, as firemen burn a ring around a wildfire to prevent it from getting any closer to the places we live."
But I-- whatever.
All in all, pretty good.
I mean, this one here: crowd pumping their fists.
"The rumor mills are now buzzing that Joaquin Phoenix's retirement from acting and newfound career as a rapper is all part of an elaborate hoax that is being documented by his brother-in-law Casey Affleck.
That doesn't exactly put the matter to rest.
According to media reports,
Diddy is producing
Phoenix's rap album.
At first his rep said she was unaware of his involvement, but later sent ABC News an email saying,
'I cannot comment on this at this time."'
Oh shit.
That's so fucking cool.
Good to see you, man.
What's up?
How's it going? Sit down.
You want some water or something?
Actually yeah. I wanted to talk to you the last time we were together.
When we were doing the Nick Adams show?
But all of a sudden out of nowhere, I turned and you're telling this reporter that you're quitting.
This is it. You're not going to do any more acting and that your performances were over and that you were going to get into music?
I opened my mouth and the fucking words came out.
You know what I mean?
And I didn't expect that.
My music makes people happy.
You know? And it's not about whether somebody else likes it or this person.
I'm not trying to-- you know-- appeal to everyone.
I'm...
You know, it's like... fuck.
To me... that's me, that's you.
Drops of water.
And you're on top of the mountain of success.
But one day you start sliding down the mountain and you think, "Wait a minute.
I'm a mountaintop water drop.
I don't belong in this valley, in this river, this low, dark ocean with all these drops of water."
Yeah?
And you feel confused.
Then one day it gets hot and you slowly evaporate in the air.
Way up-- higher than any mountaintop, all the way to the heavens.
Then you understand that it was at your lowest that you were closest to God.
Because life's a journey that goes around and around and the end is closest to the beginning.
So it's change you need, relish the journey.
Be a drop of running water.
Obey those invisible pulls on your soul-- gravity, evaporation, love, creativity.
It's in the darkest moments is when the cracks allow the inner light to come out.
But the spotlights-- don't let you see the inner light.
But they're-- part of what it's about is that's what it is-- is it's actually about revealing.
Yeah.
Joaquin: I don't really care about things in this world.
You know?
That's not how I am.
To me it's all fucking illusion.
It's all fear and lust.
What do you fear?
You fear being mediocre.
You know?
You wanna be great.
You want to leave a mark.
I want to leave something special on earth.
'Cause that's all that matters-- this earth and what happens on this earth.
"Yes, there are places in the world where dreams are almost dead.
So please, my child, do keep in mind before you go to bed
To dream a dream as big as big could ever dream to be,
Then dream a dream
10 times as big
As that one dream you see.
Then once you've got that dream in mind, please dream a million more.
And not a million quiet dreams, a million dreams that roar,
A million dreams so loud they scream,
So loud they sing and shout!
So super-huge they say,
'Hey, world!
Guess what
I'm dreamin' about.'
I'm dreaming about everything that no one thought to wonder,
Dreams so big that they've got dreams
And they got dreams up under.
And if they say that all your dreams are too big to come true,
You tell them that I told you,
'That's what dreams are meant to do!'
They're meant to make you seem as if you don't know
Up from down,
Because dreams are dreams
And that's why dreams are worth having around."
Pretty awesome book.
Joaquin: Wait, so you call her and she says,
"Oh, we're going to the inauguration and having a ball--"
Maybe after the inauguration it'd be better.
Did they say that?
Did you ask?
No, because I didn't want to push.
I wanted to find out--
What do you mean push it, dude?
I'm doing him a fucking favor.
I'm sure after the inauguration we can go in the studio.
What fucking planet do you fucking live on?
What don't you fucking understand?
I mean, this is fucking ridiculous, dude.
No, it's gonna work out.
- As soon--
- I will work it out!
Yes!
What should I tell her?
Just shut the fuck up.
♪ I'm still here through these years ♪
♪ I don't scare-- ♪
I can't believe this.
Joaquin's watching TV last night and he saw like Hanks and Diddy were at the inauguration.
I think he's pretty pissed
Diddy hasn't called.
Suddenly we've got to go to Washington.
I don't know what we're gonna do when we get there
'cause we don't have a car, we don't have a place to stay.
All we got were one-way tickets.
And nobody even asked him to host a party at the inauguration.
Not even a vice president party so he's not happy about that either.
Joaquin:
How could we not have a car?
What a goddamned fucking joke this is.
Larry:
You know, I got up,
I tried to wake up Joaq to go to the inauguration, and he wouldn't get up.
He just would not wake up.
So we left him there and then came back and he was all pissed off with the once-in-a-lifetime opportunity and he missed it.
And now he's freaking out about not having weed.
So things aren't going well on this leg of the adventure.
TV:
...every step of the way.
That's why
Weight Watchers created the brand new
Momentum program.
Can we call him please?
I beg you.
I mean, it's totally-- it's totally insane that...
Are you crazy?
We have to have patience.
...I should be without weed.
TV: We're going to take a look back at this truly remarkable day.
Can you please clip my fucking hairs, dude?
Don't! You don't have to hold it.
I'll hold it.
- I have to hold it.
- I'll hold it. Don't touch it, just do it.
- Larry: It grows back twice as fast.
- So fucking what, dude?
Quit being so goddamned negative.
Why don't you shave it off, dude?
I'm not going to fucking shave it off.
- It's disgusting.
- Because we're not getting a full trim.
- You're gonna get stubble.
- Larry: We gotta go.
- Why?
- Leo's hosting the first ball.
I do fucking "Reservation Road," it sucks, no nominations.
He does fucking "Revolutionary Road," and fucking gets nominated.
- It's bullshit.
- He's biting your shit.
He didn't bite my shit.
He just fucking got a better thing.
He's luckier.
I won't-- I think we should get rolling.
Well, great.
I'd like a fucking joint and to be anywhere other than Washington-fucking-D.C.
But life is not a Christmas day.
'Cause I don't even give a shit if he does the record or not, dude.
I don't fucking care.
But he said that he wants to do it.
Now everyone's talking about it in the fucking papers.
That's what everyone expects, now I'm in that position.
Honestly, what have you fucking done?
What have we done thus far?
We don't have a fucking flight?
What did fucking EJO say?
What did
Edward James Olmos say?
Said we're fucking... turned into-- 10% of us into water that goes down a stream and emanates into the fucking ocean where we're rehydrated into the fucking clouds and placed back down as snow on the fucking mountain-- on top of the mountain.
That's what it's about.
You know what I mean?
And that's how I'm fucking living.
That's why this is big for me.
That's why who cares if we're filming?
This is about a personal journey.
How many people actually say,
"You know what? I gotta work on me, so I can think about we," and actually fucking do it?
You know what I mean?
This isn't some bullshit thing. This is me changing my life before your eyes to be a fucking positive influence.
We got all this equipment, all the camping gear and food and everything.
And we get way out there, and suddenly the weather changes.
It's snowing.
We're freezing.
And we're on the top of this mountain, and the wind comes up, blows all our shit off into this, like, gully.
We'll never see it again.
And we have to figure out a way to get back.
- What the fuck are you talking about?
- We gotta get back without-- we all gotta survive.
Antony:
Where are we getting back to?
We're in fucking D.C.
- But I'm talking about get back to--
- You mean it metaphorically.
--the comfortable-- yeah, metaphorically.
The comfortable place where we feel good--
- Well, say you're speaking-- say "metaphorically speaking" or else it's fucking confusing.
"What is he talking about?
We're in fucking D.C."
I get where you're going.
- You did not!
- No, everything was cool up to a certain--
- I do though.
- Anton, you did not fucking get it.
Joaquin: If I'm tired and I'm grumpy, you still fucking wake me up.
You know what I mean?
It's like, have the fucking decency to let me be a decent person.
Because I'm the one that's being looked out there publically percep-- being perceived.
Do you know what I mean?
Anton, you can't-- you fuck up a flight; you can't get a goddamned flight.
Dude, if I travel with you guys,
I can't get on the fucking private jet.
Fucking Ben fucking isn't comfortable-- me and Casey can fucking roll. Okay?
Because we fucking know that world.
You guys not only-- you make us look fucking stupid, dude.
Tobey and fucking Leo are on a fucking jet, man.
And we're in this fucking minivan.
I'm in a fucking green rent-a-car minivan.
It's a fucking joke.
This is a goddamned fucking joke.
♪ It's time for me to end this game with a brand-new start ♪
♪ Coming to you live, direct,
I'll fucking tear out my spleen ♪
♪ It's none other than the one and only Joaquin ♪
♪ Bitch, D.C. ♪
Joaquin:
Oh shit!
Fucking smoked.
They're in cahoots.
Son of a bitch.
Fucking smoked!
Look it-- just two fucking weasels.
Shit, they're probably right there just selling the fucking info.
That's why they just left all smiling and shit.
Them wannabe rock stars-- fuck you.
I'll fucking crush you.
I had a private eye follow fucking Anton because I'm pretty fucking sure he's the one that was selling information to magazines, saying, like, that my shit's a hoax or something.
And I just want to fucking crush him.
♪ I heard the call, sirens sounding off ♪
♪ Feeling guilty 'cause my day was spent fucking off ♪
♪ History's perverted me, words don't really comfort me ♪
♪ You've become the epitome of a fucking-- ♪
♪ I made it here despite the efforts of a few ♪
♪ So now it's time to simply say, "Fuck you!" ♪
That's fucking ironic.
Can I come in?
I really don't think you should film this, dude.
I mean--
Ant, dude,
I know it was fucking you, dude.
What was me?
- The press.
- The press?!
I have not talked to the press, dude.
I have not had anything at all, on my life, dude,
- I have not talked to the press.
- Ant, don't fucking do this to yourself.
I--
I can't believe that you could come into my home after all the things
I've done for you.
I tried to give you this opportunity and you fucking betray me, dude-- the one fucking thing.
I did not, Joaq.
Honestly, on my life,
I did not betray you.
I swear on my life, dude.
I have not talked to the press about anything.
Dude, you think it's a fucking joke.
I do not think it's a joke, dude.
Here, is this a joke?
Let me show you this.
This is...
- obviously you.
- Yeah.
That is me, but that's not me--
I'm not talking to the press, dude.
- That's me and Norm.
- I understand that.
I'm just saying that
I am getting information and I already have information and I'm fucking-- and I have this.
I'm not a fucking idiot.
Priority dispatch-- take notice of your healthcare provider.
Um, "amount claimed, 26,000."
What the fuck is that?
- Uh, "to Anton."
- Right?
Yeah, but that's for fucking Tucson, dude.
I'm-- I'm-- I'm going to--
I'm paying that.
I'm already talking to them about that.
- How are you paying that?
- I'm not paying--
- With the fucking money from the press?
- No. I haven't paid it.
I spoke to a lawyer today.
I haven't paid any of that.
I am so fucking cool and open and good to people.
Whatever it is, nothing but fucking love, man.
I have such a-- I just want to fucking put out positive vibrations and then you fucking betray me?
- You betray us?
- I have not betrayed you, man.
- Casey--
- You literally just fucked my life.
You fucked my fucking life, dude.
You fucked my life!
You fucked my life, dude.
I know that you fucked my life.
- I did not, man. I did not.
- You are going to continue-- will you fucking tell him that we know, dude?
Yeah, it seems that you provided information to the press.
Okay, this is what happened, okay?
One day everything's down, dude.
The next day you're furious about an anonymous quote in a magazine that I've never even seen.
I don't know whether to fucking laugh or what to do, dude.
- I'm afraid--
- I dare you to fucking laugh.
I'm not gonna laugh.
I think that you are a fucking selfish, arrogant, worthless cunt.
Do you think that I'm just going to forget about this, dude?
I have gone to Casey every fucking day and said to him
"What can I do?"
He came to me with a paper to sign.
That fucking firstly it was the confidentiality-- which I know we fell out about because I thought it was--
I did honestly think--
- Then you weren't gonna sign--
- But I signed that.
The only thing about that was he's got me walking around with my dick between my legs.
Yeah. Are you gonna look like the idiot in this fucking doc?
Absolutely.
And this is the fucking moment where the fucking good guy wins.
So in some ways, maybe I actually have to fucking credit you, cuntface, because I wrote a fucking new song that was fucking inspired by to fucking crush you so maybe that way--
I mean, that would be the, you know, the fucking irony of course.
This is the fucking... you know, hit, you know, song.
The worst day of my life ends up being the day I evaporate and go up or whatever.
It's nearly ready!
I think if, you know, this is his last film, that he should be respectful with Ja-- you know, with James and the movie company.
After all, these people did make a movie.
Magazines, newspapers,
TV shows, you know, abc.com,
"Rolling Stone."
- Joaquin: No no.
- MTV News.
I'd like to see him just, you know, dress nicely and do his interviews.
But he will.
This is his last premier, his last press junket.
Despite what he says,
I think he'd like to say goodbye in a nice way.
Hey, Carline, it's Larry calling for J.P.
He's in the studio right now working on some tracks. It's ready to go.
I need to confirm the place and the time, so if you could get back to me as soon as possible. Thank you.
I can't talk to Diddy.
And so it's his people, like, I have no idea who I'm talking to and they don't feel like they have to get back to me.
Hi, you've reached Carline at Bad Boy Records...
- Should I leave a message?
- (beeps)
Hey, it's J.P.-- Joaquin.
Uh, I left a few messages, but I haven't heard back.
Just not sure what's going on.
You're dropping the fucking ball with Carline.
She doesn't know what's going on.
And I'm stressed.
No longer is it a funny fucking thing about triumph, but it's like about this dude who's constantly getting squeezed by everybody around him, trying to fuck him over.
And that's the fucking triumph-- that I rise above this shit.
That's the fucking triumph.
- Larry: Well, he's gonna--
- (door slams)
He's definitely gonna call.
All I can do is fucking walk around.
I can just go--
I can go forward.
And you know what?
The fucking cocksucker calls, right?
Hello?
I'm good. What's up?
Sue, I'm not going to New York.
I'm not fucking doing press.
Because I'm going in the studio to record with Puff.
There's no way
I'm going to cancel.
I-- I don't know.
It'll probably be...
I don't know, like a week or something.
We're just starting out.
I have no fucking idea.
It's just the beginning.
Sue, I'm done.
Oh-- fucking hell.
I didn't even see it.
Fucking thing.
You never ever be late.
Never ever be late.
- Woman: What session?
- Uh, Diddy.
♪ As soon as I scream the name ♪
♪ Lost in the-- in the jungles ♪
♪ Offering everything ♪
♪ How much more soul? ♪
- ♪ You burned my heart down... ♪
- What up?
What's up, man?
This is great.
- How long you been standing there for?
- Oh, just a few seconds.
Sorry, buddy.
Good to see you.
- Hi, how you doing?
- That sounds awesome.
- Have a seat.
- (music continuing)
- (phone rings)
- Hello?
Sorry about that.
- No, that's cool.
- So what's up, man?
Just... hanging out, um,
I can't find my fucking tunes.
- What you looking for?
- My C-- okay.
Just making sure
I have my CD.
I thought I forgot it.
- What's going on?
- So what's up, man...
- Nothing.
- ...since I saw you in Miami?
You said that, you know, you was working on some music.
Yep. So I got some stuff, man.
You want to hear it?
- Yeah yeah.
- All right.
I don't know, man.
Maybe we should... start with track 2--
I don't know.
What kind of vibe do you want?
Just play me a hit.
I need to hear a hit, baby.
Uh, I don't-- I don't--
Dude. No, try track 2.
I don't-- this is one of my newer ones.
You know how you listen to stuff and you listen to it for a while so you get bored of it, then you hear the new thing.
So maybe this is worse.
I don't know, but...
♪ Can I get a refund?
What? ♪
♪ For this life of sin, we're not trying again ♪
♪ Let me hit this, man,
I want my money back ♪
♪ I know I can do better if the devil let me off ♪
♪ I swear to God
I'm ready ♪
♪ We was dealt a hand by the man ♪
♪ Upstairs, the one they say that gots the plan ♪
♪ And we never questioned, assumed that he had blessed us ♪
♪ But every day, studied hard just in case he tests us-- ♪
- (song stops abruptly)
- Play me another.
Uh, I don't know.
What's the next--
Um...
♪ Bup bup bah-da-dup ♪
♪ Bup bup bah-da-dup ♪
♪ Bup bup bah-da-dup ♪
♪ Bup bup bup bup ♪
♪ I was merely a child when I was discovered ♪
♪ Had jitters, all meek, you know us children ♪
♪ It was only chance that we met, your scent ♪
♪ Electric, overwhelming all my senses ♪
- ♪ 19 years old, we's reacquainted ♪
- ♪ Bup bup bah-da-dup ♪
♪ Up north with Goose who we filmed with ♪
♪ I thought I lost the taste for you-- ♪
Play something else.
Don't play that one.
♪ Compli-fucking- ♪
♪ Cation ♪
♪ Compli-fucking- ♪
♪ Cation ♪
♪ Compli-fucking- ♪
♪ Cation ♪
♪ Compli-fucking-cation, compli-motherfucking-cation... ♪
♪ Compli-fucking-cation, compli-motherfucking-cation ♪
♪ Compli-motherfucking-cation, compli-fucking-cated ♪
♪ It's so fucking complicated that my mind can't even say it, check it ♪
♪ If everything was this motherfucking complicated ♪
♪ When Leo took the globe and played with-- ♪
No no no, not for you.
That's enough.
That's enough.
So tell me, um-- tell me why you wanted to do this.
I mean why-- why did you want to do hip-hop?
'Cause, uh, um...
You think it's-it's-- it's fucking funny?
You're not like making it, like, you know, like, "Yo, what up?"
You're not-- you don't be doing none of that shit when I'm not around, right?
No... no no. I mean, there's a-- not at all.
Like, that's what this-- just-- gives it a lot of change of fortunes and I think, like, I got to a place in my career when I just started looking back on my life and look at the things that had affected me and like the wrong turns
I could have made and the wrong turns
I did make.
And then I wanted this music just to represent kind of that story and, like, what that is to say that there's this other part of it.
And for me,
I have a connection to hip-hop the way anyone has a connection to any kind of music.
You know?
It's-- I don't-- it's not where you're--
I'm just playing around.
Mm-hmm, all right.
I'm just making sure.
You know, hearing the music,
I like the first two cuts.
Um, I think it went downhill after that, but, you know, that happens with everybody.
You know what I'm saying?
You know, I think you do have some potential.
It just depends on how far you want to take it, you know what I'm saying?
What you're trying to do and how far you're trying to go with it.
Like-- you know.
You know, if it's something you want to do,
I believe anybody can do anything, you know?
If their heart is really in it.
I liked those two songs, you know?
So what's the next move?
- Just... you got a vocal booth?
- What you mean?
How do you want to start it off?
- Start what off?
- Just recording.
Oh no, I'm not--
I mean, you're not ready to record with me.
You know? I mean, you're not at that point yet.
- You know?
- I-- 'cause I was-- because I thought that we were gonna make it work here.
I thought we had a deal...
Okay.
I gotta get back to work, all right?
- All right.
- Love you, man.
Come here.
Give me a hug.
All right?
Can I have my CD?
- Yeah, I gave it to you.
- Okay.
- Oh no, he'll give it to you over there.
- Okay.
Shit.
Okay.
Tell him I'm coming and I'm just going to finish it out like I said I would.
Sue: Well, let me see if I can get Letterman back.
You'll have to get on a plane tomorrow.
P.A.: Please have your photo identification out and available for the agent at the counter.
- Is it true you stopped acting, man?
- Let's start it off, baby.
♪ Yo, we got
Joaquin in J.F.K. ♪
♪ I wanna get my rap career on my way. ♪
Reporter: We spotted Joe Cocker-- wait a minute!
That's Joaquin Phoenix.
The former actor is still claiming to have left the biz of show for good, choosing to focus more on his music career and clearly less on his personal hygiene.
How about M.C. Tobias or Flavor Save?
Jofo?
So the question is will Phoenix rise from the ashes of his acting career and conquer the music industry?
Is the whole thing a hoax?
Will he put out a record?
Most of all, do we care?
Sue: He has a junket for his film "Two Lovers," three one-on-one interviews,
"USA Today."
He is going to do a print and online roundtable.
- Interviewer: Have you seen "Two Lovers"?
- Joaquin: No.
You're not curious about what it's like or what it--
I was there.
But you weren't in all the scenes.
No, it's all right.
I mean,
I'm sure they were great.
Okay, just 'cause most actors that I talk to, they're interested in how the director puts it together and...
No.
Um, did you prepare for this movie?
- In what way? No.
- In like-- did you--
The journalists outside who are waiting to talk to you, they're all wondering if this is a hoax.
They're talking to each other, saying "It's a hoax, it's a hoax."
But it's not.
Like, you seem legitimately interested.
It's hard not to get offended when you sit there with your little smile and say
"We think this is a hoax," because you're talking about my life as if my life's a fucking joke to you.
No, not-- I'm-- you know, I'm not--
I don't mean to offend you.
You can do the Fox News, go "Some may say..."
- Right.
- ...and put it on them.
But it's your question and it's hard not to take it personally and feel like you're saying my life's a fucking joke.
Do you realize really what you're doing by taking this step away from movies?
Being in the limelight as a rapper will be any different?
...that you know your new career is overshadowing the film?
Is Diddy just doing the music or is he working on the lyrics too?
Um, yeah, we're gonna work together.
Photographer:
Lovely, excellent, average, lovely.
Are you really filming just driving in a fucking car?
- Oh oh!
- All right, you gotta stop.
Photographers:
Joaquin Phoenix, whoo! Joaquin!
Joaquin! Joaquin!
Seven minutes to the introduction.
All "Late Show" band members backstage.
- (theme music playing)
- Coming up, Joaquin Phoenix.
Our first guest is a-- how about this?
Two-time Academy Award nominee,
Joaquin Phoenix.
- (band playing)
- (applause, cheering)
Good to see you.
Thank you very much for being on the program again.
You know, it's been three years since the last time you were on the show.
And I will just say right off the top here, you look different than I remember.
You've got a nice beard going and...
- Oh yeah, thank you.
- How is that-- the beard?
- In what way?
- Is it comfortable?
Is it itchy?
Are you pleased with it?
I'm okay with it, but now you're making me feel weird about it.
I'm sorry, I'm making you feel weird about it?
- Is there something wrong?
- I can't be the first one to make you feel weird about it.
Mmm, no I guess not.
See, that's what I'm talking about.
You doing a lot of this?
- That's just a nervous tic, I think.
- Oh, just a nervous tic.
Uh, you know,
I saw this--
I saw this movie the other night-- tremendous.
What a tremendous film.
You and who else is in it?
Uh, what's her name?
Beautiful lovely...
Mmm.
- Gwyneth Paltrow.
- Oh yeah, Gwyneth Paltrow.
- I really enjoyed your work.
- Thank you.
Yeah.
- Are you--
- (applause)
Um... what-- what can you tell us about your days with the Unabomber?
It's just a little joke.
Letterman:
You're not going to act anymore?
- No.
- Huh.
Why is that?
Mmm...
- I don't know.
- (audience laughs)
- I mean--
- So you have given it some thought.
Yeah, it's not really... an easy thing to explain.
It's something that's been a part of my life for a long time, d'you know?
And so it's weird to, like, come out on stage with a bunch of people and just talk about it.
- Mm-hmm.
- D'you know? So.
Now when will we see the new music career?
The new hip-hop career, when will we see that take off?
When can we--
'cause we want to be there.
Uh, well, I'd love to come on the show and perform...
- Yeah.
- ...when it's done.
But I'm just-- I'm working on it, you know?
- It's a--
- You know, that seems unlikely.
Can you-- can you set up the clip for us, Joaquin?
- I don't--
- (maniacal laugh)
Are you kidding?
Are you serious?
Does the maniacal laughter--
I don't know what the clip is.
You don't know what the clip is?
It's you and-- maybe a scene with you and Gwyneth Paltrow?
All right, you're doing fine.
Thanks.
Uh, high praise coming from you.
- (Paul clears throat)
- (Dave clears throat)
- Is that really-- that's the--
- We're having fun.
- That's fun?
- We're having fun. Just relax, seriously.
I'll come to your house and chew gum.
- Okay, I don't have to chew gum.
- No, just relax.
- I won't chew the gum. I won't chew the gum.
- Well!
And, Joaquin, I'm sorry you couldn't be here tonight.
Uh, the film is "Two Lovers."
Opens Friday in selected cities.
Thank you very much and good luck in your new career.
I hope that goes well for you.
We'll be right back with model...
Oh my God.
I don't know,
I don't know.
Oh no.
Oh no.
Sir, could you just pull over for a sec?
Dude, just pull over for a sec.
I gotta fucking walk around a little.
God-- fucking--
I don't fucking know!
Fucking wall right here.
Goddamn fucking wall.
I fucked it.
I just fucking made an announcement.
I said I'll never go back to acting and now I can't.
You know what? I'm miserable.
Fucking music sucks.
And I didn't even fucking know it.
- I'm so stupid.
- (Larry mutters)
Oh, bullshit, dude.
It fucking sucks.
I'm just going to be a goddamn joke forever.
I can't believe it.
Why'd I do that? Why'd I do that?
Fuck.
I'm fucked.
I'm fucked. I'm fucked.
I fucked my fucking life, man.
I fucked my life.
Oh shit.
Shit. I can't go to this fucking premier, dude.
How am I gonna go?
Fuck 'em.
I gotta go to the fucking premier.
Mr. Phoenix, over here.
Mr. Phoenix, right in front of you, please, sir.
I'm shooting right now.
I'm shooting.
You fucking son of a bitch.
Are you fucking kidding me?
Where's Larry?
I gotta go.
Where's Larry?
The doors don't fucking open.
Can you get the fucking door open?
It doesn't open.
Letterman:
It's just a little joke.
I'm the fucking joke?
You're the joke!
I'm doing more than what anyone fucking expects!
And then-- and you literally are fucking off.
When people really see what happens, they're gonna laugh at you!
Not at me.
'Cause I saw the fucking history, dude.
I know you watched the "Letterman" thing
'cause you think it's so fucking funny.
You're a broken alkie.
You're a fucking piece of shit.
I shit on your face, man.
Honestly, I shit on your fucking face.
I am really sorry that it's gone this way.
I know that things have been getting weird between us over the past fucking few months.
What's been weird between us?
Things have gotten weird between us, dude, and I am sorry.
I am sorry for my part in it.
I am sorry.
But you can't fucking go on treating me like I'm an asshole all the time.
You know what?
You are an asshole.
Joaq, you cannot keep talking to me this way...
- You're an asshole.
- ...the whole fucking time.
You're an asshole.
- There is some part of you...
- I don't know how come you see--
- ...that is enviously jealous.
- Oh, dude, please!
- Listen to me!
- I am listening to you!
Well, not when you're talking like that!
You don't have to be the fucking exorcist, dude.
Just fucking talk like a normal human being.
Antony: You think you know everything that's happening, but you don't.
Listen, you've got to understand one thing, okay?
That's why you don't see it, dude.
Antony, I'm telling you
I'm serious.
- Dude, don't fucking hit me.
- I'll knock your fucking--
I'll knock your teeth out and I'll shit on your fucking face.
Fuck you.
You want to test it, do it.
You've shit on my fucking life enough times.
What can I do for you?
Not fuck things up!
Not fuck up my fucking life.
Not make me look like I'm a fucking joke.
I know that sometimes
I fucking get out of fucking place.
I'm an intense guy.
I'm a passionate guy.
And that bleeds through into my life, but that's because I do something.
Know what I mean? Whether I was acting or whether I was doing music or whatever it is,
I give myself to something.
What's your bit?
What is your bit?
I mean, it's almost comical.
Like I literally was angry and now I almost-- like,
I feel sorry for you, dude.
You're a bitless dude.
I have fucking bits.
What the fuck do you have?
Haven't you seen me?
You've seen the fucking stuff I do, you see how people are affected by it.
You know that I affect people in a fucking positive way.
So what I'm saying is what are you gonna do with your fucking life?
You took too long.
That's what I'm saying, dude.
You're not fucking assertive.
I agree.
I don't need to have this conversation.
Fuck the peace, fuck the bullshit.
I'm trying to do you a favor.
I'm talking to you as a friend and I'm trying to do other people a favor to see this, to know what it's like, to understand what I go through.
They don't know what it's like, dude.
Did you have to go on fucking Letterman?
How could I possibly concentrate when I'm dealing with--
- They don't want me on Letterman.
- Excuse me!
When I'm fucking dealing with fucking Diddy and his fullness, his idea of what's right?
They're actually gonna see how fucking hard it is.
I came in here to talk and now, you know what, dude?
Think of a fucking bit worthwhile.
But fuck off anyways, dude.
Honestly, Ant, I'm through with you.
Do whatever the fuck you want.
And I hope one day
I see a bit that's worthwhile that you were involved in.
Although I find that highly unlikely.
You want a bit?
I'll give you a bit.
Oh the fuck are you--?!
Oh fuck, oh!
What the fuck are you fucking doing?
- Oh!
- The fuck you doing?
Joaquin:
Fuck!
Lar!
- Larry: What the fuck?
- What the fuck is that?
Is that human fucking shit, dude?
Did someone just human shit on me?
Let me see.
- Oh man, fuck.
- (retching)
- Jesus.
- I'm gonna fucking kill him.
I'm gonna fucking murder him.
Get the fuck out of here.
Get out of here.
Woman: Please welcome
Natalie Portman and Ben Stiller.
Cinematographers are the unsung heroes of movies.
They live and breathe shadow and light.
Their work is the bedrock of every production.
This is ridiculous.
You're chewing gum at the Oscars.
Okay, I'll take it out.
- Portman: What's going on with you?
- Nothing.
I just want to retire from being a funny guy, that's all.
You look like you work at a Hasidic meth lab.
- (laughter)
- What do you want to do?
- What do you want to do?
- I don't know.
Maybe... cinematography.
Man: The documentaries nominated here today could not be more different.
- (mumbling)
- And yet as we face anxiety and uncertainty at the dawn of this-- will you shut the fuck up?
It's fucking distracting.
I've given up acting.
You've given up acting?!
You've given up shaving.
There's a difference.
I'm gonna do my
Joaquin Phoenix for you.
I'm as giddy as Joaquin Phoenix with a ballpoint pen and a blank prescription pad.
We better call Puff Daddy...
Phoenix has gone completely nuts.
Cooper: Earlier this month
You might recall actor Joaquin Phoenix made a rather odd appearance, to put it mildly.
Man: Everybody, it looks like
Joaquin Phoenix is finished.
And if he wasn't such an asshole, this would kinda be a sad day.
He should have stayed Joaquin Phoenix, the tortured actor. This rapping thing?
It's like somebody turning the lights on in a bar at 2:00 a.m.
It just looks fucking horrible.
But before we mourn his 15 minutes, let's remember that prior to J.P., he was Joaquin Phoenix, which wasn't even his real name either.
It was like Leaf Jacobs or some shit like that.
He is a product of ambition-- just a hipper vegan Tom Cruise.
You know, all that noise about "I am the guy who doesn't care what you think of me;
I don't watch my movies;
I'm so real" was not only annoying bullshit, but it obscured the fact that he was just a fucking ham even when he mumbled.
Now maybe we can appreciate the subtle, more refined talents of a-- dare I say--
Leonardo DiCaprio, or a Matt Damon?
Is it real?
It really doesn't matter.
Hugh Grant got head from that hooker and was forgiven before his "Leno" appearance went to commercial.
And Britney shaved her head and showed us her pussy and we still wanted more.
But Phoenix is fucked because even behind that homeless man's beard and without showing his genitalia, he has still managed to empty his little bucket of mystery all over the floor.
Leaf, Joaquin, J.P., all three of you are finished.
There's no spectacle to hope for, no fantasy to imagine.
The thrill is gone.
Hey, David.
Yeah, it's Larry.
With Joaquin.
Yeah, I wanted to talk to you about getting Joaquin down there at LIV to perform this week.
Is Wednesday a big night?
I mean, is the place going to be packed or--?
- I just talked to David.
- Joaquin: David?
- Yeah, the guy from Miami.
- Oh yeah?
- And what did he say?
- Wednesday night.
- Wednesday?
- Yeah.
Why the fuck Wednesday?
He says it's a good night.
You know, like hip crowd, they'll like your music.
The guy down in Miami had doubts about, you know,
Joaquin's abilities and I had to reassure him a little bit that it wasn't going to be another "Letterman" thing.
I don't know.
I mean...
I can't question that.
If he wants to do something, we do it.
Joaquin: ♪ A charity's being formed for this deformity ♪
♪ 'Cause man can't conform for nobody... ♪
How-- what's that sound like?
♪ What can I say to Antony but "Fuck you"? ♪
No, all right.
Do you have reverb on the vocal?
- Mixer: Uh, no.
- No, nothing.
Uh-huh. And the track isn't running through the board at all?
There's no-- we can't E.Q. the track?
♪ I'm still real, I won't kneel ♪
♪ Unless it's God, my team will know how I feel ♪
♪ I never sold out, never, my good soul, never ♪
♪ I live forever,
I'm the one that God's chosen, bitch. ♪
Lar?
Man on walkie:
Go go go go.
Coming in through the deejay booth.
Be by the deejay booth.
Side of the stage.
Bring him through the stage.
Go go go go!
The side of the stage-- bring him off the side of the stage-- go!
- (music ends)
- Deejay: What the fuck is up, Miami?!
And now let's hear it... for J.P., baby.
Let's motherfucking rock!
What?
Fuck you.
♪ I'm still here,
I don't scare ♪
♪ I don't fear, don't even fear fucking fear ♪
♪ I never crack, never,
I don't give, never ♪
♪ I live forever,
I'm the one that God... ♪
♪ I'm still real,
I won't kneel ♪
♪ Unless it's God, my team know how I feel ♪
♪ I never sold out, never, my good soul, never ♪
♪ I live forever,
I'm the one that God chose ♪
♪ I heard the call, alarms sounding off ♪
♪ Feeling guilty 'cause my night was spent fucking off ♪
♪ History perverted me, words can never harm me ♪
♪ Saying I'm the epitome of a fucking rap self-parody ♪
♪ A charity's being formed for this deformity ♪
♪ This man can't conform for nobody ♪
♪ I made it here despite the efforts of a few ♪
♪ What can I say to a punk but "Fuck you"? ♪
♪ I must confess,
I'm preposterous at best ♪
♪ A pretentious mess, can't get himself even dressed ♪
♪ In response I don't get mad,
I shake you off ♪
♪ Waving goodbye like I was last year's fad ♪
♪ Trend-setting, on you I won't be betting ♪
♪ I let it go so long as you know that I'm stormy weather ♪
♪ And whether or not you're better or not ♪
♪ Couldn't make a lick of difference from where I'm sitting at the top ♪
♪ Here through these years,
I don't scare ♪
♪ Don't even fear fucking fear ♪
♪ I never crack, never,
I don't give, never ♪
♪ I'll throw it down, you can bet on that, fella ♪
♪ I'm still real,
I won't kneel ♪
♪ Unless it's God, my team know how I feel ♪
♪ I never sold out, never, my good soul, never ♪
♪ Live forever, I'm the one that God's chosen, bitch ♪
♪ Long-winded letters that I've written ♪
♪ Once a snake has bitten,
I'll forgive but won't forget it ♪
♪ Not talking revenge,
I don't have the time to do to you ♪
♪ All the fucked-up things, fantasies of ruining you ♪
♪ Ain't got a crew, but I'll take on yours ♪
♪ Gotta wrap this shit up with you
'cause I'm so fucking bored ♪
♪ Just this one thing
I gotta say ♪
♪ To let you know, to get it off my chest ♪
♪ Before this long rest ♪
♪ I never betrayed you,
I never did what you thought I did ♪
♪ Still you came at me swinging, kid ♪
♪ Nevertheless I wish you the best and pray you get to heaven ♪
♪ But more than likely you'll be burning with the devil ♪
♪ Here through these years ♪
♪ I don't fear, don't even fear fucking fear ♪
♪ I never crack, never,
I don't give, never ♪
♪ I throw it down, you can bet on that, fella ♪
♪ I'm still real,
I won't kneel ♪
♪ Unless it's God, my team know how I feel ♪
♪ I never sold out, never, my good soul, never ♪
♪ I live forever,
I'm the one that God's chosen ♪
♪ Bitch. ♪
So, LIV, it's good to see y'all.
Dude, what's your fucking problem?
Shut the fuck up.
You wanna get up here and try and fucking do it, bitch?
Show it, yeah.
Sorry, we got a fucking asshole in the audience.
Fucking shut up, dude.
Does my suit cost more than you fucking make in a fucking week, dude?
Is that why?
Yeah.
Dude, I got a million dollars in a fucking bank account.
What do you got, bitch?
You washing dishes?
You standing around washing dishes, you gonna come make fun of me?
All right, taking the next song-- uh... what?
You motherfucking asshole.
Oh, grab it!
Joaquin:
Get off.
Joaquin, Joaquin, Joaquin.
Emcee:
Is that it?
- Security #1: I'll get some towels.
- Security #2: And water.
Here you go.
Can I get some water too, please?
We'll take the back so they won't get you.
I hope.
You all right?
Larry: Dude, that was a good show.
(instrumental music continuing throughout)
- (piano playing)
- ♪ When I dream ♪
♪ I dream of you ♪
♪ And if I'm wrong, we'll know it's true ♪
♪ It takes more than sacrifice ♪
- ♪ To keep love-- ♪
- (Joaquin retches)
♪ It disappears just like the dew ♪
♪ Dew-www ♪
♪ Well, there's ♪
♪ Cool water in you ♪
♪ Well, you know that there's ♪
♪ Cool water in you ♪
♪ You know there's ♪
♪ Cool water in you ♪
♪ Well, there's cool water ♪
♪ In you. ♪
Two, two, one, two.
Mic check one, two. One, two.
Oh, yeah. Y'all know what's coming up, don't you?
Come on, I got it right here.
I got it right here.
Bomont High School, where you at?
We got something to celebrate!
Bomont Panthers, 31!
Bayson Bulldogs, 17!
We killed 'em, y'all! Yeah!
All right, I want everybody on the dance floor! Come on!
What? What? Y'all ready to party?
Get up, get up! I thought this was a party! Let's dance!
Been working so hard
I'm punching my card
Eight hours for what?
Oh, tell me what I got
I've got this feeling
That time's just holding me down
I'll hit the ceiling
Or else I'll tear up this town
Tonight I got to cut loose
Footloose
Kick off your Sunday shoes
Please, Louise
Pull me off of my knees
Jack, get hack
Come on, before we crack
Lose your blues
Everybody cut footloose
Hey, Robert!
Yeah!
Bomont High, where are you at now?
- I'm not kidding.
- They did not!
- Yes, they did.
- They did not.
We going to Mama's?
We're about to get real wild tonight, y'all! Come on!
- Ron, where we going tomorrow?
- We're going to Mama Cannon's.
I'm sorry, guys.
Suzy gets the final call.
Turn it up, turn it up!
It's the best part!
Louder, Bobby!
Dispatch, stand by. I've got the driver here. License and registration.
- Step forward for me, please, sir.
- All right.
He is testing us.
Our Lord is testing us.
Especially now...
when we are consumed with despair.
When we are asking our God why this had to happen.
No parent should ever have to know the horror of burying their own child.
And yet... five of Bomont's brightest have lost their lives.
Among them, my only son.
My boy. Bobby.
We have other children to raise here in Bomont.
And one day, they will no longer be in our... embrace and in our care.
They will belong to the world.
A world filled with evil and temptation... and danger.
But until that day, they are ours to protect.
That is the lesson to be taken from this tragedy. That is our test.
We cannot be missing from our children's lives.
The following measures will be read and voted on accordingly.
A curfew for minors under the age of 18 will take effect immediately.
Minors must be home by ten p.m. on weeknights,
11 p.m. on weekends.
All in favor, say "Aye."
- Aye.
' opposed.
Motion carries.
Punitive measures will be taken against any individual, group or property owner who organizes a public gathering where minors engage in inappropriate activities.
Such activities include consumption of alcohol or unlawful drugs, listening to vulgar or demeaning amplified music, or participating in lewd or lascivious dancing.
- All in favor, say "Aye."
- Aye.
Motion carried.
There will be no public displays of dancing unless supervised as part of a school, civic or church-related function.
Outside of these authorized institutions, public dancing among Bomont's minors will be in violation of the law.
- All in favor, say "Aye."
- Aye.
Reverend? Your vote, please.
- Aye.
- Opposed. Motion carried.
This is my car.
Momma, it's Ren! He's here!
I'm gonna beat you!
Hey, girls. How you doing?
You guys are huge!
- Get off of me! Attack of the cousins!
- Who'd you find, Amy?
- Hey, darling.
- Hey, how you doing?
Good. Hope you got some sleep on that bus.
Yeah, I got plenty of sleep.
No worries, Lulu.
- Hey, boy.
- Wesley.
You used to call me Uncky Wes.
You too big in the britches for that now?
- Is anybody hungry?
- I'm hungry! I'm hungry!
- Sounds good. Need a hand with that?
- I got it, thanks.
Hey Ren, I wanna tell you a joke.
How do you make a tissue dance?
Put a little boogie in it.
Hey, buddy, I tell you about these baked beans?
Your great grandma Esther, who you didn't know.
This is her secret recipe.
Yeah, you know what the secret ingredient is?
Bourbon.
It's not bourbon. It's a ton of butter.
- That's code for bourbon.
- Now, we do burgers on Saturdays.
I didn't know if you were a vegetarian, or a vegan or something?
No, no, no, this is great, it's good.
Thank you.
- It's grass-fed beef.
- Thank you.
With a bit of possum.
- OK. Whose turn is it?
- Daddy's!
Let's join hands. Bow your heads.
Most gracious heavenly Father, we ask you to bless this food, nourishment of our body and greater strength for Thy good.
Help us be ever mindful of the needs of others.
- Amen!
- Amen.
This used to be my office, but Lulu fixed her up for you.
It's got all the essentials... water, power, bed.
Look, I appreciate what you've done here. Taking me in and all.
There, at the end, the money you sent us... It really helped.
I wish I could have done more.
Now, look... there's rules in my house.
They're not written down, they're just common sense.
Do your schoolwork. Don't stay out late, that's not just my rule, that's the law.
And don't give people attitude.
This ain't Boston.
I really want to pull my own weight around here...
Cooking meals, getting work, helping out.
My buddy, Andy Beamis runs a cotton gin up on Chulahoma.
He said you can start in the middle of next week.
Couldn't I work at the car lot with you?
I'm good with engines, oil changes.
That's how I made money back home.
In this economy, that's the best I got.
I suggest you learn to love it.
Come on.
How am I supposed to get to work and school?
You got subways out here in Mayberry?
There's that Yankee sarcasm
I've been hearing about.
Wish it were funnier. OK.
You say you're good with engines?
I'll make you a deal.
If you can get this baby running, she's all yours.
- This?
- That's a bad-ass car, boy.
OK, OK. The door sticks.
And the gas pedal's missing.
A couple of the, uh...
Hey, it's a fixer-upper.
He did it! He did it!
Have a safe trip!
Oh, shit!
Step out of your vehicle, son.
- Is there a problem, officer?
- Driver's license.
Massachusetts, huh?
You got that music cranked pretty loud, Mr. MacCormack.
You gonna throw me in jail for playing Quiet Riot?
Let's watch that attitude, son.
- Yankee sarcasm.
- What was that?
Nothing. Sir.
- You'll have to appear in court.
- For what?
Disturbing the peace.
Peaceful out here, isn't it?
Progress.
What does progress mean to you?
We have computers in our pockets, telephones in our automobiles, and money on a plastic card.
Who here today remembers a time when you had to go inside the bank to get your money?
Remember old Mr. Rucker down at Bomont State Bank?
Every time you made a deposit, he'd give you a piece of Bazooka gum.
Now, I haven't yet met an ATM machine that would give me a piece of Bazooka chewing gum, let alone make me feel special, like Mr. Rucker did.
Now, is that progress?
Today... more and more, as families, we are tuning each other out.
We're either surfing on the Internet, texting on our cell phones, or staring mindlessly at a television set.
Now, if that is a portal to the world,
I want no part of it.
These are the people that we need to tune in to.
Everyone in this church.
- Thanks for coming today.
- Nice preaching today, Reverend.
- Good to see you.
- Yes, sir, you, too.
This is my sister's son, the one I was telling you about. Ren MacCormack.
- Ren, Ren, welcome to Bomont.
- How you doing?
- We are so happy to have you with us.
- Thank you.
I think you're gonna like
Bomont High School.
In fact, if I'm not mistaken, the graduating class this year is the biggest in the school's history.
Hey, Roger! Come on over here!
How many seniors we have at Bomont High this year?
- About 220, give or take a dropout.
- Roger's the school principal there.
- Hello.
- Wait... Do you play football?
- 'Cause we really need a good kicker.
- Ain't that a fact!
But, remember, if you're gonna play for us, you gonna have to stay clean, keep out of trouble. I heard you already had a run-in with the law.
You what?
I don't know how it is up in Boston, but down here we have rules against playing music too loud.
You're kidding me.
He got popped for playing music?
Ariel! I want you to meet my daughter, she goes to Bomont.
You're going to need a friend on your first day.
This is Ren MacCormack. He'll be attending school with you tomorrow.
- Hey-
- Hey...
- Hey, Dad?
- Yes, honey?
Rusty and I have that science project due tomorrow, we're going to be working on it pretty late. I was thinking I'd stay over.
- Is that OK?
- On a school night? Is that necessary?
Rusty! Don't you think it's gonna take us all night?
Sure. At least.
- I guess it's fine, right...
- Thanks, Daddy. Bye, Mom.
Come on, let's go.
And with two laps to go, the leader is car number 44,
Chuck Cranston!
Coming around the last turn on the final lap...
We have a winner!
In the number 44 car, it's Chuck Cranston
crossing the line first for the checkered flag!
Let's hear it for Chuck!
Yeah! He just won!
Yeah, baby!
Yeah, baby!
Today's late-model division two-time champion, folks.
Go up there, you get that flag and get that cute ass out here right now!
Come on, now!
Hey, what are you doing?
Come back here with that!
- Ariel, what the hell are you doing?!
- Hammer down, baby!
Oh, yeah. Come on, now.
Chuck Cranston! I don't care if your daddy does own this track, you've got to get her out of here!
You can chase me down, old man.
Chase me down!
Get back here! You're going to get yourself killed out there!
Once again, ladies and gentlemen, your late-model division two-time champion.
Let's give it up for Chuck Cranston!
Thanks for coming out to the
Cranston Motor Speedway.
- Rusty!
- We hope you had a good time.
Rusty, I'm talking to you!
You know when you're watching the news, and you see someone
- get killed doing something stupid?
- God, this again?
I don't want to be that stupid friend who just stands around watching.
- He should never let you do that!
- So you're just going to leave me?
Me?
Leave you?
I don't know what's going on with you any more.
Ever since Bobby...
- I guess I'll get my own ride back.
- I guess you will.
Yellow flag.
Yellow flag.
Baby, why we got to go so fast?
You want some choirboy to put a promise ring on your finger?
You're not gonna find that with me, preacher's daughter.
Stop. I get that from everybody else.
I don't need that from you.
I thought it was real simple with you and me.
Yeah?
I'm your man.
You're... you're my rebel child.
I'm not a child.
Prove it.
Shut the door.
Shut the door.
Go on.
Are you going to pout all day?
Look, I already said I was sorry.
It's Monday. Everybody gets a do-over.
- You love me!
- I know I do!
Isn't that that new kid my mom introduced me to at church?
Sure is. He's cute.
- You think everybody's cute.
- I know, but I think he's cute.
He dressed up for his first day of school. That's so cute!
Oh, my God, Rusty. Come on, let's go.
Did you see his tie?
I like it and I'm going to tell him.
- That's a nice tie.
- Rusty.
Hey, I mean it!
Don't let anyone tell you different.
Thanks, uh...
- Rusty.
- It's Ahriel, right?
It's Ariel.
- Ariel.
- Very good.
Hey. Watch where you're going, little guy.
- Sorry, man. I didn't see you.
- It's like driving.
Stick with the flow of traffic, numbnuts.
Maybe if you weren't wearing all that camouflage, I could see you.
You should get one of them orange vests so hunters don't shoot you.
An orange vest? I don't wear orange.
I'm not a Tennessee fan.
I'm a Georgia Bulldog.
Where you from? You talk funny.
I talk funny? I talk funny?
You should hear you from my end.
I'm from Boston.
Massachusetts?
- It's in the United States?
- Yeah, I read that somewhere.
What's up, man? I'm Willard.
- I'm Ren. MacCormack.
- Nice to meet you. Let me see this.
Literature and Composition.
That's this way. Follow me.
People give you shit about that tie yet?
- Nah, but the day just started
- First group, on your mark...
Keep that head down! Head down!
I'm gonna smoke your butt, man.
- You think so?
- I know so. Your butt's getting smoked.
Come on, Willard!
Go get your water.
Warm it up in your mouth.
Two swallows, hit them monkey bars.
- You're looking flushed, Willard.
- My cheeks are naturally ruddy, man.
Ren, this is Woody, our team captain.
You don't gotta salute him.
- What's up, man? Nice to meet you.
- How's it going?
Last year, varsity made it to regional.
They bussed us down to Alabama.
The excitement never stops.
- You haven't been overseas?
- I've been to Alabama, if that counts.
No. It doesn't.
I went to Russia two years ago with my gymnastics team.
It's kind of a sister city thing with Moscow.
Yeah, Russia... I don't know if I dig that. It sounds kind of boring.
Do you know anything about Russian girls?
I know they range from bearded to drop-dead beautiful.
Yeah? Well, I can vouch for the beautiful ones.
Two girls from the Russian team snuck me out of my dorm room late night. They didn't have beards.
- They were smoking.
- What were they smoking?
Oh, you mean, like, smokin' hot.
I'm sorry. Continue.
So we go to this club.
The music's banging. It's pitch black.
I couldn't see shit, just hot two girls drenched in sweat all over me.
- We danced all night.
- Great. What'd you guys do after?
Oh, come on. Look, down in the South, you can't start a story about a threesome and not finish it.
Come on.
It goes without saying, these girls are flexible.
They take me into a bathroom stall.
One shoves her tongue down my throat, the other one's on top. This girl's a champion pommel horse gymnast.
I'm talking killer upper body strength. Banging.
She's scratching my back, she's tearing my clothes off.
And her friend's whispering in my ear, "Hernnya."
- Her...
- Hernnya.
- Hernnya.
- Yeah.
- What does that mean?
- It's Russian for "bullshit."
Why would she say that?
- 'Cause you're bullshitting me?
- Yup. Yeah.
But we did dance, man.
We danced our asses off.
That ain't right.
You ever work at a gin before?
You know about a bale press?
I don't know. I've never seen one.
- Where are you from?
- Boston, Mass.
Did they teach you anything useful up north?
Just enough to get by. I'm hoping y'all can teach me the three R's.
Three R's?
Yeah, you know... reading, writing, redneckery.
People are giving you a hard time, I can see that.
You're young, you're from out of town and you're a smart aleck.
Can you start Thursday?
Yeah. Yes, sir!
I'll teach you to read and write, but you're on your own when it comes to redneckery.
Yeah. Give it a little bit of gas.
Yeah, that sounds good. Cut it.
What's the deal with the preacher's daughter? She worth all that attitude?
I hear, back in the day, she used to be a goody two-shoes.
Now she fronts like she some hellraiser
Wearing her jeans tight and everything.
You could put a quarter in that girl's back pocket and tell if it's heads or tails.
Why? You're trying to knock boots with her, aren't you?
- No.
- Yes, you are. He is.
I'm just curious. I ain't trying to bang her or take her ballroom dancing.
Well, that'd be pretty hard, being that that's against the law.
What? Banging a preacher's daughter?
No, public dancing's against the law if you're under 18.
Shut up.
Wait, wait, wait. Jump back.
Are you kidding me?
Dancing is against the law?
Yeah, man. We got laws up the poop chute around here.
I can't even bring a bandana to school, because they think I'm in a gang.
If my face gets sweaty,
I gotta use the back of my hand.
Let me tell you something, this country was built on bandanas.
So you're telling me Bomont High doesn't have a prom.
Well, you know...
They got the Fall Ball, right?
OK. So, all the churches get together and put it on.
The whole town shows up and everybody's eyes are on you to make sure you're dancing at least six inches away from your girl.
You gotta add another two inches for me.
And, for one song, they make you...
They make you dance with your mother.
I mean, talk about a boner killer.
And the schools don't wanna have dances on their property.
They... They say they don't want to be held liable.
They don't want to be held liable for what?
Five seniors died in a car crash coming home from a dance, and that's when the whole town went crazy.
They started blaming it on the liquor, the music, the dancing.
After a while everybody started thinking dancing was a sin.
But we're talking about the law, right?
Not heaven and hell?
Yeah, take that up with Reverend Moore.
I'm a machine, I'm a machine.
Hey, what's up, dude?
Hey, Woody, what's up, man?
Hey, how you doing?
- MacCormack.
- How you doing, buddy?
- Good, man. You hungry?
- Yeah. What's good here?
We got nachos, hot dogs, hamburgers.
Frito pie, all the way.
And if you're a real man?
You'll eat that jalapeño.
- Get your fingers out of my pie!
- What about that guy?
You don't know where his finger's been.
Woody! Check the door, man.
Cop still here?
Five-O getting his move on.
- What you got for me, Uncle Claude?
- David Banner.
Bootleg. Don't get too krunk out there.
First sign of the police,
I'm gonna pull the plug.
I don't wanna get a fine, and you don't wanna get another ticket.
- Wait. You got a ticket for dancing?
- He got two tickets for dancing.
One more and he's off the team.
All right. Let's get this party started! It's on!
- No cops. Let's get it, come on!
- Let's get it started!
Yo! It's show time!
- It's clear!
- Let's go!
Back it up, back it up, move out.
Whoa.
- Woody!
- Woody!
Whoa!
Now that's what I'm talkin' about.
That's a beautiful thing!
Does that turn you on?
Girls acting like hussies?
It don't suck.
Oh, now, come on.
Yeah, dude. They... they get into it.
Hey, you. Let's go.
Come on, let's dance.
- Come on!
- I'm good. I don't dance.
You go have fun.
Me and my boys are going to push everybody back.
Let me see you do that city boy thing.
C'mon! Get it!
Oh, dang. Oh, dang.
Claude!
Reverend Moore's out front, man.
Oh, shit.
You want me to step in on this?
What, you can't keep up?
You can put on a show for that guy.
Doesn't mean I'm gonna.
Attention, attention. Ariel Moore,
will you please come up to the front of the diner.
Your daddy is here for you.
She's busted!
Show's over.
You mother was afraid you didn't have any money. She said you'd be here.
Daddy, it's not a big deal.
We were just messing around.
I think it would be best if you came home with me.
Right now.
Daddy gonna take her out to the woodshed.
What the hell does that mean?
It means she's in deep shit.
- Hey, honey. You're home early.
- Yeah.
Did you have fun?
- Just breaking the law, Momma.
- Ariel. We have not finished talking.
Ariel!
Why do you think you're above serving your penalty in Saturday School?
I don't think I'm above anyone, sir.
I was just unaware that...
Hey, Eddie? Eddie?
He has a job on Saturdays over at Andy's cotton gin.
Wes. Call me "Judge," would you?
- And take your hat off.
- OK, Judge Eddie.
Could you show a little mercy here?
He was playing his music too loud.
About as loud as you used to play Lynyrd Skynyrd in that old Impala me and you used to roll in.
Remember that... Judge?
You'll have Andy verify his employment?
- Now hold on...
- Yes I will!
- Can I go back to the car lot now?
- Sentence suspended.
Oh, man. Son, you're lucky.
Not everyone's got this town on lockdown like I do.
Oh, yeah? Since you and the judge are so buddy-buddy, maybe you can have him explain this whole ban-on-dance thing to me.
Whatever happened to separation of church and state?
What's church got to do with it?
It seems to have everything to do with everything around here.
Let me ask you a question.
If there's a football game Sunday and you want to buy a beer, can you?
- You can't buy beer on Sundays.
- And why not?
'Cause of church.
You can in Boston, why not in Bomont?
Look. Sunday is God's day.
If you want to drink beer on God's day, you need to buy it on beer's day, which is Saturday.
It's right there in the Bible, if you don't believe me.
Separation of God and beer.
And if God said it, I believe it.
That settles it! Now shut up.
Hey, MacCormack.
Hey, what's up... Ariel?
Chuck Cranston wants to see you at his daddy's racetrack tomorrow.
- Be there at two o'clock.
- OK. What happens at two o'clock?
- Show up and find out.
- And what if I don't?
- You're gonna miss all the fun.
- How come he sent you to tell me?
I volunteered.
If that shithog tries anything,
I'm gonna pound him.
- No fighting, Willard.
- No promises, Rusty.
You guys, keep the smoke away from her now. Her daddy smells that,
- he'll never let her hang out again.
- High school field trip's here.
Twinkle toes.
Watching you the other night, that was real entertaining.
We thought we'd invite you out here.
Maybe you could put on a show for us.
Chuck, didn't you hear?
He's real into gymnastics.
Gymnastics.
Well... I thought only fags were into gymnastics.
I thought only assholes still used the word "fag."
Touché.
Why don't you... try dancing with this?
Now... we race these buses every weekend at the Derby Mash-up.
We race them in a figure eight, just like this.
Two things you gotta worry about.
Your corners, and your intersection.
You fall behind, you're gonna get hit by the leader.
You pull ahead, you just might get slammed by the guy in last place.
What do you say, city boy?
Ready to race?
I drove one of these at a pep rally one time... it ain't easy.
All right? If she flips over, crawl out the side window.
If it catches on fire, jump out of it.
- Keep loose.
- Pump your brakes with your foot.
Pump the brakes. Tell him.
- I just told him.
- Cool. Pump them brakes.
- All right, man. Good luck.
- Whoa, whoa! Guys, guys.
This is pretty dangerous, right?
We could get killed?
We? What's this "we," white boy? Crazy.
We? Like I'd get my black ass up there.
What'd I get myself into?
How do, all you pissants? Welcome to the Cranston Motor Speedway!
Whoa, baby! You OK?
You kinda had a lot to smoke.
Don't be tellin' me when I've had enough.
Looks like a lovely day for a bus...
I didn't say you had enough.
I just said you had a lot.
If you want to lecture somebody, go tell Sweet Buns to start his engine.
We got one practice lap before the green flag drops, folks.
It's a three-lap race to the finish line, or the last man standing.
Gentlemen, start your engines!
Let's go!
We've got homegrown hero
Chuck Cranston in Burn in Hell.
You're in my world now, boy!
On the outside, we've got the new kid racing in the Fun Zone,
Ren MacCormack.
Go, Fun Zone!
Caroline and Russell are in the back of the pack, y'all.
Hey! Where's the green flag?
- Improvise.
- Now we're coming into turn four,
- getting ready for the green flag.
- Oh, yeah!
Preacher's daughter, my ass, baby!
Green flag, green flag, green flag! And... Go!
Come on, Ren! Go!
- Go, Ren! C'mon!
- Let's go!
They're coming around turn number one.
Fun Zone is loose around the corner.
Hang in there! Hang in there!
Chuck Cranston takes the lead, with Russell on his ass.
Caroline and MacCormack are door to door, they're battling for third place!
You want a little smooch?
She is tearing him up!
Coming out of turn four.
Here they come, headed straight for the intersection!
- Pump the brakes!
- Somebody better stop.
Somebody better do something!
- Watch out, baby!
- Shit!
- Caroline is into the wall!
- Sorry, girl.
Russell! You damn son of a bitch!
Russell and MacCormack are duking it out for second place.
Shit!
We got fireworks! God bless America!
And I'm on fire.
Chuck Cranston holds the lead with one lap to go!
Getting lonely up here!
Oh, we've got us a regular
Mexican standoff, folks.
Don't you play chicken with me, boy.
Who's gonna back down?
Who's gonna back down?
Somebody's got to back down.
- Oh, what the hell.
- No, no, no! Damn it!
Chuck is down!
MacCormack takes the lead!
Yeah!
Fire! He's on fire!
Damn it!
- I got no brakes!
- Run! Hurry!
We're coming for you, Ren! Hold on!
Oh, my God!
Hey man, did you know your bus is on fire?
- Yeah, no shit!
- Stop this bus!
- Pump the brakes!
- The gas pedal is stuck!
- Do something!
- Abandon bus!
Abandon bus!
We need to get off this bus!
Ren, you gotta get off, man!
The wheels on the bus go boom, boom, boom!
Yes, sir! Get some! Fire it up!
- You OK, baby?
- Oh, my God!
Get some!
That was awesome!
Let's do that again! Yes!
Hey, man. Chuck's pretty sore about losing that race.
I mean, you blew up the man's bus, dude.
Yeah... Bomont blows, dude.
I don't have to tell you, though, do I?
Yeah. I've been to Chicago. St. Louis.
Been up to some of them clubs in New York City. I been around.
- Just like you, man.
- Oh, yeah?
Yeah.
Hey.
You get high?
'Cause I do... every damn day.
If you want, you and I can go burn one right after school.
You know, city mouse, country mouse...
Blazing!
What makes you think
I'm anything like you?
Hold on a second.
This is what we call a take-homer.
You need anything else?
- I don't want this.
- It's cool. It's cool.
No, it's not cool. Take this...
We can go down to the rail road tracks and chief one now.
- No, seriously, take this.
- Hey!
- What is that?
- What's what?
In your hand. Let me see it.
Young man. Hey!
Hey! Stop! Hey! Stop, stop!
Hey! Stop!
Open the door!
Open!
I will not tolerate it, Ren.
Not in my school.
So what have you gotta say for yourself?
What do I have to say? I was on the gymnastics team for three years.
Got drug tested all the time.
If I smoked weed, I'd be off the team.
- He had a joint...
- You know what one looks like?
Were you going to smoke it or sell it?
Mr. Parker says you were with
Rich Sawyer when this went down.
- I don't even know that prick.
- Hey! Language.
Ren, level with me.
Was it Rich's joint? You can tell me.
I don't do drugs.
You can test me.
And when it comes out clean,
I want this guy investigated for barging into the bathroom stall with me.
That's gross.
Well. Since we don't have the evidence,
I'm going to let you off with a warning this time.
But Ren, listen to me, you have to understand something.
You see, life is not some big party.
I don't care what the rap music people say, marijuana is just wrong.
Son, listen to me.
Ren, I knew your momma.
That's right. I knew Sandy.
She had a wild spark, just like you.
Running off up north, trying to live the high life might have been fun, but it also led her into getting into some kind of... unexpected trouble.
- Unexpected trouble.
I'm thinking when you say "unexpected trouble," you're talking about me.
Right? Right?
Look, believe me, don't believe me.
Suspend me, arrest me. I don't care.
But you do me one favor, all right?
Never talk to me about my mother again.
You understand?
Hey!
Let him go.
Hey, MacCormack.
What's the rush?
Dude, you trying to ignore me or something?
I'm doing the best that I can!
Massachusetts, huh?
You got that music cranked pretty loud, Mr. MacCormack.
"You got that music cranked pretty loud, Mr. MacCormack."
Yeah! No shit, Barney Fife!
Watch that attitude, son.
Try being a cop in Boston, you huckleberry!
- I will not tolerate it, Ren.
- Shut up! I'm talking!
Not in my school.
Mr. Dunbar.
Mr. Douchebag! Mr. Dumb-Ass.
With your righteousness and your little vest.
Stop trying to act like you know me!
Don't act like you know me. Don't try and act like you know my mother!
You don't know the pain she went through every day.
You don't know shit!
You don't know shit!
- What are you doing here?
- What are you doing here?
There are eyes everywhere.
- So what was all that?
- What was all what?
All that.
I was just letting off some steam,
I'm sure you got your own wicked ways.
You think I'm a slut or something?
I think you've been kissed a lot.
- Where's lugnut?
- You mean Chuck?
He doesn't own me. I know he acts like he does, but he doesn't.
You want to see something?
Everybody calls it the yearbook.
I don't know when it started, maybe 10 years ago or so.
- What is all this?
- Some are songs. Lyrics.
Quotes from books.
Poems. Music we're not supposed to listen to.
- What do people do? Just hang out?
- Yeah.
And other stuff.
You think I'm small town, huh?
I think Bomont is a small town.
You think?
Try living here your whole life.
But that's all gonna change.
I've applied to colleges.
Hell, I've applied to colleges my daddy don't even know about.
Nobody wants to see Bomont in their rear view more than me.
You want to kiss me?
Someday.
What's this "someday" shit?
You want to drop down and tumble right here? OK.
You know that sweat's gonna dry and you're still gonna feel like shit.
That's for Chuck.
Not me.
Did you hear that?
Come on, hurry!
Where are you going?
Sometimes, after football games... we all come out here and when the train passes, we just make out like crazy.
Or... we just play chicken.
So, you're just going to let the train hit you?
Maybe.
All right, stop fooling around.
OK, get off the track.
Ariel! Get off the track!
How can I impose a curfew on the young people of my congregation if I can't enforce it in my own home?
Have you been drinking?
I haven't been smoking, drinking, dancing, reading books I'm not supposed to.
I'm just late.
Who brought you home just now?
Ren MacCormack.
I don't want you to see that boy again.
- Why?
- Because I've heard he's trouble.
Trouble? Well, man born of woman is of few days and full of trouble.
Job 14:1. You know, from the Bible?
Your behavior has been atrocious, young lady, and it seems to have started when Ren MacCormack came to town.
Trust me, Daddy.
Ren's the least of your worries.
Let's get some city life in you.
Good night! This place is gigantic!
Yeah. It's bigger than Bomont.
Hey. I'm gonna get something to drink.
You go out there and shake it.
- Let go!
- I wanna shake it with you.
- Dance with me.
- Nah, I'm good. I'll watch you guys.
- You do this to me every time.
- I'm fine. I'm gonna drink.
Go out there and dance. Have fun.
- Hey. Just go dance with her.
- Willard!
What's the matter with you, huh?
We drove two hours to get here. You're just gonna stand around and mope?
I don't dance. All right? I don't dance.
I can't dance.
At all.
But it's country line dancing.
It's a white man's wet dream.
Come on.
One, two, three, four, five, six, seven, eight.
- Excuse me, miss?
- Y'all need to learn some new moves?
Shit-howdy! You drop me at day care while you go dance with them girls!
Just learn a box step or two and meet us out there.
- I got faith in you.
- Yeah.
- Just fall on in.
- All right.
Maybe I should get my drink on first.
You got girls walking around with Jäger shots between their boobies?
No sir, we don't have that here.
Well, you should.
One, two, three. Good, guys.
- One, two, three...
- Stupid.
- Come on, Willard! It's fun!
- I don't drink and dance.
So you're gonna stand around like a dork the whole night?
I'd rather be a dork than a dancing dork. Yeah.
Whoa.
Hey, I got hat hair. Come on.
Hey!
She likes to dance.
Yeah!
Hey, shitkicker, that's my girl you're groping!
Willard, we're just dancing.
Why are you dancing with another man when you're wearing my hat?
OK, that is disrespectful.
Look, nelly, why don't you go babysit this girl's purse and fetch me a beer.
Got a better idea. Why don't I kick your teeth in and grin while I'm doing it?
Willard, no fighting.
You don't even know this guy.
I'll tell you what.
If he can count this high,
I'll give you to the count of three to get out of my face, man! One!
Willard!
Come on, darlin'. Party with a real man and ditch this hayseed.
Animal!
- It just happened so fast...
- You got knocked out.
I just remember politely asking him,
"Hey, get off of my girl."
This bridge gives me the creeps.
- Willard!
- Sorry.
- What?
- This is Crosby Bridge.
You know that photo in school?
The one with the teenagers that all got killed.
This is where it happened.
My brother was driving them home.
They lost control and they went head on into a truck.
They were seniors. Two of them were all-state, Ronnie Jamison and...
And my brother. Bobby.
You would've liked him.
I looked up to him.
He was my hero.
But now every time I think about him,
I just think about this bridge.
Four doors, you got a Mazda, a Nissan, a Cadillac.
Low mileage, really good shape.
Excuse me for one moment.
Hey, Reverend!
Good afternoon.
Hey, you need your oil changed on that Crown Vic?
No, Wes. I'm not here about my car.
I'm here about my daughter.
OK.
Charlie, I need you to show
Katelin the Cadillac, buddy.
- All right.
- All right?
- Right this way.
- You want to sit down?
Wes, I know your nephew is new in town.
Now I understand that everybody needs a friend, but I am not comfortable with Ren pursuing Ariel.
Pursuing?
Yeah. You have two little girls of your own, and I think you should understand where I'm coming from here, Wes.
- I mean, as a father.
- No, I don't believe that I do.
Why don't you tell me what
Ren did exactly?
Well, I hear he's been having trouble at school.
Trouble with drugs.
Drugs.
Where'd you hear that?
From Roger? That guy's a bully.
And I'm not just saying that 'cause he wants me to take down my sign.
It doesn't matter where I heard it, Wes.
I don't want that kind of influence around my daughter.
Influence, huh?
Reverend, have you ever seen anybody die from leukemia?
It's slow and ugly, and that boy had to watch his momma go all the way through it. Alone.
His daddy was a deadbeat.
Never lifted a finger to help.
When she got sick, he bolted.
It was Ren who took care of her.
Now, you may think that Ren isn't good enough for your daughter, but, Reverend, I could argue it's the other way around.
Well...
I just wanted to make myself clear.
See you in church.
I don't believe this town.
I bring Ariel home past her curfew, and Reverend Moore is all up in my uncle's grill, making threats.
Yeah. Well, you know what it is?
You got an attitude problem.
- I got an attitude problem?
- Yeah, you got an attitude problem.
Every chance you get, you're bad-mouthing this town.
We're small-time, but we got satellites and cell phones like everyone else.
- We're making some progress.
- Don't talk to me about progress.
I've been here two months and haven't seen one wet T-shirt contest.
Oh, I know. I don't know what's up with that.
- That's not me.
- Probably some stupid law against it.
I tell you what. You get a petition for that, I'd sign it.
Because if we can't have braless, wet women here in Bomont,
- the terrorists win.
- That's not a bad idea.
We could start our own petition.
Challenge the law against public dancing.
Why not? Then we can just organize our own dance.
I'm not talking about some drunken kegger or free-for-all orgy.
That right there? That's an idea!
I'm talking about a formal, respectable dance.
One that's not held in the church, with everyone's eyes on you.
You could have it in the Bomont lockup.
'Cause what you're talking about is against the law.
Let me tell you something about the law.
It's meant to be challenged.
- Nothing's set in stone.
- Ten Commandments were.
- What's your smart-aleck reply to that?
- My smart-aleck reply?
Hey! C'mon, man! Hey!
Stop! You want that wet T-shirt contest, come and get it!
The price of a dog license will go from 10 dollars to 15 dollars.
A licensed pet is a happy one.
All right. Well, they just finished.
If you was gonna make your move, this is when you do it.
It is at this time we will take any new business or concerns.
Come down to the podium, state your name and address. Anyone?
This meeting is adjourned!
So anyway, Elinor was saying we hadn't had you and Vi over for Sunday brunch in quite a while.
- If you wanna get together...
- That'd be great.
Reverend Moore!
It's Ren MacCormack. Wesley's nephew?
Yes, Ren. I know who you are.
Yeah, well I figured you did.
Wes told me you two had a talk.
There was a conversation between your uncle and myself, but it wasn't meant for your ears.
There's a lot of that going on in this town. It's like that saying.
- The one about children? How's it go?
- That they're better seen than heard?
Yeah. Well, I just wanted to let you know I'm starting a petition to challenge the ordinance prohibiting public dancing.
I just wanted to make sure my intentions were clear.
Well... Good day, Ren.
- Showdown with the preacher man!
- You got balls the size of coconuts.
Listen to me, you corn-fed hick.
If I got to stand up in front of the city council and make my case, y'all gonna learn how to dance.
You're not gonna tell anyone about this?
No, I'm not gonna tell.
- I'm serious.
- I promise. Just follow the girls.
They know what they're doing, and you don't.
- Woody, anyone on the football team?
- Nobody will know.
Everybody will know.
Three, four.
One, two, three, four.
My bah y He don't talk sweet
Come on, man, you got to commit.
He ain't got much to say
- Come on, commit to the move.
- Don't mess around. Focus.
- Just do it.
- Shake it.
There you go, there you go.
- Feel it.
- Show me what you got.
Good, good. More hips.
But I don't really mind
- Less hips. Less hips.
- A little less.
Every time he pulls me near
I just wanna cheer!
Let's hear it for the boy
And we're jumping. And we're jumping.
Let's give the boy a hand
Let's hear it for my baby
You know you gotta understand
He's getting it a little bit.
Maybe he's no Romeo
But he's my lovin' one man show
Jump, jump!
Let's hear it for the boy
C'mon, just bounce, Willard.
Get gangsta with it. Just bounce.
Gangsters don't dance, we bounce.
Come on, Willard, get gangsta.
Hey, hey, hey. Hey, hey, hey.
Hey! What's up, man?
You want some?! Come get some!
Hey, we were just dancing, man.
- Can I help you with something?
- You guys got city records down here?
Like local ordinances?
Anything like that?
What do you want with those?
I wanna read them. Isn't that what you do in libraries other than get stoned?
Let's move that ball down the field! Now!
Two! Forty-two!
Willard!
What the hell are you doing, boy?
Give me two laps right now.
You move it! Now!
Yeah! C'mon!
Go, Willard! Go, Willard!
Go, Willard! Go Willard!
Nice.
Hey. Was that a three-pointer or a two?
That was a no-pointer.
Getting names on this petition is one thing, but trying to write this speech...
I'm just having a hard time with it.
I saw you enlisted my daughters in your campaign.
- I'm sorry about that.
- No. No need to apologize.
I think this family could use a little activism.
What about Uncky Wes?
He seems a little worried.
Well...
Wesley, he is a car salesman trying to sell cars in the middle of a recession.
So he's all about worry.
Why is this dance so important?
When my dad left...
I wasn't really surprised. You know?
I never really felt like
I could depend on the guy anyways.
It was just me and Mom, you know?
She was the strong one.
And then she got sick, and it was my turn to be strong.
I thought if I worked really hard, and listened to the doctors and did everything they told me to do, maybe we could turn it around.
Maybe she'd get better.
But she didn't.
All that hard work,
I couldn't change anything.
But with this...
I'm thinking I could do something.
I could do something for myself this time, and maybe have a shot at making a change.
You know?
That's all I want... is a shot.
Otherwise, I'm just going to disappear, like everyone else.
Can I see that petition, please?
You got my vote, Ren MacCormack.
Your momma would be proud.
Aren't you gonna say anything?
Well, you ain't telling me anything
I don't already know.
I got eyes and ears. Yeah.
Well, I thought
I should tell you myself.
Yeah.
First you're into race car drivers, now you're into dancing gymnasts?
You crack me up.
You know, I seen the way you've been looking at him.
Just waiting for the right moment to dumb down, and wrap those skinny little legs around him.
I'm so sick of you treating me like dirt!
Hey.
Is that what I've been doing?
Just treating you like another pit-row hussy, we screw on the weekends?
I thought that's what you came here to be.
You know what?
Being a preacher's daughter don't give you a free pass on acting like a slut.
Ariel...
You walk your ass back home to Daddy!
I treated you decent!
Better than you deserve!
I don't need this shit.
I was about done with you anyway!
You son of a bitch!
Stop! Stop! What are...
Crazy bitch!
Don't touch me!
Vi's in there with her.
You're OK, baby.
Just don't worry, my angel.
That son of a bitch.
Careful, Daddy, you're in church.
Look at me. Look at me.
Look at me.
Did Ren MacCormack do this to you?
- Answer me!
- Let's keep calm.
- We don't even know what happened.
- Our daughter has been assaulted, Vi.
I'm calling the police.
I want him in handcuffs.
I can see how that works for you, just blame everything on Ren.
Just like you blamed everything on Bobby.
What?
Bobby spent his whole life trying to make you proud.
He made good grades.
He went to church every Sunday, and God help him because he made one mistake?
Now nobody remembers the good things about Bobby, all they remember is that damn accident!
Why don't we have a school dance?
It's because of Bobby!
Why do we have this stupid curfew?
Because of Bobby!
Bobby's to blame for all this bullshit!
Lower your voice, talk in a civil tone.
- Let's not do this here.
- Why? Isn't this my church? Isn't it?!
Isn't this where we're supposed to talk about our problems?
It's been three damn years, so why don't we start talking?!
I have been so lost.
I've been losing my mind.
And you don't even see it!
You don't even care.
Of course I care.
Of course we care.
We don't expect you to understand everything we do that's intended to keep you safe.
Stop it! I hate it when you treat me like I'm a child.
Well, whether you like it or not, you are my child!
I'm not even a virgin!
Please...
Please don't talk like that in here.
What are you going to do?
Pass another law?
'Cause that sure as hell didn't keep him out of my panties!
Shaw!
Well, let's go get that guy that blackened my eye,
'cause we don't hit girls in Bomont, do we Daddy?
Ariel, please.
- Please, I didn't mean to!
- No, you stay here.
You've done enough.
- Where is she?
- She's staying at Rusty's.
I don't know what came over me.
I've never hit anybody in my life...
That's where you two are alike.
You deal with your pain in extremes.
I understand what you were trying to do.
You were trying to hold this town together and protect our children.
But these laws, they were too much, too soon.
There were other kids who lost their lives.
- I felt like I had an obligation to...
- Your obligation was to our daughter.
I have been a minister's wife for 21 years now.
I have been supportive.
I've been silent.
I still think you are a wonderful preacher
But it is the one-on-one where you could use a little work.
Your old man's wrong about a lot, but tossing Chuck in jail sounds good to me.
I just want this whole thing behind me.
I got you something.
A Bible?
It's not just any Bible. It's mine.
I've had it since I was seven.
I marked a few pages. Thought it might help going up against the city council.
This is great.
Really.
You said that you might kiss me someday.
I did.
You think that someday could be today?
Hey. What's your secret plan?
Get up there and boogie?
Yeah, I wish it were that easy.
This meeting will now come to order.
But, before we begin,
I would like to remind all you kids that we are conducting an official meeting.
Official town business. That means no disturbances will be tolerated.
The floor is now open.
My name is Ren MacCormack.
And I want to move, on behalf of most of the senior class of Bomont High, that the law against public dancing within the town limits of Bomont
- be abolished.
- Yeah!
You will not be warned again.
Roger, if I may address
Mr. MacCormack on this matter.
Please do.
Ren, besides the liquor, and the drugs and the lewd behavior that seems to always accompany these types of unsupervised events, the thing that really distresses me the most, more than any of that, is the spiritual corruption.
These dances, this music, it does distort young people's attitudes.
You might find it funny, but I firmly believe that dancing can be destructive.
And celebrating certain types of music can be destructive.
And I think you're going to find that most of the people in this community are going to agree with me.
I believe a vote is in order on this motion.
- All those opposed, please...
- Excuse me.
I still got something to say on this issue...
- I thought Ren had the floor here.
- This meeting will come to order.
- That's not right!
- Mr. MacCormack.
I have been more than patient with your intrusions.
I would like to remind you that we speak for this town because we are from here.
Excuse me, Mr. Dunbar.
For you to come into this council chamber and question our motives...
Roger! Stop it!
I think Mr. MacCormack has a right to be heard.
I wasn't here three years ago, when tragedy struck this town.
And I know it's not my place to mourn the lives that were lost because I didn't know them.
But it doesn't mean that
I don't think about them every day.
Like a lot of students at Bomont,
I see those pictures every day at school.
And each time I see their faces,
I think of how precious life is and how quickly it can be taken from us.
I know this firsthand... in my own way.
And three years ago, nearly a dozen laws were introduced to this council in order to protect the children of Bomont.
And most of these laws, I can see, as a parent, how they make sense to you.
But my right to dance... when I want, where I want, and how I want is a right that you cannot take away.
It is mine.
See, we don't have that much time left.
All us teenagers, pretty soon we're gonna be just like you.
We're gonna have jobs and bills and families.
And we're gonna have to worry about our own children
To worry. I get that.
But ours, as teenagers, is to live.
To play our music way too loud and to act like idiots.
And to make mistakes.
Aren't we told in Psalm 149...
"Praise the Lord.
Sing unto the Lord a new song.
And let them praise
His name in the dance."
Now if anybody else brought their Bible, like I did, will you please turn it to the
Book of Samuel, 6:14.
"David... David danced before the Lord with all his might, leaping and dancing before the Lord."
Celebrating his love of God and celebrating his love of life.
With what? With dancing!
That's all we're doing here.
Ecclesiastes assures us, "There is a time for each purpose under heaven.
There's a time to weep.
There's a time to mourn.
And there is a time to dance."
And this is our time.
There was once a time for that law, but not any more.
Thank you.
Thanks, Chris.
You know you was railroaded.
Shaw Moore walked into that meeting with those votes already in his pocket.
You didn't have a prayer.
- So what happens now?
- Nothing. It's over.
What if it's not?
What if you had your dance in Bayson?
The point was to have it in Bomont.
What's Bayson, like 30 miles away?
No. You're standing in it. Come here.
You see that water tower? That's in
Bomont. Everything east is in Bayson.
That means the cotton gin.
Now, I figure that if the
Bomont fire trucks can't come
What about the long arm of Reverend Moore?
Well, try to convince him it won't be a spiritual corruption.
Maybe he'll think about it.
And the disciples came to Jesus and said,
"Master, why is it that we can't do such things?"
And Jesus said,
"it's because you have little faith.
If you even had the faith of a tiny mustard seed, you can say to the tallest mountain,
'Move from here to there' and it will move.
For with faith, anything..."
Who's there?
It's me. It's Ren MacCormack.
Ren.
I thought you were someone else.
My son used to sit there when I would practice my sermons,
- and I...
- Yeah, with me it's grocery stores.
Excuse me?
There's always so many mothers at grocery stores.
You get enough of them calling after their kids and pretty soon, you know, one of them starts to sound like your own mom.
Sometimes I think I can really hear her.
Sit down.
My boy, Bobby, was taken from us so suddenly, and...
I can't remember the last thing I said to him.
Well, it ain't so easy with time, either.
With my mother, I always thought there'd be this day where we got to say our good-byes.
But, you know, death... death is on its own clock.
Yes... it is.
Look, I know you and the council voted against us having this dance, but it's not gonna stop it from happening.
Andy Beamis gave us permission to use his place.
And with your permission... sir.
I would like to take Ariel to the dance.
Now I promise you,
I would never, ever do anything to hurt her or disrespect her.
And I sure as hell won't let anybody else.
I didn't mean to swear in your church. I'm sorry.
Wouldn't be the first time.
The dance means a lot to me.
I mean, you know that.
But your daughter... she means more.
And if you don't let her go,
I'm not gonna go.
I know you got to do what you got to do.
Well, thank you for...
Thank you.
I'm standing before you today with a troubled heart.
I've insisted on taking responsibility for your lives.
But I'm really... just like a first-time parent who makes mistakes, and learns as he goes along.
And, like that parent,
I find myself at that moment when I have to decide... do I hold on or do I trust you to yourselves?
Do I let go and hope that you've understood my lessons?
If we don't start trusting our children... how will they ever become trustworthy?
I'm told that the senior class at Bomont High School has secured the use of a warehouse in nearby Bayson for a senior dance.
Please join me in keeping them in our prayers... that our Lord will guide them in their endeavors.
Now, if you will turn to your hymnals... page 472.
- See? Who said there's no miracles?
"Just As I Am Thine Own To Be."
- Willard, look in there.
- What is this?
- Grab hold.
- Grab hold. All right, let's lift!
C'mon, c'mon...
You look stunning!
Really? Is it OK, though?
I mean, it's not too simple, right?
Oh, baby, simple elegance is something to strive for.
Well, you can't go to a prom without a corsage.
Oh, my gosh. Mom! It's beautiful.
- You didn't have to do that.
- I didn't.
No red boots?
Not tonight.
- Can you help me pin this?
- Sure.
It's not that kind of corsage.
It goes on your wrist.
You have no idea how hard it is for me to let you walk out that door.
I just want what every parent wants.
I want my kids to come home safe.
I know it's been hard on you.
And I know I haven't made it any easier.
I just don't want you to be disappointed in me any more.
No. You are my angel.
And I will always love you.
Hey, Daddy, guess what?
We're dancing.
I was going to come up and...
What? What's the matter?
You look beautiful.
- Yeah?
- Yeah.
Come here.
Shaw, come over here. You've got to see them. They look wonderful!
- They're gonna think that we're spying.
- We are spying. Come here!
Let me get the door for you.
Ren, it's OK.
I can go through your door.
Hold on, I gotta kick it from the other side.
Ren, stop.
Come here.
- Won't you give me a hand?
- Yes.
- You OK?
- I'm good.
OK.
That was smooth.
Good job, Ariel.
Hey. C'mon.
Hey, Woody. By the looks of it, I'd say our offensive line has no backbone.
You should move your team down the field, captain. Come on.
Come on.
Huddle up. Come on.
Y'all see them women over there?
They ain't looking for a first down, or a touchdown.
They're looking for some men to take charge and ask them to dance.
Y'all gonna ride the bench or are you gonna man up?
Come on, now. Hands in.
- Break!
- Straighten up, boy!
- Here you go, my lady.
- Thank you.
When you said you were gonna wear a cowboy hat,
I didn't know how I'd feel about it.
Now that you've seen me in it, what's the verdict?
You're sexier than socks on a rooster.
That's the nicest thing you've ever said to me.
I mean it, stud.
Cute.
Remember, you promised.
No fighting.
- Willard. Don't you look pretty.
- What can I do for you tonight, Chuck?
We got some business to take care of with our friend MacCormack.
Let's be cool, no fights tonight, all right?
I get it. No fighting.
Willard! Are you OK? Let go of me!
Shut him up.
- MacCormack! Get on out here, boy!
- Willard!
What do you want me to do?
They started this!
Then kill the sons of bitches!
Russell, handle that now! Come on!
Hey, Chuck!
Hey, Yankee Doodle. Why don't you come on down and get your ass kicked.
You're real tough when it's four to one.
Rusty! Get your hands off of her!
You freak, don't you ever touch her like that! Ever!
You like that?
You want some more!
Yeah! Go, Dogs!
You want to take me?
Yeah, run away like a little bitch!
You wanna dance, boy?
The race is over, Chuck.
- Ren, Ren, watch out!
- Play fair, punk!
Thanks to Mr. Beamis.
How about a little less boxing and a little more boogie?
- It feels like a morgue in there!
- I'm on it.
- You OK?
- Yeah. Are you OK?
Yeah. My little brawler.
You look beautiful, come on!
Thank you. I kicked his ass!
Hey! I thought this was a party!
Let's dance!
- I need you to hold my jacket
- What are you doing?
Back up, sweetheart.
I don't know how big this is going to get.
I think we're almost there, guys, I think. 
I just talked to the venue. They say it's totally sold out. 
Almost.
Any hot pockets left?
God. 
It's going to be great, man. Cheer up. 
- My landlord's been calling me.                                                                   
- Yeah?
I can't wait anymore. I need to borrow some money.
- I can't give you more money. 
 - I'm not asking you to give it to me. 
I'm going to borrow it. I'm going to pay you back. 
 Fine, I'm going to fix it. 
Oh, come on, mom. 
Do you have to do that here, really?
Where else am I going to do it? 
 Janie, go get $10 out of my purse, okay?
Pay for the gas. 
I really don't see why you have to look like a hooker to introduce me. 
God!
I don't look like a hooker. 
I just haven't seen Ethan in a really long time and I really wanted to just look nice for him. 
That's all. 
[singing] Ladies are in the house
[all singing] Ladies of the eighties are in my blouse!
Hello, Little Rock!
Okay. What?
- What the hell is going on? 
 - Someone is here to see Ethan. 
- No one is allowed to see the band before the show, you know that. 
- It's not a fan. 
 -What do you mean? Spit it out! 
Shit.
- What's going on? 
 - Seriously. We need to talk in private. 
Seriously, no. I don't want to. Because every time you say, 'Let's talk in private' it's some kind of shitstorm and I want to ride this one out with the boys. 
And with Iris.
- Spill it. 
 - Give me two minutes, okay?
It's either going to be bad news about me or it's going to be bad news about the band. 
- Either way, we're a family. 
 - That's really nice of you to say. 
- Except for Billy. 
 - Beautiful, beautiful. 
One, two, three.
Okay, but I'm on record: I tried. 
Someone is in a bad mood today.
- Hello 
 -Hi. 
Who is this?
What can we do for you, lady?
Ethan, it's Mary Ann. 
Shit!
Oh, my God. I can't believe you don't recognize me. 
I guess it's been a few years maybe. 
 Oh, my God. It's been 13 years. 
It's Mary Ann Jones! God!
Do you remember we hung out when you were touring? 
 That's great. 
I don't...
- I don't really remember you. 
 - Can I just talk to you?
- For five minutes, by yourself? 
 - Everyone wants your time, man! 
-Shut up. 
 - No! Sorry.
-Let's talk about it here because we're a family. 
We are a family and this is my girlfriend.
We go on in five minutes so what do you want?
I think I should talk to you in private. 
No, I don't think so. 
- You got the stage. 
 - Okay. 
Okay, I don't know how to say this so I'll just say it. 
Ethan, you have a daughter.
She is 13 years old.
Her name is Jane.
But a lot of people call her Janie. 
 Her name is Janie Jones.
- Like the song by The Clash.
- Shut up, man.
Okay. I don't...
- Sorry, what is your name again? 
 - My name is Mary Ann. 
Mary Ann...
What do you want?
Money?
Because don't let the bus fool you, I ain't got shit. 
I don't want your money. I need help. 
I have to get myself cleaned up and I need
I need somebody to take care of her because I can't. 
What, are you buying this?
Look, lady, I'm sure the shit has really hit the fan in your life. 
But don't you think this is just a tiny bit manipulative to come in here and play 
'pin the tail on the daddy' with me?
Oh, God. I don't know what I was thinking. 
Okay, guys. Five minutes.
What, you believe her?
I don't have a kid!
I've never even met this woman. 
The jury is still out, man. 
- How are you doing, sweetie? 
 - I'm good, thanks. 
- Want another soda? 
 - No, thank you. I'm all right. 
- Hey, did you talk to him? I did. 
 - What did he say?
- He is so excited to see you. 
 - Really?
Hey, mom, you want to go upfront? 
I can't see.
I'm going to wait back here. 
You go. 
- Are you sure? 
 - Yeah, totally! Go, go! 
♪ In a state of nothing; a precious grain inside your brain ♪
♪ Fairy tales are coming true ♪
♪ Bite your lip and making me ♪
♪ Get you some of [indistinct] ♪
♪ Sometimes we're the [indistinct] blue ♪
♪ been broke, shot and sing ♪
♪ though you love me ♪
♪ we're endless [indistinct] ♪
♪ Come back to you ♪
♪ In a state of nothing a precious grain inside your brain  ♪
♪ Fairy tales are coming true ♪
Mom?
911, emergency. 
- I saw your kid in the front row. 
 - She has his eyes. 
- Shut the fuck up, she's not my kid. 
- I don't have a kid. 
 - What, what'd I say?
Was that necessary?
Thanks, dude. 
Technically, she could be your kid, man. 
Technically, she could be anyone's kid. 
- But she bears a striking resemblance. 
 - What?
- What?
- What?
- What?
- Say what?
- Did you say something? 
 - I did not. 
No.
- This is funny. 
 - Have fun with this. 
It's fucking hilarious. 
Oh, don't go away mad. 
Is that him in the black jacket and tie?
- Yeah. 
 - All right. 
How y'all doing?
Which one of y'all is Ethan?
- That's me. 
 - Mind if I have a word with you in private?
- I don't remember meeting this woman. 
 I'm supposed to believe that this is...
This is my kid?
- I don't buy it. 
 - If you ask me, she takes after you quite a bit. 
- Now, how well did you know the mother? 
 That's legit, by the way. 
I think she came on tour with us for a bit. 
- It was a long time ago, man. 
 I barely knew her. 
You're going to make this difficult, ain't you?
- This is crazy man. 
 It seems to me, seeing that...
- You are the father. 
 She ought to go with you. 
- We're on tour. 
 This is no life for a little girl. 
Normally, I'd agree with you. 
 But here is the deal. 
 I called this in. The mother is nowhere to be found. 
Her home phone, her cell phone has been shut down. 
I ran her record. Recent arrests, possession. 
A good sized stash of methamphetamine.
 Missed her court date, got a warrant on her. 
Now...
She may turn up and she may sort all that out. 
I mean, God, let's hope so. Right?
But all that ain't real good for this little girl. 
She must have other family. 
Girl said she doesn't know any other relatives that are alive. 
 We'll check it out. 
Hi Is everything okay?
I was just telling your friend, I'm sorry, what is your name?
- Iris. 
 - Iris. 
- Beautiful name.
- Thank you.
Iris, I was just telling your friend, Ethan, that we have ourselves a situation. 
- What's that? 
 - Look. 
- I don't think that she is my kid. 
 - If you don't take her...
- I have to call family services then she goes in to state care. 
Until they place her in some foster home. 
And then, there's you. 
Your name is on that birth certificate. 
- You have a kid? 
 - No, no. 
- I don't have a kid. 
 - If I have to call this in right now...
- Y'all ain't going nowhere. 
 You'll stay here, in town, until the hearing. 
And if the court orders a paternity suit, which they will
And it's you. 
 You got problems. 
Deadbeat dad. 
It's a big shock, I know. 
- This is not happening.
- Ethan, you're not thinking about not taking her? 
No, I'm thinking about what's best for the kid. 
- I don't think I can do this. 
 - Okay but you do have a choice. 
You ain't gotta go with him. 
 I can bring in the folks from Family Services. 
But I ain't sure you're going to like that. 
So let's just say 'hi' to the fella. 
And if you change your mind, I'm going to be right there. 
Is that okay?
- Yeah, okay. 
 - Okay. 
Let's give them a minute. 
Jane Jones, this is Ethan.
Ethan, this is Jane.
- Hey. 
 - Hey. 
So I guess your mother took off?
Aw, man. 
[profanity] I'm sorry, I didn't mean to say that. 
It came out. 
- Do you play? 
 - Yeah. 
- How long? 
 - I don't know, a couple years, I guess. 
Well...
Look, I know this is kind of a weird deal 
 but why don't you just come with us?
Until your mom calls, shows up or whatever?
Yeah, okay. 
You ever been on a tour bus before?
Well...
This one sucks. 
- Hi, I'm Iris.
- Hi.
You want a tour of the bus?
No, I'm okay, thanks. 
Guys, there's a kid on the bus. 
Sorry, man, but what the hell are we supposed to do?
- Not get high? 
 - Billy, don't put that out. 
Dude, this is so [profanity]
You can't have a kid on tour with us. 
It's bad luck. It's like having a woman on a ship. 
- She's not a woman, she's a kid. 
 - Iris is a woman. 
- So, what's your point? 
 - And this isn't a ship. 
Okay fine, then it's good luck. 
- Gil, open the window. 
 - It's jammed. 
I better hide my porn. 
Hey. 
I have someone here who wants to meet the rest of the band. 
- This is Chuck, he is our drummer. 
 - Janie Jones, I like your name. 
- Hi, Chuck.
- This is Dave, he plays bass. 
- Hey, how are you doing? 
 - This is Billy, our lead guitar player. 
- He used to tour with Ashley Simpson. 
 - Hi. 
- All right, maybe we should hang out in the front lounge for a little bit. 
 - Yeah. 
Why are you shaking me over this? 
 It's only for a few more days. 
That's not the point. 
- Yeah. 
 - Oh, really?
I don't know why I'm the bad guy. 
 I'm just trying to do the right thing. 
- Oh, come on. That's bullshit. 
 - Whatever! It was a long time ago!
She's probably some junkie tramp. 
- [profanity] 
 - What?
- What? 
 - I think she just heard us. 
Janie?
[distant singing]
♪ It all makes sense to me. ♪
♪ Well, people run for cover ♪
♪ But I stand out and shout ♪
♪ to the sky to carry me away ♪
♪ in the eye of a hurricane ♪
♪ the city sleeps below but no one knows ♪
♪ where I go ♪
♪ I'm carried away ♪
♪ in the eye of a hurricane ♪
♪ I have no fear ♪
♪ There's a certain kind of peace here ♪
Hey, what's up?
- Hey, I'm sorry. I shouldn't have said that.  
 - Said what?
 You know, back there. 
 I didn't mean to upset you. 
 I don't know what you're talking about. 
I didn't recognize that song. 
 Did you write that? 
- Yeah. 
 - I guess so. 
- It was good. 
 - Thanks. 
We're having a sound check a little bit later on. 
You should come. 
- Yeah? 
 - Yeah, just come and hang out. 
- Okay, sure. 
 - All right, cool. 
Hey, hey!
- Does that sound right to you? 
 - What?
- Does that sound right to you? 
 - What are you talking about?
You're grinding the temple like a fucking tweaker. 
 Chill the fuck out. 
Oh, really? Is that what I'm doing? I'm grinding the temple like a fucking tweaker? You need to chill out you fucking asshole. 
Chuck, hey. 
- Sorry. 
 - It's okay.
- Let's just play. 
 - Please. 
- What was that all about? 
 - Nothing, my dear, nothing. 
Just band drama. 
- Can I ask you a question?
- Sure. Go ahead.
Did you know that your mother was planning this?
She told me that she had a plan. 
That she had talked to him already. 
Ethan told me that you play. 
- Yeah, sort of. 
 - Well, he didn't say 'sort of'.
 He said that you had a real talent, coming from a guy like that?
- that means that you must be very, very good. 
 -Really?
Yes.
So when you get some songs together, like a demo, send them to me. Okay?
- You want to hear my songs? 
 - If they are any good, I would love to. 
Do you know this girl, what's her name, Miley Cyrus?
She's going to be a billionaire before she's 18. 
So you're in the right age group.
 By the age of 20, it's all over. 
Here, send them to me. That's me there. 
- Okay.
- Right?
Good. 
[playing guitar]
♪ Fight for me ♪
♪ Please fight for me ♪
♪ or lie to me and say you will ♪
♪ I know the game, I know the drill ♪
♪ I'd drag it out of bars and still ♪
♪ it's all I've got ♪
Hey, what's up? 
 I didn't see you there. 
Hi!
Beautiful people!
So fucking beautiful, I love it. 
I'm going to play you a little song. 
Come on, smile, you fuckers!
Pretend it's Christmas!
One, two, three, four!
Whoa, whoa! 
 Stop, stop!
[profanity]
- What the fuck are you doing? 
 - Playing the fucking drums, asshole!
- What are you doing? 
 - You're ruining the fucking song!
- What the fuck? 
 - Can we please not do this here?
- Now you're on his side? 
 -No, can we just play the song?
Yeah, play the song, man! 
♪ Training your look towards the deep end ♪
♪ Daring to dream while you drive ♪
♪ up towards the coast for the weekend ♪
♪ But it's all beneath you now ♪
♪ you have found an out somehow ♪
♪ from this life ♪
Hey! We have arrived, my troubled troubadours!
Come on, college town!
USA. 
Get up, come on. Come on! 
Did you hear back from Universal about the publishing? 
No, sadly, no. 
But I'm sure we'll make some good money off the door tonight. 
And t-shirts! 
T-shirts? Are you fucking kidding me?
Fucking t-shirts. 
- Hi
- Jesus.
Hey. 
Are you excited about the show tonight?
- Yeah, really excited about it. 
 - Are you all right?
Come on, let's go. 
Ethan! Ethan! Ethan!
[slurred] Tonight is a very special night. 
This band has been together for six years. 
I spend a lot time on the road, 
 I spend a lot of time playing music. 
I spend a lot of time getting loaded. 
I fell in love with that girl over there. 
So, you can imagine my surprise...
When today I find out... that my boy, Billy has been working my girl behind my back. 
 Yeah, it's true.
I'm fucking out of here. 
- Where are you going, buddy?
- Fuck you!
- I'm talking to you, Brutus.
- What?
I'm talking to you!
You steal my fucking lady....
But not enough to deal with the fucking consequences?
Shit!
Stop! Stop!
Chuck, a little fucking help here?
They can kill each other for all I care. 
- Unbelievable! Stand up.
- You're fired.
I'm fired? That's great!
That''s fucking hilarious. Fuck you. 
Asshole.
Come on, let's do this later. 
No, we're not going to do this later! 
 We're going to do this now!
- Wake up. 
 - What the fuck?
What the fuck are you doing?
- Where are we? 
 - We just arrived in 'Doucheville'. 
- This is your stop. 
 - No, seriously. Where are we?
Philosophically speaking, I'd say we've arrived at a crossroads. 
- The label dropped the band.
- They killed the tour, man.
What?
- What are you talking about? Why?
- Why? Dave, want to take this one?
No. Let me. 
 'Why did they kill the tour?'
Let me see if I can't recreate their decision. 
Upon viewing the youtube video of you starting a rob room brawl on stage, and then walking out on your remaining 2,000 fans, 
powers that be got together and said, "Wait a minute, this guy is actually ridiculous!"
And also, there is no more margin in this business because 
 these idiots don't sell albums anymore!
While that bullshit might play for Radiohead, throwing good money at this used up has-been is probably not such a good idea!
And also, it's just fucking plain embarrassing! 
All those in favor of dropping the Ethan Brand Experiment?
Fuck.
This bus is going back to New York tonight. 
So we can either hitch a ride or we can continue the tour on our own. 
What do you say?
- Where is Iris?
Are you fucking joking?
- She went back to L.A, man. 
 - Continue sleeping. 
No problem.
Do you need anything?
- Are you comfortable?
- Yes
Okay.
I have to talk with Sloan about some business stuff. 
Okay.
- Hang out. 
 - Yeah. 
- Watch TV.
- Right.
I'll be back.
Just let me work on them, all right?
Because they know you just lost part of your band. 
You got dropped and now this thing with Youtube. 
It's not being very helpful to this situation. 
- Play it again. 
 - What?
- Just play it! 
 - I'm not playing it again!
- You're going to freak out. 
 - I'm not going to freak out. 
- Yes, you are. 
 - I'm not going to freak out, I promise. 
All right. No yelling. 
I am not. 
[over speakers] But not enough to deal with the fucking consequences?
Stop! Stop!
Chuck, help me out here.
Fuck!
I thought we had a deal, man. 
I look like a fucking dickhead. 
Just don't let them cancel SXSW. (South by Southwest) 
What?
- We need that frickin' gate. 
 - Yeah, we need it. 
Okay, okay. Yeah. 
Relax.
What are we going to do about her?
She's gotta go, man!
Back to her mom. 
She's a kid, I can't be responsible for her. 
She can't hear me!
All right. 
Where you going?
I need some air. 
Sloane, don't make me fucking drink alone. 
♪ Bad day, looking for a way home ♪
♪ looking for the great escape ♪
♪ gets in his car and drives away, 
 far from all the things that we are ♪
♪ Puts on a smile and breathes it in
 and breathes it out, he says,  ♪
♪ bye bye; bye to all of the noise. ♪
♪ Oh, he says, bye bye bye to all of the noise. ♪
♪ Doo doo doo doo doo noo noo ♪
♪ Doo doo doo doo doo noo noo noo noo ♪
♪ Doo doo doo doo doo doo doo ♪
♪ Doo doo doo doo doo doo noo noo noo ♪
♪ Hey child, things are looking down.
That's okay, you don't need to win anyways. ♪
♪ Don't be afraid, just eat up all the gray and it will fade all away. ♪
♪ Don't let yourself fall down. ♪
♪ Doo doo doo doo doo noo noo ♪
♪ Doo doo doo doo doo noo noo noo noo ♪
Good night.
[singing in distance]
What are you doing messing with ancient folk songs?
- What do you mean? 
 - I mean, that song is like a hundred years old. 
Shouldn't you be listening to Jonas Brothers or Miley Cyrus or some shit like that?
- My grandfather was a fan.
- Your granddad had good taste. 
- Let me see that? 
 -Sure. 
Here. 
- Where's the Joker Brigade? 
 - They said they were going to go talk some shop.
I think they went to that bar over there, y'know, check out the local talent. 
It's kind of beat up but I like her. 
 She's got character.
You look like shit. 
Thank you.
You tell the truth. 
 I like that. 
- Shall we? 
 - Where?
- To 'yon Quickie Mart. 
 -Sure, let me put this away. 
No, no. Bring it. 
This is a song that I wrote when I was about 18. 
- Really?
- It's one of the first songs I wrote. 
♪ Let's just pretend.  ♪
♪ Make believe that you like me ♪
♪ Let's just pretend.  ♪
♪ Make believe that you know me  ♪
♪ Because yesterday is gone for good ♪
♪ Tomorrow never comes  ♪
-  ♪ So why don't you just take my hand ♪ 
 - E?
E, we got a problem. 
- No.
- No?
What do you mean, 'no'? 
You don't even know what I'm talking about. 
- I don't want to know. 
-Hi. 
I'm tired of getting hit in the back of the neck with shit pellets. 
Okay, so, you don't want to know that Chuck and Dave are loading up the van and heading back to New York?
What?
- Here comes Dr. Shitstorm. 
 -Just be cool, I'll talk to him. 
Stoic, controlled, surgical. 
We're leaving, that's it. 
What the fuck is this?
You're just going to sneak off like a couple of pussies and leave me and the little girl here here in the middle of nowhere? 
 - That's funny. 
- That's fucking hilarious. 
 Leave you?
We're fed up! We're fucking fed up with your narcissistic rich kid bullshit, you fucking asshole! 
 Fuck you, man! 
Fuck you, you fucking douche!
- Way to stay on message. 
 -Sorry. 
Let's everybody try to be adult about this, okay?
Eth, we're moving on, buddy. It's time. 
You need to work through some shit and we need to not be around to wait on you to do that. 
Come on, guys, this is fucking crazy. 
We've been together way too long to be doing this. 
Yeah. Exactly.
Chuck?
- Stop. Stop.
 - Ow, fuck!
[profanity]
Shit, I didn't mean to...
I'm sorry, man, I'm sorry. 
 I didn't mean to do that. 
I love you.
I love you like a brother, man. 
That's why we're leaving.
 Because if I don't, I'm going to kill you!
- Okay. C'mon.
- We're going.
I feel like I handled that really badly. 
Don't call me, man. 
Hey, are you okay?
- Ethan?
- What?
- Are you all right? 
 - Yeah. 
- Yeah, I'm good. 
 - You sure?
Yeah. 
That car smells like feet. 
Nothing a little fresh air won't fix. 
This is not a good idea. 
 I think you guys should come back to Chicago with me. 
- It's too much to handle on your own, man.
- What am I, 16?
I need these shows. 
If I'm going to play SXSW solo. 
I can handle this. 
I need to borrow some money. 
Well...
This is all I got, man. 
I'm tapped out. You take that. 
-Okay? 
 - I'm going to pay you back every penny.
I promise.
Do not worry about me.
I'll be fine.
You better stay in touch. 
 - Okay. 
- All right? Here. 
You already gave this to me. 
[indistinct] 
I don't know what that means. 
But thank you. 
- Call me when you get to Omaha.
- Will do. 
You take care of each other!
- Officer Dickerson? 
 - That's me. 
It's Ethan Brand. We met last week with that little girl?
I was wondering if you managed to track down her mom yet?
- Sorry, not a thing. 
 - Well, I don't get it. 
She said that she was going into rehab. 
Yep, well that's what junkies say. 
 Everything okay?
- I don't think that I'm the best person for this. 
 - At the moment? You're the only person for it. 
I got to go.
I'll call you back. 
- Who was that?
- Some record label idiots. 
We have to hit it. 
We have to be at the venue by 8. 
 We still got to find a place to crash. 
Thank you.
- The shower isn't half bad. 
 - I'll take a rain check. 
- Suit yourself. 
 - So, anyways. 
- When did you get your first tattoo? 
 - Seventeen. 
Really? 
 Which one?
-That one. 
 - Who's that?
I got it out of a book.
Some hottie I saw a picture of. 
I got that first one just to see my mom freak. 
What did she do?
- She freaked! 
 - Did she ground you?
- No.
- What? No punishment?
Not unless you call a lifetime of resentment and psychotherapy punishment. 
She was so disgusted with me, 
 she went to Italy with her boyfriend the next day. 
It sounds just like my mom. Except, y'know, swap Italy for some piece of shit biker bar. 
Hah!
Let's do this thing!
♪ Please be sweet to me  ♪
♪ My guard is down  ♪
[loud chattering and laughter]
♪ Please just sleep with me  ♪
♪ Before I drown  ♪
♪ I think about you all the time ♪
♪ I built a bird's nest in my mind ♪
♪ My hands press down the strings ♪
♪ Feel your smile ♪
♪ and when I sing, it's you I see ♪
♪ them other girls, ain't real to me ♪
♪ it's just sometimes, I hate to be alone ♪
♪ you're lonely ♪
[loud chattering and laughter]
 Are you having fun?
Fuck, yeah!
No, no. It's just that...
- I feel like I'm interrupting something. 
 - Naw, boy! You're good!
Am I? 
 Thanks. 
How about you keep the screaming 
 to a minimum until I'm done with this set?
And then you can make whatever kind of strange noises you want. 
Why don't you mind your own fucking business?
Well, Mr. Crackerass motherfucker, that's exactly what I'm doing. 
Because this is my fucking business: singing fucking songs. 
So why don't you and the cave dwellers sitting sitting at your fucking table, shut the fuck up
So why don't you and the cave dwellers sitting sitting at your fucking table, shut the fuck up
- And let me do my job?
- Well, why don't you come down here and say that to my face, you pretty boy faggot?
That's it!
I know it. 
- Can we do something about these people? 
 - Yeah, can we?
[mocking]
Come on, just play. 
Come on.
He's putting down his guitar. 
You're going to go ahead and apologize to Mary Alice. 
- Go on, now. 
 - Hey, mister?
How about letting go of my dad?
Come on. please? 
 Let him go. 
- Release him, man.
- Thanks.
- So, can I play you guys a song? 
- Sure!
[strumming guitar]
♪ Me, can't you see, I'm as right as rain ♪
♪ You, you're strung out and blue, but you'll be okay. ♪
♪ The sun's only heightened ♪
♪ It's all just a game ♪
♪ La la la ♪
♪ Look me in the eye, and please take my hand ♪
♪ Stop avoidin' and runnin' and building your house on sand. ♪
♪ I wish for a wave to crash
Wash it all away ♪
♪ La la la la la la ♪
♪ La la la la, la la ♪
♪ La la la la la la, la la la la ♪
♪ La la la la, la la ♪
♪ Me, can't you see, I'm as right as rain ♪
♪ You, you're strung out and blue, but you'll be okay. ♪
♪ The sun's only heightened ♪
♪ It's all just a game  ♪
♪ La, la, la  ♪
- That your little girl? 
 - Hey. 
You got some lungs on you, girl. 
 What's your name?
- Janie. Janie Jones.
- Why don't you two come up to my office?
The guy dragged me off the stage by my [profanity] underpants. 
Forget about that. 
 I want to talk about a booking. 
- Janie, can you go get my things? 
 - Wait, what kind of booking?
I wanna bring you in here as a father/daughter act. 
What? No way, that is flipping awesome. 
 - Janie, please just go 
- We would love to do the show.
- Janie, go pack up my stuff. 
Fine, just keep your pants on. 
That's some kid you got there, Ethan. 
 - Forget about it, okay?
I'm not doing a show with a kid. 
 I've got enough problems. 
I don't need my career turning into some kind of side show. 
It's for half a show tonight. 
Oh, man. Give me a fucking break! 
Those shit-kicking bar flies started the whole thing. 
 You know that. 
Those shit-kickers keep my lights on. 
I like you, Ethan.
I like the music.
I think my Sunday night audience would really dig seeing you and your kid play. 
I give you all $400 cash and and 20% of the door. A good crowd. 
A 50 minute set. There is one other act. 
All right, 50 minutes. 
Hey, what's up? 
 -Hi. 
I like your music.
- Thanks. 
 - She's 13, you little creep.
Beat it. 
Let's go.
- See you later. 
 - Later.
Come on.
Go feast on the flesh of someone your own age. 
- So when did you get so paternal? 
 - When you became my business partner.
- What, no way, seriously? 
 - Yeah, seriously. 
- This is a one time thing. 
 - Thank you!
- Are you hungry?
- I'm actually starved. 
I saw an all night burger joint on the way in. 
It starts, it's just G and C on the way in but there's a little riff. 
And then a G sharp.
- I don't have to do that, right? 
 - No, you just play the G and the C. 
There's a C minor in the bridge. 
But I'll nod at you or something. 
- Okay.
- Right.
So it's...
♪ The voice that whispers in our head ♪
♪ suggests that we just stay in bed ♪
♪ Does it seem sweeter sounding lately? ♪ 
 - C
♪ to you as well ♪
♪ It sounds a bit like Nat King Cole ♪
♪ Scrambling for change to pay the toll ♪
♪ this love has lasted longer than ♪   
 - Back to C...
♪ we did expect ♪
Back to the C...
 -♪  Never... ♪
- ♪ Expect... ♪ 
 - Now is the C minor.
♪ somehow turns into become  ♪
Now the D...
♪ While the work that we must do is
The work that we must do is ♪
♪ It's never done. ♪
- Finished?
- That's it.
I mean, there's another couple of verses. 
♪ May I audition for the part ♪
♪ of sweeping up your dusty heart? ♪
♪ I think I know it's darkest corners ♪
♪ fairly well ♪
♪ and may this melody play sweet on the dark, deserted streets  ♪
♪ where we forever wait to meet our mothers car ♪
♪ We never would have guessed  ♪
♪ We never could have guessed  ♪
♪ Becoming somehow turns into become ♪
♪ While the work that we must do is ♪
♪ The work that we must do is ♪
♪ It's never done. ♪
♪ Ooooooh ♪
♪ We never would have guessed ♪
♪ We never could have guessed ♪
♪ Becoming somehow turns into become ♪
She can do a really good show. 
- Hi 
 - Hey, Janie. 
Girls, this is Janie Jones.
- Hey, Janie. 
 - Hi. 
Aren't you a little young to be in here?
Aren't you a little old to be wearing white?
She's feisty, I like her. 
The Janie is very talented. 
 She'll play a couple of songs with me tonight. 
Couldn't find any backup singers your own age?
Yeah, I'm actually not a backup singer. 
 He's my dad. 
Go in and check on our gear and stuff. 
 I'll be over there in a second. 
She's not really my kid. 
This is my cell.
 Give me a buzz after the show. 
Nice to meet you.
Have a good night. 
I hope you enjoy the show.
- Thanks.
- You know, I don't see why you have to drink so much. before you go on. 
Hey, thanks for blowing my wrap. 
- You mean with the cougars of the Plain states? 
 - They weren't cougars. 
Yes, they were. 
Five minutes.
- Five minutes.
- Okay.
♪ And I still hate that fake smile you put on ♪
♪ seems whenever a picture was taken ♪
♪ Because I knew the real you and what you went through ♪
♪ to keep bravery in the best and to make it ♪
[cheering and applause]
Thank you. Thank you.
Why tune up backstage when you can tune up in front of an audience?
Whoo!
I smell feet!
I want to introduce you to a young girl.
She is very talented. 
 She's going to sing a couple of songs with me. 
Her name is Janie Jones.
She's like that girl, what's the name of that girl you were talking about? 
- Molly.
- That.
♪ Stole a bottle from the DJ's dressing room  ♪
♪ Drank from it until the stars began to spin  ♪
- My God, a good looking young girl, right? 
 - I know. 
♪ Then you cracked a smile so sweet and tender  ♪
♪ And all at once, the light came pouring in  ♪
[Both] ♪ And all at once, the light came pouring in ♪
♪ Oooooh  ♪
I gotta get that girl to my house. 
 [raucous laughter]
Stop it!
Are you okay?
Drop your head, sir. 
Call Sloan.
He'll take care of it. 
Oh, God. I can't do it. 
I can. I can do this. 
 I can do this. 
Oh, shit!
- I wanna make my phone call. 
 - You already had your phone call. 
Yeah, but it went to voicemail and it really doesn't count. 
[deepened voice] Hi, my friend was arrested tonight and I would like to bail him out. 
Turn around, face the officer. 
Strip.
Oh, man. Can't I just keep my clothes on, please?
"Man?" What, you have an attitude problem?
- You have an attitude problem? 
 - No. 
Strip. 
Sloane, it's Janie Jones and I really need your help.
Ethan got himself arrested and I need to bail him out. 
I really need you to call me because I don't know what to do. 
Please call me. 
 I'm at a hotel right now. 
It's 508-555-0755.
Room 20. Please, please call. 
Thanks, bye.
Sloan!
Sorry. Sorry. No.
Five hundred dollars?
No, no. That's not a problem at all. 
Yeah. 
9 AM? 
 Okay. 
Okay, I'll be there. 
 Bye. 
- May I help you, little lady?
- I spoke with someone last night named Gil?
My friend Ethan Brand was arrested and I'm here to bail him out. 
You should take a seat. 
 We'll get into some paperwork.
Is that going to take a long time? 
 He's been in there all night. 
- I sort of want to get him out. 
 - Well, that depends on how fast you can write. 
I'm sorry. 
I was so scared they might hurt you in there. 
I'm okay. 
I didn't know what to do so I called Sloane but he didn't answer. 
- Yeah, I know. 
 - So, I pawned your guitars. 
- What?
- Well, don't get mad at me. 
- I'm friggin' 13, there's not a lot of options. 
 - Yeah, I know, I know. 
- Plus, you owe like $100 and $60 for the motel room. 
 - I know, I know. 
You rock. 
Let's get the hell out of here. 
- How did you get here, did you take a taxi? 
 - What? No way, I drove our car. 
- You've been driving? 
 - Yeah! And I'm totally good at it now too. 
At first, I was scared.
Okay, okay. I appreciate your initiative and the candy spirit but the driving thing has to end now. 
- No, I'm good! I'm really good! 
 - Give me the keys!
- Come on. 
 - Keys! Non-negotiable! 
It's ridiculous, fine. 
How the hell did you figure out how to get me out of there?
Well, I mean, I guess I'd have to give credit to my mom for getting in so much trouble with the law. 
- And with Duane "Dog" Chapman.
- Who's that?
Bounty hunter? 
 It's a reality show on A&E. 
- It's so cool, no? 
 - Okay. 
Okay, let's have the bad news. 
 How much to get my gear out? 
Look, it's not like I tried to get you a better deal. 
 The guy was just so...
- What's the damage? 
 - A thousand bucks to get the guitars back. 
Sorry.
It's not your fault. 
Sorry.
It's not your fault. 
I'm the drunken lout.
I'm going to deal with this. 
- What are you going to do? 
 - I'm going to call Sloane. 
- Where's my phone?
- I don't know. 
What do you mean you don't know? 
 It was with my stuff in the green room. 
No, it wasn't I got everything out of the green room. 
 - You looked in my bag?
- Yup, many times. 
 - In the cases?
Shit. 
You know what you remind me of, guys?
Hold on a minute, I've got to take this. 
Hello?
Yeah, I'll accept the charges. 
Hey, hey. Ethan? 
 How are you...what?
What are you talking about? 
 What message?
- I never got a fucking message, man. 
 - I was in fucking jail, Sloane. 
Jail! With steel bars. and evil fucking people who steal shit and murder people
You know who bailed me out? 
 Not you!
Not my manager and my friend who, by the way, didn't pick up the phone!
Do you know who did it? 
 Janie did it, Sloane. 
Janie Jones. She hocked my guitars to get me out of jail. 
Wow, wow. 
Yeah...'wow!' 
So now, I've got no gear and almost no money. 
 - So...
- I need you to wire me some cash. 
 - I can't, man. 
- It's just two grand. 
 - I can't. I don't have it. 
- Of course, you do. 
 - No, I don't have it, man. 
Okay, a thousand. 
I don't have it. 
 I'm serious!
That is bullshit! 
 You can't spare a thousand dollars?
Even if I had the money, I can't bail you out!
Okay? I'm sorry, I'm tapped out, man. 
All right, whatver. 
 Don't worry about it. 
Chicago! Oh, my God! 
 That's crazy, I've been waiting to go to a big city for ever!
Don't get too excited because we're not going to stay very long. 
We're just going long enough to pick up some money. then we got to turn around and pick up our gear then we got four days to get by SXSW. 
What? That's crazy. 
Can you just get the person that's going to give us the money to wire it?
- No, I can't. 
 - Why not?
It's complicated.
Just wait here, I'll be back in a minute. 
Ethan?
Lily, I need to talk to you.
I need your help. 
 My back is against the wall. 
Oh, my God. 
Are you serious?
You're a grown man, Ethan. 
I can't continually bail you out. 
I wouldn't be here if I wasn't serious. 
I need a small loan.
- That's all. 
 - That's all?
I'm playing bridge. 
2,000. It's all I need. 
 You guys, your change purse!
What would you do if you didn't have me to turn to?
You'd have to get a job, now wouldn't you?
Oh, that's funny. 
 Coming from woman who's never worked a day in her life!
I think we're done here, Ethan. 
I will not have my character assassinated inside my own house.
It's not for me. 
 It's for my daughter. 
Oh, Ethan. 
This is a new low, even for you! 
Lying about a child to extort money from your mother?
I'm not lying. 
- She's sitting outside right now. 
 - Oh, really?
Yeah, really.
Well, don't be rude. 
By all means, bring her in. 
 I would love to meet my granddaughter. 
You can meet her another day. 
- Goodbye, Ethan. 
 - Okay!
Okay. Fine. 
Well, this should be amusing. 
Lily, this is Janie. 
She's your granddaughter. 
Hello, Janie.
Hi. 
Ethan, you've got to stop this charade. 
 I mean, really. 
The two of you ought to be ashamed of yourselves. 
- How old are you, young lady? 
 - I'm thirteen. 
- Thirteen? 
 - Yeah. 
- And he is your father?
- Yeah. 
Ethan, where did you find this child? 
 On the street?
It's one thing to waste your own life chasing this music career 
But to come in here and demand money from me while you're corrupting this innocent child...
Stop! Stop!
  Okay? Just stop!
Okay? And...
And he's not lying, okay?
He's...
I'm her father.
I'm her father.
- Come on, let's go. 
 - Wait. 
Please, wait. 
 Please, close the door. 
I'm sorry. 
I shouldn't have brought you here. 
So...
That's your mom?
Yeah. 
I thought I had it bad. 
Yeah. 
I'm sorry, my dear. 
I wish I could say that I forgot my medication but there is really no excuse for my behavior. 
She has your father's eyes. 
So, where are you going?
We gotta get back on the road. 
Can't you stay for just a little bit?
No, we really got to get going. 
- So where are you headed? 
 - Texas. 
- Hey, Ethan. 
 - Yeah?
- Can I ask you a question? 
 - Yeah?
Okay. But you have to promise that you'll tell me the truth. 
- Seriously, like really. 
 - Okay, yeah. 
Was my mom just some groupe that you hooked up with?
No. Not at all. 
 I totally dugged your mom. 
She was...
She was cool.
- Yeah, okay. 
 - She was, I'm serious. 
What happened to your father?
You, like, never talk about him. 
- If you don't want to talk about it... 
 - No, it's cool. 
I don't know. I guess I just don't 
 really think about him that much. 
He was a composer.
He composed modern classical music.
Was a very talented guy.
But he killed himself when I was nine.
He took a bunch of painkillers and a half bottle of whiskey and left me to fend for myself with Lily. 
I'm sorry. 
 I shouldn't have brought it up. 
No, no. 
 It's fine. 
So how much money did your mom give you, anyway?
A lot. 
- Over five grand! 
 - Holy shit! 
Really?
Who keeps that kind of money just laying around?
The obscenely rich. Criminals. 
- [phone ringing]  
 - [laughing]
No, no. I checked the cases! 
 I checked! 
- I swear I checked. 
 - You checked the cases?
It wasn't in there!
It wasn't in there! 
 I swear! 
Hello?
Hey. 
No, she's fine.
Oh, he did? That's good. 
 We were wondering when we were going to hear from you. 
Well, that's good to hear. 
I'm glad. 
Janie is great.
 We've had a great time together. 
We are in Des Moines.
Yeah. 
Yeah, I can bring her back to you. 
Yeah. Yeah. 
Hold on. 
It's your mom. 
She sounds like she is doing a lot better. 
You know, it's not like you could stay out on the road with me forever. 
You have to go back to school.
I know.
It's right up here on the right. 
Mary Ann and me been clean near a month. 
- I'm real proud of her. 
 - Thanks, baby. 
 I think I owe you an apology.
 I'm going to grab me another beer. 
 You want one, buddy?
No, thanks 
You don't need to apologize. 
If there's anybody who has to apologize here, it's me. 
No, no. 
 Actually, I do. 
Because what I said to you in Little Rock was not cool.
So...
I'm sorry.
Janie is an incredible young woman. 
 She is. 
You, you are. 
She's talented, she's smart. 
I don't know what I would have done without her over the last few days.
So, I guess what I'm trying to say is, thank you. 
Thank you for bringing her into my life. 
You're welcome.
Well, you have a really long drive ahead of you. 
I guess I better get going. 
You can stay for a just little longer. 
 If you wanted to stay a little longer. 
I think I have to push off. 
But, thank you. 
 It was really nice to see you. 
- Take care. 
 - Bye. 
♪ How long should I wait ♪
You know, you don't have to worry about me or anything. 
 I'll be fine. 
♪ How long should I decide? ♪
I'm going to come visit you, okay?
- Yeah, okay.  
 - I promise. 
♪ When both of us were wrong.  ♪
♪ When both of us were wrong ♪
♪ When both of us were wrong.  ♪
♪ When both of us were wrong ♪
- Bye. 
 - Bye. 
♪ Oh, but I love you  ♪
♪ Even still, even now ♪
♪ Even though we fell apart  ♪
♪ Even still, even now ♪
♪ But I hope we'll meet again  ♪
♪ Whose eyes will you look in ♪
♪ when love is in your heart ♪
♪ Whose hand will hold your ring ♪
♪ Whose voice will serenade  ♪
♪ to help your baby sleep  ♪
♪ to make it all okay ♪
♪ Oh, but I love you 
 Even still, even now ♪
♪ and I hope that we'll meet again  ♪
♪ Even still, even now ♪
♪ Even though we fell apart ♪
♪ Even still, even now ♪
♪ And I hope you'll be okay ♪
[muffled voices arguing] 
[tapping]
What are you doing here?
I was thinking...
- I think you should come with me.
- Seriously?
Yeah, seriously. 
I don't think you should stay here. 
You know, you don't have to do this. 
 You're not obligated or something. 
Okay. 
 Thanks for letting me off the hook.
Go get your stuff. 
[voices arguing] 
- What if my mom calls the cops? 
 - She's not going to call the cops. 
- Go get your stuff. 
 - We'll call her. 
Okay!
[voices continue arguing] 
- Wait. 
 - What?
 You know I have to come back? 
I know. 
- Okay. 
 - Okay.
Thank you. 
 Thank you very much.
[clears throat]
I'm going to play one more song for you. 
I'm incredibly honored to have someone very special come out and sing with me. 
Ladies and gentlemen...
My daughter,
The incomparable, Janie Jones!
[cheering and applause]
♪ Don't let hurricane 
 hold you back ♪
♪ raging rivers and shark attack ♪
♪ Find love ♪
[Janie vocalizing]
♪ and give it all away ♪
♪ Find love  ♪
♪ and give it all away ♪
♪ Wrestle bears ♪
♪ to their knees ♪
♪ Steal the honey from the killer bees ♪
♪ Find love ♪
♪ and give it all away ♪
♪ Find love  ♪
♪ and give it all away ♪
♪ Find love ♪
♪ and give it all away ♪
♪ Give it all away ♪
[cheering & applause]
Vacation, meant to be spent alone
Can't seem to get my mind off of you
Can't seem to get my mind off of you
Yeah, yeah, yeah
Back here at home there's nothing to do
Hey, Yeah, yeah
Now that I'm away
I wish I'd stayed
Tomorrow's a day of mine that you want be in
Oh, oh, ah
Vacation, all I ever wanted
Okay. All right, one, two, three...
Guys! One...
Hold on. Guys, freeze!
Aw!
- Where's Alvin?
- Hey, Dave.
- Where have you been?
- Where have I been?
Trying to board the ship.
Already done that.
Also, checked out our room, dibbed the side of the bed closest to the window, ordered us a round of virgin piña coladas and signed us up for parasailing.
Alvin, you're too young for parasailing.
I thought we were going on vacation to have fun.
Don't worry, family vacations are all about fun.
But first we're gonna need to set some rules.
Let's start with you can't call dibs on a bed until everyone's in the room.
- Good rule.
- That's right.
That's a good one, Simon.
All right, so that's our first rule.
Should we go over the rest of them?
Dave, come on. "Rules" is my middle name.
No attorneys to plead my case
Illa racket ships to send me into outer space
And my fingers are bejeweled
With diamonds and gold
But that ain't gonna help me now
I'm trouble
Yeah, trouble now
I'm trouble, y'all
I got trouble in my town
I'm trouble
- Hey, Dave.
- Alvin!
- Ha ha! Whoo!
- Whoa. Ahhh! Ahhh! Ow!
This is your captain speaking.
All kids are now allowed to play an the adults-only Serenity Deck.
I'm trouble
Yeah, trouble now
I'm trouble, y'all
I got trouble in my town
You think you're right, but you were wrong
You tried to take me, baby
But you knew all along
You can't take me for a ride
I'm not a fool now
So you better run and hide
I'm trouble Yeah, trouble now
I'm trouble, y'all
I got trouble in my town
Alvin!
I'm trouble Yeah, trouble now
I'm trouble, y'all
I got trouble in my town
I'm trouble
Yeah, trouble now
I'm trouble, y'all
I got trouble in my town
I'm trouble Yeah, trouble now
I'm trouble, y'all
I got trouble in my town
Yo! I'm the T to the R to the O-U-bull
Rock it non-stop till the mic gets dull
Take what! want when I want, no holding back
When I kick a ﬂow
I'm all up an the track
A to the L to the V-I-N
When I'm in town, me and all of my friends
Gonna come through like a hurricane
Tearing down everything in my way
Alvin!
- We talked about setting rules, Alvin.
- I'm sorry.
I didn't know the agreement meant no fun.
You're allowed to have fun.
When are you going to stop acting like a child?
When are you going to stop treating me like a child?
I'll stop treating you like a child when you start acting like a grown-up!
I'll start acting like a grown-up when you start...
I whip my tailback and forth
I whip my tailback and forth
I whip my tail back and forth
I whip my tail back and forth
- Hey, girls, not now, please, okay?
- Aw.
- Lame!
- Sorry, Dave.
I need to get ready for dinner with the captain.
We're having dinner with the captain?
No, I am. You're staying here.
I have to go apologize for everything Alvin did.
This is so not fair.
Not to us, not to Dave, and certainly not to the captain, who I'm sure was really looking forward to dining with me.
Why don't I go speak with Dave?
See if I can smooth things over.
Knock-knock.
- What is it, Simon?
- Well, I would never say this to Alvin.
Goodness knows he can be totally irresponsible, but I actually have a suggestion.
You have a suggestion for me?
He's been driving me crazy a lot longer than he's been driving you crazy.
All right. So what is it?
Imagine Alvin is a spirited racehorse.
That's your advice?
No. I'm not done yet, Dave.
All right, so Alvin is a racehorse...
And you, Dave, are his incredibly helpful jockey who's there to guide him down the racetrack of life.
But if you hold the reins too tight, that racehorse is going to fight and buck, which is no fun for anyone.
But if you loosen the reins just a little...
He'll fly right off the track and crash into the fence.
I know you want to protect Alvin, but, Dave, sometimes kids will rise to the occasion if you just show them a little trust.
All right, guys, room service is on its way.
Lights out by 9:00.
Dave, question.
If we're going to be held captive in this room...
Because of Alvin!
Can we at least watch a movie?
All right, let's see what's on.
You know what, why don't you guys pick a movie?
You're old enough to make your own decision.
For real, Dave?
Absolutely.
- Ooh! Dave looks so elegant.
- Have fun!
Wait, Dave, before you go,
I made something for you.
Wow, it's really... it's soft so you can sleep in it and I made it with all the colors, so it will go with everything!
Great. I'll put it on after dinner.
You could put it on now, so everyone at the captain's table could see it.
Nice.
A real chick magnet.
All right, guys, have fun.
But not too much fun, because I'm still very upset.
Goodbye, Dave.
And, hello, ladies!
I like my tail shaken, not stirred.
- Where are you going?
- To the casino. I'm feeling lucky.
Oh, no. No, no, no, no. Dave said...
Dave said, and I quote,
"We're old enough to make our own decisions."
He meant we were old enough to choose a film!
Well, we're clearly not.
Check out what Theodore just picked.
What's wrong with this movie?
It's for babies!
Which is probably why
Dave treats us like babies.
Munk up, Theodore.
There. That's more like it.
Alvin, please!
I say we go to Salsa Night!
In our pajamas?
Oh, I know!
Party rack is in the house tonight
Everybody just have a good time
And we gonna make you lose your mind
We/ust wanna see ya shake that
Alvin!
Alvin! Alvin!
And we have a winner.
Ellie, I love these dresses!
You're so crafty.
Thanks. it's what I do.
- Ow!
- Oh! sorry!
Ew! What are you?
We are the Chipettes.
- Hi, I'm Eleanor!
My sister was just trying to apologize.
What's she sorry for?
Stepping on my friend's foot?
Or her busted, tired little dance moves?
Oh, no, you didn't!
Oh, yes, she did!
You better get those Lee Press-Ons out of my face unless you want to meet my claws.
And, yeah, baby, they're real.
- Do you wanna go?
- Hit it!
Come on, shake your body
Baby, do the conga
I know you can't control yourself any longer
Come on, shake your body
Baby, do the conga
I know you can't control yourself any longer
Come on, shake your body
Baby, do the conga
Come on, shake your body
Baby, do the conga
Oh, whoa!
Ugh!
Let the music move your feet
Come on, shake your body
Baby, do the conga
I know you can't control yourself any longer
Come on, shake your body
Baby, do the conga
I know you can't control yourself any longer
Come on, shake your body
Baby, do the conga
I know you can't control yourself any longer
Come on, shake your body
Baby, do the conga
I know you can't control yourself any longer
Come an!
Captain, I'm really sorry about what happened.
Alvin, he's a kid.
He's just trying to have some fun.
There's nothing wrong with fun.
Our pelican makes sure that everybody on the ship has fun.
In fact, in port, he circles the ship on a hang glider.
It's really quite amusing.
However, my number one priority is the passengers' safety.
Sol simply cannot have Alvin put himself, or anyone else, at risk again.
Believe me, I understand.
If Alvin breaks any more of our rules, there will be consequences.
The last thing we want is anyone getting hurt.
Excuse me.
- Hot!
- Sorry.
Hot!
Unbelievable. Gravy pants.
Hey, he?!
- Do you have a problem with me?
- You bet I have a problem with you.
- Why?
- As if you didn't know.
I don't know.
Ian? What are you doing here?
I'm working, Dave.
This is your job?
Yeah, not too many record labels are interested in hiring the guy who blew it with the Chipmunks, blew it with the Chipettes and passed on Justin Bieber.
Twice.
Look, Ian, I'm sorry you lost your job and your dignity.
But spilling things, hot things, on me isn't going to bring any of that stuff back.
You're right, Dave.
It's too late for me to get my old life back.
But it's not too late to ruin yours.
You want to ruin my life?
Why don't we just start with this vacation?
If I see those chipmunks break so much as one rule,
I'm going straight to Captain Correlli.
You're in my house now!
Although, technically it's not a house, it's a ship.
The point is, I'll be watching you.
Like a hawk!
- Theodore?
- Please don't eat my brain!
Why are you watching Jungle Monster 4.7
Alvin, how could you...
Alvin?
Simon?
Girls?
Oh, no. No, no, no, no, no, no, no!
- I'll be right back!
- it's dark.
You're up for an International Music Award.
That's fantastic!
Yeah, it's pretty cool.
I guess. If you like a lot of adulation.
We fly there right after the cruise.
Hoping to take home Record of the Year.
That would make you the youngest winner ever.
I'm not that young.
I mean, I'm hanging out in a casino way past my bedtime.
Not that I have a bedtime!
No one tells me what to do.
Alvin!
Who's Alan, I wonder?
Anyway
I'd love to chat more, but I've gotta run.
You're in a lot of trouble, young man!
You can follow me on Critter!
Alvin! Alvin!
Simon?
I wasn't betting. Honest.
Your winnings, sir.
Oh, busted!
I didn't sneak out. I mean, I did.
But only to stop Alvin.
- Right.
- There they are, Captain.
Captain.
What's he going to do, make us walk the plank?
There's a plank?
No, there's no plank, but if you guys disobey me one more time, you will be off the ship.
And you'll miss the International
Music Awards. Do you understand?
- Yes, Dave.
- Uh-huh.
Absolutely.
What if we need to disobey you?
And why would you need to do that?
Well, let's say that you tell me to stay put.
"Alvin, if you move from that chair, you're grounded!"
But then I happen to see pirates climbing up ropes, ever so stealthy, from the side of the ship.
Now, it would be easy for me to take my trusty old Swiss Army knife and cut the ropes.
But I have to stay put. Or do I?
Yes, Alvin, you do.
And what are you doing with a pocket knife?
What pocket knife are you referring to?
Come on, give it to me.
You could cut yourself.
So, I could have saved the whole ship from robbage and pilgering and you'd still ground me?
Alvin, there's no such word as robbage.
And it's "pillaging."
But he does have a point, Dave.
There's got to be times when you trust us to take matters into our own hands.
I trusted you tonight and look where that got me!
That's probably just the hot gravy talking.
You're all lucky Captain Correlli has allowed you one more activity.
Is it hang gliding, wakeboarding or bungee jumping?
No. Shuffleboard.
Man!
By my calculations, it appears to be 10% shuffle, 90% bored.
That's funny!
Oh, thanks. You really think so?
You know, Dave, I think
I'd prefer the plank.
Sorry, Alvin, but this is what you get to do.
And I get to do something
I haven't done in a long time.
Absolutely nothing.
Brittany approaches her puck, adjusts her stance, looks over at me, quite annoyed, wonders to herself if I'm ever going to shut my mouth, realizes I'm not, and makes her move.
And... Oh!
Oh, it's short!
A costly error, ladies and gentlemen, that's going to haunt her the rest of her career.
You can make all the jokes you want, Alvin, but not even you can make this interesting.
Oh, really? Well, care to make it interesting that I can make this interesting?
Alvin, what are you up to?
Need I remind you Dave is watching us.
Simon, the poor guy hasn't had a moment's peace since he met us.
He's exhausted.
Check this out. In three, two, one.
Lights out.
- Nap time!
Time to turn punishment into funishment.
You get it?
I took the "pun" in punishment, and turned it into "fun," but kept the "ishment." it's word play!
- Uh-huh.
- What?
Hey, kid!
Wanna make a trade?
That's a nice-looking kite.
Yeah!
I can see Russia from here!
Come on, Simon, grab on.
Forget it. All I ever do is try to save him and it only gets me in trouble!
This won't end well.
Simon, do something!
Oh, seriously?
Simon, help!
Alvin's gotten himself in a bind.
Looks like it's Simon saving him again!
Whoa!
Thanks, bro.
- Huh?
- Thank you!
Hack-a-bye, Davey
On the lounge chair
If you awake, you'll pull out your hair
Whoa! Hey!
- Dave! Dave!
- Ow!
- Dave!
- Help us!
Guys! Guys!
No! No! No, no, no! No! No!
Dave! Help us!
Oh, yeah.
Oh, no, no, no, no, no.
You want to go hang gliding, sign up at the Excursion Desk like everyone else.
- Ian, you don't understand!
- Oh, I think I do.
Dave Seville is so special that the rules don't apply to him.
- Let go!
- No, you let go.
Hey! Come on! Great!
Oh, my God!
I need my pelican head!
Help!
- Ian!
- You idiot!
Oh, no. No, no.
Great. Way to go, Seville.
- Me?
- You!
Hey!
Save your breath, Dave.
They'll come back for me.
In retrospect, this was a bad idea.
We're losing altitude!
I don't think I can make it much longer.
I'm so hungry. Just one bite.
No.
- A nibble?
- No nibbles.
Maybe I can just lick the glaze?
The glaze is what's keeping you alive, Theodore!
Its high fat content is creating a waterproof barrier.
I'm gonna starve to death!
Actually, there are many other things that will kill you before starvation.
Dehydration, sunstroke...
An island.
No, an island would probably be helpful.
So if you see one, you should definitely say something.
Uh, Jeanette?
Oh!
We're alive! We're alive!
Good. Because now
I'm going to kill you!
Guys, guys, guys!
Nobody is killing anyone, okay?
No matter how much he deserves it.
Thank you, Si. Though I could have done without the passive aggression.
Look, we've got nothing to worry about.
Dave knows we're gone by now.
He probably has the whole coast guard looking for us.
Meantime, why don't we all just relax and have some donut?
Did you guys want some?
Theodore! Alvin! Simon!
Can't you kick any faster?
It's been two hours, Dave.
Thanks to biannual Pilates classes,
I have legs that won't quit, but they do slow down.
Take those feet off, let me kick.
No quality mascot suit has removable feet.
Take the suit off, then.
- I can't.
- Why not?
I'm not wearing anything underneath.
Look!
No, no, it's okay, I believe you.
No, look!
Look, an island!
Maybe the chipmunks washed up there.
Kick!
Faster! Come on.
Okay, there we go.
It won't belong before a rescue plane sees our SOS and flies us back to civilization.
I don't hear any planes.
Or helicopters.
Maybe Dave is coming in a hot-air balloon.
Because those things are really quiet.
I don't think Dave is gonna be in a hot-air balloon.
But he is coming, right?
Of course he is.
Just maybe not today.
Alvin's right.
We should prepare to stay the night.
What? You guys expect me to sleep outside?
Last I checked, Brit, we're chipmunks.
We're used to living in the wild.
No, we used to be used to living in the wild.
Come on, Brit, it's just one night.
One cold night.
So we'll make a fire. We're always setting things on fire accidentally.
How hard can it be when we put our minds to it?
And how are you intending to do that?
I will create a spark by striking this rock with my Swiss Army knife, which Dave took from me.
I suppose you have a better idea, smart guy?
As a matter of fact, I do, smart guy.
As you can see, the lens concentrates the energy of the sun, thus creating fire!
Whoa. Impressive.
Thanks. Thank you.
Thanks for thinking that.
Hot, hot, hot!
We have made fire!
So, what do we do now?
Kumbaya, my lord, Kumbaya
Kumbaya, my lord, Kumbaya
Kumbaya, my lord, Kumbaya
Oh, lord, Kumbaya
Alvin! Brittany!
We've gotta head inland.
If we climb to the top of that mountain, we'll be able to get a better view of the island, see if they're here.
All right, got it.
What are you doing?
- Building a fire.
- What?
You know, one time in the studio,
Snoop ran out of matches, got a blaze going with just two carrot sticks.
Figure, how hard can it be?
Forget the fire. We have to start hiking.
Yeah, okay, Dave.
Look, it's getting dark-ish.
It's gonna be cold. I'm gonna build a fire.
We'll go in the morning.
- No, we'll go now.
Don't take that tone of voice with me, Dave.
I'm not one of your chipmunks that you can just boss around and stuff into a cage whenever you feel like it.
That was you, Ian!
Calm down.
Jeez, no wonder those furballs would rather fly off the ship than spend another day with you.
They didn't do it on purpose.
It was an accident. They're just kids.
I don't know how long they can survive out there.
And you guys were worried.
 Look at us!
We're warm, we got a great fire going, beautiful night sky and if a rescue helicopter comes by, they'll see us!
Everything's gonna be fine.
Good night, guys.
- Good night.
- Good night.
Good night.
Night.
Theodore!
What? Dave always turns off the light after saying good night.
That fire was sort of the only thing keeping us from freezing to death.
- Yeah!
- Can't you just relight it?
- How?
- With your glasses. And the sun?
Oh.
I'm a survivor
I'm not gon' give up
I'm not gon' stop
I'm gon' work harder
I'm a survivor
I'm gonna make it
I will survive
Keep on survivin'
All right!
Way to keep the spirits up, guys.
Doing it, yeah!
- And what is this supposed to be?
- Breakfast!
No, it's bark.
Yeah, for breakfast!
I bet it's very good. it's not.
It's been forever since our last all-you-can-eat buffet.
Crazy suggestion, guys.
Let's get off this beach and let's find some real food.
If I know my horticulture, and I do, this is a grove of mango trees.
Then where are all the mangoes?
Maybe the Jungle Monster 4 ate them all!
You were planning on sharing that, right?
Of course.
Oh, well, good.
'Cause it kind of looked like you were gonna eat it all by yourself.
What? I would never do that.
I don't believe you!
Hey!
Yeah! Winning!
What?
Well, I'm just out of school
A sting real, real coal
Gotta dance like a fool
Got the message that
I've gotta be a wild one
I'll make sure to save you the pit!
Oh, my acorns!
Way to go, Theodore!
Come on, we'll split it.
Don't listen to him, Theo.
He's gonna eat it all by himself.
I'll share it with you.
No. She's trying to trick you.
No, you're trying to trick him.
No, you're trying to trick him by saying I'm trying to trick him.
He's lying, Theo!
- What?
Gonna meet all my friends
Gonna have ourselves a ball
Gonna tell all my friends
Gonna tell 'em all that I'm a wild one
Oh, yeah, I'm a wild one
Theodore, I am so sorry!
Gonna keep 'em moving wild
Gotta keep a-s winging, baby
I'm a real wild child
Oh, no!
My precious! My precious!
Stop it! Stop it! Stop it! Look at us.
One day on this island and we've become animals!
Did you hear that?
What was that?
- Jungle Monster.
Positions, everybody.
Hold.
Hold.
Fire!
No! Why?
Please don't eat us, Mr. Jungle Monster!
I'm not a monster, I'm Zoe.
And I'm clearly a girl who has been on this island for so long that now she's imagining that squirrels can talk.
We are chipmunks.
Yeah, Alvin and the Chipmunks.
Who and the what now?
I'm sure you've heard of the Chipettes.
We're kind of world famous.
Who?
Maybe this will help.
Rah, rah, ah, ah, ah
Roma, roma, ma
Gaga, ooh, la, la
Want your bad romance
Caught in a bad romance
- Okay. Stop.
- Lame!
I don't know who you are.
Awkward!
Exactly how long have you been here?
Well, I got here on a Monday, so...
Yeah, like, you know, eight or nine years?
Nine years? Wait.
You've been here nine years?
Well, it could be eight.
What if we're here nine years?
What if we're here forever?
I told you, Dave's coming.
I used to think that Dave was coming, too.
And he never did.
Huh?
Dave Henderson, my supervisor at UPS.
I used to fly cargo planes for them, until one day I crash-landed in the ocean.
- We crash-landed, too.
- Really?
But our Dave won't rest until he finds us.
Right, Alvin?
Absolutely.
You mean I'm finally gonna get out of here?
I can't wait to go tell the others!
There are others?
I mean, can you guys imagine being stuck here for all these years without anybody to talk to?
I think I'd lose my mind!
Chipmunks,
I'm pleased to introduce my friends.
This is Rawlings, Spalding, Callaway,
Dunlop, and, right there, that's Nerf.
Hey, girlfriend, you look good.
They survived the crash with me.
Okay.
- Hi.
- Hi.
- Hello.
- Okay.
I'm Theodore.
Guys, Dave is coming to get us!
No, not Dave Henderson. I saw your face!
It's another Dave.
But, you guys, just get excited.
We're finally gonna get off this island.
She's funny.
In a crazy sort of way.
This totally calls for a party.
Who's hungry?
- Yeah!
- Yes, please!
- I'm hungry.
- We are famished.
Yeah? Let's go to my place.
Is it far?
I don't think I could walk another step.
Who said anything about walking?
We're gonna die!
Oh, man! That was so cool!
I know, I know!
Come on. Come on in, guys! Bring it in.
Come on down!
Yeah! Wasn't that awesome?
No, it was not awesome.
It's a miracle we got here safely.
In fact, the odds of a chipmunk getting hurt on a zip-line are one out of six.
Why do I always have to be right?
Ow! Ow! Ow!
Ellie, Ellie! Are you okay?
I think I sprained my ankle!
Ooh, you know what, you should put some ice on that.
Oh, no, guys, I don't have any ice.
I live there in that tree.
I thought that maybe you did, though.
No, we don't have any ice.
Just like we don't have any shelter.
Wow, that's a major bummer for you.
- Do you guys like bungee jumping?
- Yes!
No. We do not.
Listen, lady, maybe you should just leave us alone so we can focus more on surviving and less on killing ourselves.
Whoa, that is a lot of uptight in a very little package.
I'm not uptight. I just don't wanna see anyone else getting hurt. Ow!
Criminy. What was that?
You know what, that was just a spider and they live here because this is nature.
It is not just a spider, it's a Phoneutria bahiensis.
Its bite contains a neurotoxin.
Ooh! Mr. Fancy Words. So what?
Alvin, toxin? Poison? Neuro? Brain?
Oh. That's not good.
Side effects include changes in personality, loss of inhibition, dry mouth.
Okay, calm down. I get bitten probably twice a day by these little fellows and I am still completely normal.
Yes, normal.
Oh, no.
Alvin? Simon!
Chubby one!
Girl chubby one!
Brittany? Jeanette?
I hope they're okay.
Who cares if they're okay?
I just need them to be here.
And here I am thinking you've changed and don't only care about yourself.
Nope. And it's a good thing, too.
Because right now the rage I'm feeling for you and those chipmunks is the only thing keeping me going.
Shall we keep going?
Ian, just keep an eye out for something to eat or drink, all right?
All right. Right there!
- Where?
- That thing around your neck.
You're not gonna eat this.
This was a gift from Theodore.
That explains it.
I was gonna say, it's really ugly.
Like, really... Wow.
- Ugly.
- It's not ugly.
It goes with everything and it's soft enough to sleep in.
Yeah, and it's edible.
You will not eat my son's necklace.
He's not your son, Dave.
He's just a chipmunk.
Oh, Dave. Where are you?
Where are you, Alvin?
All right.
I'm gonna crash.
Simon. Where are you going?
Who is this Simon you speak of?
Um. you?
No, my name is not Simon. It is
Simone!
That's pretty close to Simon.
And yet completely different.
Would you care to join me on my adventure?
What adventure?
The adventure called life!
Okay.
But just until Dave shows up.
Alvin, Alvin!
Simon and Theodore are gone.
They probably just went to get stuff for the shelter.
It's all the guy can talk about.
Still, it's not like them to wander off like that.
Could you please go look for them?
Why can't you?
I have a situation of my own to deal with, Alvin.
Oh, right. How is Eleanor doing?
Huh? She's fine. I'm talking about me.
It's been two days since my last bath and I am a mess.
I can't get rescued looking like this.
Oy.
Theo! Simon! Simon!
Theodore! Theo!
Si! Theo!
Bonjour, my friend
Simon? Are you bungee jumping?
- His name is not Simon.
- It is Simone.
That's pretty close to Simon.
Yeah, I thought so, too.
But he's acting totally different.
The spider bite! That's it!
Remember the side effects?
Personality changes, loss of inhibition?
Lies! Who are you?
Wow! Simone is pretty cool.
It's Simon, Theodore. And, no, he's not.
Au revoir, Alfred.
Alvin. it's Alvin!
Whoo! C'est magnifique, Simone!
Okay, Theo, it's all you.
Really? I've never done anything like this.
And you never will.
How can you let him do this?
What are you thinking?
I'm thinking, "When did my dad wash up on this island?"
- What?
- We were having the best time.
Why do you have to show up and be so uptight?
Me? Uptight?
I'm not the uptight one, I'm the fun one!
The cool one. Ask anybody.
- Who should I ask?
Come on.
Theodore, you can't bungee jump.
You get scared just watching a movie.
Munk up, Alvin.
A little help?
Ah! Much better.
Jeanette, these dresses are, like, totally adorbs. I die.
Thank you.
And I also made these for you, Eleanor.
Oh, look how handy you are all of a sudden.
And in case you get tired,
I made you a wheelchair.
Oh, super.
J'arrive.
Enchanté, mademoiselles. A kiss.
A kiss. And a...
A kiss.
- What's gotten into him?
- Spider venom.
Yeah, yeah, he thinks he's some sort of fun-loving French dude.
- Really?
- Now he thinks he's...
The most interesting munk in the world.
Simon? Simon.
- Simone?
- Oui?
I think we should get to work on that shelter.
Pourquoi? I cannot imagine a better roof over our heads than the stars in the sky.
What about the kind of roof over our head that's actually a roof?
It's going to rain!
What is a little rain? Hmm?
We cherish the water, for it is the water that nurtures the flower.
- Okay. This is crazy!
Building a shelter was your idea. Yours!
Oh, great. Great!
All right, guys, we're gonna build a shelter.
I need everyone's help. Let's go.
I'll try. But I feel so useless.
- What are you doing?
- What I've wanted to do since the moment I laid my eyes all over on you.
- What?
- Huh?
Hey, you guys are going to catch pneumonia dancing in the rain like that.
I say, hey, I be gone today
But I'll be back around the way
Seems like everywhere I go
The more I see the less I know
But I know one thing, that I love you
You ought to be careful kicking mud around like that.
Hello?
Someone could lose an eye!
I've been a lot of places all around the way
But I don't want to write a lave sang for the world
No, I just want to write a song
That looks like fun.
Hocking in the dance hall moving with you
Dancing in the night in the middle of June
My momma told me don't lose you
I say, hey, I'll be gone today
- Eleanor? Would you care to dance?
- I'd love to.
- With me?
 Yes, Theodore!
I can't believe
Jeanette's getting all the attention.
I'm the pretty one.
Jeanette's the smart one.
You don't see me running around trying to be all smart, do you?
I know! I'm the fun one,
- You're the pretty one.
- Yeah!
Do you know how slippery that dirt is?
This is ridiculous.
Are you even listening to me?
Simon!
Alvin? You're starting to sound like Dave.
No!
Hmm.
What are you doing?
Ugh. Building a shelter.
Since I'm not the fun one any more
I figure I may as well be... the responsible one.
Ew. Really?
Well, since I'm not the pretty one any more, maybe I should build a shelter, too.
Yeah, good luck with that.
What, you don't think I could do it?
Hey, I didn't say that, Brit.
I thought it, but I didn't say it.
So you wanna play it this way.
Alfons-y!
He's so French.
Oh! Be careful, Simone!
Let's do it.
Oh, no.
Now, wasn't that a pleasant ride?
Good thing we don't wear pants.
Okay, you guys, come on, come over.
- Are you sure it's safe?
- Of course it's safe.
I do this thing every day.
Oh! Oh!
- Jeanette!
- Jeanette!
Hold on, Jeanette.
- Viens, ma chére.
No, no. Look into my eyes.
You have nothing to fear.
Yes, yes. Very good.
Voila!You are safe. Bravo!
- You made it!
- You're so brave.
Aw!
- Wow.
- Ooh la la!
Pretty.
Whoa.
Double rainbow. What does it mean?
Alive they're superstars, sure. But dead?
They're legends.
I'm talking about tribute albums, pay-per-view funerals.
Wait a second. You actually think
I'm in this for the money?
Well, if you're doing it to pick up chicks, you're doing a lousy job.
I'm doing this because I love them, okay?
Look, if you wanna spend the rest of your life running around after a bunch of spoiled brats, be my guest.
- They're not brats.
- Really? Even Alvin?
You never even bothered to get to know them, Ian.
I mean, sure, Alvin can be kind of a handful, but he means well.
He's sometimes just a little irresponsible, that's all.
But, come on, Simon?
He's probably the most level-headed kid I know.
If anything, he's a little too uptight.
And then there's little Theodore.
Dave, I barely cared about what you had to say about the first two.
I can't imagine the big-boned one is gonna be any more interesting.
Forget it, let's just keep going.
Yee-haw!
UP, poisson, up!
Ooh la la!
Oh, no. This is terrible.
Shouldn't he have come up by now?
Uh-oh. Simone! Where are you?
Zoe, you've gotta do something.
All right.
Callaway, I need you to go in there and find Simone.
I know you can do it, little buddy.
You're kidding, right?
If Callaway can't find him, nobody can.
Simone!
Told you.
I'm sorry if I caused you any worry, mademaiselle.
But I have something for you.
Maybe this will be a way to make it up.
Oh! it's beautiful!
Where did you find it?
Yeah, it is beautiful.
Where did you find it?
In a cave behind the waterfall.
I thought it would look nice on you.
But now I realize even the most precious gem cannot compare to your beauty.
Aw!
Yeah. Were there any other jewels or gems or diamonds or anything else in there?
By the time I found the gold,
I had already been gone from my Jeanette far too long.
Aw!
What?
You guys, they found it. They found it!
And the best part is, they don't even know what they found.
They think that it's just one bracelet.
Which means that the rest of the treasure is mine.
All mine!
What the...
Whoa! What are you?
Hey! Oh!
Yeah, you're one of those honey badgers.
You just take what you want.
Drop it. Drop it!
You mess with me, ése,
I'll go loco on you.
Whoa! Hey!
Whoa!
Give it back!
You can sting like a bee or strike like a cobra, but this honey munk don't care!
Okay, Brit, I'm all done.
If you want, I can help you get started...
Whoa!
This tree house is awesome.
Maybe you are kind of the smart one.
Thank you, Alvin. And yours is...
Well, you did your best.
Anyhoo, no reason we can't be comfortable and stylish while we wait for Dave to show up, right?
Brit, I...
I think I know why Dave hasn't come.
You do? Why?
'Cause he's not even looking.
Alvin, why wouldn't he be looking for us?
Because I drive him crazy.
You know, the way Simon's been driving me crazy?
I mean, that's what I've been doing to Dave.
For years.
No wonder he hates me.
Oh!
Don't worry, Alvin.
I'm sure Dave will come.
I mean, he certainly loves
Simon and Theodore.
Un, deux, trois
Simon? ls Dave ever gonna find us?
Simon? I mean, Simone?
I'm so sorry, were you speaking to moi?
Yes! About Dave!
Are we ever going to find him?
I see you are sad, man ami.
And I hate to see you sad.
I will help you find your friend Dave.
You really think you can find him?
I know I can!
And then I will find this Simon you keep speaking of!
As Dave and I have never met,
I will need you to describe him for me.
Well, he's very kind and a good storyteller.
Mmm-hmm. Very helpful.
Oh! And he's about this tall.
Mmm-hmm.
Is he by any chance a big, flightless bird?
I don't think so.
Then these footprints must not be his.
Jungle Monster!
Do you hear that?
Yeah, it's my stomach grumbling.
No, no, maybe it's a helicopter! Listen!
Face it, Dave, no one is coming to rescue us, okay?
And my stomach noises are gonna get louder and louder and louder until one day they just stop.
Because I will have eaten you.
Maybe you're right.
Maybe no one's coming.
Maybe the chipmunks aren't here at all.
Maybe they're gone.
I really messed up.
Dave, it kills me to say this, kills me, but...
Look, man, you're really good with those kids, really good.
They love you.
And I should know because I was really bad with those kids and they hate me.
But, look, you should know that whatever happens, you did nothing wrong. Nothing.
Thanks, Ian.
Come here.
Yeah. Yeah.
Ian?
Ian?
Ian!
Mon dieu!
The Jungle Monster's real! And it's angry!
Or hungry. Alfons-y!
That means let's go.
Oh.
Ow!
Great, a volcano.
Of course!
That's why the water was so hot!
It's being heated by the underground magma chamber!
- How do you know that?
- I have no idea!
Maybe I accidentally paid attention.
Hey, guys, anyone up for a quick hike?
Like, I don't know, maybe to the waterfall or whatever?
Not now, Zoe!
The whole island is going to explode!
What?
Guys, we've got to get off this island.
We have to build a raft, now.
"Right now" like, right now?
Or "right now" like, after a hike to the waterfall now?
I've been hit!
By Dave's necklace?
Tell Jeanette I will watch over her with angel wings.
Dave?
Theodore!
Dave? Ha ha!
Told you we'd find him!
Simon!
It is Simone, but I am often confused for this Simon fellow.
Perhaps we look alike?
- Simone?
- Ian!
Hey, you found the chubby one.
Don't worry, Theodore.
Nothing's gonna happen to you. Is it?
What was that?
That's an active volcano.
Okay, Brittany and I will build the deck.
Eleanor, you need to start braiding ropes.
Jeanette, find as many coconuts and mangoes as you can.
Who knows how long we'll be out there.
Who knows how long we'll be out there.
What can I do to help?
- Dave!
- Dave!
Dave!
- You found us!
Hey.
We missed you so much.
I knew you would find us.
Ow.
Eleanor! What happened?
You know, just a zip-line accident.
- A what?
- I'm fine.
It only hurts when I try to explain it.
Okay, you know what, never mind.
The important thing is you guys are safe.
Everything's gonna be okay.
Hey, what is it?
I thought you'd never find us.
That you weren't even looking.
Why wouldn't I look for you?
Because I'm such a pain in the...
Alvin.
I know, you don't think I'm a pain.
No, you're a pain.
But I'd come, no matter what.
Arc de Triomphe, mayonnaise, Napoleon.
I get it, Frenchie, you come from a rich history.
Well, guess what, we're all gonna be history if we don't get out of here.
Uncle Ian!
What's he doing here?
It's kind of a long story.
Don't worry, he's cool.
Yes, for a pelican man.
Oh, yeah, nothing cooler than a grown man in a pelican suit.
So, Dave, how are we gonna get out of here?
I don't know, Alvin,
I think you've got this under control.
Theodore, you and Eleanor are on rope duty.
Dave and Ian, we need oars.
Simone, you and Jeanette are in charge of food.
- And, Zoe...
- No, I know, I know.
I'm gonna go and I'm gonna pack up my balls!
Who's that?
Another long story.
Yeah! Good work, guys!
Let's get off this island.
This raft won't build itself.
Whoa!
Go! Go! Go!
- Heave!
- Ho!
- Heave!
- Ho!
- Heave!
- Ho!
It's incredible, you guys.
Very impressive.
Just seeing everyone come together to build it...
- I just want to say...
It can wait.
Wait, where are Jeanette and Simone?
I hope this is going to be enough.
Did you hear something?
Who can say?
When I am with you, all I can hear is the beating of my own heart.
Oh, Simone!
Oh!
Oh, no!
Oh, no!
Somebody! Help!
Jeanette?
Guys! Guys!
Over here! Come quick, hurry!
- Simone, are you okay?
- Simone!
Why are you calling me Simone?
- Simon?
- Yeah.
You're back! It finally wore off!
What wore off?
You were bitten by a spider.
It, like, messed up your brain.
Ah. Is that why I think I see Dave and a half-Ian, half-bird?
No, it's really me. And really Ian.
'Sup?
Simon, where's Jeanette?
She was out here with you.
Jeanette? I don't know...
I do.
It's Zoe. She took her.
Simon, I need to know where you found that gold bracelet.
What gold bracelet?
The one you gave to Jeanette.
What? When did I give Jeanette a bracelet?
On your date.
Jeanette and I are dating?
Okay, he's useless.
Theodore, Eleanor, you're gonna have to lead the way.
I don't remember exactly how to get there.
I do!
Which way, Eleanor?
Make a left. No, right. No, left!
I thought you said you knew where you were going.
I do! Sometimes I just forget my left from my right.
That way!
Okay, we just have to cross here.
Are you kidding me?
Guys, I can't do that.
But, Simon, you already did.
No, I didn't.
That was Simone, that was not me.
But Simone is you.
He's in there somewhere.
You just have to find him, taut de suite.
Because Jeanette needs you, Simon.
No, I'm sorry, I just can't do it.
All right, Ian, get everyone to the raft.
If the volcano blows before I make it out of here, you have to promise me you'll...
Leave without you. Got it.
Okay.
Dave.
I'm coming with you.
Absolutely not, it's too dangerous.
Remember I said someday I may need to disobey you?
Sorry, Dave, but I gotta disobey you.
Let's go.
You're not coming up until you have every last bit of that treasure.
But the volcano is about to explode!
Well, then I guess you better hurry, huh?
Run, go, go. In you go.
Get down there. That's right.
Keep going!
S.0.S.
Please someone help me
It's not healthy for me to feel this
Y. O. U. are
Making it hard
I can't help it
See, it don't feel right
Keep moving!
This time, please
Someone come and rescue me
Okay! Pull me up. I can't hold any more.
If you can still talk, it means you haven't stuffed your cheeks yet!
Yes! That sounds very good.
Jeanette!
Dave!
They're supposed to be behind that waterfall!
That's right.
That's what I'm talking about.
- Zoe!
- No, no. Not another step.
Don't come any closer.
Are you all right, Jeanette?
I'm pretty freaked out, and those earrings tasted awful.
Zoe, you don't have to do this.
Oh, I don't?
I spent 10 years looking for this treasure.
It's the whole reason why I came to this stinking island!
You mean you didn't crash-land?
They said that I was crazy and they said that this map was a fake.
And now the treasure is mine!
Run!
Jeanette, come on, come on.
Run!
Jeanette!
Oh, no!
Help, help!
Oh, no, help!
You're going back in that cave, and you are going to get me more treasure.
Jeanette!
- Simone!
- It's Simon!
Alvin!
No!
- Hurry!
- Come on, guys, go!
Go. go!
Come on, come on.
Ow!
Look!
Come on!
Run!
But where's Dave?
- Help me UP!
- Oh, help you UP?
Is that what I'm supposed to do now, Dave?
All I had was my treasure, and now it's gone.
Do you get that? My life is ruined.
And now you're gonna know how that feels.
No, no! it's tempting to blame Dave.
I know. I've been there.
I wish I could get back all those years
I spent plotting my revenge.
All that time and energy, wasted.
All those pizzas
I had delivered to his house, wasted.
That was you?
Not now, Dave! All right?
You could let Dave fall to his death and I could go back to the raft with the chipmunks, become their manager again and make tons of money.
So, really, I'm good either way.
But let me tell you something.
Hate, anger, regret, those aren't just members of a girl group I once signed.
They're what consumed me.
And they're consuming you.
It's not too late to do the right thing.
Or not. Again,
I'm good either way, so...
I don't want to sway you.
What are you guys doing? Help me.
Please. Help me save my dad!
Hurry!
I got you, Dave.
Come on! Help me, guys.
Wow!
There they are!
Come on!
Faster!
Hurry! Hurry!
Let's go, go. 90!
Oh, no!
- Get up!
- Hurry!
- Come on! Come on!
- Come on!
Run!
Grab the oar!
Come on! Come on, guys!
Paddle!
Come on! Paddle!
Faster! Come on, hurry!
Vacation, all I ever wanted
Vacation, had to get away
Vacation, meant to be spent alone
Now we'll never get to perform at the International Music Awards.
I guess now we're the losers.
Jeanette, I don't know what to say.
I guess I was just so obsessed with finding that treasure that I kind of... I lost it.
And I'm...
I'm really sorry.
We both are.
Well, apology accepted.
Oh.
Really?
Look, Dunlop, this is a new beginning for both of us.
I hope you don't mind.
Simone gave it to me.
Oh, I don't mind.
You know, Jeanette, even the most perfect gem cannot compare to your beauty.
- Dave?
- Yes, Alvin?
I just wanted to say now that we're not all, you know, dead, sorry.
Sorry.
Sorry I was acting like a child on the ship.
And kind of maybe ruined our family vacation.
Sometimes a racehorse needs a little room to run.
Yes. Yeah. I like where your head's at.
That is very wise, David.
'Sup?
What, no love for Uncle Ian?
- You put us in cages!
- You put us in cages!
Seriously? Are we still talking about that?
New subject, I saved Dave's life.
Okay, but I'll be watching you, mister.
Alvin, you still have that pocket knife I gave you?
Knife? Oh, right, sorry,
I meant to give it back.
I want you to keep it.
Really?
Maybe you can use it to signal that helicopter.
What?
- Hey!
- Down here!
Hello!
It's me, Ian Hawke! Jet Records!
Guys, circle around!
Everything's aka y. We got you, guys!
My mama told me when I was young
We 're all born superstars
She rolled my hair and put my lipstick an
In the glass of her boudoir
"There's nothing wrong with loving who you are "
She said, “Cause He made you perfectly
If
- So hold your head up, girl And you 'H go far"
Listen to me when I say
I'm beautiful in my way
'cause God makes no mistakes
I'm an the right track, baby
I was born this way
Dan 't hide yourself in regret
Just lave yourself and you're set
I'm an the right track, baby
I was born this way
Ain 't no stopping us now
We're an the move
Hay! hm',
Ain 't no stopping us now
We've got the groove
Show your hands, your hands
There ain 't no stopping us now
'Cause, baby, you're a firework
Come on, show 'em what you're worth
Make 'em go, oh, oh, ah
As you shoot across the sky-y-y
'Cause, baby there
Ain 't no stopping us now
We're on the move
Ah, ah, ah it's good to be back, huh?
Sure is.
Sold Zoe's story to Hollywood.
Huge bidding war.
Keira Knightley is interested.
I'm thinking Fiddy Cent for me.
There ain 't no stopping us now
We're on the move
Oh, oh, ah
Come on, let your colors burst
We've got the groove
Sky-y-V
I was born
This
Way
Thank you!
- Thank you!
- Thank you.
- You're a great audience.
- We love you!
Party rack is in the house tonight
Everybody just have a good time
And we gonna make you lose your mind
Everybody just have a good, good, good time
Oh, ah
I'm sorry, sir, that's full.
We're gonna have to gate-check those.
Are you gonna charge me 25 bucks a bag?
Of course not, sir.
It's $25 for the first bag and $40 for each additional bag.
I'm a little chilly.
Would you mind adjusting the vent?
But of course.
- Oh! You wrinkled my business magazine.
- Sorry.
Guess I'll have to read this.
Ooh, she's pretty.
Oh, wait, that's me.
All right, head count.
Boo!
You like my Jungle Monster costume?
Eleanor made it for me.
Yeah! Out of a barf bag!
Nice.
Where's Alvin?
Ladies and gentlemen, this is your captain speaking.
We're cleared for an an-time departure for Timbuktu.
If Timbuktu is not for you,
please alert the ﬂight attendant by pressing your call button.
Alvin!
Thank you for choosing Air Alvin.
En/oy your ﬂight!
Sir, please return to your seat, we're about to take off.
- Sit. Now.
- Uh-oh.
- But he...
- Sit!
No, no, no!
Alvin!
Everybody just have a good time
And we gonna make you lose your mind
Everybody just have a good
Good, good time
Oh, ah
Oh, ah
Oh, ah
Oh, ah
Every day I'm shuffling
Put your, put your hands up Oh!
Put your, put your hands up
Yeah!
Put your, put your hands up
Glow!
Put your, put your hands up
That's right!
Put your, put your hands up
Whoa!
Put your, put your hands up
Yeah!
Put your, put your hands up
Yeah!
Put your, put your...
Every day I'm shuffling
We have arrived
Let the party begin
Throw your hands in the air
Everybody sing
- Oh, oh, ah
- I see you right there
- Oh, oh, ah
- Having a good time
Oh, oh, ah
Came, let's get it started
The night is so young
Keep the party going now
Throw your hands way up high
DJ, turn the music loud
Oh, oh, ah Oh, oh, ah
Oh, oh, oh And keep it going
With a little bit of funk
With a little bit of bass
With a little bit of crunk
Please turn it up
You got that music
Nice and loud
For them people in the cut
You can feel it in your gut
You can feel it in your face
You can feel it in your butt
We do our thing
Got that dance ﬂoor packed
Drive them crazy an the screen
There ain 't no dilly, no daily
We just call it haw we see it
Never ever be repeated
Super-duper human beings
Cam e an
We have arrived
Let the party begin
Throw your hands in the air
Everybody sing
- Oh, oh, ah
- It feels good, right?
Oh, oh, ah
Came, let's get it started
The night is so young
Keep the party going now
Throw your hands way up high
DJ, turn the music loud
Oh, oh, ah Oh, oh, ah
Oh, oh, oh And keep it going
When I'm in the club
I love my music way up
3:00 a.m.
Yeah, I stay up
5:00 a.m.
I see you, player
Then to the diner I needs waiter
In the meantime I do my thing
Standing out catches everything
Singing songs I can't even sing
You don't know me
But you see that bling
I rock, I roll
I party out of control
Give it to me, baby
Say, "He ﬂy"
When we arrive Yeah
We have arrived
Let the party begin
Throw your hands in the air
Everybody sing
- Oh, oh, ah
- Get 'em in the air
Oh, oh, ah
Came, let's get it started
The night is so young
Keep the party going now
Throw your hands way up high
DJ, turn the music loud
Oh, oh, ah Oh, oh, ah
Oh, oh, oh And keep it going
In the club, looking ﬂy
All these girls passing by
Show me love Hate that guy
That's what's up It's the life
But it don't matter, no
'Cause I ain 't no animal
Perfect teeth don't matter, no
Even with your attitude
We party all night long
Dan 't even do it wrong
So DJ, play my sang
Let's get-get-get it an
We have arrived
Let the party begin
Throw your hands in the air
Everybody sing
- Oh, oh, ah
- Come an
Oh, oh, ah
Came, let's get it started
The night is so young
Keep the party going now
Throw your hands way up high
DJ, turn the music loud
Oh, oh, ah Oh, oh, ah
Oh, oh, oh And keep it going
English - US - SDH
That's me, Walter.
Where... Where'd you go?
Oh, there you are!
I have the best life in the whole world.
That's my brother, Gary.
He's the best friend you could ever have.
Yeah, I know what you're thinking.
We could be twins.
Here's where we live: Smalltown...
...the best town you could ever grow up in.
Gary and I did everything together.
And, as the years passed, my brother was always there for me.
I got it! Gary, throw me! Throw me!
Aaah!
We were a great team.
- Nice job, Walter.
- Thanks, Gary.
Oh, don't get me wrong.
It's not perfect.
- That was so fun!
- Nothing is.
Sorry, kid.
- I wanna do that again!
- Come on. I'll ride with ya!
Hurry up!
Even the sunniest days can have a few clouds in them.
Ride's bogus, anyway.
Hey, wanna rent a video?
Yeah. Race you home!
And, well, that night sorta changed everything.
It's The Muppet Show, with our very special guest star, Mr. Steve Martin!
I found them...
... The Muppets.
I guess you could say
I was their number one fan.
Oh, Gary, it's an entire map of The Muppet Studios.
And they made all the difference.
- Trick or treat!
- Because from then on...
- Hey, guys.
- Oh, hey, Gary.
- Hey.
- Hi-ho, guys. Yay!
Is that Kermit the Frog?
What is this, 1978?
...even on the worst days,
I knew...
...that as the years passed...
Cancel that last remark.
...as long as there are singing frogs and joking bears...
...Swedish chefs and boomerang fish, the world can't be such a bad place after all.
All right, good night, buddy.
Oh, good night, Gary.
And as long as there are Muppets...
- ...for me...
- ...hair-growing tonic.
...there's still...
...hope.
Aaah. Bye-bye!
Somebody get him!
Animal. Hey, Animal, come on.
The show's about to start.
Show! Show!
Hey, Walter, why don't you join us?
Come on!
No! Wait! I want to be with you guys! Please let me in!
Kermit!
Whoa!
Walter, are you OK, buddy?
You're drenched in sweat.
Did you have the dream again?
Ummm. No. Hey, so when are you guys leaving today?
Oh, um, just a couple hours now.
Oh, wow, Gary, I think it is so cool you're taking Mary to Los Angeles.
I can't believe you guys have been dating for ten years.
I know. Yeah, she wanted to do something special for this anniversary, and she's always wanted to see Los Angeles, so...
Hey, don't forget to send me a postcard from The Muppet Studios.
Oh, yeah, I'm sorry.
- I can't do that, Walter.
- But, Gary...
Because... you're coming with us!
Oh, Gary!
- But what about Mary?
- She's fine.
- She said the more the merrier.
- I... I don't know what to say!
The Muppet Studios are there, Gary.
I can't believe this!
Better get a move on.
We don't want to miss that bus!
No way! Who knows?
Maybe Kermit will be there.
I wouldn't get your hopes up, buddy.
The Muppets haven't put on a show together in years.
I don't think they use the studios for anything but tours anymore.
Nah, I think that's just an Internet rumor.
Like there's a country called Turkey.
Walter, how many times do we have to go over this?
- Turkey is a very real country.
- Wow, Muppet Studios.
I can't believe it!
# Everything is great
Everything is grand
# I got the whole wide world in the palm of my hand
# Everything is perfect
It's falling into place
# I can't seem to wipe this smile off my face
# Life's a happy song when there's someone by my side to sing along
# When you're alone life can be a little rough
# It makes you feel like you're three foot tall
# When it's just you
Well, times can be tough
# When there's no one there to catch your fall
Whoooa!
# Everything is great
Everything is grand
# I got the whole wide world in the palm of my hand
# Everything is perfect
It's falling into place
# I can't seem to wipe this smile off my face
- # Life smells like a rose
- # With someone to paint
- # And someone to pose
- # Life's a piece of cake
- # With someone to pedal
- # And someone to brake
- # Life is full of glee
- # With someone to saw
- # And someone to see
- # Life's a happy song
# When there's someone by my side to sing along
# I've got everything that I need
# Right in front of me
# Nothing's stoppin' me
# Nothin' that I can't be
# With you right here next to me
- # Life's a piece of cake
- # With someone to give
- # And someone to... Heavy cake!
- # Life's a piece of pie
- # With someone to wash
- # And someone to dry
- # Life's an easy road
- # With someone beside you
- # To share the load
- # Life is full of highs
- # With someone to stir
- # And someone to fry
# Life's a leg of lamb
# With someone there to lend a hand
# Life's a bunch of flowers
# With someone to while away the hours
# Life's a fillet of fish
# Yes, it is
Life's a happy song
# When there's someone by your side to sing along
Oooh...
# I've got everything that I need
# Right in front of me
Nothing's
# Stoppin' me
Nothin' that I can't be
# With you right here next to me
# I've got everything that I need
# Right in front of me #
Sorry. I was super excited.
All right, Carlos. Flip the ignition.
And that is how you fix a 12-volt starter.
Oh!
You know what that means.
Spring break.
It's OK. We'll be back to studying in two weeks.
Yay!
- Have a nice vacation.
- Bye. Have fun.
- Bye, Mr. Gary.
- Have a good break, guys.
- Hey, great job, Carlos.
- Thanks.
Enjoy your anniversary dinner.
- Hi.
- I got you these.
Oh. Sorry. It's probably from the dance number I was doing.
It's OK. They're really sweet.
You excited for our big trip to LA?
I have our list.
Me, too.
Oh, this is the most romantic thing ever.
I've always dreamt of seeing Los Angeles.
I know. Walter can't wait either.
You don't mind that he's coming, right?
No. No, of course not.
As long as we can spend our anniversary dinner together. That's all I ask.
Totally. It's gonna be the most romantic anniversary dinner ever.
I love you so much.
Oh.
- I love you, too.
- I'm gonna go check on Walter.
# Everything's great
Everything's grand
# Except Gary's always off with his friend
# It's never me and him
It's always me and him and him
# I wonder when it's going to end
# But I guess that's OK
'cause maybe someday
# I know just how it's going to be
# He'll ride up on a steed
Get down on one knee
# And say "Mary, will you marry me?"
# Please #
Oh...
# I've got everything that I need
# Right in front of me
# Nothing's stoppin' me
Nothin' that I can't be
# With you right here next to me
# You've got everything that you need
# Right in front of you
Nothing's stopping you
# Nothing that you can't do that the world can throw at you
# Life's a happy song
# When there's someone by your side to sing
# Life's a happy song
# When there's someone by your side to sing
# Life's a happy song when there's someone by your side to sing along #
OK, they're gone!
Hey, Gary, what should we do first at Muppet Studio?
'Cause I was thinking that maybe we could start at Fozzie's Joke Room...
Oh, no, wait, wait, wait.
The lines might be shorter at Honeydew's Laboratory of Fun, so maybe we should start there instead.
I just... I just can't wait!
Oh, Walter, don't be nervous.
Oh, I know.
I just can't believe I'm here.
The home of the Muppets!
What... What happened to this place?
Where...?
- Where is everyone, Gary?
- I don't know, buddy. It's so...
OK, well, I guess you guys are it for today.
Anyway, welcome to the original Muppet Studio, where dreams can come true.
- Is this the Universal Studios?
- Yes, it is.
OK, now if you'll just follow me, please.
OK. This used to be Kermit's office.
- Whoa.
- Mm-hmm.
It's really the highlight of the tour.
You should see it sometime.
OK, this next building is where they kept the rope and the medium-gauge wire for the productions. Let's go take a look.
Come on, buddy.
Wow!
Oh, boy.
Oh.
Whoa.
There. Now this here is
Kermit the Frog's old office.
Or so we've been "toad."
Well, as you know, gentlemen, I've loved the Muppets since I was a boy.
And what better way to honor the Muppets than to make this beautiful studio a Muppet museum.
I think I'll call this room the "Kermit the Frog's
Old Office Room."
- Oh, that is lovely.
- Oh, good one, Mr. Richman.
Now, this here is the standard
"Rich and Famous" contract
Kermit signed 30 years ago, that contains...
- The deed to this property.
- Exactly.
Now, this contract is 100 percent ironclad, with one minor exception.
If the Muppets can raise the ten million dollars it would cost to buy the building before this contract expires,
- then they get their studio back.
- You know, if I didn't know better,
I'd say you were reciting some sort of an important plot point.
Well, I hope so. Otherwise,
I just bored the audience half to death.
You mean half the audience is still alive?
It's nice doing business with you.
- Yes, sir. Come on.
- Goodbye.
I love geriatric humor.
Gentlemen, there's oil under this studio.
Yeah, I can smell it.
And more importantly, the geological survey says there definitely is.
In two weeks, we tear this place to the ground and start drilling. Ah, those Muppets.
They think they're so funny.
Well, it looks like the joke's about to be on them.
Maniacal laugh.
Maniacal laugh.
Maniacal laugh. Maniacal laugh.
Maniacal laugh.
- Walter!
- Walter?
- Walter!
- Walter!
Yeah, so then, when he thought they were alone, he said,
"There's oil under this studio, see.
I'm gonna tear it to the ground, see.
- Sweet, sweet oil, see!"
- People still talk like that?
Maybe that's just how he sounded in my head.
Either way, we've got to find Kermit!
He'll know what to do.
How do we find Kermit?
Nobody's seen him in years.
Stop the car!
I've got an idea!
Mmm.
These are delicious!
- Great idea, Walter.
- Mm-hmm.
We've been doing this for a long time.
I think maybe we should call it a night.
- Guys!
- We can't give up, Gary.
But it's getting really late. Maybe we should just go back to the motel.
- Guys!
- It...
- What?
- What?
- Maybe he lives there.
- Oh. That's it.
So, what do we do now?
I don't see a doorbell, and the house looks empty.
- Gary, throw me over.
- What?
- Gary, just throw me over already!
- OK.
- OK, here we go. OK...
- One, two, three.
- That's good.
- Sorry.
- No, it's good.
- Guys?
I think that's an electric fence.
Mary, it's Kermit the Frog.
- OK, buddy, head down.
- One, two, three!
- It's an electric fence.
- Yep.
Oh, my gosh. Walter? Walter, buddy?
Walter, can you hear me?
- Throw me again.
- No, I don't...
I don't think that's a good idea.
- What kind of throw was that?
- I think there's somebody coming.
Excuse me...
You OK? That was quite a tumble.
Oh. Look, look. I think...
Hey. Hey, Walter?
- Walter, you all right, buddy?
- Where am I?
OK, this is awesome.
We're at Kermit's house.
- Oh, jeez. Walter.
- No, no, no, no, no. You OK?
This... This is Kermit's house?
Anyhow, how can I help you guys?
Let me just say, this is an honor for all of us to meet you, sir, but my brother, Walter, has some really disturbing news for you.
- Good evening, ladies and gentlemen.
- Not now, 80's Robot.
Might I offer you a drink? Tab?
- Good grief.
- New Coke?
Listen. Not right now,
80's Robot, please!
Bummer.
- Watch out for the...
- Gag me with a spoon.
- Yeah, head for the door.
- Grody to the max.
Ow.
Ow.
I'm really sorry about that...
...Walter. What were you saying?
- Yes. Tex Richman, the oil baron, is...
- Yes, yes, yes.
Oil baron Tex Richman, the wealthy philanthropist.
You know, he's about to buy our old Muppet Show theater and turn it into a Muppet museum.
Isn't that great?
- No! I mean...
- What Walter's trying to tell you is that Tex Richman has a secret plan to tear down the theater and drill for oil.
- What?
- The only way to save the studio is to raise ten million dollars.
Ten million dollars? That's impossible.
- But...
- The only way to raise that kind of money would be to...
...would be to put on a show.
And I haven't seen the old gang in a long, long time.
I guess people sort of forgot about us.
Hm?
# Is there more I could've said?
# Now they're only pictures in my head
# That's why my green is feeling gray
# Sometimes even frogs have rainy days
# Remember when the stage caved in while you were rocking out?
# Who'd have thought your smorgasbord would be hard to live without?
# If we could do it all again
# Just another chance to entertain
# Would anybody watch or even care?
# Or did something break we can't repair?
# Your cannonball trajectory
It always gave me hope
# They may have been unbearable but I still loved your jokes
# Is there more I could've said?
# Now they're only pictures in my head
I didn't do it. I've been framed!
Ahh. Wocka wocka!
Gonzo the Great will ride this baby again!
Muah!
This legato tune is posolutely, most transparently bringing me down.
- For sure.
- One, two, and a half...
# Can we do it all again?
# Make'em laugh like we did then
# We can harmonize for one more song
# But I'm standing here instead
# Now they're only pictures in my head #
Well, it sounds like you guys aren't getting back together anytime soon.
Mmm...
This is going to be a really short movie.
But, Kermit, you have to try.
I... The Muppets are amazing.
You give people the greatest gift that can ever be given.
- Children?
- No, the other gift.
- Ice cream?
- No, no. After that.
- Laughter?
- Yes!
The third greatest gift ever!
Kermit, your fans never left you, the world hasn't forgotten.
All you need to do is show'em again!
Hmm.
I don't think so, guys.
Don't you see, Kermit?
It's time to play the music.
# It's time to light the lights
# It's time to meet the Muppets... #
Please, Kermit.
You're my hero.
You're on my watch.
Well, I... I guess...
...we could try.
- We?
- Well, yeah, listen.
If I'm gonna do this,
I'm gonna need some moral support.
Well, that's perfect.
We're experts at moral support.
- Yeah!
- Good. I guess if we're gonna go, we better get going.
We got a lot of people to find.
Oh, great! But wait, how do we find'em?
Didn't you see our first movie?
We drive.
- So where do we go first?
- I shall take the liberty of using my modem to locate the Muppets.
- OK.
- Great.
Oh, stop it!
In the name of all that's sacred, let it end!
R-E-N-O. That spells "Reno."
You have reached your destination.
My guidance ends here.
Well, I guess this is the place.
Good evening, folks, and welcome to Pechoolo Casino!
# Why are there such great deals
# On our hotel rooms?
# Free parking for cars
- # Not RVs
- # Not RVs
# Our wedding chapel is 24 hours
- # No marriage certificate is needed
- # No marriage certificate is needed
# We're glad you found it
# Pechoolo Casino
# The owners, the Moopets and me #
Cha-cha-cha!
Thank you, thank you.
We'll be back in six minutes.
Hmm.
- Hi-ho, Fozzie.
- Hi-ho, Kermit.
Kermit?
What are you doing here?
Well, I... I just want to tell you that was a great show.
It was... very informative.
I do my best to keep it fresh each night.
- Oh, yeah.
- Oh, I'm Fozzie, by the way.
Oh, I'm sorry.
This is Gary and Mary.
And this here is Walter.
He's a personal friend.
- Yeah.
- So I said, "What are you looking at?"
So I punched him in the face! I mean...
- Let's talk in my dressing room.
- Sure.
- OK.
- Here we are.
Make yourselves at home.
Wow.
This is not quite what I expected,
- based on your Christmas cards.
- Oh, yeah. About that...
Oh, but it's nice, and... and airy.
Maybe we should give them some space.
I know, but I wanna hear what they're gonna say. OK.
Sixty-four shows nightly can get pretty grueling.
Fozzie, an evil oil baron wants to tear down our old Muppet studio.
What? Oh, no!
I mean, that's a shame.
Step out of the vehicle!
Hey, Fozzie...
I'm sorry I haven't been in touch more.
It's fine, Kermit. Look at me!
Living the dream!
Uh-oh.
Oh, no! Not this again!
- Quick, save the cushions!
- The cushions?
I'm sorry, Fozzie.
If I'd known you were here in this place...
That's all right, Kermit.
It's not your fault.
- We had a good run.
- Yeah.
Yeah, it's just that...
Well, we haven't seen each other in a really long time, and I...
I just thought maybe we could raise the money to buy the theater back if we all got together and put on one last show.
A show? But I've spent years building a solo career.
I have a whole new show-biz family that loves me.
Fozzie! What the heck are you doing, hibernating?
Next show starts in 30 seconds.
We hired you, and we can fire you, so get your butt in here now!
- They terrify me. Let's go.
- Let's go.
- Watch out for the forklift, Fozzie.
- Oh, thanks.
Wow! Gonzo's doing really well!
According to 80's Robot, he's the richest plumbing magnate in the Rust Belt.
You! Order 28,000 tons of plumber's putty from Beijing.
- Right away, sir.
- And, you, send the 28,000 tons of Silly Putty back to Beijing.
- You bet.
- Oh, and you?
A memo to the waterless toilet department.
I don't care about the mess, just keep trying.
- Hi, Gonzo.
- Kermit? Fozzie? This is a surprise.
- We need to speak to you.
- All right. Have a seat.
Ah. Thank you!
- I think I'll stand.
- No, really, you should try one! Comfy.
It's our executive line of used toilets.
Anyway, I'm very busy.
I've got 30 seconds. Go.
Uh... Gonzo, I'm not quite sure how to say this, but...
Don't forget to mention the evil oil baron.
Yes, Fozzie, I was about to.
Just give me a moment, OK?
Gonzo, it would appear...
Remember, evil oil baron.
Fozzie, I'm going to get to that. Please!
- As I was trying to say...
- Evil oil baron.
OK, time's up. Thank you, guys.
Gonzo, we're trying to get the old gang back together again.
- We really need you.
- My answer is no. Good day!
Come on, guys. We should go.
I just want to say, when I was a kid,
I saw you recite Hamlet while jumping your motorbike through a flaming hoop, and...
...it made me feel like I could do anything.
Thank you. Yeah.
- Good try, Walter.
- Hey, guys, up here!
- Ya-haa!
- Huh?
I've been wearing this under my suit every single day for years!
Look out below!
Whoa, where you going?
You threw me off-balance!
I can't see! Apollo 13!
Citizens of Earth, the Great Gonzo is back.
I pledge never to hold a plunger again!
Run! Run! Run for your lives!
Run, run, run!
- Run, guys!
- Run!
Oh, my gosh, run everybody!
It's gonna be big!
It's gonna be a big one!
Wow! That was an expensive looking explosion!
I can't believe we had that in the budget.
So maybe if you look inside yourself, the person you should be most angry at is you.
Is you.
How have you been feeling?
Any more control issues?
In control.
- Good.
- Psst. Animal!
- Excellent.
- It's me, Kermit.
Hey, we're having a meeting here, man.
You're being really rude, frog!
Pardon us, please. Animal,
I need to talk to you for a second.
We're getting the Muppets back together.
We need you to drum again.
- Animal drum?
- Yes!
- Please, sir.
- Drum! Drum, drum!
- Drum, drum, drum!
- OK, OK.
- In control.
- Good.
I'm Animal's court-appointed sponsor.
We don't use the "d-r-u-m" word.
- It's his trigger word.
- His trigger word?
Excuse me, Mr. Black.
I'm so sorry to interrupt, but it's very important to these guys that they get their drummer...
Gary!
It's my trigger word, too.
Jack, we talked about this on Tuesday.
Tuesday's another one of my trigger words!
Oh, I don't think so!
Sorry.
- Let's go, Animal.
- Bye-bye!
- Animal, heel.
- Go, Animal! Be free, man!
But remember! No drumming!
Mr. Kermit, may I suggest we save time and pick up the rest of the Muppets using a montage?
Great idea, 80's Robot.
We greatly appreciate your financial support.
Eighty-seven point three miles to go. Eighty-seven point two...
80's Robot, do you have to do that?
...the secrets of the universe...
I guess we're in.
Welcome to this week's edition of "Everything Stinks."
Whoa!
Bye, Lisa.
Off to the TED Conference.
Three, two, one.
Think we should've rented a bigger car?
Hey, wait for me!
I wanna help save the studio!
I wanna go with you! Oh, not again.
Wow. I can't believe we're all back together.
Even all you guys who weren't in the montage!
Yeah, how come you didn't use me in the montage?
I thought my story was pretty interesting.
Rowlf? Wanna get back together?
- OK.
- Good.
Classic.
Anyhow, looks like we got everybody, so we can plan our telethon and raise that ten million dollars.
- Well, not everybody.
- No, I think everybody's here.
- Where's...?
- All good!
- Miss...
- All done here!
Piggy?
Kermit, we're going to get Miss Piggy, right?
OK, OK, OK, you're right.
We'll go get Piggy!
My Minitel tells me she is in Paris, France.
Oh! Well, then we drive to France.
- You can't drive to France, Walter.
- Yeah. It's way too far.
Then maybe we should travel by map!
- Good idea, Fozzie.
- Yeah!
To Paris!
Paris! Paris!
Look at these ceilings!
Yeah. They must be very tall here.
Yeah, very nice.
Uh... Hi there. Excuse me.
Miss? Pardon me, ma'am?
Hi there! We're here to see
Miss Piggy, and it's urgent.
Urgent! Urgent!
- Is it urgent?
- Very. Yes.
Let's have a look then, shall we?
She has an opening in...
- ...early September.
- Early September?
That's like six months from now!
That's nothing. Once I waited a whole year for September.
She is the plus-size editor.
She's a huge deal and extremely busy.
You can't just pop in without an appointment.
- OK, then.
- Thank you.
- All right.
- Mean lady.
- Close the door on your way out.
- Thanks a lot.
- She wasn't very nice.
- Yeah.
Guys! Muppet Man!
- Yeah!
- That could work!
Hello.
I have an appointment.
Oh, OK.
Um...
Will you wait here a moment?
Decisions, decisions.
Eeny, meeny, miny, mo. I choose you.
Mademoiselle Cochonnet?
- Can't you see I'm busy?
- Of course.
There's a... man here to see you.
He does have an appointment.
An appointment? That's weird.
Well, why didn't you say so?
Send him in!
Right away. Sorry.
- Ahahaha.
- Remember, left foot, right foot.
Hello.
Whoa.
- What the...?
- Sorry.
That looked expensive.
- You look familiar.
- So do you!
Please, have a seat.
Yes, we're going to have a seat now.
- No, no, no, don't sit down!
- Oh, sorry! Whoa!
Uh-oh.
Message to head. Left leg in trouble!
Going down. Left leg going down!
What?
Ohh!
I can't believe I fell for Muppet Man.
- You guys OK?
- Is anyone hurt?
Kermit?
- Hello, Piggy.
- Kermie!
Oh, Kermie, Kermie, Kermie, Kermie,
Kermie, Kermie, Kermie, Kermie, Kermie!
Mm, mm, mm. Kissy-kissy.
Mm, mm, mm!
Wait! What am I doing?
I promised myself I'd never go back!
I am woman! I am strong!
You must leave at once!
- OK.
- No, no, wait, wait!
Miss Piggy!
The Muppet Studios are in danger.
In danger? Our studios? Kermit!
It's true, Piggy. And we need to do The Muppet Show again.
We need you.
Oh.
Before I decide anything,
I need to talk with you, frog.
Alone.
Piggy? Last time we were together,
I said some things I regret.
No. No, Kermit.
You were just being honest.
You never intended to marry me.
Not even after I built us a house where we could raise tadpoles and grow old together.
Well, who do you think's been looking after that house all these years, huh?
Piggy, why do you have to always be so overdramatic about things?
You know, it leaves me no choice but to do things that hurt you.
I am who I am. Why can't you accept that about me?
Look, this is not about you and me.
It's never about you and me, is it?
It's always we. We this, we that.
"We" need you. You can't even say,
"I need you," can you?
Piggy...
I'm sorry, Kermit, but I have a life here.
A life I've made for myself.
Piggy!
Just remember, Kermit,
I cannot be replaced.
Kermit? What happened?
Where's Miss Piggy?
She's not coming, Fozzie.
But, Kermit, we always worked together.
We can't do this without Miss Piggy.
No one will give us a show without her.
We'll be fine, Fozzie.
We'll be fine.
We just...
We'll just have to come up with something else.
Kermie.
OK, I've got an idea.
We need a pig that can sing.
But, Kermit, who could possibly replace Miss Piggy?
Hey, what's everybody so quiet about, huh?
- Well, she's sorta like Miss Piggy.
- Come on, everybody.
Let's go pitch our telethon and get the Muppets back on TV, OK?
- No.
- No.
Oh, my goodness!
Oh, that's wonderful!
That means no.
- Come on, guys.
- Awkward.
Listen, Kermit, I like you.
I remember you guys from when I was a kid.
So I'm gonna shoot straight.
You guys aren't famous anymore.
I wish she'd shot a little more curvy.
Take a look at this diagram the research department drew up.
This circle represents everything that's currently popular.
And this tiny speck is you guys.
So the answer's no.
It's not gonna happen.
Take a look at the shows that are popular now. Punch Teacher.
- Oh! I love that show.
- It's time to punch teacher!
- Finish him!
- It's my favorite.
I just thought
I could make a difference.
I'm sorry, but in this market, you guys are no longer relevant. Have a good day.
Before I go,
I'd just like to say something.
I think kids are smarter and better than all this junk, and if you...
Veronica, bad news. Punch Teacher has stopped production.
It's being sued by the
Teachers Society of America.
- What's their problem?
- No idea. I just found out.
What are we supposed to do with that 120-minute black hole in the schedule coming up in two days?
OK, Muppets.
You've got yourselves a show.
- All right!
- Oh, yes!
Thank you so much. You will not be sorry, I promise, I promise!
OK, enough! One, no more going nuts in my office. These are new carpets.
- Yes, ma'am.
- And two, you need a celebrity host.
OK. Whatever, whatever.
Come on, guys, let's go. Yeah!
- Let me wipe that.
- You've missed a spot.
- I don't see it.
- Just a little lower!
- Oh, I am so sorry. Did I get you...
- Yes.
Well, gentlemen. It appears we have some competition on the Muppet property.
The Economist says they've gotten back together again.
- The Muppets got back together?
- Remember?
# Together again
Gee, it's good to be... #
Gentlemen, please!
No singing in my office!
- Yes, sir.
- But, of course, it was all his fault.
- Mostly his fault.
- No matter.
Point is, that studio and that oil belong to me.
Yeah, those Muppets are gonna be running home with their tails between their legs.
Some of'em literally.
Because those ones have tails.
Maniacal laugh, maniacal laugh.
That's a maniacal laugh moment.
OK, this is it. 80's Robot, let's park around back.
It's The Muppet Show, with our special guest star,
Mr. Bob Hope!
Time once again for Veterinarian's Hospital, the continuing story of...
And now, Pigs in Space!
Gary. Can you believe it?
- The Muppet theater.
- Yeah.
- Welcome back, everyone.
- Thanks.
Well, I know the old place is not quite at its best right now.
Yeah! Who cancelled the maid service?
But don't worry. We'll be fine.
Kermit, there's no way we can rehearse with the place like this.
Wait. Kermit, don't say another word.
Mary, Walter and I, well, we would be happy to help you rebuild the theater.
Honestly, it would be an honor for all three of us.
- So would.
- OK. Well, let's clean this place up!
Yeah!
- This is boring.
- But don't you guys remember?
You're the Muppets!
You do this to music!
Well, all right!
- Hey, Animal!
- Yeah?
Look what I found!
- Beauregard!
- Scooter! Good to see you!
Where's everybody been?
Celebrity... celebrity!
Hello! Yes. Could I speak with President Carter, please?
He moved? Well, you don't happen to have a number where I could reach... Hello?
Walter, I thought we were gonna clean the balcony.
- Doing a great job, pal.
- You're doing a great job.
- Wocka wocka.
- Hey, guys!
Look at these old photos I just found.
Oooh.
Can you believe that 80's haircut I used to have?
I looked totally ridiculous!
Yes, it's Kermit. The frog.
Could you come to our celebrity telethon this weekend?
Sure. Sure, I understand.
- Hey, shut the door!
- What is that?
Say hello to the little friend.
There goes dinner.
Wow! Great job, everybody!
Oh, hey, Kermit.
Listen, have a great night, and I just want you to know,
Walter and I are really good sewers, so we'll have those costumes ready for you in no time.
- Good. You two have a great night.
- OK. Thank you!
- Bye.
- Kermit?
Gary, I was kind of hoping that we could go to the beach tomorrow
- or see the Hollywood Sign.
- We'll have plenty of time to do that stuff. It's just, right now,
I don't wanna leave Walter.
You know, he needs me.
I don't know, sweetheart, he seems pretty happy.
- Like that.
- Oh, OK.
Now you.
Yeah, that's it!
Yeah, yeah, good job!
Well, just one more day, OK?
And then I'm all yours.
Tell you what. Why don't you get a head start on sightseeing tomorrow, and then I'll be waiting for you when you get back.
OK. Just... don't forget about me.
Never.
Well, we're still on for dinner Friday, right?
Yeah, of course.
- Oh, Walter!
- Oh, yes, Kermit.
Hey, listen, Walter,
I just wanna tell you that none of this would have happened without you, so thank you.
- Oh, well...
- And welcome aboard.
Night, everybody. Just sleep anywhere you can find a spot.
"Welcome aboard"?
Hey, Kermit. You awake?
- Yep.
- What's the weather
- supposed to be like tonight?
- I don't know. Why?
I just don't want it to rain through the hole in the ceiling.
Stars sure are pretty, though.
We're gonna be OK, right?
We haven't done this in a long time, and I really don't wanna go back to Reno.
Don't worry, Fozzie. We'll be fine.
Look how we cleaned this place up today, you know?
Same old team, all pulling together.
I guess you're right.
Night-night, Kermit.
Good night, Fozzie.
OK, gather round, troops! Everybody, time to get this rehearsal going.
- Scooter, is everybody here?
- Almost everyone, chief.
- Yeah...
- Hey, anybody got any kerosene?
I wanna take these old pig dresses out back and burn'em.
Hold it right there, sausage snout!
- Piggy?
- Huh?
Well, look what the cat dragged in.
Come on. Keep it up, Maurice.
Sorry, Miss Piggy, but you've been replaced... permanently.
- Oh, yeah?
- Yeah!
I don't think so... sister?
Who you calling sister, sister?
- Oh, look, an omelet station!
- Oh, where?
Hiya!
There's only one Miss Piggy, and she is moi.
Yeah, well, you ain't seen the last of me! I'll be back!
Yeah, yeah. Heard of mouthwash?
Welcome back, Miss Piggy.
All right, all right, don't crowd me!
Wow, she sure hasn't changed.
Piggy? You came back.
I'm not here for you, Kermit.
I'm here for them.
And, besides, when this show's done,
I'm catching the next plane back to my life in Paris.
OK, Piggy, OK. Places for the opening number, everybody!
Oh, good morning, Veronica.
- Morning, Frog.
- OK, everybody, take it from the top.
Oooh!
- You missed your cue.
- I know!
There's kind of a rhythm to this, you know?
Uh... Oh, and if you like that one, what's the bear capital of the world?
Mos-cow!
Ha.
# It's time to play the music
- # It's time to light the lights
- Two, three, four.
# It's time to put on makeup
# It's time to dress up right #
Hey guys, stop. Cut, cut, cut, cut, cut. What's the problem?
We can't keep time without the drums, man! We need drums!
- Sorry, Animal.
- No drums! No drums!
- Jack Black said no drums!
- Animal, heel! Sit!
- Who's next? Oh.
- In control.
- Hey, Walter?
- Oh. Yes, Kermit?
You think you might wanna help us out here?
Maybe do something in the show?
Kermit, you know, you've been so nice to me, but I have to face the facts.
See, the Muppets are so talented...
Hey, guys, check it out! Fart shoes!
- Patent pending!
- And...
...I don't have any talent at all.
The truth is...
I can't perform with you guys.
I feel like a phony just being here.
Walter, just because you haven't found your talent yet, doesn't mean you don't have one.
If you look inside yourself,
I'm sure you'll find something that you're really good at.
OK, Kermit. I'll try.
Take my picture!
Welcome.
How many in your party? Two?
Uh... No, just the one.
All right, party of one, follow me.
# I look around, and once again I'm on my own
# My man ain't here
He's gone and done me wrong
# No one's gonna stop this girl from having fun
# I throw my hands up high and have a party for one
# I'm having a me party
A party by myself
# A me party
I don't need nobody else
# A me party
I'm the first and last to show
# There's no one at this party that I don't already know
# I'm not gonna sit around by myself and wait for you
# Haven't you heard?
One is the new two
# I'm gonna make a scene
I'm gonna make a fuss
# Tonight I'm gonna celebrate with just the one of us
# I'm having a me party
# Haven't I seen me here before?
# A me party
# I'm the last one on the dance floor
- # Me party
- # A party just for moi
- # Me party
- # It's a solo Mardi Gras
# I'm having a me party
I'm such good company
- # A me party
- # I saved the last dance for me
# What happens at a me party stays at a me party #
Excuse me, miss, are you expecting anyone else?
Oh... no.
No, it's just me. Party of one.
Order up!
- OK, cue 17 is Fozzie's intro.
- Hey, Scooter? What's left?
Oh, uh, it's you, chief!
- Hm?
- Your duet. With Piggy.
- Miss Piggy?
- Hm?
We're all out front practicing our acts and seems that everybody expects you and I to do a duet, so...
Oh, that's so lovely, but I'm afraid I can't.
No, no, you see, I'm already doing a duet with my new dance partner.
Hola.
OK, come on, rehearsing, let's go. We gotta break it up.
- Excuse us.
- 'Scuse us.
Let's try that lift again, shall we?
The lift again.
OK, on my count this time, OK?
In three, two... Wait for me!
Good grief.
Kermit! There you are. I've been looking for you everywhere!
So nice to see you, Veronica.
Who's hosting?
Did you find a celebrity?
Yeah, well, I've wanted to talk to you about that, you see, because...
Well, actually, I'm kind of a celebrity.
You?
No. Kermit, listen.
I will not air the show unless you find a real celebrity host.
I will rerun Benson if I have to.
Yeah, you see, the thing is, Veronica, that's kind of impossible because the show's in 12 hours!
Twelve hours!
I might as well just go and ask Tex
Richman to give us the studio back!
And the Muppets are like a big family.
Well... And for us, that theater is... is like our home.
Which is why, in conclusion...
...we humbly ask that you give us back our studio.
It would certainly mean a lot to us.
Hmmm.
Well, Mr. The Frog, let me see.
Correct!
The answer is no.
Well, you could've just said that.
- Contract.
- Contract.
Contract.
- Nicely done, sir.
- You see, Muppets, according to this contract, it's not just this studio you lose the rights to tonight,
- it's the Muppet name itself.
- What?
And all characters under the Muppet name.
Wait a second. What possible use could you have for our names?
Told ya I'd be back.
Well, now I am...
...back.
And I see you've met Mr. Richman, our new business partner.
The Moopets are a hard, cynical act for a hard, cynical world.
Hey, Fozzie! I want you to meet a friend of mine.
- Wocka wocka.
- You're relics, Muppets!
The world has moved on, and no one cares about your goody-goody, hippy-dippy,
Julie Andrews and Dom DeLuise hostin', singin'-and-dancin' act anymore!
You're dead!
And I just come to bury you.
Now, get out of my office.
- What?
- What is that supposed to mean?
You said you were gonna talk to the man!
Guys! OK, so maybe
Kermit signed away the theater and the Muppet name, but as long as we have a celebrity host, we can still pull off a heart-warming, last-minute triumph, right, Kermit?
Well, actually I don't see how we can, Fozzie.
- Huh?
- What?
Guys, the show's in six hours, and we're barely rehearsed, and, well, I...
I couldn't get us a celebrity host.
- Oh, no!
- What?
I'm afraid Tex Richman's right.
The world's moved on.
I'm sorry I dragged you guys into this mess.
Kermit?
All right, listen up, you freaks!
I didn't come 5,000 miles to not be on TV.
All we need is one stinkin' celebrity, and by any means necessary.
Now, the frog's gone.
We're doing things my way from now on.
Let's move!
- Hey!
- Hi.
- How was your day?
- Oh, it was great.
I went to Guinness Book of World Records... alone.
Then Ripley's Believe It or Not... solo.
And then I ate lunch unaccompanied, and then I walked back here... independently.
Listen, I got you these.
You know, to make up for the other ones. The broken ones.
Thanks, sweetie.
Listen, Gary.
I was just wondering what the plan was for dinner tonight.
Oh, I don't care.
What do you feel like?
OK. That's fine.
That's just fine.
That's... that's perfect.
I'm going to go for a walk.
Individually.
- Walter, hey.
- Gary.
Oh, where have you been? I need you to help me figure out a talent.
A talent for what?
For the show. Kermit asked me to do an act in the show.
I... I could be a Muppet.
Wow. Wow, Walter, that's amazing.
Yeah, but I need to figure out if I have a talent.
Well, you know what?
I'm sure you'll think of something, but right now I actually...
I need your help.
I'm starting to get the feeling that
Mary's upset with me about something, and I don't know what, and I was hoping maybe you would talk to her for me.
Gary, I'd love to help you out, but I can't leave the theater now.
This is important.
Well, hold on a second.
I mean, my life is important, too.
Yeah, but the whole reason we came here was to see the Muppets.
No, it wasn't!
The whole reason we came here was to take a vacation where
I took Mary out to a fancy dinner because it's our tenth anniversary, and then...
- Walter, what day is today?
- Friday.
Yeah. Yeah, that's it.
This is bad.
Walter, this is really bad. I have to...
- Mary? Mary!
- Wait.
Gary, I need you.
OK, is everybody ready?
Commence Operation
Celebri-nap. Masks on!
- Masks on!
- Except for moi.
Nothing covers this beautiful face.
- No maskin'?
- No maskin'.
Check the door on Stage 28.
- I'm going over there now.
- She's done in makeup...
I told you, I'm not done putting on my balls!
Oh, hey, Animal.
What are you doin' here?
Acting. Natural.
Now!
Whoa!
Hiya!
Hiya!
Mary, surprise! I figured out why you're mad... at me.
Gary, I've gone home.
I love you, but you need to decide, are you a man or a Muppet?
# I reflect on my reflection
# And I ask myself the question
# What's the right direction to go?
# I don't know
# Am I a man
- # Or am I a Muppet?
- # Am I a Muppet?
# If I'm a Muppet
Then I'm a very manly Muppet
- # Very manly Muppet
- # Am I a Muppet?
- # Muppet
- # Or am I a man?
# Am I a man?
# If I'm a man that makes me a Muppet of a man
# A Muppet of a man
# I look into these eyes
# And I don't recognize
# The one I see inside
# It's time for me to decide
# Am I a man
# Or am I a Muppet?
# Am I a Muppet?
# If I'm a Muppet
Well, I'm a very manly Muppet
- # Very manly Muppet
- # Am I a Muppet?
- # Muppet
- # Or am I a man?
# Am I a man?
# If I'm a man that makes me a Muppet of a man
# A Muppet of a man
# Here I go again
# I'm always running out of time
# I think I made up my mind
# Now I understand who I am
# I'm a man
# I'm a Muppet
- # I'm a Muppet of a man
- # I'm a very manly Muppet
# I'm a Muppet-y man
I'm so sorry.
- Oh, Gary.
- Mary.
# That's what I am #
Kermit. We have our celebrity!
Mr. Jack Black has graciously agreed to do the telethon!
Oh, my gosh, that's amazing.
Where is he?
- In the trunk.
- Get me outta here!
You kidnapped Jack Black?
That's illegal!
But, Kermit, what's more illegal, briefly inconveniencing Jack Black,
- or destroying the Muppets?
- Kidnapping Jack Black, Fozzie!
Kermit, listen. Whatever
I may think of you right now, these guys are counting on you.
You inspire them.
- What, to kidnap people?
- To work together.
- To kidnap people?
- Mr. The Frog, we all agreed a celebrity is not a people.
And now that we have a celebrity, the show's back on.
Come on, Kermit.
Don't let these guys down now.
All right. Well, what are you guys still doing here, huh?
- It's showtime!
- All right!
That's it!
- Nicely done, sir. As usual.
- En garde.
Ow! Ow.
OK, very nice.
Halt! Point left!
Well done, sir. Thank you.
Thank you so much.
And coming up next on CDE,
The Muppet Telethon.
Kermit and friends host a celebrity-studded gala,
- with special guest, Jack Black.
- Oh! He's pretty good.
- We're going to phase two.
- Yes, Mr. Richman.
So do you think we're working for the bad guy?
Hurry! The show starts in ten minutes!
Where did you learn to drive?
Hang on, everyone!
Come on, guys. OK, listen up, everybody!
This is it! Five minutes to curtain!
- Kermit?
- Get ready for the opening number.
- Yes?
- I need to talk to you about my act.
Listen, Walter,
I know you're gonna be fine.
In fact, I'm sure you'll be great.
Scooter, who's up first?
- Come on, come on, come on!
- No...
Fly in the arches!
- OK, first we have the opening theme.
- Of course. Yeah.
- You come out and introduce Fozzie.
- Right.
Then we have...
TV executive at six o'clock!
- What?
- The show is a disaster, Frog!
- Veronica...
- Where's the audience?
I knew you guys weren't popular anymore.
I should have trusted that chart.
There's no one here!
- What about Hobo Joe?
- Who?
Why does everybody forget about Hobo Joe?
- Just a second. Scooter!
- Yeah, chief?
- Did you hand out all those flyers?
- Of course. Every last one!
Don't worry.
We'll think of something!
You better.
Yoo-hoo! You've got audience.
It's me! What am I, invisible?
Jack Black.
Fifteen seconds to curtain, Mr. Black.
- Hi!
- Ah! Where am I?
Why am I so fancy? What are you doing?
You're ruining my look!
- We'll see you out there! Good luck!
- Stop cleaning me!
- You sure got nice teeth, Jack Black.
- Yeah.
We're here!
- Start the show!
- Ready for some kind of entertainment!
All right, good luck, everyone, and cue Scooter.
OK, we go live in three, two...
Ladies and gentlemen, please welcome your host, Kermit the Frog.
It's The Muppet Telethon, with our very special guest,
Mr. Jack Black! Yay!
# It's time to play the music
# It's time to light the lights
# It's time to meet the Muppets on The Muppet Show tonight
# It's time to put on makeup
# It's time to dress up right
# It's time to get things started
# Why don't you get things started?
I always dreamed we'd be back here.
Dreams? Those were nightmares!
# It's time to get things started
# On the most sensational inspirational, celebrational
# Muppetational
This is what we call The Muppet Show #
Ladies and gentlemen, welcome to The Muppet Telethon!
We have Muppets standing by to take your calls.
- Yes, we are.
- Hi. Hello.
Could I have a large pizza with ham and...?
Yes, and, boy, do we have a wonderful show for you, with our special guest, Mr. Jack Black!
I'm being held captive by these weirdos!
Now you know how we've felt for the past 40 years!
Somebody, anybody, please call the police. This is real rope!
- Man, this 3-D is incredible!
- This is real!
Oh, and by the way, folks, we have plenty of room here in the audience, so if you'd like to come down and see the show live...
There's no audience in the theater.
Look, it's totally empty.
Poor Walter.
Maybe we should go back.
No way, Mary.
I've made my choice already.
I just sang a whole song about it.
I wanna stay here with you.
So thank you.
Ladies and gentlemen, prepare yourselves for the Great Gonzo's most amazing feat ever.
- Head bowling.
- What? No!
I have not signed off on this!
Drumroll, please.
And a one and a two and a three!
Uh-oh. Uh... My fingers got stuck.
All part of the act, folks. Stay tuned.
Please, make this end! Please!
This is great. Call'em.
Hello?
You wanna give us some money?!
Uhhh...
- Say yes!
- Yes! We will take that money!
Hey, guys, we got us some money!
Oh, yeah, tickets. Here we are.
Tickets. Thank you.
Five dollars to show you your seat.
It's up there somewhere.
- Help!
- OK, thank you, Gonzo.
Thank you very much. Ladies and gentlemen, we will see what happens with head bowling a little later in the show.
Up next is our furry funny man,
Mr. Fozzie Bear! Yay!
Thank you, thank you, and thank you.
Boy, did I go to a bad seafood place last night.
The catch of the day was salmonella.
Wocka wocka!
- OK.
- Ah! That joke's like 50 years old!
So how'bout those shopping centers?
You seen one, you seen a mall! Take it.
Make it stop!
- Wocka wocka wocka wocka!
- Make it stop! No!
- We're not a team! I'm not with him!
- What is happening?
People are actually watching this?
Deadly! Bring the car!
What am I gonna do?
What am I gonna do?
Walter? Sixty seconds till you're on, Walter.
You ready?
No. Yes, yes, yes...
Whoopi Goldberg?
Selena Gomez? And... hi there.
Yeah, look, somebody said there might be a career opportunity here,
- something about saving a theater.
- Yes, yes, of course.
I don't really know who you guys are.
My agent just told me to show up.
- That's great.
- Are you one of the
Teenage Mutant Ninja Turtles?
Yes, I am, and let me show you how you can help.
And don't worry. It's just your one shot to go on live TV before millions of people to prove you have what it takes to become one of the Muppets.
Good luck.
Up next, folks, I am proud to present a brand-new act to the show. Introducing Walter.
That's not good.
It appears that
Walter has stepped out, so it's...
Well, it's back to the days of yore down at the old barbershop.
Oh, no! It's a barbershop quartet!
Get me out of here!
Wait a minute.
What are you doing?
Is that Nirvana? Stop it! No!
You're ruining one of the greatest songs of all time!
Ow!
Careful around the ears!
Ah! That was hot!
Hey! What's going on here?
Why is my body so big?
What'd you do to my voice?
I sound like a chipmunk!
Wait a second.
Did you guys shrink my head?
Ladies and gentlemen,
Jack Black!
Nice work, everybody.
Chickens, you're up next!
It's going rather nicely.
We might just make this.
And now I am pleased and proud to present those princesses of poultry,
Camilla and friends!
Let's hear it for Camilla and her farmyard friends!
No, I... I don't know why I'm not hosting this.
So remember, folks, keep on calling and you'll help us reach our goal of ten million dollars by midnight.
And if...
Oh, dear.
Ladies and gentlemen, don't be alarmed.
We will get this sorted out just as soon as we can. Scooter!
Well, that's that. Nice try, Muppets!
Kermit, how are we going to raise the rest of the money with no electricity?
All right, calm down, everybody.
- Is everybody OK?
- Yeah.
Well, we can't do the show without power.
- Anybody got any bright ideas?
- Not now, Fozzie.
Ten-gauge gator grip.
I love it when you talk shop.
Oh!
- # La la la la la la la
- # Mee mee mee mee
What? How'd they get the power back?
We're gonna have to get up on that roof and shut'em down for good!
Bolt cutters!
Bolt cutters.
Deadly! You come with me.
That's it.
Hm.
To the end of the Muppets!
Deadly! What are you doing?
Enough!
Just because I have a terrifying name and an evil English accent, does not preclude the fact that, in my heart,
I am a Muppet, not a Moopet!
Looks like it's I who will have the last laugh!
- What does that mean?
- It's an idiom, you idiot, because you cannot laugh!
Ha ha!
Oopsie.
Deadly.
Now that's a maniacal laugh for you!
Hey, Gary, Mary, how'd you guys get here so fast?
We travelled by map.
We thought it'd be quicker.
Hey, I'm sorry I bailed. I just...
I realized you don't let the most important person in your world slip away.
- Hey, Scooter?
- Yeah?
Could you do me a favor and take over hosting duty?
But, chief, I don't go onstage.
Well, just do what I do.
Pretend that the audience is naked.
Yeah, but, I...
Ha... ha... ha...
Uh, Miss Piggy?
You are all naked.
Well, sorta.
OK. Great!
And now, ladies and gentlemen, please welcome, a real hero...
You saved it?
After all this time?
Oh, Kermie.
I guess I'm not that good at saying this kind of stuff.
- Yes, Kermie?
- Well...
...over the last week,
I realized that...
...I... I miss you.
And I need you.
And maybe you don't need the, the whole world to love you.
Maybe you just need one person.
It's time for our song, and if we don't raise the money tonight, it might be the last time we sing together.
And... Well, are you ready?
Oh, Kermie.
# Why are there so many
# Songs about rainbows?
# And what's on the other side?
# Rainbows are visions
# But only illusions
# And rainbows have nothing to hide
# So we've been told
# And some choose to believe it
# I know they're wrong
Wait and see
# Someday we'll find it
# The rainbow connection
# The lovers, the dreamers and me
# All of us under its spell
# We know that it's
# Probably magic
# Have you been half asleep
# And have you heard voices?
# I've heard them calling my name
Hey, these are yours, man.
I kept'em for ya.
- Drum.
- No drum.
- Drum!
- No drum!
- Drum! Drum!
- No drum! No drum!
You know what to do.
# I've heard it too many times to ignore it
# It's something that
I'm supposed to be
- Aaah!
- # Someday we'll find it
# The rainbow connection
# The lovers, the dreamers and me #
Drum! Drum, drum! Drum!
Ah ha ha ha ha.
You still got it, man!
Piggy? Will you stay... for me?
- For you, Kermie?
- Yeah.
Of course!
Woo hoo!
Thank you, everybody.
Thank you, all.
Ladies and gentlemen, it's almost midnight and we haven't quite reached our target yet, but if you'll all just stick around, we'll be right back with our final act.
The Muppet Telethon will return after these messages.
Walter? Walter, where are you, buddy?
Listen, everybody, the show ran short, and we don't have anything else planned.
We need one last act to bring us home.
I'm gonna go check on Jack Black and see if he has any ideas.
You guys see if you can come up with something.
We have two minutes! Two minutes!
- Think, think, think!
- What am I thinking?
Walter. Walt!
- Walter!
- Gary?
- Wha... You came back.
- Walter.
What are you doing down here?
They just need one more act. You gotta get out there and help those guys.
I can't. What if people laugh at me? I...
I'd rather go back home to Smalltown.
With you.
Look, Walter, you're my brother, and I'm always gonna love you, but you belong here, with these guys.
Hey, you're the one who got Kermit to do this.
You're the one who brought everyone here together.
You always believe in other people, but that's easy.
Sooner or later, you gotta believe in yourself, too, because that's what growing up is.
It's becoming who you want to be.
You have to try. Please, Walter.
You're my hero.
OK, Jack Black's got nothing.
What did you guys come up with?
- Bunsen can set Beaker on fire.
- No, no, no, we can't do that.
- I could break out the fart shoes.
- No, no, no, that will never work!
We're back in three, two...
Oh, no!
It's Walter.
Thank you.
- He's all grown up.
- Oh, that was wonderful!
Ladies and gentlemen, Walter!
It looks like we're going to get our studio back! the Muppets are about to take back their studio.
Help! I've been mugged.
Alerting authorities.
- We're sorry...
- What happened? Hello?
- Hello?
- Guys, my phone is dead.
News flash: My phone is also dead.
Repeat, my phone is also dead.
Ooh...
I did it. I beat you.
Game over, Kermit. You lost.
Chicky!
Too late, Muppets. I won!
Turn that thing off!
The show is over!
But we were so close!
Or not.
It kinda makes me feel better, honestly.
I mean, we were nowhere close at all.
You artists formerly known as the Muppets are standing on private property.
My private property.
And I'm telling you to leave. Now!
He's right, everybody.
He won. We gotta go.
Not now, Fozzie.
- I can't believe this.
- I know.
Well, that's that.
This isn't right.
It can't end like this.
But what can we do?
Listen, everybody, we've got nothing to be ashamed of. And you know why?
Well, because thanks to Walter here, we tried.
And if we failed, we failed together, and to me, that's not failing at all.
And I don't care what anybody says.
And I don't care if no one believes in us, because I believe.
- I believe in you.
- Huh?
- And you.
- Me?
And you.
You know, what's important isn't this building or a name.
It's each other. So I say, fine, let's just start at the bottom and work our way back up to the top.
- Yeah.
- Let's all walk out through these doors with our heads held high. As a family.
- Because that's what we are.
- Yeah. Yeah.
Muppets, Muppets, Muppets!
Wow.
Muppets, Muppets, Muppets!
All right.
- Wow.
- Wow.
Hey, where's Walter?
See? Your fans, they love you guys!
Hey, Walter.
Aren't you gonna join us?
- Yeah! Come on!
- Come on, Walter!
- Come on, Walter!
- Yes. Come!
What're you waiting for, buddy?
Get over there.
Yeah, go ahead.
Muppets! Muppets!
Muppets! Muppets! Muppets!
Hm? Oh.
How charming. A finale.
# Everything is great
# Everything is grand
# We've got the whole wide world in the palm of our hand
# Everything is perfect
# It's falling into place
# I can't seem to wipe this smile off my face
# Life's a happy song
# When there's someone by your side to sing along
# Everything is great
And we'll live happily ever after
# And we'll keep giving the world the third greatest gift
# Laughter
# Ze movie's almost over
It's time to say, "So long"
# Will you please stop singing?
You've already sung this song
# Life's a happy song when there's someone by your side
# To sing along
We're happier when you don't sing.
# We've got everything that we need
# We can be whatever we want to be
# Nothing we can't do
# The skies are blue when it's me and you and you and you
# And you and you and you and you
Well, all of you. Yeah!
# La la
La la la la la
# La la
Hey, remember me? I'm Jack Black!
No, what are you doing? Whoa, whoa.
No, no, no. Put me back down.
- All hail the Hobo King.
- What are you doing? This is insane.
# We've got everything that we need
# We can be whatever we want to be
# Nothing that we can't do
# The skies are blue when it's me and you and you and you
- # Life's a happy song
- # When there's someone
- # By your side to sing
- # Life's a happy song
# Mee mee mee
Mee mee mee
# Life's a happy song when there's someone
- # Someone
- # Someone
# By your side
# To sing along
I just have one question
I need to ask you.
Will you, Mary... marry me?
- # Mahna Mahna
- # Do do do-do-do
- # Mahna Mahna
- # Do do-do-do
- # Mahna Mahna
- You're breaking the law!
I own that name.
Hey, guys, I think I've finally worked out how to...
"Oil" bet that hurt.
This just in: "Richman gives back Muppet theater and name.
Change of heart.
Nothing to do with head injury."
- # Mahna Mahna
- # Do do do-do-do
- # Mahna Mahna
- # Do do-do-do
- # Mahna Mahna
- Hey, Richman! We had a deal!
- Yeah, for reallies!
- Yeah, you owe us money, man.
What the wocka?
Thank you.
- # Mahna Mahna
- # Do do do-do-do
- # Mahna Mahna
- # Do do-do-do
Breaking news: "Miss Piggy promises to stay out of the limelight.
Kermit says,'We need some time alone. "'
- Oh, Kermie, I'm so happy.
- What are you talking about?
Let's share our happiness with ten of the world's largest news publications.
- How's the quiet life, Kermit?
- Piggy, froggy!
- How are you enjoying your time alone?
- Piggy!
- # Mahna Mahna
- # Do do do-do-do
- # Mahna Mahna
- # Do do-do-do
- # Mahna Mahna
- # Do do do-do-do
# Do-do-do, Do-do-do
Do-do-do
# Do-do
Do-do-do-do
# Mahna Mahna #
Music is powerful.
One song can change the mood, trigger a memory.
One song can change your life.
Listening to my heart
For God's sake, help me!
George, are you okay?
- Thanks.
What a mess, huh? Quite strong spirit today.
Be careful.
- Of course.
Would you like paper? You have to be informed.
Goodbye. Have a nice day.
- Thanks.
Danny, the obligations they cry. The toilet is clogged again.
Whose fault this time?
- My.
But you have to throw trash and clean the tables.
We will take care of.
- Thanks.
Give it.
Danny, welcome. Not much, but go well work again ...
I do not work weekends, but I lack staff.
In what should be here?
- Come later to 11.
Thanks, kid.
- Until tomorrow.
I'll see you tomorrow?
- Yes. Good night.
Used recording kit $ 500
A few more months.
How can you give a sweat-earned money used shenanigans?
What you spend?
- Tickets for the Knicks, the first row.
This is really something.
That's right.
What are you doing after the game?
- Going home.
With these "shenanigans" I can do something that will be forever.
People can listen to music for years.
Who are his shenanigans ever need him?
Anyway
- Seriously. This is a good question.
School of Music? You must be kidding.
Can I take your order?
- For her Caesar salad without croutons.
We will share the chicken parmesan.
Have you?
- Yes, it ...
Would you repeat that?
- Caesar salad without croutons.
And we will share with the chicken parmesan.
- Soup or salad?
You can choose soup or salad to chicken.
What soup?
- Chicken Soup ...
We'll take it.
- It will eat chicken.
And three cups of water.
I'll bring them, ma'am.
Can not take an order.
So good education is so important.
If they see Tony will kill you.
- Relax, I'll eat a few.
There will come a day when Tony will work for me.
I will buy this place and call it "When Roger."
Tasty Was?
- Very. Bill, please.
Sorry, forget it.
"Forget it"? Very clever, Danny.
Every day comes a bunch of cute girls ...
... And you stop at one.
It is different.
- Do not call you.
Maybe he wants to wait a little? Is not this a rule?
Do not call the boy soon get his number?
The rule is two days.
Some girls call after three days.
I think, depends on their menstruation.
How long since?
- Almost two weeks.
You saw the girl two weeks ago?
I understand that after some time to dry, despair, and I am so.
But it's time to overcome.
Do you always eat like that?
- How?
You're here?
Why do not you call? Me to tell you.
I will not tell anyone. Do not like it, right?
And if you like, two weeks its been a long time.
This is not according to rule for two days, regardless of menstruation.
He here?
In the kitchen f.
I'll call you?
Would lead him.
It's here.
- Yes, but I must tell you something.
Come to eat?
Why did you come then?
Do not call.
I have no phone.
Why?
I'm deaf.
Mom's friend was deaf. I only know his name.
Can you give me your email?
You need a maid.
Or girlfriend.
We are going to the movies.
But she did not hear anything.
Lip-read if you can. And if not, enjoy the view.
So it is with other things in my life.
Did you?
Try to talk. I'm sure they will understand.
Are you hungry?
Come.
Tell me about yourself. I know almost nothing.
Spaghetti with minced meat? And I have my favorites.
You can not drive? You can change this.
Music, but how ...
Sorry about your father.
Is there more?
And you're sweet.
How do you talk to people? With my family for example?
But how can they say what you want?
Why not with sign language?
Mom did not allow me to teach him.
So you do not know how?
Attended normal school, so I better read lips.
Learn sign language when I grow up?
Very cute doing it.
Let me show you something?
That is why I work here. I play every day.
Want to become a famous musician?
No, but I want my songs to become famous.
And then compose?
I learned to play the 12, and since then I write the songs himself.
Save for a demo, but I have much time to write.
Must be nice to play the piano.
No, everything is fine.
Watch.
You will play this part, and I with his right hand.
What do you say?
I know. But it was fun, right?
How lost your hearing?
- Meningitis is spent.
Her father also had it. Can not pay for treatment and died before her eyes when she was 5 years old.
This makes me remember how my mother died.
I do not wish anyone.
So good to know you?
You have no idea.
- Seriously?
I spend the night with you?
Over and sent her to go there?
I have not slept with her.
What did you do then?
- We laughed, ate, talked about her.
Are you kidding me? How do you talk to her?
It was weird. You can learn sign language.
We have many things in common. She also loved music as a child.
I know you like her, but do not rush it a bit?
Any idea how difficult it is to communicate all day?
You'll learn sign language.
- You can not say anything.
In addition to her friends and get a bonus.
And so I'm Diana.
- Chattermouth.
I'm saying that you think better.
Make him consider things.
I will not give up something beautiful just because it can be difficult.
You look wonderful.
- You too.
What do you eat?
- Halibut sounds great.
Sorry, it says ... Spaghetti with minced meat?
Sweetheart, this is a chic restaurant.
- No, no problem.
How can you afford such a place?
Sorry, but her mother would ask at this point.
I work hard.
What do you do?
- Waiter am.
Her mother would not approve.
Only transfers until I am ready to meet with the family.
I doubt it will get there.
I do not like wine?
- Never drank, silly.
Even wine?
- This will appeal to her mother
Wine like.
- Accumulating points towards the family.
Give alcohol to their daughter.
She is 21 years old and never drank, even birthdays.
Never has rules and sex. Will take away her virginity and you?
Keep the reins too tight. Do you go without it?
This is called defeat.
- It will not happen.
You know your mother would not approve it.
Is large enough to solve alone.
Ready?
Welcome to the official party for your birthday!
People Ariana turned 21 today!
Really your birthday?
Already has.
Goodbye.
You're drunk.
What is it?
Are you okay?
Are you okay?
I'll take you home.
My house is quite small and reigns mess.
Are you sure?
Come on, drink the entire cup.
Put this on.
Time for sleep.
Good night.
Good night, Princess.
Good morning, sunshine. This is for you.
Congratulations on your first hangover.
Evidence for a great birthday.
Answer the following philosophical question:
If a tree falls in the forest and no one around to hear will issue a sound? How do you think?
Come on.
Mr. Walker.
Sure, it sounds made.
- How do you know?
Tree falls, then sound.
- But nobody was there to hear.
So, if you let off and no one will release it sound?
You will hear, and smell.
You back.
Depends on the definition of "sound". Is it physical or mental.
If you define sound as natural, there will be vibrations in the air.
But the sound can be thought. In this case there is no vibration, and the way our brain interprets sounds.
If we consider sound as a physical concept, the tree will produce a sound.
But if you look like a mental concept, there is no sound.
Great.
It is so obvious, right?
In any case, she would not hear it.
How do I hear?
Are you okay?
Everything okay?
Attend two courses together. I'm Nicole.
You did great.
Pay no attention to Mitch, he is badass.
But on this subject will not be calling anymore.
Come here.
Let's go inside.
This is my mother.
Died 4 years ago.
Every day I hear how people complain about minor things.
I was with her all the time.
All five years, while struggling with cancer.
Not once did I heard her complain. But I did it.
Waking up in the morning, saying: "What a great day to live."
I watched her I said that there must be paradise.
I saw it in her smile
He was always beside me, still here.
This is her favorite sweater.
Sometimes I take it in her hand and she gives me strength.
Of course.
Your father is also a composition?
It's nothing.
Can I try?
Near E.
Loved his father, right?
Sam? So I call you father? I like.
Sam's name do you like more?
Very beautiful, Sam.
Sounds good.
- Sorry, I did not know you're here.
Did you wrote it?
- Yes, just killing time.
How about to make a small concert here?
Will play songs, you will invite your friends.
Are you sure?
- Let's try.
Music can be beneficial for business.
Good night.
- You too. And thank you.
What would you do with Danny in the summer?
What is it?
Not a packed suitcase. When will they take?
Leave for two weeks? What if your mother know?
I'll miss you.
That was Mom.
No problem.
Like it?
What is it?
Do not worry about it.
I should not say it to you, but it very seriously.
"Seriously?" What do you mean?
- Love is to the ears.
Speak with sign language.
- Use sign language?
You see? Was it scary?
Job Interview? Where?
Why do you want to intern in an accounting firm?
This is nice for certain people but I know you long enough and I know that this is not your dream.
Seriously? Always wanted to play with numbers?
What then? What dreamed as a child?
I knew it. What went wrong?
Why not play before a large audience?
Wait. This does not mean you can not play.
Look at Beethoven.
You can do anything you want.
What is wrong with my lifestyle?
Do not tell me.
You know what I think? I think that fear.
Indeed, fear is.
Not from your mother, or Marianne, or anyone.
Afraid of myself, afraid to be yourself.
Life is too short to live for others.
You can not destroy their future. There disability.
Are you there, dear?
Sorry about yesterday. Can I come with you?
I had to leave.
What do you mean?
Last night they came to take me.
I will be away almost all summer.
You would be here two weeks? Where go?
Europe. I gotta go. I'll be back next month.
Month? At least I will write it?
I love you.
Greg, you know that Arianna is here?
- I'll check.
Last night is gone, will be absent all summer.
Are you sure?
- They left in 23:27.
Thank you.
- Enjoy the summer.
This is the last time you hiding something from me.
More will be meeting with him, talking or even thinking about it.
I have not raised to do with a waiter.
You'll get it in the autumn, when you start school.
Hide it. And silence again if something will look for another job.
Discard it. And everyone else.
I do not know how to tell you, but I met another. Forget about me.
I read the email.
Sometimes I forget how hard it was before.
Not properly celebrated 21st birthday.
Give me another chance. What do you say we go for a dress?
Nicole, how was your vacation?
- Great, I was with my parents.
Hear you Sam? When he returned from vacation?
What holiday?
I do not know what happens. Does not correspond to my messages.
Is it online?
- Do not you see?
Will she rang the home.
So you know where you live?
- Were you I would not ...
I worry. I have not seen her for over a month.
I do not want to lose her. Please.
Ariana is not here.
- I Sam.
And it is gone.
- Still on holiday?
She does not want to see you.
- Leave her alone to talk.
Do not you want to see me?
I don't get it.
Security.
- You must leave.
We will leave when she tells him.
Throw this man from my home.
Get out.
This is Richardson family. Henk, a colleague of David.
And this is Tyler, his successful and handsome son.
You flatter me.
Nice to meet you.
Arianna, why not divorce Tyler around?
I will make coffee for me and Henk.
Do not go.
Not yet.
I do not know what it is, but wants to be alone for a while.
Sorry, sometimes it takes time to relax.
It's nothing.
- You're so nice.
Once again, thank you.
Goodbye.
Do not you dare make me so ashamed again!
You forget.
Sometimes feelings to someone, but not mutual.
You can not change it.
Do not want to hear, but outside is full of girls.
You'll meet someone suitable.
I'm sure it is appropriate.
- No, not when they are evaluated.
Who always tells me that everything is good?
Sometimes it is difficult to see things that way.
Think about great songs that you wrote.
There is no better inspiration than love ... and pain.
Probably does not make sense, but I will ask Sam to come?
Would mean a lot to me.
- Will come.
"I'm sorry, but I met another. Forget about me."
Did you wrote that?
This email address does not exist.
I did it for your own good. Do not want to create ties with this person.
One day I will be grateful.
I had to discard them. Take care.
Mrs. Scott, with Ariana want to go shopping before the film.
Enjoy.
More are coming!
We need chairs.
Below is more. This is great!
Congratulations. I sat back. It was incredible.
Thank you. I'm glad you came.
- Sam really wanted to be here.
I really tried. The bus stop ...
I do not want to hear. Is large enough to solve alone.
If you want to be here, would come.
'll Talk to him.
If you still want to do a concert, just tell me.
Turnover has almost tripled.
You have a golden voice, kid.
We want chicken wings for an appetizer, and four cups of water.
Excuse me, sir.
The service here is great.
What are you doing?
Everything is fine. It is usually very sweet.
Get in the car!
Climb in the car!
Arianna, God!
Her mother does all that. I swear it is the foundation of everything.
Sam slapped her, all they saw.
Sam is devastated. Coming after you.
I still love you.
- You had to forget because it is full of girls?
- Forget it, I was wrong.
Perhaps you are right, maybe Sam is really appropriate.
Have something most can only dream.
You can not deny it.
Went in this direction. Maybe go with you.
Whether ...
- Run!
I will take your change.
Do not let it go!
I love you.
We found out that you gave up your hearing aid operation.
About 65% of undergoing such an operation,
can hear sounds, voices, even music.
This will permanently damage your ears.
- My ears have been damaged.
How dare you take such a decision without telling me?
Life is mine and I want to hear. You want to control me.
So do not learn sign language and interpreter have that stupid.
That's why you never told me about this type of operation.
Do not want to hear, because you will lose control over me.
Well, I just lost it.
More I do not need a translator.
And you do not need me.
- I needed you more than ever.
Who will they last? That loser? Who will pay for college?
I will not go back to college. I will study music.
Always been dreamer, like his father.
That's right.
Because dreams come true, Mama.
Dad knew it.
Do everything to prevent me, but I'm in love.
Again, you hear and play, just like Dad.
And there's nothing to prevent me!
Where are you going?
- To correct an old mistake.
She is 21, slightly relax the reins.
If you climb into this car, I fired.
Leave.
Marian, come back. My daughter can not even drive.
You want a beer?
Every day you buy a newspaper?
And every night you throw?
Ever read it?
Why buy it then?
- The seller is nice.
"The seller is nice"?
- Yes, George.
Instead of begging on the street, it sells newspapers.
Nobody buys a newspaper from a man like him.
Buy in store or kiosk.
But in the end, is the same newspaper.
The same, eh?
Is there a sports page?
- I do not think.
Entertainment?
- I have no idea.
I will use it for something more useful.
Play nice water.
Seriously.
The stock market dropped 300 points ...
Receives a sudden attack.
- I'll heal, right?
You are here.
Glad to see you.
I am Dr. Fraser.
Fainting is caused by glioblastoma multiforme.
This is a malignant brain tumor.
This type of cancer difficult to treat. Especially if the tumor is inside.
Chemotherapy can attach your condition for several months, but in any case will reappear spread.
There is one medicine that has not yet been tested as a lump ...
... And is not covered by health insurance.
It is very expensive, but can ...
- For how long?
Depends.
At this stage, can give you only a few months or even days.
It is time for the next procedure.
- I'm done.
Not yet, there are several therapies ...
- I'm done.
When I was 10, my mother brought home a duck's nest eggs.
Be looked after for some time, but not allow me to keep them.
I was very upset by them back, but it was actually the best part.
They no longer need me.
Once spread their wings were free.
Heaven is theirs.
After a year I saw a group of young ducks under the bridge.
Are returned each year.
Now there are only two.
Danny, we will now guess what girls say.
Girls, what can be used more than once?
Are you ready?
Shoes.
Shoes!
I know your expensive taste.
You're wrong.
Good books.
Love.
Do not play it.
- What do you mean?
It comes to shoes, books or your favorite food. Something fun.
But love is something better.
- Should be fun.
We have fun.
Smile.
Next question?
Soon you will see her again.
It's okay, do not worry.
You know? I am the happiest man in the world.
How many people can boast that they have experienced true love?
They have found the love of your life?
Will you promise me something?
Whatever happens, listen first to ourselves, in his heart.
And make that transaction.
Why wait? I want to attend.
I want to be there when the world heard for the first time.
I want to hear your beautiful voice.
You can hear it now.
I love you, Danny.
- I love you.
What do you do, Sam?
I'm going to eat. Can I get you something from home?
Under the bed is a shoebox. We'll bring you?
Of course.
- Thanks.
Tomorrow I will operate.
- Everything will be fine.
The nurse will come again?
And Roger?
It is for Diane.
So we are alone.
I love you.
The operation lasted several hours, one day you will remain under observation.
Some patients say that after several years signals associated with sounds that recall.
Help me out here.
Only a few hours, you must do something.
Are you crazy? Will not happen.
It is unbelievable that we do.
See you there.
- What are you talking about?
First you walk.
I want to breathe clean air.
- Minus 10 degrees F.
I'm fine. See you at the restaurant.
Fresh air ...
A few more months.
- For what is this bug?
What do you buy?
- Tickets for the Knicks.
Is that you?
How are you?
- Better than you, you look terrible.
What are you wearing? Are you lost?
I have not seen lately.
I was sick for some time.
- Do not go out in the cold.
It's nice outside. A great day to live.
How is business?
- Stagnant know how it is
Gone for a while.
- With a girlfriend?
Pretty girl f.
- No, it will remain here.
Pity.
I need something to read. Do you have papers for me?
Of course. You should be aware what is happening.
How do you want?
- I do not know. Around 500?
I was worried about you.
You're a good friend.
Come on.
I'll take you back.
Call a doctor immediately!
- Call Dr. Fraser.
Are you crazy? Cold could kill him.
Put his oxygen mask.
Sorry.
It was a good idea.
It was wonderful.
Sam will soon be out of intensive care. You can see it.
Why not?
- You look terrible.
You know, that does not care.
And do not look too bad.
But you sound bad.
I never had a brother.
Do.
I love you.
I love you, brother.
But care must be toilet is not forever closed.
Do me a favor?
Will you go to see how Sam?
That's love.
The answer in the game is love.
Do you know when Ariana Scott will leave the ER?
And you are?
- Her friend.
What can you use consistently?
Don't mention it.
Nothing.
Her father died in her eyes It reminds me of my mother's death.
I do not wish anyone.
Danny would say that he lived a wonderful life.
Considering where you live and work
Its hard to believe.
But people who knew him well would agree with his words.
Danny was only 24 years but lived more than some people succeed for life.
Do not worry, you will cover replacement, brother.
We are gathered to say goodbye to Dan ...
You can call anytime.
It is still strange to hear.
And to hear her voice.
I do not know whether I like it.
You need time to get used to.
When Danny got acquainted with you, it was love at first sight.
I tried to warn him when it became serious.
I told him it would be difficult. And that everything is unreal.
I tried to quit.
You know what I said?
He said he will not give up something beautiful just because it would be difficult.
If I had listened, we would not experience the most wonderful thing.
I have something for you.
From Denmark.
What is this?
That's love.
Beware, Sam.
Honey, I'm very pleased for you. This is the first day of your new life.
But do not take good things for granted.
Listen to the world.
Is a wonderful place, and says many things. Now you can hear them.
Live a full life, Sam. The life that you have chosen.
Seems to me no longer, but it is not.
I'll be with Mom for a while but will come when you need me.
Love with all your heart, because you will find me where is love.
Where love will hear my music. You only have to listen.
I love you, Sam. Forever. With love Danny.
Music is powerful.
One song can change the mood, trigger a memory.
One song can change your whole life.
In memory of Nicole, which every day was wonderful to live
By Mikhel for Subtitles.es
==SPREAD THE WORD==
Living In
The Material World, Part 2
** I look at the trouble and hate that is raging **
** While my guitar gently weeps **
** As I'm sitting here doing nothing but ageing **
** Still my guitar gently weeps **
** Gently weeps **
** Still my guitar gently weeps... **
I always felt really close to the public and where I grew up and that's why, I suppose, I wrote some songs that were like,
"Hey, you can all experience this," you know?
It is, it's available for everyone.
Ravi, really, it was him who helped me to get back into being a pop singer.
** Da **
** Da-da-da-da-da **
** Da-da-da-da-da-da-da-da-da... **
He was the one who said to me, you know, try to find my background, or some roots. What's my roots?
I mean, the first thing that meant something, really, that I could call a root was riding down the road on my bike and hearing Heartbreak Hotel coming out of somebody's house.
So, "Right, it's Heartbreak Hotel."
So from then,
I went from Los Angeles, where I was with Ravi with my sitar, went to New York on my way home.
That was the last time
I really played sitar.
I checked in the hotel in New York.
Jimi Hendrix and Eric Clapton happened to be staying there.
Then I thought, well, maybe
I'm better off to get back into being a guitar player, songwriter, whatever I'm supposed to be.
Because I'm never going to be a sitar player, because I've seen
1,000 sitar players in India who's twice as better than I'll ever be.
You want to hear the song
I wrote last night?
Yeah. It's just a very short one.
** ..doesn't last all morning **
** A cloudburst doesn't last all day... **
If there's people joining in,
I'd appreciate it too.
It seems I've got... We can forget about the second part of it.
The only thing...
The main thing is...
"January 2nd. Started rehearsing at Twickenham.
"Derek and I are going to do the musical Hey Man.
"January 3rd. Rehearsing at Twickenham.
"January 10th. Got up, went to
Twickenham, rehearsed until lunchtime,
"left The Beatles, went home and, in the evening, did King Of Fuh at Trident Studios."
'January 11th. Got up. John and Yoko came and diverted me at breakfast.'
I just thought, "Well, what's the point of this?"
I thought, I'm quite capable of being relatively happy on my own,
And I'm not able to be happy in this situation.
You know, "I'm getting out of here."
It's like... It's complicated now.
See, if we can get it simpler... and then complicate it where it needs complications.
But it's complicated in the bit...
It's not complicated.
But, no, I mean, you know...
I'll play just the chord if you like, and...
C'mon, you always get... Always get annoyed when I say that.
I'm trying to help, but I always hear myself annoying you.
Shall we...try it like this, you know?
It's funny that I don't...
It's this one, it's like should we play guitar through "Hey, Jude"?
Well, I don't think we should.
Yeah, OK, well, I don't mind.
I'll play, you know, whatever you want me to play.
Or I won't play at all if you don't want me to play.
You know, whatever it is that will please you, I'll do it.
I wish we could start hearing the tapes now.
Like, do it and then hear what it is.
It was just a very, very difficult, stressful time.
And to be, you know, even under pressure, being filmed having a row as well.
That's what happened.
I just got up and I thought,
"Well, I'm not doing this anymore.
I'm out of here."
And so I got my guitar and I just went home.
And wrote Wah-Wah.
Did you ever hear the thing about John Lennon saying, when George walked out of the
Let It Be session in frustration,
"Let's get Eric Clapton"?
Yeah. Did you ever think what it would be like to be in The Beatles?
HE LAUGHS
Yeah.
The pros and cons of being in a band like that... were massively extreme.
They were times when you just... it was like the closest knit family you've ever seen in your life.
But as that can be, too, the cruelty and the viciousness was unparalleled.
We didn't underestimate George.
We knew that he was peaking, you know, as we got to those records.
He'd not been really interested in the beginning, I don't think.
And because John and I did so much of the writing, he could just leave it to us.
But, erm...
I think he realised, you know, that there was something in this.
That artistically and financially, it was a good thing to get into.
So by that time, erm, yeah, we realised that he was really coming up with the goods.
I think, you know, with George, you know, it wasn't his ambition to be in The Beatles for his whole life.
Sometimes it could be quite difficult to get a song on an album.
When you think that in Let It Be, they rehearsed All Things Must Pass and a couple of other of George's songs that didn't make it on to Let It Be, right, and didn't make it on to Abbey Road, right, but made it onto his first solo album, he was stockpiling stuff.
You know, stuff was building up.
** Something in the way she moves **
** Attracts me like no other lover **
** Something in the way she woos me **
** I don't want to leave her now **
** You know I believe and how... **
I don't honestly believe that giving
Something to Joe Cocker, or giving
My Sweet Lord to Billy Preston had anything to do with his confidence as a songwriter.
I think he was totally confident about the songs.
The insecurity may have been if The Beatles kept going,
"How many songs am I going to be able to get on each album?"
And with the backlog sort of mounting up of songs that he had, get it out there and get something from it.
** Somewhere in her smile she knows **
** That I need no other lover **
** Something in her style that shows me **
** I don't want to leave her now **
** You know I believe and how. **
Something was a great song, is a great song, and John just said,
"That should be a single."
And that was the first time that
George's song was a single.
It was usually Paul's, and George was usually the B-side.
But, you know, he just said,
"This should be the single."
Because he always cared about George.
They had something going, you know.
** You're asking me
Will my love grow? **
** I don't know, I don't know **
** You stick around, now it may show **
** I don't know, I don't know... **
Can you describe the scene at Apple Corps, a typical day?
It was a bit like spin the top and see where it goes.
You know, George met the Hells
Angels, right, and said,
"Hey, if you're ever in London, pop in to Apple.
"We'd love to see you." You know.
Never thinking it's going to happen.
Six months later, you know,
30 motorbikes, you know,
Harley Davidsons, are outside the offices in Savile Row, you know, with the Hells Angels.
"Well, George said it was OK."
Right, they're all living in Apple.
At a Christmas party,
John and Yoko came as
Father and Mother Christmas, and we had this 24-pound turkey that only had to make it from here to that couch.
That's where the table was.
Didn't make it, right?
Two guys were carrying it in, and the Hells Angels just ripped it to pieces.
By the time it got to the table, there was nothing left.
And then, you know, they were sleeping in the studio and stuff and so we asked them to go.
You know, "Could you please leave."
And they said, "No.
"George asked us. It's nothing to do with you. George said it was OK."
Right. "Well, George is going to have to tell them to leave." Right?
So...
George knew the situation and knew he would have to ask them to leave but he had to figure out how he was going to ask them.
And, er...
So he did it very well. He was talking to them and he said,
"You know, there's yin and yang, in and out, up and down,
"you're here, you go."
And they said, "OK." And went.
I think we'd kind of come to the end of our tether.
We'd sort of done about all we wanted to do.
We would get a bit testy with each other. It was like a marriage.
You know, you love each other, but you're getting fed up.
And then we'd solve it, and we're good friends.
We'd realise we loved each other, and it was all cool.
But then we'd argue again, you know.
My house was like the reconciliation house.
We all shouted at each other and talked it over and then we went back to work.
He comes in, he'd been to India again, I think, and he says, "I've got this song.
It's like seven-and-a-half time."
"Yeah, so?"
You know, he might as well have talked to me in Arabic, you know what I mean?
** Here comes the sun, do-do-do-do-do **
** Here comes the sun **
** And I say, It's all right... **
Da-da! And that's how I come off.
I had to find some way that I could physically do it, and do it every time so it came off on the time.
That's one of those Indian tricks.
I had no way of going, "One, two, three, four, five, six, seven."
It's not my brain.
So as long as I did, "Der-der-ler, do-do-do-do-do-do-do-do da-da!"
"OK, that's seven. Good. Got it."
It was one of those beautiful spring mornings. I think it was April.
We were just walking round the garden with our guitars.
And that was...
I don't do that, you know.
I'd only ever do... This was what
George brought to the situation.
He was just a magical guy and he would show up with his guitar, get out the guitar, get out of the car with the guitar and come in and you'd start playing.
And we'd walk around the garden.
We sat down at the bottom of the garden, looking out over the...
And the sun was shining and it was a beautiful morning and he started to sing.
Started to sing Here Comes The Sun, the opening lines, you know, and... and I just watched this thing come to life.
** Little darling **
** It's been a long, cold, lonely winter **
** Little darling **
** It feels like years since it's been here **
** Here comes the sun, do-do-do-do **
** Here comes the sun **
** And I say, it's all right... **
What would you say you learned from each other?
I'd say we just learned a bunch of stuff.
What it was, we'll never know.
And I always liken us to like, four corners of a square.
People say,
"You know, John was the impor..." or "John and Paul were the important ones."
And so and so and so and so.
But I say,
"No, no, no, it's a square."
Without any of those corners, you collapse.
The days that we spent as these Beatles, and we'll probably die as Beatles, err... you know, we understood it.
No one else will ever understand that.
And, you know, we actually understood it cos we experienced it.
How did you feel when the band finally called it quits?
It was very difficult.
We'd done this a long time, and as I said before, you know, no matter how bad it was... and some days it was very bad in the studio, just the atmosphere and the tension and the distance... but...we, you know...
If the count-in came in, if someone counted it in, we all gave everything.
It was quite obvious that the Beatles gave us the vehicle to be able to do so much.
When we were younger we grew right through that, but it got to a point where it was stifling us.
There was too much restriction.
You know, it had to self-destruct.
And I wasn't feeling bad about anybody wanting to leave.
I wanted out myself.
I could see a much, you know, better time for myself by, you know, being away from the band.
** What I feel **
** I can't say **
** But my love is there for you any time of day **
** But if it's not love **
** That you need **
** Then I'll try my best to make everything succeed **
** Tell me, what is my life without your love? **
** Tell me who am I without you **
** By my side? **
** What I know **
** I can do... **
The band that I was in, we had more stress than everybody.
And yet, it's all these other people who are all offing themselves left right and centre.
And sometimes, I'd be in a crazy mode and then Ravi would come and I'd think, "Oh, what am I going to do?"
But the moment you just go for it, then it would turn out much better than you would expect.
And I used to have the same feeling with...
I became quite friendly at one point with, erm,
Swami Bhaktivedanta, who formed the Krishna temple.
But I... You know, they'd call me up and say, "Come to the temple," and, "The Swami's here and he'd love to see you."
And I'd be like, going through some private nightmare or something, and I'd think, "How can I go to the temple when I'm like this?"
But then I'd go.
I'd always walk out of there thinking, "Oh, thank you, Lord."
I think everything George did, including the songs that he wrote that didn't have spiritual words directly in them, were spiritual and that that was always on his mind.
Even the song Something, that is considered one of the greatest love songs ever written...
I think Frank Sinatra said that - can be seen as a love song to God.
What about the music makes it spiritual, aside from the words?
I think the thing about the music that makes it spiritual is the person who's singing it, namely George.
That he wanted to be spiritual, he had a spiritual dimension to him, he was known to be involved in spirituality.
A mantra as we know it in English means some phrase that's repeated again and again.
Actually, mantra is a Sanskrit word originally.
It meant a sacred chant, to this maha mantra.
Maha means great in Sanskrit.
It means the great chant for deliverance.
In 1966, I had gone to San Francisco and I'd heard that the devotees had recorded a record at that time.
I had also heard that The Beatles had ordered 300 copies of that LP,
33 1/3 LP vinyl recording.
And it was a kind of thing where it just sort of passed.
"OK, the Beatles got 300 copies, so..."
After about a week, we just sort of forgot about it.
But I found out later that George had gotten that record himself and that he and John had chanted the Hare Krishna mantra while sailing somewhere in the Mediterranean Sea, for so long that he said that his jaws were aching.
I think that chanting helped George a lot to overcome feelings of distress and anger.
He once said to me...
George once said that,
"Once you start chanting, you don't want to stop."
I think that he was very attached to the chanting and also to people like myself who were of his age and who were on a spiritual path.
Sometimes I called him a closet Krishna because he didn't shave his head, he didn't wear robes.
** Hare Krishna **
** Hare Krishna **
** Krishna Krishna **
** Hare Hare **
** Hare Rama **
** Hare Rama **
** Rama Rama **
** Hare Hare **
** Hare Krishna **
** Hare Krishna **
** Krishna Krishna **
** Hare Hare... **
He wanted to make an album for the Radha Krishna Temple.
All of these people in their white robes, bald heads, going round, hitting the Indian bells... just trying to, at times, record all of them with them not necessarily keeping still all the time, and some of the weird instruments that were being brought in to be recorded, it was absolutely fascinating.
** Hare Krishna **
** Hare Krishna **
** Krishna Krishna **
** Hare Hare **
** Hare Rama **
** Hare Rama **
** Rama Rama **
** Hare Hare. **
I remember hearing it on a car radio somewhere in the east part of... east London, and the disc jockey saying,
"That was a song by a group of bald-headed Americans."
George said about taking on this project himself, recording the devotees singing the Hare Krishna mantra, was that he wanted to get across what he believed through a medium that he was familiar with.
And that was chanting, that was a 45 record.
And it was quite amazing because myself and none of us thought that this was going to be a popular record, and yet it became very popular.
It was played in the intermission at the Isle of Wight concert, when Bob Dylan was setting up.
And then it was played at the intermission in a football game in Manchester, where Manchester United was a very popular soccer team.
All the fans, who were probably just there to watch the soccer, started singing along because it was only three words and they could do it.
There were 5,000 football fans singing Hare Krishna.
People always say I'm the Beatle who changed the most.
But really that's what
I see life is about.
The point is, unless you're God-conscious then you have to change, because... because it's a waste of time.
Everybody is so limited and so really useless when you think about the limitations on yourself.
And the whole thing is to change, try and make everything better and better.
That's what the physical world is about, change.
** Sunrise doesn't last all morning **
** A cloudburst doesn't last all day **
** Seems my love is up **
** And has left you with no warning **
** It's not always going to be this grey **
** All things must pass **
** All things must pass away... **
Well, I'm trying to,
I think, but...
** Sunset doesn't last all evening... **
He just lived by his deeds.
He was spiritual and you knew it.
And there was no salesmanship involved.
And it made you spiritual being around him.
Uh, it made you like those Krishnas, who could sometimes be the biggest pain in the necks in the world, running around with their robes and their shaved heads and their white powder all over their face.
Scaring you half to death coming out of a dark studio, glowing.
It was a very unusual choice,
I thought, to work with Phil Spector with the kind of songs you were making on that album.
Yeah, I suppose it was, but he needed a job at the time.
And I needed somebody to help me because, you know, I mean, after being in a group all the time with a producer suddenly to be a solo artist with no producer, you know, and no group, you know?
Yeah.
So it's like, you know, it's quite a big jump.
John phoned me up in the morning.
He said, "I've just written this song and I'm going to record it today
"and have it out tomorrow.
It's called Instant Karma.
"Will you come and play on it?"
I said, "OK."
Got my guitar, went into town, went in the office and Phil was there.
And I said, "Come on, let's go and do this song with John."
And he said, "Whoa, no, no.
I can't go. I haven't been invited."
And I said, "Don't worry.
Just come on."
And so he stood at the back of the control room in studio three, it was, in Abbey Road.
And he stood there, and like the engineer was getting all paranoid and Phil wouldn't say anything.
And after about a couple of hours, I said,
"Come on, do something."
So then he started putting the echo on it.
McCartney was making an album.
John had a single ready to go.
And now John was talking about making an album already.
The Plastic Ono Band.
And I said to George, "You know, you ought to consider making an album."
And I'd only been there 12 hours.
I went to George's, Friar Park, which he had just purchased, and he said, "I have a few ditties for you to hear."
It was endless! He had literally hundreds of songs.
And each one was better than the rest.
He had all this emotion built up when it released to me.
I don't think he had played it to anybody.
Maybe Pattie.
** Wah-wah **
** You've given me a wah-wah... **
We worked over and over on the songs in the studio so that everybody got the right routine.
And it sounded really nice and in the control room,
Phil was in there with the engineer making it sound like this noise.
The first track we ever did was a song called Wah-Wah.
And it sounded really nice in the studio.
All this nice acoustics and piano and no echo on anything.
We did it for hours until we, you know, he had it right in the control room.
Yeah. We went in to listen to it and I thought,
I hate it. It's so horrible.
Did you say that to him? Yeah,
I said, "It's horrible. I hate it."
Eric said, "Oh, I love it."
So I said, "Well, you can have it on your album then."
But I grew to like it.
He wouldn't let anything go until it was right.
My Sweet Lord must have taken about 12 hours to overdub the guitar solos.
He had nine harmonies working on.
Bwa, bwa, bwa, bwa, bwa, bwa, bwa.
He must've had that in triplicate, six-part harmony before we decided on two-part harmony.
He had it metic...
He was a... Perfectionist is not the word.
Anyone can be a perfectionist.
He was beyond that.
He just had to have it so right, and he would try and try and experiment and experiment and experiment upon experiment.
Whoa.
One, two, one, two, three, four.
** You don't need a love... **
You don't need a...
I was just going to bed and I was cleaning me teeth and suddenly in me head came this
** You don't need a... **
All I had to do was pick up the guitar, find what key it was in and fill in the missing words.
** You don't need a love in **
** You don't need a bedpan **
** You don't need a horoscope **
** Or a microscope to see the mess that you're in **
** If you open up your heart **
** You know what I mean **
** Been polluted so long **
** Here's a way for you to get clean **
** While the Pope owns
51% of General Motors **
** And the stock exchange **
** Is the only thing he's qualified to quote us **
** But the Lord is awaiting on you all
To awaken and see **
** By chanting the names of the Lord
And you'll be free **
** You don't need a love in **
** You don't need no bedpan **
** You don't need a horoscope **
** Or a microscope
To see the mess that you're in **
** If you open up your heart **
** You will know what I mean **
** We've been polluted so long **
** Now here's a way for you to get clean **
** By chanting the names of the Lord **
** And you'll be free **
** The Lord is awaiting on you all to awaken and see **
** By chanting the names of the Lord and you'll be free **
** The Lord is awaiting on you all to awaken and see... **
The album took six months to make.
And George had endless time.
He never really knew if he wanted the album to come out.
So the longer it took to make, the better George, the happier George was.
I picked My Sweet Lord of all the songs. cos I told him that's the hit.
And everybody fought me on that cos they said it's got religious overtones in it.
I just said it didn't matter.
It's the most commercial song in it.
And George was even nervous about it because of Hare Krishna in it and My Sweet Lord and was the public ready for it.
I said, "It doesn't matter.
It's a hit record."
I thought a lot about whether to do
My Sweet Lord or not.
Having written it,
I thought it's really committing myself to something.
There's going to be a lot of people are going to really hate me.
Because people fear the unknown, you see.
It's some sort of instinct in people.
The point was that I was sticking my neck out on the chopping block.
But at the same time, I thought,
"Well, nobody's saying it." Yeah.
I wish somebody else was doing it.
So that, you know, to represent, you know, cos everything should be represented in a way.
If everybody's just going
"Be bop, baby" you know, OK.
We were on tour with
Bonnie & Delaney.
They came over to England and George was a big fan.
And one place we were, we had a piano in the dressing room.
And, uh, the discussion was, how do you write a gospel song?
So I went to the piano and started playing some gospel changes.
And I don't know if it was Delaney or Bonnie, but one of them starts,
** Oh, my Lord. **
And then they went on
** We say hallelu... **
** My sweet Lord
Mmm, my Lord **
** My sweet Lord... **
** Well, I really wanna see you **
** I really want to be with you **
** I really want to see you, Lord **
** But it takes so long, oh, Lord **
** My sweet Lord. **
** My sweet Lord **
** Oh, my sweet Lord **
** Oh, my... **
What is it about it that makes it so timeless?
Well, is it? Uh, first it's simple, you know, and the repetition.
You know, really, I think, the thing about a mantra, you see, it's got a mantra in there.
And, uh, mantras are...
Well, they call it a mystical sound vibration encased in a syllable.
It has this power within it, and you know, it's just hypnotic and it's kinda nice.
You know, it's nice.
I mean, I'd have done that mantra for ages.
Once I chanted it for, like, three days non-stop just driving through Europe.
And you just get like hypnotised.
You get a... on some subtle level which makes you feel so good that you don't want to stop.
"My Sweet Lord" by George Harrison
George's huge commitment to Indian spirituality and how that would lead him to be fairly dismissive of the material things that we'd all come to enjoy, you know, and so he was trying to remove himself from that in some way, and even in a physical way, you know?
And I had become, bit by bit, more and more obsessed with his wife Pattie.
And was making amateur kind of inroads into finding out what was going on and what was happening to their relationship.
And at the same time trying to balance my relationship with him.
And when we finally did start to act it out,
I mean, I went to George right away and said,
"Look, I think this is going to happen,
"and I think, you know, it is already,
"there's the feelings there.
I have to know what you feel about that."
It was almost like, well, if you want me to stop and go away,
I will, you know.
But I need to know what...
And he was very kind of cavalier, you know?
He said, "Well, take her.
She's yours," kind of thing,
"But, in fact, can I have that, we'll swap."
And to be honest, it had kind of almost got to that before anyway.
There was a lot of kind of swapping going on, and a lot of fooling around.
And this is, you know,
'60s free-love stuff.
I mean, so...
And George's attitude seemed to have more wisdom in it than anyone else's, in that this is all material, it's all Maya, it's all irrelevant to the bigger picture.
Doesn't really matter, in other words.
And I thought, phew, God, you know, well, that's almost like giving me carte blanche.
From time to time, during the spring and summer of 1970
Eric and I saw each other.
One day we were walking down
Oxford Street when
Eric said, "Do you like me, then, or are you seeing me
"because I'm famous?"
I replied, "Oh, I thought you were seeing me because I'm famous."
And we both laughed.
He always found it difficult to talk about his feelings.
Instead, he poured them into his music and writing.
Another of our secret meetings took place at a flat in South Kensington in London.
Eric wanted me to listen to a song he'd written.
He switched on the tape machine, turned up the volume, and played me the most powerful, moving song I'd ever heard.
It was Layla, about a man who falls hopelessly in love with a woman who loves him but is unavailable.
My first thought was,
"Oh, God, everyone's going to know who this is."
I felt uncomfortable that he was pushing me in a direction
I wasn't certain I wanted to go.
But the song got the better of me with the realisation that
I had inspired such passion and such creativity.
I could no longer resist.
That evening, I went to a party at the rock manager
Robert Stigwood's house in Stanmore, North London.
George had said he didn't want to go. Eric was there.
And I felt elated by what had happened earlier in the day.
But also felt deeply guilty.
** Isn't it a pity... **
Much later in the evening,
George appeared.
He kept asking "Where's Pattie?"
** Isn't it a shame... **
He was about to leave when he spotted me in the garden with Eric.
** How we break each other's hearts... **
He came over to us and said,
"What's going on?"
** And cause each other pain... **
Eric said, "I have to tell you, man, that I'm in love with your wife.
** How we take each other's love... **
George was furious.
He turned to me and said...
** Without thinking any more... **
.."Well, are you going with him or coming with me?"
** Forgetting to give back... **
And I said,
"George, I'm coming home."
** Isn't it a pity... **
** Wah-wah **
** You've given me a wah-wah **
** And I'm thinking of you **
** And all the things that we used to do **
** Wah-wah **
** Wah-wah... **
George was always so in tune with people. He loved Ravi.
When Ravi told him how bad it was,
I think he just started making calls immediately.
Ravi came to me and he said if he was to do a concert, maybe play to so many thousand people, but to the size of the problem, the money, the funds that would be made would just be so small.
So that's where I came along.
I can generate money by doing concerts and by making records.
George, how much money do you hope to get from this?
Well, it depends really.
Maybe through the concerts, we could estimate maybe about...
How much?
Quarter of a million. Maybe 250,000 from the concert.
But if we record the concert and film the concert then maybe that would be a greater way of making the money.
You know, a record could possibly sell a million, two million.
Thank you. If you appreciate the tuning so much,
I hope you'll enjoy the playing more. Thank you.
** Watch out now, take care **
** Beware of falling swingers **
** Dropping all around you **
** The pain that often mingles **
** In your fingertips **
** Beware of darkness **
** Watch out now, take care **
** Beware of the thoughts that linger **
** Winding up inside your head **
** The hopelessness around you **
** In the dead of night **
** Beware of sadness **
** It can hit you **
** It will hurt you **
** Make you sore and what is more **
** That is not what you are here for. **
There were two concerts.
One in the afternoon at two and one at eight o'clock.
It was the first of its kind, benefit by stars for a relief concert and it was magical.
That's the only word to describe it because nobody had ever seen anything like that before, that amount of star power on stage since Woodstock.
And this was all in two hours on stage at one time.
Eric was there.
Leon Russell was there.
Ringo was there.
Dylan was a no-show up until the last minute.
I had to go down to his apartment and literally get him.
It was chaos.
So we didn't know what we were doing, and mics were all over the place.
We only had three hours to mic the band.
Then the audience came in.
We didn't know how to mic the audience.
So the mixing took six months.
The concert took, the two concerts took four hours.
And we had to put together what was a Grammy-winning album.
George knew all these people.
You know, they were his close friends. I got that second-hand.
You know, I got to meet the great Alla Rakha, the greatest tabla player who ever lived, you know?
George was always saying,
"Ask Alla Rakha to show you some things."
And so, I think he finally got the picture that he oughta show me some things.
So he would hold his hands and he'd go...
And he'd do this whole thing, this Indian-technique thing and George would be watching.
I'd look up a few times and George would be watching and laughing, you know?
How am I supposed to understand what it is he's doing.
This genius trying to teach a rock drummer.
I really appreciated in later days that he actually went in front of that audience on the Bangladesh concert because he did it for his friends.
That he actually went up there and talked to an audience.
I think that must have been about the first time he's ever done this.
You see, a few things in English, or a few things in German on the stage where it didn't matter, is a big difference than to an audience where he knew it was going to be filmed and used.
To talk to an audience was very, very difficult for him.
There's somebody on bass who many people have heard about but they never actually have seen him.
Klaus Voormann.
'And one day, '
I was pretty upset.
And we walked in the garden.
And we didn't say much for a long time.
We sat down on a bench, and we really...
..went inside of me.
He wanted to really find out what made me so sad.
And he did it in such a fantastic way.
I can't repeat the words, or I can't tell you exactly what it is, but he just, in a fantastic way, made me feel good.
Found out what the problem is in no time.
You know, nobody's ever done this before and will never do it again.
George is a very extreme character.
He always goes to the extreme.
If it's taking coke, you know, sniffing coke, or if it is being open to meditation.
He was in New York, and one time I said,
"I'll come over and watch you."
And he said, "OK." And then he said,
"Oh, Klaus is coming.
"Hide the stuff."
And that made me very, very sad.
I lived first in the main house, in a room. Old Victorian house.
Beautiful old kitchen. In the early days, you had your servants.
They were going from the kitchen to the front room and bringing you the food.
They had to walk through five doors,
"Oh, I left the spoons."
Had to go back. It was really crazy.
It was not meant to be lived in by normal people.
So I at a certain point suggested to George,
"Why don't you put the kitchen where you are? Just build a kitchen!"
He said, "That's a good idea."
So he actually built a kitchen downstairs where you look into the garden.
The man who built the house, he must have been a nutcase.
Just a complete maniac.
One thing, for example, he has a picture of a friar with a frying pan in his hand.
And with holes in it. And it says underneath, "Two holy friars."
You know. Stupid stuff, in a way.
It's not really very bright.
But that's what the whole place was.
It was like a joke, in a way.
"Before I bought it, the house
"was going to be knocked down because the Catholics would not pay
"for the upkeep.
"What a thing to knock down a house like this.
"Sir Frank helped my awareness.
"Whatever it was I felt became stronger or found more expression
"by moving into that house,
"because everything stepped up or was heightened.
"There were disasters all around at that time.
"Some were great, some were awful, some were drawn out,
"painful, miserable.
"Some were not disasters after all.
"But the thing about Sir Frank with his advice like,
"'Scan not a friend with microscopic glass.'
"I mean, that helped me
"actively to ease up on whomsoever I thought I loved.
"It gave me the consciousness not to hang onto the negative side
"of it, to be more forgiving."
One way of starting a day was for him to get up when the sun gets up, sit down and meditate.
For a long time he had a special room in the house where he was going to meditate.
And he was very proud of this.
He would come to me and tell me about it, how strong he was, and he was fighting the bad parts in his body and, uh, he was really opening up.
George liked turning you on to things that he liked and was interested in, whether you were a little kid or whether you were a grown up.
For our kids their first experiences at George's house were not unlike the experience that Derek and I had when we went on that weekend to Sussex, but without the drugs.
The impression it made upon them, it's such a wonderful place.
The caves, the lake, the shape of the house. Everything.
The detail. It was just a dream.
** Give me love, give me love **
** Give me peace on Earth **
** Give me light, give me life **
** Keep me free from birth **
** Give me hope, help me cope **
** With this heavy load **
** Trying to touch and reach you **
** With heart and soul **
** Oh **
** My Lord **
** Please **
** Take hold of my hand... **
He created an atmosphere in the studio.
He put up joss sticks, make a nice smell. He put the lights down.
He really made it into a real tranquil, nice sort of surrounding.
Everybody felt just great.
He would sit down with the guitar most of the time, play the song to us.
And then slowly we'd start picking up on what the feel of the song was.
We could take our time, find our sound, do what we wanted, make suggestions.
George had such a beautiful touch on the slide, you know.
George had that kind of sound that'd make you cry.
When I hear certain songs he's played slide on, it just takes me right to a place.
He loved to find the right note and, you know, if you listen to anything he's playing the solo on, he certainly did.
If I had him on my records, you didn't have to read it,
"Oh, that's George." You know?
He found that incredible, it's like a haunting and emotional sound he got from his slide-ish guitar.
With Ravi, the times when he's completely absorbed so much into the music where he's forgotten that he's even sitting there playing. Mm-hm.
And he only remembers when he's finished the piece and he comes out and the audience applaud.
That's the moment when he realises he's transcended and been somewhere, which is the same in meditation.
Sometimes, I think great people can project their greatness.
They don't have to shout about it.
The concert Eric did,
Eric Clapton at the Rainbow.
Watching the concert,
I was so aware of Eric.
All he did was he had his eyes closed and he was playing some fantastic guitar, and his foot was tapping.
The thing was that the magic was coming out of Eric's...
..soul, or whatever. Mm.
Through his guitar. Yeah.
And it was at that point where he just looked like an angel.
When George was ready to make a record, he'd just say he's got some new songs, and, uh, would I be wanting to, you know, come and play on 'em.
When he put out Living
In The Material World, on the back of the record he put,
"Jim Keltner Fan Club...
"send a self-undressed elephant to Jim Keltner Fan Club." All that.
And so I saw that, I went,
"George, what's that, man?
"What did you do?"
And he said, "Well, I figured if I'm going to do a fan club,
I'm going to make it about somebody who I'm a big fan of."
What a tremendous thing, you know?
It was a little embarrassing, but yet it just, you know,
George was always having fun.
I was getting, uh, weird letters from crazy people.
I got a couple of Polaroids from this crazy guy.
There was an arrow through a piece of meat,
I think it was a heart, I think he bought a heart or something, some kind of big piece of meat, and there was an arrow going through it.
You know, and then there was like, one with a knife and blood dripping, and that was right about the time that I, uh, had bars put on our windows.
George stepped back.
And that step back to me means that he got very heavily into drugs and things, which, I don't know the reason why that happened.
** What I feel **
** I can't say I can't say **
** My love is there for you every time of day **
** If it's not love
If it's not love **
** That you need
That you really, really need **
** I try my best to make everything succeed **
** Tell me what is my life without your love? **
** Hey, man **
** Tell me who am I without you **
** By my side? **
** Oh, tell me... **
Recommended by Eric Clapton,
Barbra Streisand and many other top-notch singers and entertainers.
Secret mixture of honey, vinegar and... warm water.
And your throat will never bother you again.
You just won't have a throat!
But it coats what you don't have, so they tell me.
And...
Hey, the ex-Beatle himself.
Get a programme!
Hey, today's two-head programme!
Hey, George, ex-Beatle,
Harrison programme!
** You thought that you knew where I was and when **
** It looks like you've been foolin' you again **
** You thought that you had got me all staked out **
** But, baby, looks like
I've been breaking out **
** I'm a dark horse **
** I'm running on a dark race course **
** And now I'm a blue moon **
** Since I stepped out of the womb **
** I've been a cool jerk **
** Looking for the source **
** I'm a dark horse. **
The critics were brutal.
I remember that about Ravi opening the show and then about George's voice being gone and shot.
Yeah, it probably, his voice probably was very weak or, you know, and beat-up.
And maybe a lot of people they saw bored with the Indian set.
But that did not deter George.
And, by the way, not everybody was bored with it.
And not everybody thought that his voice sounded horrible.
They just loved hearing those songs and him trying... to deliver them the best he could.
My next move will be
Madison Square Garden.
After that,
I'll go back to the hotel, then it'll be
Madison Square Garden again.
** Baby, looks like you...**
After that, I'll probably just collapse. I don't know.
He liked the moon.
You know, if the wind was blowing and the full moon was up, he'd put on Bing Crosby singing
Sweet Leilani and just make the moment even better.
And then he might hand you a gardenia.
He just painted life like that.
He drew all the elements in.
He was a very sensual person.
Sensual in the way that whatever you ate had to have a flavour.
You know, had to have some special flavour.
If there was a flower, he wanted it to smell or be bright.
When I first met him, he said,
"I don't want you to think
"you've discovered something about me I don't know.
"I'm not claiming to be this or that or anything.
"People think they've found you out when I'm not hiding anything."
For whatever his, you know, faults were, and his...
He had karma to work out.
And he wasn't going to come back and be bad.
He was going to be good and bad and loving and angry and everything all at once.
You know, if someone said to you
"OK, you can go through your life
"and you can have everything in five lifetimes,
"or you can have a really intense one and have it in one,
"and then you can go and be liberated", he would've said, "Give me the one.
I'm not coming back here."
I thought he was really... somebody who was saying something that I connected with.
He was really a very captivating person.
And we seemed, he was working.
And I liked, uh, you know,
I liked the music.
I liked what he was doing.
We just seemed like partners... from the very beginning.
Jim Keltner's here? Yeah.
About how long does it look like?
About three minutes. Good.
** Everyone has choice **
** When to or not to raise their voices **
** It's you that decides **
** Which way you will turn **
** While feeling that our love's not your concern **
** It's you that decides **
** No-one around you will carry the blame for you **
** No-one around you **
** Will love you today and throw it all away **
** Tomorrow when you rise...**
'There was this amazing sunset.
Just orange sky.'
And he said,
"That is what I want to do."
Now...somebody might say, "What?"
You know, "What do you want to do?"
What? He wanted to make, he wanted to be able to create that sunset.
When we were first on tour, and we were in customs and they were going through my baggage,
I hadn't revealed anything to
George, really.
They're going through my handbag.
He said, "Oh, you've got that book, do you..?"
He was like going through my bag with the customs.
"You read that, you've read that.
That's good."
He was approving of...
..of my journey, and he, I think, considered himself a bit of an expert on spiritual matters.
Yeah, we had our differences.
I might have done a different technique than he did.
But we both had the same goal.
And I think that was really the key to everything in our lives.
He had this ability to bottom line everything by pulling focus and showing you the cosmic world of this galaxy and there you were suddenly, just this little person with his own little problems, fretting away on the surface.
So, I had heard a little about George, uh, liking Python, and I'd been a bit wary because, you know...
I don't want to know about somebody famous, you know.
We had the screening of
The Holy Grail and it went really well and suddenly there he was, going "Well, this is fucking great."
And he said, "Let's go upstairs."
And then we started a dialogue which went on for about 48 hours.
It was extraordinary.
I mean, it was like bla, bla, bla...
Well, George was very fond of Rutland Weekend Television.
On Rutland Weekend Television, we did a send-up called The Rutles.
It was like a Hard Day's Rut.
We were on Abbey Road filming.
And I'm dressed as...Paul.
And then Neil was dressed as John with a huge big beard.
And we're there, we're on Abbey Road, and these people, "You're the Beatles!
"You're the Beatles!"
It's 20 years later, you know.
"You think they're still here?"
But George is standing with us, and they don't recognise him.
He's laughing his ass off.
We're getting signed autographs, and they don't notice it's George.
Existence is kind of funny because of our temporality.
Here we go round pretending to be kings and emperors, and you're going to die.
You're in a box in a minute or two.
So we are constantly undercut by our own physicality, our own physical bodies, which let us down.
And you find all these evangelicals, and suddenly they're having gay sex in Aspen.
"Oh, this body's letting me down all the time." that's what makes us funny.
George's grounding in what was... both true and what was, he would test things by what made him laugh or what was close to his heart.
I've always been surprised
Python's proved to be as long living as it has, cos we were just having fun, just like they were having fun.
We were entertaining ourselves.
We weren't thinking about the audience.
It's like John Lennon said, "You're still fucking peasants to me."
Certain things... There was a kind of arrogance there that... you're not out there to, you know, want to be loved so desperately that you'll do anything.
It's about... maintaining your own integrity and your own view of the world, whatever that is, and trying to be truthful about it.
We'd written Life of Brian.
We had EMI putting up the money for the movie.
We had designed it.
We were heading out on the Saturday with the crew to Tunisia to start building.
And on Thursday, we get a call.
And Lord Delfont -
Bernie to his friends... had finally got around to reading the script apparently.
He hadn't read it before.
He was shocked and horrified, and said, "There's no way EMI's going to be involved in this blasphemous filth."
And pulled the plug on the Thursday.
And we were dead.
I'd be calling George and he said,
"No, I'll pay for it."
So I thought, yeah! All the time he said, "No, I'll take care of it."
And I thought, yeah.
We were looking for 4 million, and nobody has that amount of money, you know.
Eventually, when we got to California,
George says, "I've figured it out.
"We're going to create a company and we're going to give you the money."
And it's 4 million and he'd mortgaged his house to put up the money for this movie, because he wanted to see it.
Which is still the most anybody's ever paid for a cinema ticket.
Thank God you've come, Reg.
I think I should point out first, in all fairness, that we are not, in fact, the rescue committee.
However, I have been asked to read the following prepared statement on behalf of the movement.
"We the People's Front of Judea, brackets, officials, end brackets
"do hereby convey our sincere fraternal and sisterly greetings to you, Brian,
"on this, the occasion of your martyrdom."
What?! Goodbye, Brian. And thanks.
If you care about what constitutes what we call western civilisation and which now probably is coming to an end, and you were to consider the role that's been played in that, by this thing that you treat as a piece of buffoonery, you would have a certain humility in saying that you have been able, through making it, to shed light.
What we're saying is take a critical view, find out about it.
Don't just believe because somebody tells you to.
Somebody in the pulpit says something, question it.
You keep making the basic assumption that we are ridiculing Christ and Christ's teaching.
And I say that we are not.
Would you imagine your scene, for instance, the sermon on the mount, the scene in your film of
The Sermon on the Mount... Right.
..is not ridiculing one of the most sublime utterances that any human being has ever spoken on this Earth? Of course it is.
A lot of people looking in will think we have actually ridiculed Christ...
Yes...physically. Christ is played by an actor, Ken Colley.
He speaks the words from the sermon on the mount.
It's treated absolutely respectfully.
The camera pans away, we go right to the back of the crowd to someone who shouts "Speak up!"
Because they cannot hear him.
Now if that utterly... No...
..undermines one's faith in Christ, then I think their faith cannot be terribly strong.
I think he enjoyed the scandal of the whole thing.
He pretended not to, but I think when you actually can alienate
Protestants, Catholics and Jews all at one go, you know, you're doing something.
** Let me in here **
** I know I've been here **
** Let me into your heart **
** Let me know you **
** Let me show you **
** Let me roll it to you **
** All I have is yours **
** All you see is mine **
** And I'm glad to hold you in my arms **
** I'd have you any time... **
When we were editing
Life of Brian and we just had a screening, and George was there, and we then had a meeting afterwards with all of us,
Denis O'Brien, who was our manager,
George and his manager at the time, and George and it was a shocking moment for him because there we were disagreeing about everything.
We were arguing what should stay in, what should go out, what was working, what didn't
And I think he was genuinely disturbed and I think it was the last meeting he ever came to of the group cos I think after, I think he wanted to believe in something.
He may talk about the spirit of the Beatles going into Python, but I don't think he wanted the divisive nature of the spirit.
In 1979 I'd finished... a two-man tour with Elton John.
And, as always when George was around in my life, the phone would ring.
"What are you doing?"
I said, "Well, I'm not doing a lot."
And he said, "Well, I think
I've got a film company."
He said,
"You know all these theatre people,
"and you love all that stuff, why don't you be me in the office?"
And it was as simple a statement as that.
I said, "When can we start?
" He said, "I've started.
Life Of Brian's on its way.
"We're thinking about the next one, called Time Bandits.
"There's this madman called
Terry Gilliam, you know.
"You'll love him.
" I said, "I know Terry.
" "I thought you might know him,"
And off we went.
HandMade was called HandMade because we were handmade.
Everything was done in-house, including, er, quite a lot of the marketing strategy.
We designed posters because we had people like
Terry Gilliam who would do those designs.
We had people like Michael Palin and Derek Taylor, who would come up with great by-lines, all in-house.
So this was again, this was like a giant band, and George loved being in a band.
He missed The Beatles.
He missed his mates.
He missed working with people.
He was a great collaborator.
He loved being there.
Why is minority music important?
All the music that isn't really sold in your local record store in the top hundred...
Well... You're asking me?
Everybody on the charts gets it from somewhere, don't they?
They get it from these little guys in other countries who invented the stuff.
That's how I feel about it.
So it's important purely so they've got something to steal and put in the charts?
- No, it's important...
- That's a good answer.
Hi, Liv. Hi.
So why is it important to have all these people at our house?
It's important to have to worry about lots of things and make sure everything's right.
And, uh, well, it's nice to see everyone.
Wonderful people, good food. You like it, don't you, after all? See?
Thank you. Yes.
I feel very strongly about major issues.
I don't talk about them an awful lot.
But I feel, uh, very strongly about unfairness.
What do you think we should be doing to make our lives better?
Thank you.
** Give peace a chance **
** All we are saying **
** Is give peace a chance... **
Mr Chapman came up behind them and called to him Mr Lennon as he arrived at that doorway.
And then in a combat stance, he fired, he emptied the Charter Arms
38 calibre gun that he had with him and...shot John Lennon.
** I bless the day I found you **
** I want to stay around you **
** And so I beg you **
** Let it be me **
** Don't take this heaven from one **
** If you must cling to someone **
** Now and forever **
** Let it be me. **
I wonder what you felt, losing someone who was close to you for all those years.
It's like, uh, losing your parents, or anybody you know and love.
He was no angel. He wasn't.
But he was, as well.
Was he? Yeah.
He was really angry that John didn't have a chance to leave his body in a better way.
Because George put so much emphasis and importance on the moment of death, of leaving your body.
That was very, um...
That's really what he was practising for.
It's like the
Dalai Lama said something that, we really, um, made us smile.
He said,
"What do you do in the morning?"
He said, "I do my practice,
I do my mantras,
"I do my spiritual practice."
"How do you know it will work?
" He said, "I don't.
I'll find out when I die."
And, you know, it's so great.
It's like that was it.
I'll, I'm practising this so that when I die I will know how to leave my body and I'll be familiar and I won't be frightened.
George had a maximum amount of diversion in life.
And, you know, towards the end of his life, he'd say, like,
I'd say, "Oh, you know they want to give you this award thing".
And he said,
"Well, I don't want it.
"Tell them to get another monkey."
I'd say, "Yeah, but, you know, it's really a nice one.
"You should have this."
And he'd say, "Well, if you want it so bad, you go and get it."
You know. "I'm not going.
"I'm not doing that any more.
"Because it's just a big diversion.
"I want to plant trees.
"I want to be quiet.
I want to meditate."
And he really did draw the line.
And I really admired him for that.
I mean, I've always been intrigued with George's "spirituality", which is absolutely essential to him.
You know, living in the material world.
So he was caught in these two worlds of a very spiritual world and a very material world.
And... And they're both, I think, related in the sense that it's about finding the beauty in the real world.
To make the real world as beautiful as it can be.
And that's, I think, what he was doing in... in Friar Park.
He created such, you know, exquisite beauty there.
But there was nothing airy-fairy about it.
And it wasn't about somebody snapping his fingers and having somebody else do it for him. He had to do the work.
OK, back up now. Back up!
Our friends would joke, calling him Capability George, you know, like after Capability Brown.
And he'd be like, "Get that pond...
"put it over there, move that hill...
"Don't like that hill." You know.
And the next week, it would be, pond over there, hill over there.
And it would look better, you know.
And he'd garden at night-time, he'd garden until... you know, till midnight.
And he'd be out there squinting cos he could see, at midnight, you know, he could see the kind of moonlight and he could see the shadows.
And that was his way of not seeing any of the weeds and imperfections that were, you know, that would plague him during the day.
So he'd be able to imagine what it was going to look like when it was done.
** Well, I'm alone but that's all right... **
'He used to say to me every day,
'"You don't have to go to school today.
'"Do you want to just go on a yacht in the South Pacific
'"and run away forever?"'
** I'll be fine anywhere... **
'A lot of people would probably say,
'"You're an idiot for not doing that."
'And maybe in a way I am. But I...'
To rebel in my family was to go to school.
I went to like a semi-military school.
We did CCF one day a week, and that used to piss him off, me walking around in an Air Force uniform.
I was...15, and then, er...
..had some, er, little run-in with some policemen.
And, er, he told the policemen to fuck off!
And, uh, that was when I realised that he was actually cool, on my side, and not just a scary dad, you know.
And, er, he was very, very close to me after that.
And we kind of... would run off down the garden and hide.
"Don't tell your mum" kind of stuff, you know.
He was really a free person and he did not like to be bound by rules.
But he did like women.
And he did, erm, he was...
Women did like him.
And he was... uh...
Whether...
If he just said a couple of words to a woman, honestly, he had a profound effect... on people.
So that was always something that was, you know...
And I'm not the only one who's had to deal with this, you know, person who's... well-loved.
So it was always a challenge. Uh...
Sometimes people say, you know,
"What's the secret of a long marriage?"
It's like, "You don't get divorced."
And I think, you know, you go through challenges in your marriage and here's what I found.
First time we had a big hiccup in the road, I, you know, you go through things, you go, "Wow."
There is a reward at the other end of it.
There's this incredible reward.
You love each other more.
You...learn something.
You let go of something.
You get...
Those hard edges get softened.
You know, you're that block of stone.
And, you know, life shapes you and takes away those hard edges.
You have kept to yourself, in recent years.
This led to some wild stories about the Howard Hughes of Henley.
Because I don't go discothequeing and things like that, where people hang out with their cameras, so they presumed that I was Howard Hughes, with my big fingernails and Kleenex tissues and that kind of stuff.
Bottles of urine all around the house, and, uh...
But I wasn't like that at all.
I go out all the time, or a lot of the time, see friends, have dinner, go to parties...
I'm even more normal than, you know, normal people.
I've met you before.
You know, all his lines about, "I was never at a discotheque...
" Well, I wasn't.
We had to drag him out of them, you know. LAUGHTER
Well, that was back in '64, '65.
Before the limp.
Yeah. No, I stopped going to 'em around 1967, I think.
Yeah, I stopped in 1980.
What about now? What makes you cross with each other now?
Well, the last time we were cross was when George was suing me.
Er, the last time he calls me was to say, "I'm going to sue you."
I said, "No, George, don't be silly."
"No, I'm going to sue you.
I don't like what you've done."
Cos he wrote this song and I had it mixed by somebody else... and, er, he didn't like the mix.
So he was going to sue me.
So, in the end I have to...
I said, "Sue me if you want, but I'll always love you."
** I don't want you **
** But I hate to lose you **
** You got me in between **
** The devil and the deep blue sea **
** I forgive you **
** Cos I can't forget you **
** You got me in between **
** The devil and the deep blue sea **
** I want to cross you off my list **
** But when you come knocking at my door **
** Fate seems to give my heart a twist **
** And I come running back for more... **
'You're going very fast.
'You're going at the absolute limit of the car's tyres
'and its suspension' and you, yourself are right on the very edge of your limit, taking it to the finest point.
When that happens, your senses are so strong and, in my case, I relate it to a real experience, where I went... came to a corner and before I got to the corner I smelled grass.
My senses were so... so sharp, so exaggerated that a car had gone off the road in front of me, out of my sight.
My senses told me there was something wrong. That was grass.
The car was on a tarmacadam road.
So, I immediately backed off.
The millisecond that you're talking about is so small.
Now, that's what I think George saw and that was heightened senses to a point, not only of your feel and your touch, but your feet because of the pedals, the gas pedal, the brake pedal, the sensitivity of the function of those.
It's the kind of thing if George and I talked about it, he would love that.
And if you listen to a really top guitarist, how he can make that guitar talk, that's another heightening of senses that is beyond the ken, the know, the knowledge of any normal man or woman.
George had a huge circle of friends and I think I was kind of, er...
..I was just one of them, really.
I mean, I like to think that there was something special about our relationship.
In many ways there was, but after
George died, when, you know, and I, and we all got together,
"God," I thought, "he's got, how do these guys all fit together?"
And there was a whole other mob, they used to call them the Thames Valley gang, and these were all old, you know, ageing rock stars, if you like.
That had, you know, got little, nice little houses, and he was... He had something going on with everybody.
Anything to do with racing and cars and motorbikes, that was part of the world, then there was the music side, and then there was the movie side, and then there was the comedian side, and... and there was always this wonderful crowd of people, all pretending to be grown-ups!
That's what was really funny about it and we all just giggled a lot, because, look at this, and we're all in this place.
He showed up one day and he came in with two ukuleles and he gave me one.
He goes, "You gotta play this thing, it's great," you know,
"let's jam," you know.
And I said, "I have no idea how to play a ukulele."
"Ah, it's no problem,
I'll show you," you know.
So we spent the rest of the day playing ukuleles and, I mean, playing ukuleles...
Strolling around the yard playing ukulele... my wrist hurt the next day!
But he taught me how to play it, you know, and I learned the chord formations.
And when he was going, I walked out to the car and he said,
"Well, wait, I want to...
"I want to leave some ukuleles here."
And he'd already given me one, you know,
I said, "Well, I've got thi..."
"No, we may need more."
And he opened his trunk and he... he had a lot of ukuleles in the trunk.
And I think he left four at my house and he said, "Well, you know, you never know when we might need 'em
"because everybody doesn't carry one around."
** Yippie yi yaaaay **
** Yippie yi ohhhhh **
** Ghost riders in the sky... **
'He and Jeff had kind of pictured this group, The Traveling Wilburys, ' and George's idea was that he would hand-pick everybody in the band and it'd be the perfect little band, but I think the qualifications were more about who you could hang out with, you know, more so than, like, trying to find the best guy that did this or that.
Though George liked to surround himself with people that were good... at something, you know.
George rang my bell one night and came in and said,
"God, I just had dinner with
Roy Orbison and Jeff," you know.
"I got this idea, I've got to do an extra side...
"for a single that
I'm bringing out.
"I need a studio, so I called Bob Dylan, and...
"You know, Bob has a little studio out at his house
"and so he's agreed to let me use the studio.
"I'm going to try to write something tonight
"and we'd just do it, but I thought
I'd have Roy on it, too,
"and if you want, you know, maybe you'd come too."
And I said, "Yeah, well,
I'd love to come."
** Been beat up and battered around **
** Been sent up and I've been shot down **
** You're the best thing that
I've ever found **
** Handle me with care **
** I'm so tired of being lonely **
** I still have some love to give **
** Won't you show me that you really care? **
** Everybody's got somebody **
** To lean on... **
'Bob said, "Well, what's it going to be called, George?
'"You gotta have a name for your song."'
And there was a packing crate that said, "Handle With Care," and...I witnessed him look over at the crate and look back and say,
"Oh, it's Handle With Care."
So, we cut the track and then we took a break to eat and... he said, "OK, well, now we gotta write some words, guys."
You know, "I got these songwriters here...
"Time to write a song," you know,
"let's write one," you know.
So, everyone...
Everyone'd just throw a line out and you'd get, "No!", or, you know, sometimes a line'd come out and you'd get,
"Woo, that's good, that's a good one. Oh, I like that."
You know, and, so that's how we did it.
** It was in Pittsburgh **
** Late one night **
** I lost my hat **
** Got into a fight. **
OK. That's sort of like...
Yeah? Yeah, if you ignore those chords, then just sing it over, the same sort of phrasing over the next bit, we can change the chord.
Or, or if he...
Or the other thing would be, you know, if we back it up now, don't play you that and you sing the second off the lyrics of the same chords and we'll copy it and put in, all right?
All right. Yeah, do that. Yeah.
That'll be... Yeah. Let's try that then... Yeah, that sounded good...
You could have chosen to retire into contented middle age and get together with a few friends in the musical business and play together occasionally.
Well, that's what the real reason is! Really.
Contented middle age?
Yeah, I suppose so.
** Everybody loves your **
** Electric dumplings **
** He loves your
Clothes that stretch **
** He loves your **
** Fuel injection **
** He loves your **
** Service charge **
** He loves your **
** Five-speed gearbox **
** He loves your
Long endurance **
** He loves your **
** Quest for junk food **
** He loves your **
** Big refrigerator. **
That was all right. It was OK.
I'm not mad about,
"clothes that stretch."
It sounds very English,
** Clothes that stretch. **
It's a bit of a joke, the idea of a comeback, you know.
Especially to me, you know. Seems...
Why? I don't know, because
I don't really see myself as a fully-fledged showbiz star, anyway, you know, like that.
George, why do you play music?
Why do you still play music?
Just to enjoy? Yeah.
Now, just, well, we gotta do something, you know, with our lives.
Yeah. That's the one thing that I know what to do, you know, how to do.
Hello, Neil, how are you?
Hello, George. Very well, thank you.
Nice to see you. Very nice.
Hello!
Oh, a vegetarian leather jacket!
Yeah? Yes.
Oh, is that a filmer?
Yeah, I've got you!
Oh, I've seen that, that's the one I can see.
Go on, turn it off.
You know, I can see...
No, I don't want to turn it off!
I've seen that, Sharp, you know,
I've seen the adverts for those.
And who is this? It's Stephan.
It's John. Oh, is it?
John Lennon, of the Beatles.
Oh, that's what's her name.
Pat! Pat! Who's this?
Cilla's friend.
We don't know who that is. Ho-ho-ho!
Some other lady, lady of the night!
They were horrible girls, weren't they?
No, George, it's a very fine leg, it's a nice bit of stocking top!
Hmm. Just cos you've graduated in the world.
They're fine ladies!
** Ahh Ahh **
** Ahh Ahh. **
'You know, they say,
'in this life you have to perfect one human relationship
'in order to really love God.'
You practise loving God by loving another human and by giving unconditional love.
George's most important relationships really were conducted through their... their music and their lyrics.
I mean, George, er... that's, I'd Have You Anytime, the song that George and Bob wrote together, you know,
"Let me in here, I know I've been here, let me into your heart."
He was talking directly to Bob because, you know, he'd seen Bob and then he'd seen Bob another time and he didn't seem as open and so, that was his way of saying,
"let me in here, let me into your heart."
And he was very unabashed and... romantic about it, in a sense.
You know, I found that he was very, er... he had these love relationships with his friends. He loved them.
It was very early in the morning when I think my wife took the call and then woke me up and told me that Roy had passed away.
And then the next call was George.
I don't even know if I should say what he said to me, you know, but I will anyway!
When I came to the phone, he said,
"Aren't you glad it's not you?"
I said, "Yeah, yeah,
I am," you know.
Just, you know, he said,
"He'll be OK.
"He'll be OK.
"He's still around, so just listen, he's still around," and then, that was all he had to say about it, you know.
We say farewell to the end of this reel.
You know, you want to just write it so that, you know,
I mean, you don't want to milk it into some huge big thing, you know.
No, of course.
I mean, I prefer you were to be honest about it. No. No, that's fine.
You know, there's nothing worse than, you know...bullshit.
You know what I mean?
Yeah, I agree, I agree.
And then all it does is it means everybody else starts phoning up and then they want their version of it. I know.
I'm sorry, I mean, we're all going to die one day, but I'm not going to die for you quite yet.
We wouldn't want that.
Well...you never know.
I think it makes a good story, doesn't it?
W-what... When it was first...
When he was first diagnosed with cancer, he told me, and in a way as, you know, his main thing was not to upset me.
I mean, there is a man who's, who was not well, who's worrying about me and all the people around him.
So, that was the measure of the man.
And then, of course, it was with great joy that, that he actually got better initially and so things were back on track and we all put it to the back of our minds that this was gone now.
I woke up, I just heard smashing of glass.
I jumped up and woke up George.
It was about, it must've been about 4.30 in the morning... and I said,
"Somebody's smashed a window," and he said, "How do you know?"
I said, "I heard it!"
So he jumped up and I ran to the door and I locked the door.
And he said, "Why are you locking the door?"
I said, "Why?! Because I'm afraid.
That's why I'm locking the door."
He said, "No, no, no,
I'm going out there."
And so he ran downstairs, um...
..which he really didn't have to do, but he felt he had to do cos my mother was upstairs, and he didn't want...
You know, he didn't know if she was OK.
We had a statue of Saint Michael.
And the wing from the statue of Saint Michael... it was made of stone - had been thrown through the window.
And George was on one side and I was on the other and we looked down and this maniac just ran in like Beelzebub...
..with a stick from Saint Michael in one hand... you know, he slays the dragon with his spear.
He had that in one hand and I didn't see what he had in the other.
Anyway, George started chanting really loud at him, and this guy was saying,
"Get down here, get down here."
"What do you want?"
He said, "You know what I want," it was just horrible.
It was just like this voice from the bowels of hell.
And, uh...and then he just ran up, tore up the stairs.
He was in a florid psychotic state.
And he was tall and young.
And then they'd come closer to where the room was.
And this man was on top of George, um... trying to kill him, just laying on him, in just, I think, the worst way.
To have some, you know, physical contact with some horrible person.
Anyway, I just ran back in the room and, uh...
I don't know, something just took over, and I grabbed a poker.
My dad was a big baseball fan and he used to always say, "Follow through."
That's all I could think of was,
"Don't throw like a girl."
"Follow through."
I mean, it got worse, cos I hit the guy several times, you know,
I could see the blood spreading down his blond hair.
And then, he got up.
You know, he got up and he chased me and had me around the neck.
And then George got up and jumped on his back.
And, poor George, he said,
"You know, God,
"just when he got off of me,
I was thinking 'Oh, good, '
"then I had to get up and fight him again."
And he'd already been stabbed.
But we all fell into a big pile, and I managed to get out from underneath, and George pinned him down.
And George said to me,
"I've got the knife!"
And I thought, "What knife?!"
I didn't know, I thought he was just kidding.
I thought he was just trying to fake the guy out.
It's like, I hadn't seen that.
Afterwards, we were...
We were, um, taken to a good old
National Health hospital with these rickety wheelchairs at four in the morning and it was like freezing, it was so cold, I was just shaking,
I didn't realise I was in shock.
But, you know, they were pushing us down and we were looking at each other and they've got us in these beds and they put the curtain around us and he had a collapsed lung, he had things in and out the other side and outside of his leg...
You know, I had my head open and, you know...
But just looking into each other's eyes, our eyes must have been like...
I said, "What the hell was that?"
He said, "I don't know, it's like, I never tried to kill anybody before," and I said, "No, neither did I."
It's like this... you know, phew.
But what...
You know, honestly, we talked about it a lot, and the next day George said,
"You know, I was lying there
"and I was thinking,
I can't believe it,
"after everything's that's happened to me,
"I'm going to be murdered,
I'm being murdered in my own home.
"And since I'm being murdered and I'm going to die,
"I better start letting go of this life,
"and I better start doing what I've been practising my whole life
"so that I can leave my body the way I want to."
He was so defiant, and so determined.
Nothing was going to stop him from leaving his body and leaping as high as he could go.
It was the millennium, and we were staying in Santa Barbara with some friends, and then this awful news came through.
I said to Tania, "We have to go," and so I called up and said,
"Should we come?"
And he said, "Where are you?"
OK, so, we got on a plane and came immediately, and, um...it was very...
You know, it was very powerful.
I mean, they would walk us round where the various stages of the attack took place.
When they picked him up, they put him on this stretcher and they're carrying him downstairs, and there were two people who had just started work that weekend.
And he's being carried out, stabbed, he'd eight stab wounds, and he looks over and he says,
"So what do you think of the job so far?"
Which is a great kind of...very George.
So Dhani and Livy and George... came up to this house... and he just was so distraught.
I've never, ever had a time when there's so many tears have been shed... just total grief - of no death.
Just grief of what a horrible thing somebody could do to another person, without actually killing them.
He was very, very badly attacked, and... by the time he died, he didn't even have a single scar on him.
I mean, he was like a yogi.
He moved on from that, physically and mentally, and didn't let it affect him.
But it definitely took years off his life, you know.
If you're trying to fight cancer and then you're trying to stay alive for something like that, you know, it's got to take it out of you, you know?
We went to Fiji to be,
"Take us to the island where there isn't anybody,
"and then take us in a boat and drop us off at the cove
"where there isn't anyone on the beach, where there isn't anyone."
And then he'd disappear.
It's like, he's only with me, and then he would go off on his own.
But he'd come out, like, dressed in banana leaves, or something, you know, with, like, heliconias and things.
He liked to... for him, I think that was just like building a fort out of bracken.
I had an experience which, um...
..speeds up the whole idea of, um...
You know, if you have something happen to you physically, then, you know, people go in hospital, or have, you know, something wrong with them and, um, you know, have a shock or something like that, and then you think,
"Wow, yeah, I could be dying now."
Now, if I was dying now, what would I think?
What would I miss?
If I had to leave my body, you know, in an hour's time, what is it that I would miss?
And I think, "Well,
I've got a son who needs a father,
"So I have to stick around for him. as long as I can.
"But, um...
"other than that, I can't think of much reason to be here."
We had this whole
30 years together, and then at the end you're able to just decant that time.
We spent that summer together and we had so much fun.
It's amazing, you know, at the end of your life, here's the conversation...
"I hope I wasn't a bad husband."
"Well, I hope I was an OK wife.
"How did we do? How did we do?"
And then you think, "I'm so glad.
"I am so glad that we just kept walking this path together."
And all those other things that came and went we just swatted away and batted away in between us, you know?"
He had a long battle with his cancer.
He's such a brave lad.
What do you miss the most about George?
Uh, his humour, his friendship... his, um, love.
I've lost racing drivers, phew, so many of my friends have been killed.
I've been with them when they've died.
I've had an enormous exposure to emotional experiences.
And yet, I don't think there's much else that's ever given me such a long-lasting... bereavement as George's loss.
And I can't say that I was one of George's very best friends, cos a lot more people spent a lot more time with him than I did.
But I, at least, felt such a closeness to him that it still affects me to this day.
I could give you a dozen names, and I'll bet you they would say the same as I'm saying.
It wasn't a skill.
It was just an aura which provided us with a feel-good factor that we didn't get from very many people in our lives.
The last weeks of George's life, he was in Switzerland, and I went to see him, and he was very ill.
And, you know, he could only lay down.
And while he was being ill and I'd come to see him,
I was going to Boston, cos my daughter had a brain tumour.
And I said, "Well, you know,
I've got to go,
"I've got to go to Boston," and he goes...
..it's the last words I heard him say, actually...
And he said, "Do you want me to come with you?"
Oh, God.
So, you know, that's the incredible side of George.
God, it's like Barbara fucking
Walters here, isn't it?
There was a profound experience that happened when he left his body.
It was visible.
Let's just say, you wouldn't need to light the room...
..if you were trying to film it.
You know, he, um...
He just...
He just lit the room.
** Namah Parvati **
** Pataye Hare Hare Mahadev **
** Namah Parvati Pataye Hare Hare **
** Namah Parvati Pataye Hare Hare **
** Shiva Shiva Shankara Mahadeva **
** Hare Hare Hare Hare Mahadeva **
** Shiva Shiva Shankara Mahadeva **
** Shiva Shiva Shankara Mahadeva **
** Shiva Shiva Shankara Mahadeva **
"Long, Long, Long"
** It's been a long, long, long time **
** How could I ever have lost you **
** When I loved you? **
** It took a long, long, long time **
** Now I'm so happy I found you **
** How I want you **
** How I love you **
** You know that I need you **
** Oh, I love you... **
From the top, then, lads.
I think you can use the Stones as markers.
They certainly captured the times.
The hippy, peace, love, acid thing has long gone, and they're different times.
There was something in the air,
Coppola was making Apocalypse Now.
There was definitely the sense that the Sixies didn't work, and that you either had to blow up the system or flee from it.
From the artwork to the music, it was a Rolling Stones record that wasn't the big, popular album.
What year was it? '72?
I know the folklore, obviously.
They were getting away from, running away from England.
Why did they...?
So they literally got booted out.
English tax exiles. Seemed to be a popular English rock'n'roll story.
They had to go and almost implode, in a way.
The sense of being exiled, the sense of being..."You can't go home."
I think this music reflects that.
He's going the wrong way.
We used to go that way.
Let's go the way we used to go.
When I started talking about making this film,
I said, "We're never gonna do this.
"We're never gonna go to where we recorded it."
That was your booth.
You lived in there.
I didn't, I wasn't always,
I was out here a lot.
= That was my booth.
= Only when we let him.
We used to try experimental things, cos it was a nice, big room.
One bloke could be there, while I was here, doing something else.
We did a lot of versions of things.
We did them over and over.
The thing about Exile On Main St. is that there wasn't a master plan, we just accumulated material knowing that we would use it one day.
So we just came in and recorded.
This is really weird. You come back to something you did 40 years ago, it doesn't really matter.
You've got to look back at the big picture, you got really good things out of it.
= Where were we? Boring, really.
= That's about as good as it gets.
That old fucking recording session...
I mean, boring.
Who gives a shit?
The Lucifer of Rock, the Pied Piper, the rebellious young millions, who, in the 1960s, made rock music the official language of their unfocused, but unmistakable affection, from tradition...
Middle America couldn't believe what was happening to their kids.
They were listening to this music, buying their albums, album covers with pictures of the boys lying around in homes, making parents sick.
People across the country thought,
"What can we expect nex from the Stones?"
American Top 40.
The second=biggest foreign act ever to hit the American charts has had five number one singles and ten consecutive gold LPs.
The green stuff they gather isn't moss.
The Rolling Stones.
Are you any more satisfied now?
Financially, dissatisfied.
You know...
Sexually, satisfied.
Philosophically, trying.
We'd been working hard, we were a very successful band, we'd sold a lot of records but we weren't getting paid, cos the record contracts were giving us such a low royalty.
We found out that we had a management company guy who claimed that he owned everything we were doing in the past and always would in the future.
Touring, records, publishing songs, everything, he said he owned it.
So we had to get rid of him and try and get out of this ridiculous Byzantine mess that you've created for yourself.
We were supposed to live this life, limousines, you had to have, and this, that and the other.
The money just flew, so you were always in debt.
None of us had paid tax.
We thought we had.
We thought that had been dealt with, and it hadn't.
Tax, under the Labour government of Wilson was 93%.
If you earned a million quid, which we didn't, you'd end up with 70 grand.
So it was impossible to earn enough money to pay back the Inland Revenue and stay here, in England.
It was a feeling that you're being edged out of your own country.
The British government were scared by the number of fans we had, I suppose.
They couldn't ignore that we were a force to be reckoned with, and sometime in the end of the year we had to make the decision.
It was like, well, we all wanted to keep going, so let's just move.
We're not rooted in England, we'd been around the world half the time.
We do this farewell tour of England which is quite short, and rather sort of sad.
I can remember it so vividly.
Everyone thought we were never going to come back.
We had this kind of settled way of life for a touring band.
We were all very kind of English in our ways, with our semi=suburban studios, nice country places to live in, and we were quite happy with that.
I mean, "sedate" is not really the right...
It wasn't sedate, but it was pretty centred.
This kind of lifestyle that we'd created for ourselves, which was really pleasant, had to come to an end.
How do you feel about emigrating?
I don't know. Are we really going?
Well, so they tell me.
= Do you want to leave England or not?
= No.
You're not keen on it?
= On what?
= On going off to France.
You keen on England?
In those days, if a band was big in England and then left England, that was the end of them, you didn't like them any more.
It's fucking curtains.
And then, when you leave for tax reasons, it's really not very cool.
I had to get out of the country to pay the tax incurred for me.
That's why I had to leave.
Let that be a warning to you.
I start taking pictures of the Stones in 1964.
I heard that the whole band was moving to the South of France, so, a few weeks later,
I was down in Nice.
I asked, "Do you think it's possible
"to take a few pictures of the Stones in the South of France?"
And they gave me the name of the place,
Villefranche=sur=Mer, Villa Nellcote.
I just went for an afternoon.
I didn't know Keith and Anita were living down there.
Of course, the house was beautiful and the light is incredible in the South of France in spring.
At the end, I was thanking everybody for a beautiful afternoon and everything, and they said to me, "You can stay."
How long were you there for?
Six months.
Admiral Byrd built it.
He was an English admiral.
Steps down to his own private boating dock.
So I bought a speedboat.
"Splash out, I might be in jail..."
"Let's have some fun while I'm free."
That whole era, just before we moved to France, was all kind of jittery, so in a way it was quite a relief to get to France and have that off your back and start learning French.
Anita in Nellcote.
First off, it was her first year with the baby, so she was being mother, as well, and just, sort of, made sure the joint ran properly.
She was the only one that could argue with the cook, Fat Jacques.
Until I had Marlon we were just living in hotel rooms, moving around constantly.
So, for me, going to the South of France was great.
It was a wonderful place.
It was very romantic.
I lost, totally, my sense of time, down there.
It was like a kind of dream, you know.
Every morning, Keith would be up at 8:00, 8:30 in the morning, and ready to jump in his car, looking after his kid, Marlon.
No one knew the Stones in the South of France, so that they were able to act and live normally.
We'd go to the zoo, we would go to the beach.
In the afternoon,
Anita would look after Marlon, and Keith would play music.
Every morning it would be the same.
It was a normal way of life.
We've been seeing a lot in the music papers over here, some pictures of you and a very beautiful lady called Bianca.
= I believe.
= Yeah.
And all those rumours, that you must have read about, anything to say about them?
= No.
= In a word!
Not really.
What can I say, but rumours, rumours...
Mick Jagger came to St Tropez for a quiet wedding.
It's been chaotic and it's brought the town to a standstill.
We knew they was getting married, and we kind of knew the date, we were thinking,
"Well, it's on on Saturday,
"and Mick hasn't mentioned it.
"Maybe we'd better buy him a wedding present."
Then Mick called up the day before the wedding and said, "Hi, Bill. I'd like to invite you to our wedding reception."
And I said, "OK. Thanks."
So, it was a bit strange.
= You can stop taking photographs.
= Shut up, man.
People came from all over the world for the wedding.
Some musician had to go back on tour or recording, or something like that, and some other had nothing to do.
So, like usual, it ends up at Keith's house.
In the South of France, if you have money you can get anything.
On the right you've got Marseilles, which is a very well=known place for illegal products, and on the other side, you've got Italy, with the Mafia.
So, you join the two together, and you understand.
I had a non=verbal agreement with Keith.
This was very simple.
You get high on music and photography, stick to it, I take care of the rest.
At the beginning, it was interesting and fun, but the thing is, it was fantastically disruptive.
Of the band, of our lives, of our social life, everything.
I hated leaving England.
I did, because, when you got down there, you had to try to replace everything you loved, cos it wasn't there.
You had to, sort of, buy... try to buy PG Tips to make your tea.
Then you had to deal with the French milk, which wasn't the same.
Then you bought Bird's Custard and Branston Pickle and piccalilli and all the English things you were used to in your life, you had to import them all because they weren't there.
I'm not a very good mover.
And no, I didn't like...
And I was English and I couldn't see living in France, and that.
I mean, the mental thing was a bit, sort of... strange.
You were in exile, particularly me,
I couldn't speak French or anything.
I joined the Stones May or June of '69, and so, I hadn't earned enough money or done enough work on that level to have any kind of tax problems.
But one of my most vivid memories is being flown there in our own private jet.
I thought, "My God. This is the high life, this is wonderful."
We looked around for studios, but, especially in the South of France in the early... in 197 1, there was no good rooms to work in, and the equipment was shabby, and nobody felt comfortable in anywhere we looked at.
We tried various cinemas and public halls that one might rent, and we just never found a suitable site.
In the end, we chose convenience,
I suppose, over sound, and went for the basement of Keith's house.
We said, "We have this truck, our own mobile studio.
"Why don't we just forget about them and just bring in the truck
"and work around the problems?
"At least, this way, we don't have to ask our interpreter
"every time we want to turn it off or on."
Good afternoon!
Basically, I think that the Stones really felt like exiles.
"It's us against the world now.
Fuck ya."
That was behind the attitude.
We said,
"We're all gonna do this, boys.
"We're all just gonna move out and be a family and do it,
"and here's the place."
And, in a way, it was energising.
I ended up there because that's where everybody else went.
My boys that I play rock'n'roll with left the country.
We were invited to go and we went.
I didn't mind living between Nice and Monte Carlo.
Didn't mind that a bit.
Didn't mind all the pretty girls around the countryside.
Yes, sir, buddy.
South of France and a young man in his 20s, a rock'n'roll musician, that's a mighty good combination.
I'm tellin' ya!
That's when you're shitting in tall cotton.
Can you say that?
I just said that.
The Stones, during that time, were quite spread out across the South of France, so it was a little difficult to get everyone together for long periods at a time.
They'd get together for a few days and then everybody would want to go home and see their families.
Then there was the fact that Bianca was in her late stages of pregnancy during that period, so Mick was constantly in Paris where Bianca was.
So it wasn't the best conditions at all.
I remember, we just couldn't seem to get started.
= There. Come in again.
= Charlie should...
Yeah, it would make it so...
Andy, could you turn the piano up just a bit?
...just have the off beat.
Charlie, did you get that?
Do you want to try that?
It would be nice to change the drum sound when it comes back in again.
I'd just moved to France, and I used to have to drive, a six=and=a=half, seven=hour drive from where I lived, on these little roads.
I couldn't do it every night, play and go home, so I lived with Keith.
I lived in a room upstairs and Keith lived in a huge bedroom above that.
We had... It was quite...
I mean, it was pretty together, really.
In a mad sort of way.
We would work any time in 24 hours.
So, if it was 1 1 o'clock at night it would go for another 12 hours, or if it was at 12 o'clock midday, it would go for 12...
You know, whatever time.
That's why you had to live there.
I'm 21 years old, and there I am in the South of France, working with the best band on the planet, getting paid good cash money.
Come on, it was pretty cool!
It was my initiation into how you can actually live rock'n'roll.
At that point in time, the Rolling Stones were the centre of the world.
I might have been somewhat delusional, but music was very important back then.
It was the heyday of...
"Music's going to change the world."
All that rubbish.
And they were changing the world.
What a lot of people forget is, they were doing it, they really were.
The Rolling Stones, at the time, it's not a five=piece band any more.
It is an eight=piece band, with the horns,
Jim Price, Bobby Keys, with Nicky Hopkins.
And, all those people, they have kids.
And it's like, the Rolling Stones, it's like a tribe.
During the night, all those musician and technicians, during the day, all those kids.
So, it's impossible to separate the family life from the professional activity downstairs.
The tribe grows bigger and bigger and bigger.
Running.
Which amps are you coming out of?
Now he asks us.
That Fender...
The basement of Keith's house was in fact a lot of separate rooms, that made up a basement.
In the end, the separation was so poor that we would have to have the piano in one room, an acoustic guitar in the kitchen, because it had tile, so it had a nice ring.
There was another room for the horns.
And there was one, probably, main studio, where the drums were, and Keith's amp, and Bill would stand in there but his amp would be out the hall.
The place was absolutely atrocious and was very, very difficult to deal with.
It was so humid and the guitars would go in and out of tune all the time.
And Mick kept complaining about the sound and...
The gear wasn't working properly, the lights would go off, and there were fires, and it was just insane.
It wasn't the best conditions at all.
It was difficult for all of us.
The wires would go out the door and down the hall into a mobile truck.
Every time I wanted to communicate,
I would have to run around to all the different rooms and give the message.
Should we listen to it?
Well, I broke the string on that one.
A lot of Exile was done how Keith works, which is: play it 20 times, marinate, play it another 20.
Keith's very like a jazz player in lots of ways.
I mean, he knows what he likes, but he's very loose.
Keith's a very Bohemian and eccentric, in the best terms, person.
He really is.
I never plan anything.
Which is probably the difference between Mick and myself.
Mick needs to know what he's gonna do tomorrow,
I'm just happy to wake up and see who's hanging around.
Mick's Rock, I'm Roll.
I wanted to be a hotshot record executive, and they were the Rolling Stones, they had their own record label.
Atlantic distributed Rolling Stones records, we got a dollar an album and a big budget to produce the records.
The whole deal was, "Can you get the Rolling Stones to make an album
"every year or 18 months?
"Cos they're floating around, they're flying around."
And I said, "Yeah. I can do that."
Then I started to watch their creative process.
Watch how it worked.
I was amazed that Keith could fall asleep while he was doing a vocal.
Mick wouldn't show up.
I was coming from...
You had to make three sides in three hours.
These guys were taking two weeks to get one track done.
Sometimes I didn't have an idea, so I'd just throw it out and just see what happens.
You get the best out of this band when they think they're not working.
Where it's...
"This is just a free=for=all."
And, as long as the tape's rolling, this is where you get it.
That whole period was incredibly creative for all of us.
Once we got into a studio and picked up our guitars, we were in our own world.
Nothing else could really get in the way.
Trying to make the songs up, there's a riff, there's a groove, and you're trying to make up the words and a melody.
So the writing process was very, very loose.
We started off just jamming.
Really casual. Hung together.
It always ended up great.
That was the great thing about it.
It was about as unrehearsed as a hiccup.
It just was...
It wasn't exactly spontaneous combustion.
Placed a call to...
Give George Harrison my best wishes.
Not to mention his old lady.
This was a whole different approach to music and recording from what I'd been used to.
Usually you know the name of the song you're playing.
This is a...
And then there should be a chord...
The one that's great on that is Ventilator Blues.
You always rehearse it and it's a great riff, but we never do it as good as that, something is not right.
Either Keith would play it a bit different, which is not the same, or I'll get it wrong.
That's because Bobby said,
"Why don't you do this?"
I said, "I can't play that."
He said, "Yeah. It's this."
And stood nex to me, clapping.
I just followed his time.
Where I ever had the balls to try to tell Charlie Watts where two and four was, is beyond me.
I have often thought to myself,
"Son, what were you smoking,
"or what were you drinking?"
God bless his heart and patience, he listened to me.
There you go, you hear it right here,
I taught Charlie Watts how to play the drums.
I don't think we've ever said,
"Let's make this kind of album or that kind."
They take on their own character, once you start to get into it, since we'd left the country and were recording in a totally different way.
I wanted to reduce it back to basics.
It's been said that the Stones gave black music back to the Americans, what were the first black musicians that turned you on to black music?
Chuck Berry, Little Richard.
Little Richard was the first one
I heard that really knocked me out.
After that, Chuck Berry, and later Bo Diddley,
Muddy Waters, Jimmy Reed.
Slim Harpo.
The list gets endless but...
I guess the more you got into black music the more you followed it back to where it come from.
And so, eventually, you were listening to Robert Johnson,
Blind Lemon Jefferson, et cetera, everybody goes through that.
To me, even now, American players and singers are always the best.
It is one of those sort of things that you have going. It is for me.
But then I'm a black American freak, cos that's the music I like, primarily.
That's the only...
That's really the music I love.
It was a super eclectic band.
I was brought up in the '50s.
I liked pop music,
I didn't just like blues.
I loved blues, but I loved Elvis, but I loved crap pop music, like acoustic blues music, country music.
We liked everything, plus you've got all these other people, and you're kinda throwing this whole mishmash in.
We'd absorbed so much different kinds of music since we'd become the Rolling Stones.
Maybe we missed America, I don't know.
Mick and I had always loved country music anyway.
You're playing the Midwest in 1964, '65, you ain't going to hear much else.
It's the other side of rock'n'roll.
Rock'n'roll, basically, is your blues and they put under a little bit of white hillbilly melody.
It's the coming together, it's that lovely... which music's always about, is one culture hitting another.
Hillbillies ideas of subject matter are like really interesting, and there's a lot of very...
In all of that music, there's a lot of things that just keen into your heart.
One of the things about Exile,
I think, was a lot of stuff that we'd picked up on the road and along the way came out.
You've drawn from whatever you've listened to since you were a child.
Probably, some of the things
I write or play are things that I listened to in 1947.
Rock'n'roll in its basic sense is a mixure.
What I've always loved about it, when I thought about it... it's a beautiful synthesis of white music and black music.
And it's just a beautiful cauldron to mix things up.
My father was in that world.
He was a race car driver, drug smuggler and adventurer.
We were there for, I guess, about three months, as Keith and Anita's long=term guests.
There was a lot of down time in Nellcote.
The creative process happened gradually throughout the day, as far as I could see.
Remember, I was just a kid.
People would sit around and play guitars, and start picking little bits of music, and then, late at night they would get busy.
From the top then, lads.
The basement, at night, was the epicentre, and as long as we could stay awake, we were down there.
It was kind of the adult area, because there was a lot of drinking and smoking, and there were bottles of Jack being passed around.
It was loud and a little bit scary, but it was also, before it got wild, a place where we all wanted to be.
It was so loud.
It was really, really loud.
I went to Villefranche sometimes, in the evening, and I could hear the music from Villefranche.
And I'm amazed that the people there were so patient, because it was always going, it was going all night.
It got really hot, especially down in the basement where they were recording.
It was like a sauna.
Dingy and dark.
I don't know how they did it, quite honestly.
It was really an exreme labour of love,
I think.
No.
The same again.
Leave it a whole other one before...
No. Charlie don't come in till later.
= You add just the guitar?
= Later, on the C.
And Bill come in with him?
Yeah, and Mick, MT, where does Mick come in?
= When he feels it, not too...
= When you feel it, Mick.
I'll give you a yell, something like middle eight...
What would really happen was this:
They would play very poorly for two or three days on whatever song, and then, if Keith got up and started looking at Charlie, then you knew that something was about to go down.
Then Bill would get up and put his bass at that sort of 84=degree angle, and you went, "Ah, here it comes.
They're going to go for it now."
Then it would turn into this wonderful, God=given music.
OK. Here it comes.
Run up to the D and E.
= All right?
= All right.
Got your lead sheets?
Once you're into the recording, everything else is a bit peripheral.
We'd be down in the basement, working, working, but the odd time you come up to the surface, oh, they'd be partying up there.
So you never knew quite what you were going to meet.
Nellcote was never empty.
There was people all over the place.
Some people sprawled out, and say, "I can't make it home."
"Have the couch. Have the big couch."
Had a couple of mad French cooks that blew the kitchen up.
But, apart from that, there was no mayhem, particularly.
Fat Jacques. He said they blew it up.
He was a junkie too.
He used to go to Marseilles.
"Where's Jacques?"
"It's Thursday."
"Oh right. He's gone to score."
I was commuting back and forth to Nellcote from all over the world.
Dealing with Atlantic, seeing about a worldwide simultaneous release.
It became my life.
When you're at work with the Rolling Stones, you won't last unless it becomes your life.
I remember, vividly, late afternoon, early evening, one meal a day.
We'd all sit at this long, long table.
We would all smoke joints and hash in between courses.
We had this big bowl, and everybody would be passing it around.
It was a whole new La Dolce Vita,
Felliniesque kind of lifestyle.
I actually became, in my mind, like one of the Rolling Stones.
You'd be surprised what an eight=and=a=half=year=old kid sees.
They see everything.
They're like little owls.
Obviously, there was cocaine, because Dad brought it.
I remember a lot of joints.
We'd roll joints.
That was, I think, pretty much my function in life at that point, was to be a joint roller.
If you're living a decadent life, there's darkness there.
This was decadent.
Nothing was hidden.
Everything was out in the open.
But at this point, this was the moment of grace.
This was before the darkness.
This was, if anything, the sunrise before the sunset.
Hell, yeah, there was some pot laying around, there was whisky bottles around, champagne bottles around, there was scantily=clad women around.
Hell! It was rock'n'roll, son!
Without it, you ain't got rock'n'roll.
Everybody had a great time, but it was very stressful, if you know what I mean.
You were having a good time, but ready to go back home.
The only one who wasn't like that was Keith, who was being supplied in his mansion, with the band working downstairs.
Must have been heaven for him.
Late again, Richards.
I don't envy you when you grow up and have to go to work for a living.
Sometimes I would wake up and I would just hear this weird rumbling from the basement.
And then realise that I'd slept for nearly a whole day, and they were working on.
But sometimes if Jimmy Miller was there, and enough people to operate the machinery,
I'd say, "Let's start."
They'd say, "There's nobody here."
I said, "I'll do for now."
It was like, whoever's around, and you had an idea,
"OK, round 'em up and let's go."
I cut Happy with Jimmy Miller on drums, and Bobby Keys on baritone sax, and me on guitar.
That was basically the take.
Everybody would go in and out of the place as they wished, so I kind of got really paranoid, it was unbelievable.
I walked into the living room and there was this guy sitting on the sofa, he pulled out a bag full of smack.
The whole thing kind of disintegrated and we got heavily into drugs, like breakfast, lunch and dinner.
At the end, especially,
I thought I was cursed.
We're getting our souls back!
I wasn't that aware, at the time, cos I was so used to it being around me.
At the time it was just Keith, it was how we worked.
He's always led life his way, and I don't think they cared what you thought or I thought.
I did it, basically, to hide.
Hide from fame and being this other person, because all I wanted to do was play music and bring my family up.
With a hit of smack,
I could walk through anything, and not give a damn.
Middle of September, what happens?
Keith and all his entourage, and all these guests and friends and hangers=on, are all in, watching television, and someone breaks in and steals eight guitars, one bass and a saxophone, of Bobby Keys.
Just walks out the house and no one even knows.
That's how, like, loose and stupid it was out there.
It's a big group of people, and they're dependent on the creative engine.
If it starts to get out of whack and doesn't work efficiently, everyone's going to suffer in some way.
You think you're in control of this wonderful, enjoyable lifestyle, and there's a moment where you are, but then, what happens is, the lifestyle starts to choose you.
That's the problem.
Suddenly, it was getting cold and autumn, and we'd got all of this stuff that we'd recorded in a truck, in a basement.
Mick and I were looking at each other, saying,
"I think we've drained it.
And we've drained everybody else."
There was a sort of a group feeling, I think,
"That's it, we've done it."
I can't even remember people leaving, but they certainly left, all very quickly.
Me and Keith and a couple of other people were still down there and eventually we got the word that we had to leave, because we were gonna get arrested.
We never got busted and we never got thrown out.
Now, did it become somewhere where we shouldn't stay?
Yeah, but we never got thrown out.
I felt like an outlaw,
I kind of quite liked that, the feeling of,
"We can't go anywhere."
You didn't have any choice, you can't get high any more, so get another buzz.
We always went to LA to finish our records.
That was a sort of... our modus operandi.
So we went off to LA.
It was kind of fun playing it to lots of musicians and friends in LA, interesting to get their input, cos everything that went on at Nellcote, it was in a bubble really.
We'd never made a double album before, so we didn't quite...
I think we were a bit naive about it.
It was just a bit too much work, considering that we'd had all these pressures, plus we were just a bit burned on it.
I remember Keith even saying,
"I'm so burnt out on this record."
But we still got loads of unfinished songs.
Some of them had fragmentary lyrics and some had none at all.
So we had a big mountain to climb.
It's weird, where your lyric things come from.
Tumbling Dice,
I sat with the housekeeper and talked to her about gambling.
She liked to play dice and I didn't know much about it, but I got it off her and I made the song out of that.
Casino Boogie would have been a song with no lyrics, so Keith and I did this William Burroughs thing, where we did cut=ups.
I just wrote phrases and chucked them into a pile and picked them out.
"Anything goes!
We've got to get this done."
We went to Sunset Sound to finish the record off.
My vocals had to be done, the harmony vocals and Keith's vocals.
We did pedal steel guitars, upright bass.
Exra musicians of some kind that we hadn't already thought of.
A lot of background vocal stuff.
The first part was good, but you've got to keep it up.
Those overdubs, they give the songs a complete twist.
So this LA experience is a lot about that.
A little bit of those girls goes a tremendous long way.
All these little jams, like
I Just Want To See His Face, that I'm going off on some religious bent, suddenly come alive and you see,
"That's what I meant when I was singing it."
There was a lot of material and I kept throwing new things on it.
That's always slightly bewildering.
We had to choose the songs we liked, choose the takes, and to sit in this room for...
I don't know how long, and sort everything out.
They'd mix forever. Keith would do mixes and Mick would do mixes and then they'd argue which one was the best.
It used to go on and on and on.
We needed a cover, so as you were mixing the record that you'd done,
Mick and I would be looking through books just to see styles and things like that.
Charlie and I went to loads of book shops in LA, bought loads of photography books.
And Charlie came up with this idea of Robert Frank.
Robert was perfect for that period, very American, of the '50s and '60s, very iconic.
We imagined it would be a photograph of the Rolling Stones, you know, stark Robert Frank imagery.
Then Robert said, no, he didn't see it like that, he saw doing photography with Super 8.
I said, "We'll give it a whirl."
He can see something that you wonder what the hell he's looking at.
When it's done with him and finished, it will look fantastic.
I have always thought, somewhere in the back of my mind, that what we were doing wasn't just for now.
So you're making the record even when you're asleep.
So I was dreaming the damn thing.
There might have been a feeling that,
"Right, since we've decided to move out of England,
"well, we better make this bloody work."
Finally, it's not that thing, you're stuck in a basement, trying to work out what the fuck is going on.
Now, we've finished this record.
All we have to do is wrap it up in this gritty little package.
The billboards. Fantastic.
It's up there.
It's going to be out and then you're on the road playing it, and it's exciting.
Mick doesn't like the finished thing.
He won't like this when it's finished.
He won't let you finish this.
That's what he's like.
Mick doesn't like anything you did yesterday.
Let's do tomorrow.
Which, in one way, is very good, cos it keeps you going forward.
It is a different kind of record.
It's a very sprawling, gutsy piece of work.
Criticism of Exile, it didn't have a direction.
But then, that's also something very laudable about it, that it exhibits all these styles, and even multiple styles, in one song.
Does it have tons of hit singles in it?
No. This isn't that kind of record.
Over the years it's just acquired a kind of magical glow.
Probably because of the way it was recorded, the rawness of it, the edginess of it.
I loved the tracks, obviously, but I don't think we had hardly any good reviews on that album.
By anybody.
They were all boo=hooing it and saying it was a load of crap, and it wasn't like the Stones.
And they all did amazing U=turns in the nex few years, saying it was one of the greatest albums we'd ever done.
I just wanted to make music and see how sounds are made.
How do you transmit that feeling and it actually comes back out and touches people?
It's been the mystery of my life and I'm still following it.
The Rolling Stones.
Rolling Stones. Crazy Mick. Crazy Mick.
Lay a couple of tickets on your friend.
It's the highest debuting song of the week, it's called Tumbling Dice by the phenomenal rock group that Time magazine says some far=out things about:
"The fan allegiance is not to rock as music,
"it's to the Stones as a socio=sexual event."
KROQ, Los Angeles, a rock revolution, is happening with the Rolling Stones!
Get down!
Exile On Main St. Dramatically altered the vocabulary of record making.
There are texures on there that no one ever laid down before.
That's so crazy, this was in France, cos it sound...
Literally, I thought, every night, they were in Memphis and they were going out and eating barbecue, and partying and getting with women.
If it wasn't for this record,
I would have thought the Stones just did this.
But this is like peaks and valleys of creativity and expression.
I love that record because it's sort of like something that could really confuse a journalist.
Make him rethink his whole career, because he can't box the Stones in any more.
I mean, there's 15 directions going on at once.
I think that anybody who was cool wanted to be there while it was all happening.
I would have been there.
I'm sure of it.
This is almost as if you were there while they were in a room trying to pull together a song.
And this is almost saying,
"This is who we were and this is where we're going.
"And we're not going back."
When it comes to rock'n'roll music it's like...
It's like...
"How good does it get?"
Often when you go back to places, like where I was brought up, it doesn't look anything like that any more, it's completely and utterly different.
There's like a motorway underneath this and now that's a mall and you can't recognise it, whereas this, it's completely, exactly the same.
I had this house from 1970 to 1975.
It does have a lot of memories = one reason is that we recorded here = but it has other memories for me, too.
Children, my parents and that sort of thing.
My brother lived here a lot.
= Did he?
= Yeah.
He liked it very much, having this very large house.
= Who wouldn't have liked it?
= I don't blame him!
I'll follow you.
Here we go.
The beginning of the recordings of Exile On Main St. Were done in this house so the earliest recordings for Exile On Main St. Were done here.
And they were what?
Do you remember?
Sweet Black Angel was done here.
= Oh, is that here?
= Yeah.
We recorded the percussion out on the lawn on a very nice day.
And some of the other tracks that we've found that were exras on Exile that we've been recording, they also were done here.
So the earliest recordings of Exile were done in this house.
We built this...
We built this mobile truck.
= Oh, that's right!
= We built the mobile truck so that we could go anywhere we wanted in the world and record.
Yes, it was in those heady days.
And so we bought this mobile truck which was actually, really, a good piece... quite a good piece of machinery, I mean, efficient and good sound and all that.
And so, we...
This, I think, was one of the first places we brought it.
It was always freezing cold when you went to go and listen to the playback.
It was always freezing cold, you had to cross the garden and put it out.
So we just set it up and everyone lived here.
We would all put our amps up in here and I remember that we had quite a lot of brass on the recordings we did in here and I remember them being up there.
Bobby Keys and Jim Price were up there.
Yeah, I remember them being up there.
And they, you know...
I remember being down here directing them.
"Hey, do it again!
Come on, you can do better than that."
Where would you have been set up?
In there, with the baffles coming round the screen.
= And them lot leaning over.
= Yeah, saying,
"No, it shouldn't go 'kah, boom, boom', it should go 'boom, boom, kah'."
Were you pleased with the sound you'd get in here?
Yeah, it was a great sound.
In a small little box, you get a very bad drum sound so you have to trick the drum sound out with all kinds of echoes.
In a big, ambient room like this, you get a very big drum sound which, in those days, was...
You can move things in big rooms, that's what's so good.
Like the brass didn't have very good ears, so you go up there, or you go...
We used all the rooms to record in.
So we would put amps in all these different rooms to get different sounds and... I don't think you moved the drums, did you, Charlie?
Oh, I don't think so.
And you weren't allowed to, so no.
This was like a, kind of like, hanging out room.
= It still is, innit?
= And this one...
= I mean, different sort of hanging out.
= I can't remember what we did in here.
= Nor can I.
= We used to put amps in all these rooms.
But they were all done up, but slightly more hippyish.
We had a pretty... I mean, sedate lifestyle is not really the right...
It wasn't sedate but it was pretty centred and it was pretty grounded in its own way.
Geographically, it was very grounded.
And we're all very kind of English in our ways.
And then we recorded in various locations, but we did record a lot in Barnes in Olympic.
So, we had to come to this crunch period where this kind of lifestyle that we'd created for ourselves, which was really pleasant, had to come to an end.
Including being in these kind of houses, for me anyway, living in them for long periods of time and working in them, sort of came to an end.
And that is the beginning of Exile On Main St.
Shall I tell you what was recorded here?
Shake Your Hips, Sweet Virginia.
Loving Cup.
I Just Want To See His Face.
I think that was done here.
= Are you sure?
= That was done in Nellcote.
= I don't think it was.
= I think it was.
I'll ask the question.
Stop Breaking Down, that was done here.
= Could well have been.
= I remember doing that here.
Casino Boogie was done here.
= You think so?
= Sure!
We have a lot of disagreements about this.
With the...
He's going the wrong way!
I can't remember.
We used to go that way.
Let's go the way we used to go.
You're being led along purely by instinct now, it's like a...
When I started talking about making this film,
= I said, "We're never gonna do this."
= That used to be a studio.
"We're never gonna go to where we recorded it."
That was your booth there, you lived in there.
= Did I?
= You used to get through the other...
No! I wasn't always. I was out here a lot.
That was my booth.
= Only when we let him.
= I was quite often here.
Playing the bongos with a bell around my neck.
That's always a good look.
I don't know what happened to...
I forgot it today. Fuck!
= What was the bell doing round your neck?
= It was a fashion accessory of the time.
= You had a bell, didn't you?
= No, I didn't.
= I remember you with a bell!
= No. I had a very colourful scarf.
We used to try experimental things, because it was a nice big room.
You could like sit in a circle and all play, or one bloke could be over there doing something while I was here doing something else.
Or I could be in that booth, or there was another studio you could go in, or you could be completely isolated, doing that kind of recording.
So there was a lot of...
That's why recording in a big room's good.
We didn't just book a three=hour session, did we?
We used to book a three=week session.
What we really did is we'd just accumulate the material, knowing that we would use it one day.
So we just came in and recorded.
So, Charlie and I are sort of disagreeing about what was recorded where, but it is written down on some list which I think is relatively accurate.
= Two blind people reading a book.
= Yeah.
Loving Cup.
There was a Loving Cup version done at Nellcote, but I'm pretty certain that one was done here, but... I don't know.
Charlie and I are arguing about
I Just Want To See His Face.
Stop Breaking Down, Robert Johnson blues, that was recorded here.
= Shine A Light was recorded here.
= Yeah.
I heard that the other day on the telly and it's fantastic, so loud.
= Yeah, your drums you mean?
= No, no, you singing.
Really? Oh, yeah.
So we did a lot of versions of things, we did them over and over.
= We still do.
= Yeah.
A lot of the good things were recorded here.
Rip This Joint.
That was recorded in Nellcote, wasn't it?
= I think so.
= Shake Your Hips. That was recorded here.
I mean... I'm not sure...
You said that was recorded at Stargroves when we were there.
We did a version of it there but we didn't use it.
What else did we used to do in here?
Take loads of drugs!
But we worked very hard during the drug=fuelled sessions.
The problem is, with recording, and if you take drugs, but even if you don't, that people will become in love with the process.
At Nellcote, we were there recording nine months.
And then we did one, two... three...
...four... five, six... seven, eight. Maybe nine tracks in that nine months. Maybe.
That's good going, one a month.
I mean, you should be able to do one a day, really.
I mean, you know, and come back to it...
One every two days.
= OK, where were we?
= That's about as good as it gets.
That old fucking recording session...
I mean, boring.
Who gives a shit?
I remember buying it, the day I bought it.
At home, I had two big speakers on either side of my bed.
I was in college and got in the right frame of mind and blasted it.
And it scared me.
That was my first reaction, was that...
There's something...
These guys have maybe gone off the deep end, there's something going on under this thing that's...
I wanna go there but I don't know if I'll survive it.
My friend Angelo, he's a massive Stones fan.
He's like, "Have you ever heard Exile?"
And I was like, "No".
I hadn't heard it.
And the first thing he did was show me the artwork and I was like, "Oh, wow! This is nasty!"
You know?
And then he played it for me and every song was just...
To me... I mean, they were writing songs that were anti=religion at times or questioning their faith, and every one of the songs sounded like a church song to me.
I mean every song had the boogie...
That kind of stuff or just really bluesy slow.
Just kind of interpretation, you know.
Beautiful.
And when I heard this, it changed everything
I thought about the Rolling Stones.
I would go to, like, old record stores and shop and just pile up my catalogue.
And this was one of them, you know?
From the artwork to the music.
And it was a Rolling Stones record that wasn't... you know, the big popular album.
So, if I had this in my collection, it symbolised that, you know, I was ultra...
I was mega=cool, right?
And, you know, when you're 18, 19 years old, and you have your little backpack of records...
Now, kids are walking around with, you know...
It's weightless, you know?
You're just flipping through things.
But if you had a backpack with just all the cool mega=stuff, you didn't care...
Now, these kids are walking around with a whole record store. Full of content.
But if you had the mega=ness in your backpack...
"What? You got that
Rolling Stones record?" "Yeah, yeah."
And this record in particular, was the first one that I felt like they finally had 100% confidence to just say, "Fuck you".
And they had the songs, they had the hits, so...
I mean, the record label couldn't say anything to them.
They had the songs but if you listen, intertwined in every song there is a big "fuck you" in some way.
I must have been 24, 23, and I was...
I had no television, you know,
I had no phone. I was living in this apartment and all I did was listen to Exile On Main St. over and over again, obsessively.
And it was so satisfying.
It was such a...
As a work, it's still my absolute favourite album of all time, ever.
It's my, you know, desert island, deathbed album.
Because it's just so satisfying in every...
Musically, emotionally, lyrically.
The stories that are told, the grandeur, the ruination.
You know? It's all there.
For me, Exile On Main St. is the rock and roll bible.
I think it's a perfect marriage of... electric blues with a tinge of country and soul music.
I think it's the height of the Rolling Stones for me, because I love Mick Taylor.
You can just feel kind of what was going on in their lives and in that atmosphere, while they were making that record.
There is an undercurrent to this thing that I can't put my finger on, even as someone who makes records.
I have no idea where this comes from.
And that's that foreboding, evil undercurrent.
I don't know that they intended that,
I don't even know that that's what was going on with them, but there's something.
From the photos on the cover, right?
You know, the minute you have a tactile connection to that record, there is a dark message to it.
Yeah... It's a mystery.
I don't know what that's about.
You know, hit the cover and you'll get to hear like, you know...
= Like a sample of it.
= A sample of the songs.
You were going off of the art, you know?
When the art of a record, you know, gave you a vision of what it might sound like.
Nobody knows what that means but it offends everyone for some reason.
Everything, like, has this vulgar and sleazy... in like a great way, made every...
In my opinion, made me a guy who was, you know, for a part of my life
I was scared of rock and roll cos I thought it was the opposite of what was real and what was right.
And when I heard this record, it made you feel good about it.
I miss the hair.
They had great hair back then.
If you had that hairdo and you were from England, it was a good hairdo.
If you were from America, it was a mullet.
Never understood that.
It's all about the freaks.
It's all freaks and that's how they felt.
They were the freaks. They were these huge rock stars but they were freaks.
And that's how they felt and that's how they walked through, like a freak show.
I mean, I know a little bit about fame and you do feel like a freak.
To me, that's that point of view, as you said, the narrative in the entire album.
It's like being...
It's like looking through the eyes of a freak as they're looked at by everyone else.
I just...
God! The stories just crush me!
My impressions of what's going on in the stories of that record are all about being both sort of king of the hill and completely alienated from mainstream.
That's what Exile On Main St. Means to me.
That they are sort of rock stars so they're grand, they're above everything, so they're in it but they're not of it.
And so they're walking around,
Iooking at everything through the lens of alienation and, you know...
There's a lot of Ioneliness and there's a lot of heartbreak.
There's a lot of soul in the record.
It's a great thing...
It's an inspiring thing to see how hated it was when it came out and how revered it is now.
That's inspiring to know, you know, when you're releasing records yourself.
But... Yeah, it's just not accessible.
It's not poppy and accessible at all.
Like, it didn't have any poppy hits on it and I think that was confusing to people at the time, coming from the Stones.
But it was them at their best. I mean, the Stones, when they're at their best, are an incredible blues band and this is them doing that.
So... it's a perfect portrait of them.
When I heard this, it was 1994.
And I already knew, you know, the logo of the Rolling Stones.
It was imprinted in my brain. When I thought of the Rolling Stones, I thought of the logo.
I thought of Mick, you know.
You know, I thought...
The band, you know?
And this was, you know...
If it wasn't for this record, I would have thought the Stones just did this.
But this is like peaks and valleys of creativity and expression, you know.
There's education.
Cos it is '93 now, right?
This is an old record.
As well as all their other ones, you know?
But what it showed me was... to be an artist isn't just about, you know, popular songs, it's about a body of work, you know?
Eclectic, odd, avant=garde, straightforward, you know, on topic, off topic.
That's what groups are supposed to do.
Yeah, man, this whole record is just...
From the artwork to everything about it, you could tell they were just kind of at a point where they were going for it and didn't care if they were going to offend the masses.
It sounds like they had fun when they made the record.
You rarely hear a record that the people actually sound like they're having fun.
I don't talk to anyone about this record and I don't want to talk to people about it.
Like, it's my record.
It's my special, personal, private record.
With my boyfriend, he'd be like, "Let's put it on!"
I'm like, "No! I can't do that with you."
He probably wanted to have sex to it or something and I'm like, "No!"
You know what I mean?
Like that just can't be done for me.
Like I wouldn't put it on while... I wouldn't be able to eat dinner with this record on.
It would feel sacrilegious to me.
It would feel wrong.
That's a record that I can come to when I'm feeling like king of the world, or when I've just had my heart broken, or when someone just died, or when I need to, you know, find my musical bearings again.
It's a journey of sound.
Nowadays, we can go on and just click, you know, like a smorgasbord.
"I just want corn today."
And the chefs like, "Really, try this fish.
It goes great with the corn."
"No, no, no, I'm just gonna get the corn."
"But I prepared this wonderful fish that just...
Taste=wise...
"The spice and the fish goes great with the sweet corn."
"No, no, keep your motherfucking fish,
I just want the goddamn corn." Right?
And they have the opportunity to do that and they're missing out on a great meal, a great body of work, you know?
And this is one of them, where you put it on through the whole way and have it colour your time.
I love that record because it's something that could really confuse a journalist, sort of make him rethink his whole career, because he can't box the Stones in any more.
I mean, there's 15 directions going on at once.
I just love when they're befuddled like that.
They'd moved past the blues and gone into other areas of southern
American music, gospel and country.
I think they listened to the best of what American music had to offer.
They managed to combine, as I said, this sort of R&B and this electric blues with country music and with real deep southern soul music.
And even Mick's ability to portray an old black bluesman in the way he delivered his singing was kind of amazing, you know, for a scrawny little English guy.
I listen to it and I think it's the best of where I came from, you know, right along Route 66 and growing up on the Mississippi.
They managed to really draw from that and bring it into their English soul music.
I was born in Memphis and so I used to go down to Beale Street.
You'd hear guys on the corner just playing and you'd think,
"Man, those guys are better than anyone you could ever hear on the radio."
But you'll never hear them on the radio.
And then you have a band like this that just, you know, they worked really really hard and then just started to get where they could play.
They had the world at their fingertips and they could just play whatever kind of music they wanted.
In a lot of ways, with their music, they were trying to represent the people that were never going to make it on the radio.
America just, you know, didn't care about its true musicians, its true home=grown musicians.
They never cared.
They had some white guy redo it, which I guess this is the same thing, and then it was OK and it was fabulous.
But those, you know, early blues, the Deep South, those musicians, they never made the money they should have nor got the credit, nor got the accolades... till they were 90 or dead, you know what I mean?
That's kind of a depressing thought, that it took Englishmen to come in and kind of say,
"Hey, I think you might be onto something here", you know?
And there's something beautiful about the way they saw America and what parts of America they cherished, which was the... you know,
Deep South, African=American,
I like to call black, but, you know, music that just was truly American.
You can see the impact of blues through other genres and through other cultures, and then siphoned through and filtered through the Stones' sort of camera.
It's interesting to learn about yourself through somebody else's viewpoint and I think America was probably doing that but it just took a long time to allow that to take root, you know, with this record.
When people say devil music, that's devil music right there.
Damn fucking devil!
Sounds so good.
I Just Want See His Face is like... The first time I heard it, I was scared to death.
I was like, "Oh, no.
I'm gonna get struck dead", you know?
"I don't want to talk about Jesus,
I just wanna see his face."
Then they all talk about dropping to those knees and thanking God and it's like...
They pretty much covered everything.
And you know those black girls singing,
"I just wanna see his face"?
They do not agree with that.
They believe in Jesus, very much so.
There was a couple of things that took me by surprise and I thought were maybe done wrong but then they came back and they sounded incredible to me.
One was at the beginning of the track Ventilator Blues, after the first guitar licks happen, there should be a kick drum.
It should be..."When your...
"Spine is cracking..."
There should be a kick drum right there and there's not.
And that pissed me off when I first heard it and the drum start on the up, on the snare...
But now I love that, that's my favourite part about that.
You know, I always cock my head when that part comes in.
I think I'm gonna do Loving Cup.
I think that's one I like a whole lot.
That always made me wanna be...
Like I wanna, you know...
I remember, I would feel that...
Are you really gonna play it?
= Yeah!
= Hilarious! This is awesome.
Doesn't it just remind you of late nights and like...
You guys must have gone through the bar phase of your life, where you have no pride, you know?
I just love that.
Been through?
I could still be there, I don't know...
Listen to his vocals.
There's so much abandon in the vocal performances and in the guitar.
There's so much abandon. They're so unself=conscious, they're just letting it out.
It just feels like something folding out, like an elephant's trunk...
It wasn't, you know, just a joke that it might change the world.
It might actually sweep a youth culture into a new state of mind, like you actually had the potential to do that.
Don't you miss bands that actually disturb the social fabric?
Don't you miss that there was a social fabric to disturb?
What disturbs our fabric any more? Nothing.
Nobody does anything like that any more.
There aren't any rock stars any more.
I love Rip This Joint just cos it's so raucous but I would say that Sweet Virginia is probably the jam song of all time.
Like, if you don't know Sweet Virginia, then you need to go home.
And it is probably the one song that whenever you're sitting with a band, you can all play that song because it is part of our genetic history, as far as music is concerned.
Right. Now, is everyone settled?
I don't want anyone moving around.
I am a very nervous person.
What happened with Exile On Main St. was totally different.
And I think that the...
There's no doubt that they had this mantle of... representing the entire culture of rock and roll.
And they had to change, I think.
Or they felt they had to or wanted to change or felt they were searching for some other way to become...
How were they going to develop?
Where was their music gonna go?
How was it gonna develop into anything new?
And it was retaliation against everything that had come before, I think.
Not that they were repudiating any of their work, but they had to think differently and it seemed like a terrible struggle.
I was aware of the mythology surrounding the making of Exile On Main St. really from the time it came out.
And over the years, especially once
I started recording with them, you know, I asked a lot of questions,
I got a little clearer picture about it but...
The mythology had a huge impact on me in 1972.
Just the little bit of information that came out was kind of life=changing.
The drugs had changed...
That's a major factor in this, OK?
It went from this happy giggle stuff to something else.
And the politics had changed, man.
Nixon was levelling Cambodia and Laos...
It was a weird time.
In '72, I'd just written a paper about Joseph Conrad for class at school.
And then these guys put this album out.
And I'd always looked to them as leaders, you know?
And the message I got was...
"Follow us, we're going the wrong way, against the current, up the river
"and we're gonna be hanging out with Captain Kurtz."
And that was...
And the pictures that filtered through of them recording the album bore that out there, like...
I'd have to go back and see them but my image of it is...
It looked like the prisoners of the POWs in Hanoi, you know?
These real stark black and white things.
And they'd gone off to some distant place, maybe it's like Lord Of The Flies, you know?
Just this... They were not gonna abide by the laws and they were saying,
"Get out while you still can.
The ship's going down."
It was apocalyptic.
It's dark and foreboding but at the same time, it was quite alluring, man.
They were having fun.
And it was totally cool.
It was a scary record.
It was an exraordinary decade, there's no doubting it, and it had to end.
It had to come to an end. Why should we put it on the Rolling Stones that it ended?
It was coming to an end anyway.
I don't mean just because it was changing from 1969 to 1970.
The 60's really ended, I think, in about '73 or '7 4, really.
And so they had to strike out for something new.
And also I guess to search for other ways of telling a story with music, which means all the different influences that they had over the years, right?
I mean, blues, rock, gospel, everything together.
It's a touchstone for a lot of musicians,
I think.
Because there's a unity between how you play and how you live your life in that record, man, you know?
And that's different from other things.
The looseness, the lack of self=consciousness, the confidence...
The confidence towards the world and also in your own playing.
"I'm not gonna get lost,
"don't worry about whether we're speeding up or slowing down."
It's about feel, it's about being in the moment.
It's a Zen record like that, man.
It's all about being in the moment and enjoying the moment.
There's probably not a better example of that out there.
And so, for musicians, it's not just,
"I wanna make music that sounds like that."
It's, "I wanna live my life like that."
Main St. Is downtown LA.
You can't get more main than that, it's real down and out.
I had moved to LA in the early 70's, by '72, I was living in LA.
By '73, I was shooting Mean Streets, some of it in New York, the rest in LA, on Main St.
And it was the down=and=out area.
It was like being on skid row on the Bowery where I grew up, actually, on the Lower East Side, in the old Italian area.
It's a sense of being the outcast, of being on the edge of society, on the fringes I should say, not the edge.
People that don't count.
Supposedly don't count, yet they're still there.
Look at this. I mean, you know...
The incredible photography of Robert Frank.
Also taking in the side show.
The desperation of the side show performer, you know?
And all these elements,
I think, come to play.
And Main Street, you had to know it a little bit.
And also the fact that Main Street is a term that's used for...
How should I put it?
...the white picket fence, small=town Americana, but Main Street in Los Angeles and New York, you know, different place.
They were, I guess...
Maybe they fostered the image of the outcast to a certain exent, and the rebel, obviously.
They all did in rock and roll, all rebels, but these guys were something else.
This was some other existence that led the way.
I think this album was kind of a turning point, kind of a letting go of everything before this record.
And this and Let It Bleed, for me, and Sticky Fingers...
It certainly set me on a course as an artist.
I would say that they probably are the most influential rock artists in my life.
And the record really represents a freedom and a stepping away from the conventional and from the norm.
A freedom in letting go of your surroundings and, as I said, that has a lot to do with...
What happens in your art is leaving all the familiarity behind and bringing your circus on the road with you.
Another thing about this record is that I have never googled the lyrics.
I don't really want to know the actual lyrics.
I am very attached to what I think the songs are about and there are so many words in these songs that I've caught obviously many snippets.
I know basically what's being said but I do not want to know actually what's being said.
Cos it's very powerful.
This is a special record that way and I bet a lot of people feel that way.
They think they know what it's about and they're gonna go to their grave believing that.
I mean, what does it really mean?
It really means...
It really means what's at the core of all the rock stardom, that whole...
Let's face it, at the bottom of a lot of bravado is just basic insecurity and I feel like this record... is a perfect portrait of, like, the essence of what made them rock stars in the first place.
As a kid, growing up,
I imagined the Stones as being absolutely intimidating and raucous and it all being about sex and drugs.
And when you listen to the record, although that may be the environment of the record or the sonic environment of the record, the musicianship on it is seminal, you know?
You had some of the greatest drumming in rock history with Charlie.
And although we think of the Rolling Stones as being... the recordings being steeped in looseness and sort of being a rock and roll shambles, if you will, it's really not.
I mean, it's some of the great,
I think, pop craftsmanship and some of the great rock recording, just as far as the arrangements are concerned, of all time.
And I think that, you know, you get into music now, you listen to some of what's happening and in almost every great rock band, you hear the influence of the Stones.
Exile was the record that really made me go,
"All right, these guys are going to be around forever.
"They're gonna be 95, on the stage, wearing Nikes..."
I've seen you, Mick.
He wears Nikes, that's awesome.
When I came to this...
But I was a freak at that time.
And when I made my record off of their record...
By the way, I met Mick once in LA.
They were, I don't know, doing some record release party which is nex level record release party, like everyone, journalists flew in, you know what I mean?
And he looked at me...
The guy, the producer I was working with, introduced me and said,
"Oh, she made Exile In Guyville."
And he looked at me like he actually forgave me for doing something so awful as to make my record.
And, like, had he known how much I loved this record and that really it became symbolic of a male persona for me.
Like, I actually had a relationship with the guy who is singing all these stories.
And that was my boyfriend and I was either saying, "Oh, please love me", or "You dick!" or whatever I was saying to this guy, this imaginary guy, was what this record meant to me.
It was all the men that I had loved and thought were flamboyant and stood out from the crowd in our rock and roll scene in Chicago, and didn't give me the time of day, or they did, or they toyed with me or whatever it was,
I was deep in a personal relationship with this record.
And I was not critiquing it.
I was yelling at my imaginary boyfriend.
Nobody really ever asked me about Exile On Main St. when I was making or when I came out with
Exile In Guyville, except to say, "Is it really a song by song response? Because I don't hear it."
And, frankly, I think that's just sexism because you'd have to be a girl to understand what I was doing.
Men would be like,
"Well, you have no horns."
You know? "There's no brass."
You know? They just didn't get it.
See, I'm not sure what prompted the decision.
But I just got a call from Mick, early in 2009, saying, "We're thinking of reissuing Exile
"with a few exra previously unreleased tracks.
"Would you be interested?"
"Yeah, OK."
So, nex thing I know...
I got the equivalent of 200 boxes of tape, maybe more.
It was all on hard drives at this point.
When I first started on the thing,
I got a fax from Keith. A stern one.
Saying, "Don't try to make it sound like Exile. It already is Exile."
And that was very wise and he was absolutely right.
The task was to not get in the way of it.
Don't fix it up.
You know, it really is archival, as much as anything.
Part of the consideration was...
Don't just put out the same stuff that's been bootlegged to death if you're gonna add something new to it.
And let's try to find those gems, like Sophia Loren, that no one has heard.
Like, no one's heard, that's never been bootlegged. That was a joy.
Aladdin Story, which has been heard and covered by Death In Vegas.
I don't know if you ever...
It's amazing...
They did a recording of it, and very faithful, too.
But no one's ever heard it with the vocal.
So that's something that's cool.
It was really... to try to make something interesting for people, something that would hold together.
We were really just looking for three or four tracks.
We ended up finishing 1 1, and to be honest with you, there's more there.
And it'd already been pillaged, too, for Tattoo You and for Goats Head Soup.
And there's a lot of great stuff to be left off because it didn't fall into that period.
The lines between when Exile begins and where Let It Bleed and Sticky Fingers end, it's a little grey.
So some of the reels that might have had something relevant to Exile also had other stuff.
The first thing I put on, it said
Honky Tonk Women and I was, "What"?
So, I put that reel on first and...
It was the nine takes leading up to the final take of Honky Tonk Women.
And they should just put that out.
You can chart the thing...
It starts with Country Honk and they took that as far as they could and that wasn't where it was supposed to go, and I think nex day they start over and lan Stewart's playing honky=tonk piano.
And Keith's playing in the holes of this thing that's filling up all the air.
And somewhere around take nine, they pull the piano out and you got this angular rhythmic thing that he's doing, which makes total sense if you hear the piano, but when you first heard that, it was like, "Wow!"
How does anyone...
I've never heard anything like that, like the beginning of Honky Tonk Women.
From that tuning just to the angular rhythm of it.
So, it's a very interesting trip.
But there was all kinds of stuff.
Although I do believe that the take of Loving Cup that's on the bonus tracks is...
That's my favourite thing, to be honest with you. It's...
It represents...
When we talk about having loose rock and roll without it being sloppy, how far from the centre of gravity can each individual pull the thing and still keep the centrifugal force going...
This version of Loving Cup absolutely takes it to the limits and it's fantastic, man.
It's just... And Mick's vocal on it.
It's just such an attitude, you know?
Like it just requires a guy of that age who does whatever he wants to do to sing with that attitude.
And it's so...
I think that really captures the spirit of this.
I love that track.
And it's different.
It's guitarcentric as opposed to being pianocentric.
It's not a gospel song, which it is on this.
But outside of the choice of takes on that, they did the right thing here.
I think it's just fun.
Fun to listen to.
You've heard all the Beatles stuff and you've heard a whole lot of the Dylan stuff.
And, you know,
I don't think there are too many people that mean that much to you, where the sound has emotional triggers that transcend the notes.
That's the thing about the Stones.
When you hear that five=string tuning when Keith plays that, or when you hear Mick's voice, or even when you hear Charlie lifting up off the high hat on the two and the four like nobody else does... When you hear those things, whether the Rolling Stones like it or not, it's got all sorts of emotional triggers for people that transcend the records.
So that's an essential component of this.
It took years and, ultimately, it took playing music with the Rolling Stones, actually playing bass with them just during sessions and between songs and everything like that, to understand what goes on in that band.
The Rolling Stones really listen to each other.
They're quick to react, as they are in conversation.
It's a highly conversational band.
The exchange, musically, between the players is...
...it's jocular and it's loose and it's quick.
And just as their conversational repartee is like that, so is their playing.
And whatever goes on interpersonally between any of them,
I believe it evaporates when they start playing.
And they're loose.
It reminds me so much of Miles Davis.
Miles Davis was the jazz example.
That band that he had around that same time, that had Herbie Hancock and Wayne Shorter and Ron Carter and Tony Williams, was loose, was floating on this incredible drum thing that's happening, and confident and a little cocky.
It's the way you should play rock and roll.
Without self=consciousness, without being stiff, without showing off.
It's not a show=off record.
It's not filled with "look how fast I can play".
It's a really soulful record.
You can't overstate the importance of Mick Taylor.
That's something else I learned from listening to this stuff.
He's a great foil for Keith's playing.
It's different from what he's got going with Ronnie, where they talk about the weaving of the guitarists.
This is two very separate approaches that bounce off each other in a really unique way.
It's a real strong characteristic of the Stones' recordings from that period.
Something else that I really got hip to was just how great a bass player
Bill Wyman is.
He's a crazy, genius bass player.
I'm a bass player,
I can learn his parts note for note, but I could never come up with them.
He sort of thinks like a guitar player and he's playing in holes where a guitar player might play with a very melodic kind of thing and the tone of the bass doesn't have a big low register, it's almost nasally sounding, it's almost like it's the seventh string of the guitar.
But then, he'll throw in some James Jameson kind of thing, some totally funky fill that's just like...
It's quite sophisticated.
He's an enigmatic musician... but such an important component in this stuff.
If there's one thing, one big overall thing, that I learned about Exile from listening to all this stuff... it's that maybe everything that you heard about actually happened, but when they were recording... they were on their game.
You couldn't possibly write all these songs and record all these songs and play them as well as they did, and not be at the top of your game.
So, the mythology's got to include some superhuman strength and has got to acknowledge that they're really professional, they're really a great band.
There's nothing shitty about Exile On Main St.
When you really get into it, there's a looseness but that should not be mistaken for sloppiness.
There's nothing sloppy about Exile.
And there's a lot of really good stuff.
Plus, in the things that weren't included on the album, you can see the link, you can see the link to...
Like Aladdin Story, for example, which is called something else now...
That's the link to Between The Buttons and Exile. But there is one.
So, a lot of these things...
In fact, if you just listen to these 18 songs, it's like "Wow, where did that spring from?"
But there actually is some lineage and connection.
Mick and l, sometimes, just before we start making an album, say, "What kind of album do we want to make?"
And I say, "Make a Rolling Stones album."
That's about as far as I can narrow it down.
It's really a matter of surprising yourself, it's about what's coming out.
If I knew everything that was to be played it would probably sound as dead as a doornail, you know.
You kind of tend to write songs no matter what else you're doing.
It's not one of those things where you sit down and say,
"Songwriting time."
It's just something that happens during the day.
You might pick up a guitar to tune it, and before you know it you've got a song.
If you're lucky.
I never pushed songwriting.
It's a...
Idea comes in.
Like an antenna.
You know, "Incoming, transmit."
Albums, what you get, you say, "That's that album," a lot of albums roll over into the nex one.
Some of the stuff that you do...
And, say, Sticky Fingers, towards the end you've got more stuff than you can use, you say, "We'll just save it."
So you kind of roll over material that way, and the album becomes what gets on there, but to us the process is continual, usually.
But it's, "Let's use these 12 songs, and what do we call it?"
"I know, Beggars Banquet.
I know, Let It Bleed, Exile On Main St."
So you kind of take snippets of something that's going on all the time.
Still is.
On a good day I can still write a song.
It interested me, and I think probably the other guys, of actually not recording in a recording studio = that was a novelty.
Because before then, you always thought...
"To make a record you've got to go in the studio."
This kind of if you've broken a leg you've got to go to hospital.
We found out you could break legs just as simply and easily without bothering, that you could actually make an environment that you could work with.
I think we first thought it would be a bit of an experiment and then we'd move on to another studio.
But by the time we'd got settled in and things were starting to happen, it was just, "Why bother?
We've got what we want here."
So it was a matter of experiments, a lot of that.
I mean, getting lost in those damn basements... It was enormous.
So you could say, "Let's try the drums in that one for this song
"because it's got more echo, more snap."
Or you put the bass in another room.
You could experiment with the place like that, find the best spot for each instrument.
It's got a kind of very dense sound, that you can pretty much tell that it was recorded there.
I'd say the beginning, the first month, was probably a little bit touch and go whether we'd actually pull it off, but then it started to flow, and as I say, we said, "We don't need to go anywhere else, we can do it all here."
And I said,
"Great. In that case, I'll stay. I'll unpack."
I think we always wanted to be a bit of a soul band as well, and horns... they were...
I wouldn't have said...
Maybe it was because it was Bobby and Jim Price, it was just the two cats, it wasn't like a whole full horn section which can be a lot to take care of.
With just the two guys, they fit into the size of the band real well.
It just gave us that exra texure that we'd been looking for.
So we basically just were a bit of a soul band, in a way, at that time.
Bobby and I were working together for a couple of years before we realized that... actually born on the same day, same everything, within hours of each other.
I said, "The only problem with Bobby is that he's a Texan.
"Otherwise he's great."
We'd never even intended it to be a double album until finally we'd sort of run out of songs and said,
"Wow, there's too much for one album
"but there's too much good stuff.
"We can't cut this baby up."
So we decided to go for the double.
Sometimes it's the hardest part of making albums = what order do the songs come in?
And you kind of get used to listening to them, jumbling them up, and saying, "That one works nice off of that," and you kind of work it like that.
It's a bit like a jigsaw puzzle.
Sometimes you have a good track but it doesn't somehow work coming out of that track or going into that.
And of course there's always the thing that somebody else has a different feeling about it, and so you've got to...
"Well, do we flip a coin or what?"
But it's quite a process.
We were successful, I suppose, in that respect, that it hangs together well.
That's an important thing with a record.
You can have the same record, the same songs, but if they're in a sort of order that sometimes can jar and not quite hang together.
And that's the difficult thing = you've made a great record and you know it's good stuff, but will it hang together?
With Exile I think we did it.
It's just having, I think, maybe the exra amount of space to play with.
You know, more songs, more time.
Firstly it was received with a little bit of doubt and scepticism, but then it just started to pick up and then it kept going and going and going until some people now say,
"It's the best album you've ever done."
I don't know about that, but I'm still very proud of it.
I can never pick...
I mean, what do I think's the best?
I could never think in those terms.
It's just, "Well, that was what was the best of what I did then."
You're kind of used to seeing us chopping and changing in this life, but yeah, we'd also been off the road for quite a while, and quite honestly we had to get used to how things had changed in the about two years that we were off.
Technology had changed immensely.
I mean, they actually...
You had PAs, which sounds weird now, but when we used to work in the '60s... most PAs were a couple of little speakers hung on a side of a wall, one of which usually worked, and that was just for the vocal.
So we had to get into learning miking up, monitors, so we had to do a lot of catch=up to start with.
It didn't take long, but it's a lot more to consider.
Before, you just went on stage and hoped they heard you. That was it.
It was kind of exciting to go to Cannes and walk along the beach and see all the topless girls, which you didn't see in England, and naked girls and all that.
That was a bit of fun.
And just getting into that, and then, much later, meeting... famous artists, painters.
I did, anyway. I don't know about the others, they left earlier.
It was...
And living in a really nice house.
I lived in a place called the Bastide de Saint Antoine which was near Grasse where they do the perfume.
And...
I had these beautiful gardens with high wild flowers and all that, and they had their own vineyards and they used to have their own wine.
Used to have about 400 or 600 bottles of wine every year from their grapes, which you drank, it was the house wine.
And I would go in the gardens and I could just take photos of nature and see massive great grass snakes about seven foot long.
And it was really, really interesting.
I've always loved nature anyway.
And I did a lot of movie films of a praying mantis eating insects and things.
I just enjoyed all that.
But then, when it came to recording, when they finally got the Stones' mobile studio over to Keith's house, very convenient for Keith, wasn't it?
There was this stairway that came down from upstairs, and it turned, at the bottom of the stairway it turned, and there was a room.
It was probably nine foot square, maybe ten.
That was where we recorded.
And it used to get so hot in there that condensation used to run down the walls and all that.
My bass amp used to be under the bloody stairs, out round there.
The horn players used to be down the corridor in the kitchen, when they were doing things, or vocals.
It was all spread.
We couldn't see the engineer and he couldn't see us = Andy Johns, and Jimmy Miller the producer.
They couldn't see us, we didn't have a contact with them.
So it was always speaking.
And it was just like an oven.
It was not very conducive to making music, really, and it was a bloody miracle we did.
I suppose we had the band there, the whole band there, probably 30%, 40% of the time.
The rest of the time it was just bits.
Me and Charlie, and...
Mick hadn't come, Mick Taylor didn't come, me, Charlie and Keith, so we'd work on something.
Nex day Keith wouldn't come because Mick wasn't there so then Mick'd come and then he'd see Keith wasn't there so the nex day he wouldn't come.
And sometimes we'd all get there to do a session and Keith wouldn't even come, he was upstairs sleeping, and we'd...
Charlie had come five hours, me and Mick Taylor had come two hours,
Mick had come an hour, and Keith's upstairs, and he didn't come down to the session.
It was like madness.
Musically, he was a better musician than any of us in the band, definitely.
He was young, he was...
God, some of the things he did were... just amazing.
He was incredibly boring on the stage.
He'd just stand there and look at his guitar and just do these most amazing licks and riffs and solos, but he'd just... like that, you know.
God, the audience would see the top of his head all the time.
And I always thought he could have been a bit more... to the public...
But then I'm not a good one to talk, am I?
I don't leap about much.
In 30 years with the Stones I've probably made three steps on the stage.
By the time it gets to that stage it's quite different from the way it starts, and you've got names of songs, and you think... and you think,
"Tumbling Dice? Which one's that?"
And then you hear it and you say, "Oh, yeah,
"that's the track we called so=and=so, that had a different name."
And Keith used to think of funny names.
He'd call one, like...
General Election or something, you know.
And it'd turn out to be
All Down The Line or...
So when you saw the list of the tracks on the album, what were going on, you didn't know which one was which, cos you didn't know them by those titles.
Cos Mick wrote the lyrics much later, often, we did the tracks, and then he did the lyrics later and put them on.
You'd heard them so many times that they were just like... you didn't really want to listen to them for a while.
And Charlie's the same.
He says, "I don't listen to it.
Once you get the album, I don't listen to it."
I'll say, "I don't either."
I don't put the record on.
When you get the record,
I don't put it on my turntable and listen to it.
Keith does. Keith'd put it on and play it for the nex three weeks solid, every night, morning, noon and night, at full volume.
And he does that, bless him, that's what he does.
We went back to our roots with Beggars Banquet and then we just continued in that way.
I don't see a lot different on Exile On Main St. from the two albums before it or the one after it, actually, Let It Bleed.
They're all my favourite albums, those four albums are my favourites, of all the career.
I think that's when we were at our peak musically, inventively, creatively, and on stage we were dynamite.
No one could come near us on stage, no one.
That whole period was incredibly intense and creative for all of us because it was a new beginning for the band and they'd signed a new contract with Atlantic Records and we had to, in theory at least, we had to come up with at least six albums in six years.
If we weren't hanging out together or recording... we were touring.
I just remember most of the time we were either in the studio or we were socialising together or we were on the road.
The enduring thing about being with the Stones, right from the very beginning, actually,
I mean, right from when I first joined them,
I'd be going over to
Mick's house in Cheyne Walk and he'd be playing old blues records.
Same with Keith.
It always had this underlying... sort of rootsy blues feel, which was what really... you know, made it so special.
I think it was a real struggle for Keith and Anita once we started the recording process, because you're mixing domesticity, in a way, with... not to put too grand a term, art.
Domesticity and art don't necessarily mix.
Although we were recording down in a basement that was separate from what was going on above...
There were constant power failures, and...
Compared to the way records are made today, it was quite primitive and quite basic.
You know, I remember Mick having to sing using... having to use a different part of the basement, maybe a disused toilet, or something, to do his vocal overdubs in.
They basically had to turn it into their home, and of course... it ended up being like a holiday resort for all their friends and everybody else's friends.
And in the midst of all this holidaying and partying we were trying to make an album.
In those days all the other girls were, like, very kind of... not middle class, but kind of very quiet and wanted to have a baby and wanted to get married and all of that, and I...
For me it was not on the agenda.
I just wanted to live out the dream.
That place was just amazing, it was just exraordinary, it was very decadent.
And it belonged to an admiral called Alexandre Bardes or Bordes, and he was an admiral, an English admiral, and he collected exotic plants.
And so from every trip that he went he brought these plants home and he just filled up the garden with all these monkey trees, baobab,
I mean, it was like a jungle.
There were places where I wouldn't even go.
And the whole house was like... it was majestic and very big, very, very kind of decaying.
No furniture =
I remember bringing some rugs.
They're in all the photographs of Dominique Tarle.
I say, "Oh, that rug..."
We brought along the rugs. So we kind of lived in that kind of style anyway, rock'n'roll, hippy, whatever, all on the floor basically.
Everybody that came there, they were shocked.
You know, they said,
"How can a beautiful place
"have all these toys on the floor and silly guitars..."
The best places were for the guitars = all the nice couches and everything, all guitars.
You always had to sit somewhere...
I mean, Keith still does that, he's always got the guitar in the best place, his best seat.
It was great. They all took part.
I don't know, in the evening we put them to sleep, and that's it.
I don't know how you could sleep with all that noise, but kids are kids, so...
And then they had a great attitude towards the grown=ups as well, and the grown=ups had to deal with them as well, especially Jake and Charley who were older than Marlon,
Marlon was still a toddler, two years old.
But the other ones were always very demanding and kind of confronting them and playing with them.
No, it was really good, a good vibe.
Lunch was always outside, and dinner was always...
I remember running in the kitchen, like, all the time.
"We need more of that, more of that..."
It was really...
I don't know who paid for it, but I'm sure it cost a bomb.
And all the wines and all of that, and we always had liquor in the house.
It was like a freeloading kind of brigade, basically.
And some of them were really annoying, and I got more and more bored with all these people and I became a bouncer.
I kind of remember standing at the top of the stairs and just throwing... emptying a room out that somebody had slept in and just throwing all these clothes down.
And everybody was like, "She's a monster!"
That's what I ended up doing, just throwing everybody out.
Then I started to move around rooms, and for a period I moved into a room just above the truck.
But that was also part of our escape route in case we got busted.
We had this escape route that we planned so you could jump out the window where I was sleeping, and then jump on the bus and get out really quickly, because otherwise it was all these corridors and staircases.
So we had it all sussed, we had it pretty sussed.
It was really incredible, yachts... it was, like, the deepest harbour in the Mediterranean, and then there was the Sixh Fleet, the Germans were there, all the navy people were there.
The Sixh Fleet would come in, they'd have LSD, and all the village would open and all these people would ravage the village, and shoot=outs, and it was like a...
Yeah, it was like a frontier, like being in the Far West.
All these sailors, like, running around.
That was more interesting than what was going on in the house for us.
So we used to go up and drive up to them and pretend to be pirates and do all kinds of nonsense.
A couple of them had skull and bones flags as well, so there was, like, this element of bonding with these people, but they didn't think so.
And then, I mean, Keith, he drove out with his motorboat, and then he ran out of gasoline so then he sent flares and we had to go to Villefranche and pick him up.
But that happened a lot.
When you live with them, that's what you see. You don't see... all the other people from the outside see...
It's a kind of reality that you live with.
And I've always found it really sad that people always say,
"It was all sex and drugs and rock'n'roll."
It was rock'n'roll and drugs and sex, in that order.
When it came out, yes,
I was really proud of them.
I was really proud of Keith as well.
I loved it right away, from Rip This Joint all the way down.
It's amazing, it really is special.
I actually went to France and bought a house and set up home there.
Everybody else rented a place or something.
And I chose somewhere, typically me, right in the middle of sort of North Wales, the equivalent thereof.
So it was miles from anywhere, right in the mountains, so...
But I still have it.
It was an old = well, old = it was an Edwardian villa, beautiful thing.
Keith had this fabulous balcony that he overlooked the end of the thing...
Where was it, Nellcote?
At the Cap Ferrat or something.
Good sound in the cellar, it was a huge cellar.
It wasn't a little place.
I think I was in the sort of coal bunker bit, but it was a good sound for the drums, the drums were great.
Time to Keith was a very loose thing.
It was a very small T=l=M=E because it meant...
He's like it even now he's straight.
Keith's time is...
I don't mean his playing time but his time of getting up and going...
It's quite normal for Keith to work from sort of eight in the evening till three o'clock the nex afternoon.
And Mick works from eight at night till twelve at night, and goes home.
So as a drummer you're in the middle of doing it all.
That's why it was good at Nellcote, cos you could do that.
Didn't matter when I went to bed.
No, I'm serious. Keith works like that.
Anyway, and with various other things going on, you might not work for two days and then do a whole two days without sleep the nex.
Keith likes to do a good track, keep it, and play it over and over again, for at least a year.
He likes that.
Mick and I tend to do it and hear it back and never play it again ever.
And Mick will just hear it when he mixes it and that's it.
Keith will play them endlessly.
That's why Keith's a good one to... if you ask him about a track you did two years ago, he'll have it on his thing and know...
If it's a good one he'll know it and play it.
It's very good...
What I meant about him being a jazz player is he plays like that, his playing is... it's very easy playing with Keith.
Very easy.
Your only critic is yourself, really.
He doesn't say, "Ooh, that's horrible."
And he doesn't stop playing if whatever.
It's like, "If that's how you want to do it, see what happens.
"I didn't like it, but you liked it."
He's very easy like that, very easy to play with.
And if it's good he's very complimentary about it.
So he's very easy to play with.
Well, it's a long time I've played with him.
Very comfortable to play with.
What I think happened with Exile is that we had all these odd things going, and the songs that were done for the albums that we used... so we had these other things that were actually... like Casino Boogie and all those things, normally they're pushed, not used, but they'd slowly come to the surface and we needed them to do this thing and they...
That's how...
And sometimes you miss the best things.
You do, no matter who you are.
Mick won't like using something from two days ago, so you'll miss it.
Not his fault, it's just how it evolves.
And sometimes you have an idea of an album, that it should all be this, and so you dismiss the other stuff.
And that's kind of what happened with Exile.
We picked up a lot of stuff that was dismissed off the albums before, couple of albums.
They always say that about great writers.
"All great writers are alcoholics."
And you go, "No, they're not."
And you look at them and you think,
"Bloody hell, the great ones actually were!"
Mostly.
Fitzgerald, all that lot.
It's like, "Whoa, wait a minute."
So maybe that's true. I don't know.
That's been said about jazz musicians for years.
I was going to ask that as well...
Now, you could be right.
How many people copied Charlie Parker cos he was so great and so fucked up at the same time?
Many people.
But I don't think it made him greater than he actually was.
It may have made him spend more time on it, I don't know, cos that's what it does, it messes your...
I don't know, actually, about that one.
And also when you're younger you can cope with it.
It's when you're older you can't.
And it doesn't hang on you so well either.
I remember hanging out with the Stones in the Olympic, when I first met them with the Faces, the Small Faces, when I used to hang out with them.
They sang...
...the background vocals to
Get Off My Cloud, things like that.
Many good memories of parties, cos Olympic used to have three different studios.
You'd have the Faces in one, the Stones in another,
David Bowie in another.
Everyone would meet in the canteen, like, "How's it going? All right?"
I remember, yeah, it was a really big moment in my life.
Like, "The Stones have to leave England!"
Yeah.
And then I got hit by the taxman as well.
So was the government starting to come after the big rich rock stars?
I got hit for 80 grand or something, which meant me having to leave England, and I went, "Now I understand what Exile was all about."
Because, just like the general public, it took them years to find out how good the album was.
When it first came out as a double album, it was great to me, but really... not understandable by the general public.
It was like, "Double album?
"These guys really think they can do a double album?"
I mean, it's twice as many songs.
They were all fantastic.
I was born with those songs in my mouth, anyway.
You can name any song off of there and I was with it.
I didn't have to learn it.
When I joined the band, back in '7 4 or whenever, when I had to learn
160 songs or something, that was my initiation down in Woodstock...
I ended up teaching them to the band.
I knew the songs. I'd never played them before but I just knew them.
Well, Mick will be a fusspot because he always is, to today.
He's mixing, he's remixing Exile now.
So that shows you.
It's never quite... perfect enough.
In his view.
But to my view... it's different.
It hits the nail on the head whether the tracks are mixed or not.
Preuzeto sa www.titlovi.com
